Chris Finch is finalizing a deal to join Nick Nurse’s coaching staff with the Toronto Raptors, sources tell ESPN. Most recently, Finch’ has been an assistant with New Orleans and Denver. He has a long history with Nurse dating back to the G-League and Europe.
Here's how sources describe the marketplace for a possible Russell Westbrook trade: Slow developing.
A three-part podcast series debuting on Monday: “The Giannis Draft”
The NBA has informed teams that an aggregate of $384.4M will be returned to teams from escrow system of player salaries -- $12.8M per team, according to memo shared with teams. This was part of the Force Majeure reductions to salaries in 2019-2020 season.
ESPN story on Oklahoma City hiring assistant Mark Daigneault as franchise's next head coach:
The Oklahoma City Thunder are promoting assistant Mark Daigneault to become the franchise’s next head coach, sources tell ESPN.
The Oklahoma City Thunder and Phoenix Suns are engaged in talks on a Chris Paul trade. @WindhorstESPN and @TimBontemps reporting on ESPN:
The BOG vote was unanimous, source says.
Vote passed, per source.
The NBA's Board of Governors call is underway and teams are expected to soon approve by vote the amended CBA negotiated with the NBPA, sources tell ESPN. This clears the way for new salary cap/financial rules to start the 2020-2021 league season.
Orlando player development coach Rick Higgins is joining Stephen Silas as an assistant with the Houston Rockets, sources tell ESPN. Higgins joins former head coaches John Lucas and Jeff Hornacek on the new staff. Higgins is the son of ex-NBA player and GM Rod Higgins.
ESPN story with @TimBontemps on NBA, NBPA agreement on amended CBA and free agency starting on November 20 — two days after draft.
Talks on opening the NBA’s transaction window — trades, contract opt-ins and outs, etc. — are progressing toward firming a date two or three days prior to the November 18 draft, sources tell ESPN.
The NBA and NBPA have reached agreement on an amended CBA, sources tell @TimBontemps and me. Free agency begins at 6 PM on Nov. 20, with signings allowed at 12:01 PM on Nov. 22.
The Indiana Pacers are hiring Kaleb Canales as an assistant coach, sources tell ESPN. Canales has had extended recent runs with Knicks (2018-2020), Mavericks (2013-2018) and Blazers (2008-2012). Canales was an interim HC with Portland in 2012.
Chauncey Billups and Larry Drew are finalizing assistant coaching deals to join Ty Lue's staff with the Clippers, sources tell ESPN.
First, there won't be finalized deal between NBA/NBPA until just prior to draft. Teams would be managing FA and draft simultaneously. Also, switching order starts new salary cap year earlier, offering some teams edge in draft-related trades that otherwise wouldn't be possible.
Among NBPA player reps on tonight’s call, there was some curiosity about starting free agency prior to Nov. 18 Draft, sources tell ESPN. For a few reasons, it isn’t possible under these circumstances. However, it is an idea that's had some support among teams in ordinary times.
ESPN story on NBPA vote to accept a December 22 start and reduced 72-game schedule for 2020-2021 NBA season:
The NBA and NBPA are expected to discuss moving up the start of free agency as early as possible to accommodate players joining new teams so close to a Dec. 1 start of training camps, sources tell ESPN.
Source: All Votes Counted.
The NBPA player rep vote has completed, approving a December 22 start/72-game regular season, source tells ESPN. Next up: NBA/NBPA finishes financial terms on amended CBA, which will take into next week. Expect trade moratorium to be lifted shortly prior to Nov. 18 Draft.
The Sacramento Kings are finalizing a deal to hire Rex Kalamian as an assistant coach, sources tell ESPN. Kalamian spent the past two seasons with the Clippers after lengthier recent stops with Toronto and Oklahoma City.
Marcus and Markieff Morris -- unrestricted free agent forwards -- have signed with agent @ChafieFields of Wasserman, sources tell ESPN. Fields is one of the few agents representing both NFL and NBA clients.
From 1992 to 2003, Lucas spent parts of two seasons each as a head coach in San Antonio, Philadelphia and Cleveland.
John Lucas has agreed to a deal to join new Rockets coach Stephen Silas on his coaching staff, sources tell @espn_macmahon and me. Lucas had been in a player development role under Mike D'Antoni.
Ericka Weems, 37, was found shot dead in her Akron home on Monday afternoon. LeBron James and the Weems' family grew up together in Akron. James and Cavaliers front office executive Brandon Weems -- Ericka's brother -- are lifelong friends.
Brandon Weems is the Cavaliers director of scouting
ESPN story with @ZachLowe_NBA: The NBA’s Board of Governors and the Players Association are holding separate meetings on Thursday expected to culminate with an agreement on starting the 2020-2021 season on Dec. 22 and playing a reduced 72-game schedule.
The NBPA is holding team calls today, sharing with players details of a proposed agreement with NBA that includes a Dec. 1 start to camps, three preseason games and discussions on a salary escrow for players in the range of 18 percent for the next two years, sources tell ESPN.
Reporting w/ @ZachLowe_NBA: NBA has Thursday meeting of Board of Governors that will share latest w/ teams on progress toward reaching deal for pre-Christmas start to season. NBPA/team reps meeting as soon as Thursday PM, expected to get a consensus on approving a Dec. 22 tip.
That setup gives the teams who finish the regular season seventh and eighth two chances to secure a postseason berth. The Nos. 9 and 10 teams would have to win twice -- without losing -- in order to snare one of those two spots.
The play-in tournament proposal has coalesced around the structure ESPN first reported was gaining traction in early 2018: a four-team tournament among the Nos. 7, 8, 9 and 10 seeds for the final two playoff spots in each conference.
The NBA is searching for ways to increase cash flow into teams, and sources said the league is hopeful to expand guidelines on sports betting, hard alcohol and casinos that could generate between $80M and $100M in revenue.
ESPN story with @ZachLowe_NBA: Adam Silver to GM's on talks for a December start to 2020-21 season: "Time is running out." NBA-NBPA discussions, details on a play-in tournament and scramble to reach deal on pre-Christmas tip to spare $500M-plus in losses.
The NBPA's engaged with conversations with players on the issue of the start date of the season -- December or January -- and also continues to negotiate with the league on a number of financial amendments to the CBA needing resolution for start of 2020-2021 season, per sources.
Sources: On the chances of getting an agreement for a Dec. 22 start to season -- with training camps presumably needing to start within a month -- Commissioner Adam Silver told teams today: "We're running out of time."
ESPN Sources: NBA had a call with its general managers today, reiterating that there’s still no timeline agreed upon with NBPA to start the 2020-2021 season. Talks continue with union, but there's an increasingly short window to get an agreement in place for a pre-Christmas tip.
The Bulls are hiring Bucks assistant Josh Longstaff for Billy Donovan’s coaching staff, sources tell ESPN. For Longstaff, it is an opportunity to elevate to a front-of-the-bench assistant.
Sacramento assistant Bob Beyer is joining Stan Van Gundy’s coaching staff in New Orleans, sources tell ESPN. Beyer had been with SVG on his staffs in Orlando and Detroit.
ESPN story on NBA-NBPA impasse on agreeing to a December start of season -- and league fears that delaying until January could cost $500 million to $1 billion in losses next season and beyond:
The NBA wants a shortened 72-game season with the Dec. 22 start, but playing fewer games than that in a potential January start hasn't been raised, sources said.
There's still a gulf between NBA and NBPA on a start date for the 2020-2021 season, sources tell ESPN. NBA wants pre-Christmas; NBPA still preferring mid-January. Economic issues remain significant, including escrow withholding on player salaries w/ revenues down b/c of no fans.
ESPN Sources: For fourth time, NBA and NBPA agree to extend deadline to serve notice on terminating the Collective Bargaining Agreement. Extension goes to Nov. 6 now, which allows additional time for talks on CBA modifications. Discussions are ongoing this weekend.
NBA players must be tested every day for the coronavirus and return a negative test each time to be allowed to participate in offseason workouts at team facilities, according to a memo shared with teams today.
Two seasons as Agua Caliente head coach for Adams.
Clippers G League coach Brian Adams is joining Doc Rivers’ staff with the Philadelphia 76ers, sources tell ESPN. Adams had been Agua Caliente’s head coach for a season after working as a coaching associate under Rivers with the Clippers and Celtics.
ESPN story on Mike D'Antoni finalizing an assistant coaching deal to reunite with Brooklyn Nets coach Steve Nash.
Udoka spent seven years on Gregg Popovich's staff in San Antonio, and has interviewed for several head coaching jobs. He spent last season with Philadelphia. Jacque Vaughn is the Nets top assistant coach. Nash has built a strong staff for his first season as head coach.
Mike D’Antoni and Ime Udoka are finalizing deals to become assistant coaches under Steve Nash with the Brooklyn Nets, sources tell ESPN. Together, D’Antoni and Nash were the architects of the Seven Seconds or Less Offense with the Phoenix Suns in the mid-2000’s.
The Woj Pod with @espn_macmahon on Daryl Morey and the Sixers, Stephen Silas and the future of the Rockets, the end of an era in Utah and restarting the NBA season in December. Apple: Spotify:
The Woj Pod with @espn_macmahon: Daryl Morey to the Sixers, Stephen Silas' hiring and the Rockets future, the end of the Miller family ownership era in Utah and the stakes surrounding starting the 2020-2021 season in December. Full audio on ESPN:
ESPN story on the Houston Rockets hiring Dallas assistant Stephen Silas as head coach:
Rockets were sold on Silas' offensive ingenuity, his pedigree w/ Rick Carlisle, Steve Clifford and his father, Paul Silas. Silas has coached some remarkable guards in his NBA career, including Luka Doncic, Kemba Walker, Steph Curry. Now he gets to run offense for Harden-Westbrook
Dallas Mavericks assistant Stephen Silas is finalizing a deal to become the next head coach of the Houston Rockets, sources tell ESPN.
Talks on salary cap and tax continue with NBA/NBPA. Had league and union followed the normal formula to determine this season's salary cap -- linking it to overall league revenue -- sources told ESPN that it would have fallen to around $90M -- down from about $109M in 2019-20.
Sources: The NBA bubble in Orlando recouped $1.5B in revenue that would've been lost without restarting the season. Expenses for the bubble were $190M -- $10M more than originally estimated.
NBA is likely to release its 2020-2021 schedule in halves to allow for flexibility and the play-in tournament remains a significant part of the league's plans for next season, sources said.
ESPN Sources with @ZachLowe_NBA: NBA revenues dropped 10 percent to $8.3B in 2019-2020 season, including $200M deemed "net negative impact" on months-long splintering of China partnership.
ESPN story on Daryl Morey finalizing a deal to become Philadelphia 76ers President of Basketball Operations:
Conversations with the Sixers and Daryl Morey started shortly after his departure from Houston, escalated in recent days and will culminate with Morey becoming the Sixers new President, sources tell ESPN. Doc Rivers and Morey have a strong relationship and history together.
A deal is expected to be finalized in the next few days, and Sixers GM Elton Brand is expected to remain in his current position, sources said.
The Philadelphia 76ers are in advanced talks on a deal to hire Daryl Morey to oversee the franchise's basketball operations, sources tell ESPN.
16 50-win seasons, I meant to say.
The Miller family saved the Jazz in the mid-1980's, buying the team and keeping it in Salt Lake. 50-win seasons, 9 division titles and two WC championships. Only the Spurs have a better winning percentage than the Jazz (1470-1014, .592) since the 1989-1990 season.
ESPN story on the Millers agreeing to sell the Utah Jazz to Ryan Smith (@RyanQualtrics) for $1.6 billion-plus.
Smith had been co-creator of the Jazz's "5 For The Fight" jersey patch, which has raised over $25 million for charity in recent years.
Ryan Smith, 40, is a lifelong Utah resident and Jazz fan who built a software company that sold for a reported $8B. Smith and his wife Ashley have had a longstanding relationship w/ franchise. Deal includes Vivint Arena, per sources, and pends approval of NBA Board of Governors.
After 35 years of stewardship, the Millers have entered into an agreement to sell the Utah Jazz to Qualtrics founder @RyanQualtrics, sources tell ESPN.
Apple: Spotify:
Full ESPN story on the NBA's push for a pre-Christmas start and plans for a truncated 2020-2021 schedule:
Because approximately two-thirds of the league’s current jurisdictions still aren’t allowing large gatherings of people  as well as the ominous current trajectory of the virus  the NBA has become less apt to delay start of season and wait on return of fans, sources said.
Another potential casualty of the 2020-2021 season and the coronavirus, sources tell ESPN: The All-Star Game. The event is scheduled for Indianapolis. No final decision has been made.
Sources: NBA and Board Governors continued discussion on call today about playing something resembling more of a baseball series to limit travel outside of bubble. For example, a team might travel to New York and play its two road games against Knicks and one vs. Nets.
The NBA is planning to continue discussions with NBPA on 2020-2021 start plans that would include an opening night in the days prior to Christmas, 70-to-72 regular season games and a play-in tournament, sources tell ESPN.
Full audio of Lakers GM Rob Pelinka on The Woj Pod:
ESPN reporting with @WindhorstESPN, @ZachLowe_NBA and me on NBA Board of Governors meeting underway today to discuss plans for 2020-21 season, including possible start date as soon as Christmas Day:
Apple:
The Milwaukee Bucks are hiring Josh Oppenheimer as an assistant coach, sources tell ESPN. Oppenheimer had previously worked for the team as a member of both the Larry Drew and Jason Kidd coaching staffs.
Los Angeles Lakers EVP and GM Rob Pelinka on The Woj Pod: Inside the championship run, LeBron James and Anthony Davis, Kobe and Gigi, much, much more. ESPN: Spotify:
Pelicans were sold on SVG’s abilities as a teacher with a young roster, his history of building top defensive teams and his vision for the roster in place. His personnel decisions in Detroit was a non-factor in search; he’s coming to coach.
ESPN reporting with @_andrew_lopez: Stan Van Gundy has agreed to a deal to become the next coach of the New Orleans Pelicans.
The sudden loss of Rockets scout BJ Johnson has hit the NBA community hard. Few in basketball as widely beloved as him.
ESPN story on NBA, NBPA extending window to negotiate modifications to the Collective Bargaining Agreement -- with optimism a deal can be done in the next two weeks:
I remember Vaughn reaching out in the mid-2000’s upon accepting a job at my old newspaper  The Fresno Bee  to talk about working there. He replaced @JeffPassan, who left Vaughn all his phone numbers. An honor to have him as an ESPN colleague. A beautiful man, gone far too soon.
As the NBA and NBPA negotiate adjustments to the CBA because of the coronavirus pandemic, each side has until October 30 to give 45 days notice on terminating CBA. While that's still on table, there's optimism an agreement on adjusted terms will be in place prior to Nov 18 draft.
ESPN Sources: For third time, NBA and NBPA agree to extend deadline to serve notice on terminating the Collective Bargaining Agreement. Extension goes to Oct. 30 now, which allows additional time for talks on CBA modifications that sources say continue to be productive.
Rivers begins building out his 76ers coaching staff with Joerger, who had recently interviewed for the Pacers head coaching job.
Former Kings and Grizzlies coach Dave Joerger has agreed to join Doc Rivers' staff as an assistant coach, sources tell ESPN.
Deal has been fully agreed upon now, source tells ESPN.
ESPN story on the Clippers finalizing a five-year deal to hire Ty Lue as the franchise's new head coach:
Ty Lue is finalizing a five-year deal to become the next coach of the Los Angeles Clippers, sources tell ESPN.
Stone will become the 10th current Black executive to hold the GM title in the NBA.
The Rockets are planning to promote Executive VP of Basketball Operations Rafael Stone to general manager, sources said. Stone has played a significant part in the Rockets’ team building throughout his tenure with the organization.
ESPN Sources: Houston Rockets general manager Daryl Morey is stepping down.
Jeff Van Gundy met with Houston Rockets ownership and management today on the franchise's coaching job and conversations with the team will continue on Thursday, sources tell ESPN.
Clippers interviewed assistant Sam Cassell for franchise’s head coaching job on Tuesday, sources tell ESPN. Cassell spent six seasons on Doc Rivers’ staff.
New Kings GM Monte McNair is reshaping his front office, hiring former Hawks GM Wes Wilcox as assistant GM, Philadelphia’s Phil Jabour as VP of Player Personnel and OKC’s Paul Johnson as Director of Basketball Operations, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Stan Van Gundy emerging as a finalist and formidable candidate in New Orleans' search for a head coach:
Another New Orleans finalist -- Clippers assistant Ty Lue -- has a meeting set for this week too, sources tell ESPN.
Stan Van Gundy is meeting with New Orleans Pelicans officials today, emerging as one of four expected finalists for the franchise’s coaching job, sources tell ESPN.
Full audio of Raptors coach Nick Nurse on The Woj Pod:
ESPN story with @espn_macmahon on Ty Lue's coaching candidacy with Rockets gaining momentum after Monday meeting. Lue remains a prominent part of Clippers' search.
Here's a link to Nurse's book -- "Rapture: Fifteen teams, Four Countries, One NBA Championship, And How To Find A Way To Win Damn Near Anywhere" -- released this week:
The Woj Pod with Toronto coach Nick Nurse: Inside his new book, "Rapture," his loathing of fraternizing with peers in bubble, pilgrimage to visit Phil Jackson, proving yourself to players as an NBA coach, much more. ESPN: Apple:
Miami's Goran Dragic has been determined to find a way to play in these NBA Finals with plantar fascia tear in his left foot -- and source says he's been told the injury can't worsen by playing. Pain has been extreme, and he hadn't been able to put much pressure on foot.
76ers assistant Kevin Young has agreed to join Monty Williams’ coaching staff with the Suns, sources tell ESPN. The Sixers interviewed Young for the franchise’s head coaching job.
Here's an Amazon link for "The Spencer Haywood Rule," co-authored by @MarcJSpears and @GwashburnGlobe:
The Woj Pod with The Undefeated’s @MarcJSpears on LeBron James and Kobe Bryant, his new book, “The Spencer Haywood Rule,” hiring practices in the NBA and much more. ESPN: Spotify: Apple
Game 4 coverage of the NBA Finals on ABC, ESPN and ESPN2 tonight
Miami Heat All-Star Bam Adebayo is planning to return for Game 4 vs. the Lakers tonight, sources tell ESPN. Lakers lead series, 2-1.
Golden State assistant Mike Brown had a head coaching interview with Clippers in recent days, sources tell ESPN. Clippers are meeting with multiple candidates. Assistant Ty Lue is still in a strong position there, per sources.
As @Rachel__Nichols says, “This book is phenomenal.” The Spencer Haywood Rule — the story that changed the NBA. Available today. Congrats to authors @MarcJSpears and @GwashburnGlobe.
One of the breakout players of The Bubble  Portland Trail Blazers guard Gary Trent Jr., -- has signed with Klutch Sports, CEO Rich Paul tells ESPN. Paul and agent Lucas Newton will rep Trent Jr.
"Before the surgery, you could see he was clearly favoring his right side; and that it was painful," Dr. Su told ESPN. "It was natural to avoid pushing off and landing off (the left). Four months post-op, we are seeing higher loads and seeing symmetry between the right and left."
Finally, Thomas decided that a procedure by Dr. Edwin Su, a renowned orthopedist in New York, was the best chance to resurrect his playing career. Thomas' hip was bone-on-bone, the pain relentless and the constant favoring of his right side had his balance constantly compromised.
Isaiah Thomas had a hip resurfacing procedure five months ago: “It's like night and day for me," Thomas tells ESPN. "There's no more pain. I've got my full range of motion. For three years, I was trying to play the best players in the world on one leg.”
Both Adebayo and Dragic had hoped they could return for Game 3 vs. Lakers tonight, but the pain and physical limitations on both injuries has them out again.
ESPN story on Heat All-Star Bam Adebayo out for Game 2 of NBA Finals:
Miami Heat All-Star Bam Adebayo (shoulder) will miss Game 2 of the NBA Finals vs. Lakers tonight, but there remains hope that he could return for Game 3 on Sunday, sources tell ESPN. The Heat have listed him as doubtful for tonight.
Pacers are meeting candidates this week and next, a roster of interviews that so far has included former Grizzlies/Kings coach Dave Joerger and Pelicans assistant Chris Finch, sources tell ESPN. Joerger is a strong contender in process. Chauncey Billups gets a sit-down soon too.
Houston and New Orleans are among teams planning to interview Clippers assistant Ty Lue in near future, sources tell ESPN. The Clippers are expected to begin meeting with coaching candidates soon -- and Lue will be prominent in that search to replace Doc Rivers.
Minnesota Timberwolves associate HC David Vanterpool will interview for the Houston Rockets head coaching job, sources tell ESPN. Vanterpool spent seven seasons on Portland staff before becoming the top assistant with Minnesota a year ago.
A serious possibility to join Rivers' staff with the Sixers, sources tell ESPN: Former Pelicans coach Alvin Gentry.
ESPN story on Doc Rivers reaching agreement to become the next coach of the Philadelphia 76ers:
Rivers connected quickly with GM Elton Brand and Sixers ownership in Wednesday's meetings and sides moved quickly toward negotiating a multi-year deal that culminated with a formal agreement minutes ago, sources said.
After a rapid courtship and negotiation, Doc Rivers has reached agreement on a deal to become the next coach of the Philadelphia 76ers, sources tell ESPN.
Full audio of @SteveNash on The Woj Pod:
ESPN story on Doc Rivers' emergence as a serious candidate to become the next coach of the Philadelphia 76ers:
After a productive Wednesday of talks with Sixers, Doc Rivers has emerged as a serious candidate in process to hire a new coach, sources tell ESPN. Rivers left town after meeting with ownership and GM Elton Brand. Mike D’Antoni remains other prominent candidate in search.
Dragic has been able to put pressure on his left foot and hasn't ruled out returning to play in the NBA Finals, source tells ESPN.
Miami's Goran Dragic has suffered a plantar tear of left foot, source tells ESPN.
Full audio of Nets coach @SteveNash on The Woj Pod:
Houston is starting to receive permission to interview assistants for vacant head coaching job, including Denver’s Wes Unseld Jr., and Dallas’ Stephen Silas, sources tell ESPN.
Full audio of new Nets coach Steve Nash on The Woj Pod:
Brooklyn Nets coach @SteveNash on The Woj Pod: Apple: Spotify:
The Woj Pod with David Fizdale: LeBron James and the Lakers, Erik Spoelstra and Pat Riley, the beginnings of the Big 3 in Miami, the staying power of the Heat organization, much more: Apple:
Doc Rivers had two years left on his contract, sources tell ESPN. This is a challenging coaching search for Clippers, who are the ultimate win-now team. Among top candidates in the marketplace: Clippers assistant Ty Lue and former Rockets and Knicks coach Jeff Van Gundy.
Doc Rivers on his departure
Coach Doc Rivers is out with the Clippers, sources tell ESPN.
The Woj Pod with David Fizdale: The Lakers-Heat NBA Finals matchup, LeBron James’ burden with Lakers, inside The Big 3 with Heat, Erik Spoelstra’s place among coaching elite, Pat Riley-Spo dynamic, much more: ESPN: Apple:
ESPN story on Dell Demps transitioning from the front office to coaching, joining Quin Snyder's staff with the Jazz:
The Jazz are also hiring former NBA guard Keyon Dooling in a player development role, sources tell ESPN. Dooling played parts of 13 years in the NBA, and collegiately for Quin Snyder at the University of Missouri.
After leaving New Orleans in 2019, Demps decided he wanted to transition to coaching and spent time in Utah attending practices and meetings with Snyder and his Jazz staff. They were together with G-League Austin 2007-2010 and built a strong working and personal relationship.
Former New Orleans Pelicans general manager Dell Demps has agreed to join the Utah Jazz as an assistant coach, reuniting with Quin Snyder, sources tell ESPN.
Zach Lowe’s story on the NBA/NBPA funded development of a low-cost saliva-based test for Covid-19:
The Woj Pod with ESPN Front-Office Insider @BobbyMarks42: Inside Chicago’s hiring of Billy Donovan, Denver’s emergence as a sustainable Western Conf. force and how the pandemic impacts free agency and spending. Spotify: Apple:
Atlanta is hiring San Antonio’s Landry Fields as an assistant GM, sources tell ESPN. Fields was GM of the Spurs’ G-League affiliate in Austin. Fields, 32, played five years in the NBA.
Spotify: Apple:
ESPN’s @BobbyMarks42 joins The Woj Pod to discuss the Chicago Bulls’ hiring of Billy Donovan, the 76ers coaching search, emergence of Denver as a sustainable NBA force and how the pandemic will impact free agency and team spending. ESPN:
NBA has made official its plan for a draft combine to be conducted in both team markets and virtually, beginning September 28 through early-to-mid November.
ESPN story on the Chicago Bulls hiring Billy Donovan as the franchise's next head coach:
Billy Donovan has agreed to a deal to become the next coach of the Chicago Bulls, sources tell ESPN.
247 Sports analyst Josh Gershon is joining the Minnesota Timberwolves in a draft preparation and player personnel consultant role, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on the Boston Celtics preparing for a Gordon Hayward return in a telltale Game 3 tonight vs. Miami:
Barring a setback in pregame warmups, there’s significant optimism within the Celtics that forward Gordon Hayward (right ankle sprain) will be active to play in Game 3 vs. Miami tonight, sources tell ESPN. After missing a month, Hayward offers a sizable boost for Boston’s bench.
Another candidate interviewing for the Indiana Pacers coaching job, sources tell ESPN: Golden State assistant Mike Brown.
What a blow. Rest In Peace to an American icon.
Celtics upgraded Gordon Hayward (ankle) to "Questionable" for Game 3 vs. Miami on Saturday, an indicator that there's a real chance of his return.
ESPN story on Brad Stevens gathering Boston's leaders for a late-night meeting at hotel in aftermath of emotions spilling into post-Game 2 locker room:
ESPN Sources: Brad Stevens had a late night Thursday meeting with Celtics leaders  Kemba Walker, Jayson Tatum, Jaylen Brown and Marcus Smart  to work through emotions of post-Game 2 locker room. A lot of yelling in locker room, but nothing escalated to a physical confrontation.
Milwaukee’s Giannis Antetokounmpo has won his second consecutive MVP award, sources tell ESPN.
Full audio of Denver’s Tim Connelly on The Woj Pod:
As Masai Ujiri said at news conference today, he’s yet to engage with Toronto ownership on a contract extension. His current deal ends in 2021.
Denver Nuggets President Tim Connelly on The Woj Pod: How he built the NBA’s best young roster, how he turned the corner as a struggling young GM, the emptiness of winning without family in Bubble, much more: Spotify:
Architect of Denver Nuggets  Tim Connelly - joins The Woj Pod on run to Western Finals, resisting trades of a younger Jamal Murray for established stars, fighting to keep confidence as GM in job's early days, emptiness of celebrating without family. ESPN:
Kings decision on a hire is expected this week among other finalists - Minnesota’s Sachin Gupta, Houston’s Monte McNair and former Hawks GM Wes Wilcox, sources tell ESPN. Those three interviewed in Northern California in recent days.
Denver Nuggets GM Calvin Booth has withdrawn from the Sacramento Kings search for a new head of basketball operations, sources tell ESPN. Booth was promoted to GM under President of Basketball Operations Tim Connelly after Arturas Karnisovas left to run Bulls.
Denver assistant Wes Unseld Jr., — architect of Nuggets defense in incredible comeback vs. LAC — made an even stronger case for Bulls’ job. Chicago’s EVP Arturas Karnisovas already thought highly of him, working with Unseld in Denver. Malone: “Wes Unseld should be a head coach.”
ESPN Sources: NBA has locked in November 18th for the 2020 Draft. Date had been tentative.
ESPN Sources: In a three-hour lunch meeting, Bucks co-owner and governor Marc Lasry made it clear to MVP Giannis Antetokounmpo that the franchise plans to spend into the luxury tax to try and deliver him a championship supporting cast:
ESPN Sources: MVP Giannis Antetokounmpo's 3-hour lunch with Bucks co-owner/governor Marc Lasry on Friday covered the season, how Bucks can improve roster, Lasry confirming willingness to spend into luxury tax and agreement they’ll talk again after Giannis returns from a vacation.
Nuggets do it again: Back from brink at 3-1 in conference semifinals. This time, Denver’s forced a Game 7 against Clippers on Tuesday (9 PM ET) on ESPN.
Updated ESPN story on Houston's Mike D'Antoni becoming a free agent and emerging as a candidate with Sixers:
Mike and Laurel D’Antoni statement to ESPN on departure from Rockets
ESPN story on Mike D'Antoni's plans to inform Houston ownership that he's becoming a free agent and won't return to coach the Rockets next season:
D’Antoni will be considered among a group of candidates for the Philadelphia 76ers coaching opening, sources tell ESPN. D'Antoni was an assistant for several months under Brett Brown before accepting the Rockets job four years ago.
D’Antoni, whose contract expired with the end of the Western Conference semifinals on Saturday, turned down extension offers prior to the season.
ESPN Sources: Houston coach Mike D’Antoni is informing the franchise’s ownership today that he’s becoming a free agent and won’t return to the Rockets next season.
Rajakovic, an assistant with the Serbian national team, built a strong reputation working with young players with Oklahoma City and Phoenix. Ideal fit for the Grizzlies trajectory.
The Memphis Grizzlies are hiring Phoenix's Darko Rajakovi as an assistant coach, sources tell ESPN. Rajakovic replaces Neven Spahija, who recently left the Grizzlies for a coaching job overseas.
ESPN Sources: Minnesota EVP Sachin Gupta, Houston assistant GM Monte McNair and former Atlanta GM Wes Wilcox are among those advancing to a second-round of interviews in Sacramento’s search for new top basketball decision-maker. All three will travel to Sacramento.
The NBA is still tenatively targeting a Nov. 18 draft, but that date could still move, sources tell ESPN. Plans continue to center around a virtual draft setting that would allow teams to have "war rooms" at their facilities, sources said.
There is still no clarity on when the 2020-2021 NBA season will start, but the league has told teams to expect an eight-week advanced notice of a proposed opening night of the season, sources tell ESPN.
The NBA tentatively expects to allow teams to begin conducting in-person interviews with 2020 draft prospects starting in mid-October, sources tell ESPN. For now, there are still no in-person workouts with prospects allowed by teams.
Incredible story, incredible journalist. Congrats @MerrillLiz!
Raman replaces Niele Ivey, who left for the head coaching job at Notre Dame.
The Grizzlies hired MIT women’s coach Sonia Raman as an assistant coach, team says.
ESPN story with @espn_macmahon on NBA probing Houston's Danuel House Jr., on possible protocol violation in bubble and the uncertainty surrounding his return to the Western Conference semfiinals:
House was a late scratch for Rockets’ Game 3 loss to the Lakers due to “personal reasons” and is listed as "out" for Thursday’s Game 4 on the official injury report. Sources say league hasn't cleared him to play in Game 4 yet, but NBPA and NBA are discussing issue.
Reporting with @ESPN_MacMahon: Houston Rockets forward Danuel House Jr.’s status for the remainder of the Western Conference semifinals is in jeopardy as the NBA probes a potential violation of bubble protocol. House has denied any wrongdoing to the league.
Billups fits the historical profile of past Indiana coaches Larry Bird and Isiah Thomas: NBA Finals MVP's and generational team leaders -- hired without coaching experience.
ESPN Sources: Chauncey Billups has emerged as a candidate in the Indiana Pacers coaching search:
ESPN story on NBA and NBPA targeting November 18 for the league's 2020 Draft:
A significant part of why teams wanted that draft pushed back -- in this case, likely a month to November 18 -- was to allow the NBA and NBPA more time to negotiate the new salary cap numbers for 2020-2021. Teams need those figures to be able to conduct trades around the draft.
In a memo to teams today, the NBA explains that pushing the draft date back from October 16 allows for a pre-draft prep and a combine, more time to gather information on the potential start date for next season, and the advancing of talks with the NBPA on CBA matters.
The NBA plans to further discuss that November 18 date with the Board of Governors and general managers in meetings this week, per sources. It could become finalized soon.
The league has informed teams of a potential revised 2020 NBA Draft date of November 18, sources tell ESPN. The NBA and NBPA have been negotiating on that new date.
ESPN Sources: Pacers beginning with a wide-ranging list in coaching search, including Becky Hammon and Dave Joerger:
The Chicago Bulls are expected to have an interest in considering Donovan for the franchise’s head coaching job, sources tell ESPN. The Bulls are just completing a first-round of interviews with several candidates.
With reduced league revenues amid pandemic, there remains uncertainty on how long the Thunder might continue with key veterans in place before changing course on playoff contention. The timetable on so many plans in the NBA remain fuzzy. This was an extremely amicable parting.
ESPN story on Billy Donovan and Oklahoma City Thunder deciding against purusing a contract extension and parting ways:
The reality of Oklahoma City’s eventual transition toward a rebuild made it a challenge for the two sides to find a way to continue forward together, sources said.
Discussions between OKC management and Donovan were described as "collaborative" and "realistic." Donovan will become a significant coaching candidate in the NBA marketplace.
ESPN Sources: Oklahoma City coach Billy Donovan won’t be returning to the Thunder next season. Donovan’s contract expired at season’s end and the sides have decided against pursuing an extension.
ESPN story on NBA approving coaches and staff to bring guests into The Bubble:
Per league memo, each team may host no more than a total of 10 staff guests in Orlando.
Staff guests will quarantine the requisite 7 days upon arriving in the bubble, per memo.
The NBA is allowing team staff to bring guests into the bubble starting with the conference finals, per memo shared with teams.
After leaving Game 4, Giannis Antetokounmpo was encouraging the Bucks to tape up his right ankle and let him return -- but he couldn't plant or jump off the sprain, per sources. Around the Bucks, many didn't expect he could play today. No one dares rule him out yet for Game 5.
So Giannis shoots the free throws, leaves the court and heads to the Bucks locker room. Miami, 36-30.
Milwaukee's Giannis Antetokounmpo (right ankle sprain) is planning to play in Game 4 today vs. Miami, sources tell ESPN. (Tip is on ABC, 3:30 PM ET)
Apple link:
CNN’s Daniel Dale (@DDale8) on The Woj Pod: His intense Raptors fandom, joy of this post-Kawhi run, balancing eyes on president’s speeches vs. big Raptors games, the art to his CNN duties -- and a dog named Breezy. ESPN: Spotify:
No one will care Steve Nash can still get a letter on his stars in HORSE. In the end, Brooklyn’s players have to know he’s obsessive in detail and preparation, elevating them in the narrowest margins of postseason basketball. On Nash’s leap to coaching.
NBA’s statement on guest policy for coaches and staff in The Bubble
Via @NBA_Coaches: "The challenges of being away from family for so long can be overwhelming. NBCA discussions with league office are ongoing. We will continue to work with the NBA as partners to evaluate the viability of coaches' families coming to Orlando as more teams exit."
Steve Nash was an infrequent contributor to the Warriors: part workout guru, part confidant. Nash watched Steve Kerr learn to coach, grew his understanding of Kevin Durant. Bob Myers tells ESPN: "Steve got to audit the class before he gets to teach it."
The great @MikeVacc talks to Steve Nash’s old Santa Clara teammate: Hawks coach Lloyd Pierce.
Reporting on @SportsCenter about some of the reasons that led the Nets to hire Steve Nash as coach.
Full audio of GM Sean Marks’ first interview on the hiring of Steve Nash as Nets coach:
Full audio of Sean Marks on The Woj Pod:
Spotify:
Brooklyn Nets GM Sean Marks joins The Woj Pod to discuss the hiring of Steve Nash: How the deal came together, how it fits for Kevin Durant and Kyrie Irving and why a 20-year relationship with Nash helps Marks to believe this will work:
There's a modern history of retired guards getting head coaching jobs without stints as assistant coaches, including Doc Rivers (Magic), Isiah Thomas (Pacers), Mark Jackson and Steve Kerr (Warriors) and Jason Kidd (Nets).
Brooklyn's new coach Steve Nash tells @MarcJSpears: "He’s one of the greatest players I’ve ever seen and to have his confidence is really important.”
ESPN story on the Brooklyn Nets hiring Steve Nash on a four-year deal:
In recent weeks, Nets owner Joe Tsai and general manager Sean Marks have been aggressive in recruiting Nash to make the leap that he had so far resisted in his retirement: head coaching.
Jacque Vaughn will stay as the lead assistant and become the league’s best compensated assistant coach, sources tell ESPN.
Hall of Fame guard Steve Nash has signed a four-year contract to become the next coach of the Brooklyn Nets, sources tell ESPN.
NBA is fining Boston's Marcus Smart $5K for flopping in Game 2 victory over Toronto, source tells ESPN.
ESPN story on the NBA warning teams about spectator conduct courtside in the playoffs:
I'll say this: It's been fantastic to see families in the gym and walking campus. To witness Michael Porter Sr., courtside to watch his son and Denver win Game 7 was pretty cool. It brings a new level of humanity to what otherwise has come to feel like a dreary environment.
NBA has shared with teams a memo stipulating similar restrictions on player guests attending playoff games, per source.
John Thompson had chances, but never did become an NBA coach. Yet he impacted the league far beyond Ewing, 'Zo and AI. There are scores of forefathers to this 2020 equality movement, but none larger than Big John. Monty Williams: "He was like Moses to me."
ESPN story on the assistant coaches granted permission to interview for the Chicago Bulls' head coaching vacancy:
Through his tears, Suns coach Monty Williams found the five words on why John Thompson meant so much to him  and all the kids raised in the shadow of Big John and the Georgetown Hoyas: “He stood up for us.”
The memo to "all governors and senior team basketball operations personnel" is meant as reminder of "higher standards expected" of them. As league memo said, given unique arena conditions, limited number of seats, small buildings, no crowd noise, this is "especially important."
The rules disallow "conversations with game officials, disrespectfully addressing game officials and using profane or objectionable language will be interpreted broadly and strictly," per memo. No directed those comments to refs during breaks or post-game either, league says.
The NBA has warned teams that owners and senior basketball executives -- and their families -- must adhere to proper decorum at playoff games in The Bubble, per memo. "No profane or objectionable language," or "coming onto court" during games.
Georgetown’s John Thompson — Hall of Fame coach and a colossal figure in American sports — has died at 78 years old.
Dan Le Batard does everything exceptionally well in our business, but especially this:
NBA has fined PJ Tucker $25K too, league says.
OKC’s Dennis Schroder has been fined $25K because of a shot to the lower mid-section of Houston’s PJ Tucker in Game 5, source tells ESPN. No suspension.
Denver getting a boost today: Guard Gary Harris (strained hip) is planning a return to the Nuggets lineup for Game 6 vs. Utah, sources tell ESPN. Harris has been sidelined for the entire restart, but made significant progress in recent workouts. Jazz lead series, 3-2.
The Pistons finalized a deal to hire former Lakers executive Ryan West to a player evaluation role in the front office, sources tell ESPN.
The Knicks are finalizing deals for Mike Woodson, Andy Greer and Dice Yoshimoto to join Tom Thibodeau’s staff as assistant coaches, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story with @espn_macmahon on Houston's Russell Westrook participating in his first full-speed 5-on-5 since sidelined with a strained quad. "He looked as explosive as ever," one source said.
Full audio of @malika_andrews on Woj Pod:
ESPN's Jackie MacMullan on Michael Jordan's impact in bridging the gap between NBA players and owners.
There is still a discussion ongoing among players about the timing of a playoff resumption -- with an expectation that a Saturday return of games will be finalized later today, sources tell ESPN.
There is a meeting of NBA owners and players set for later today, sources tell @MarcJSpears and me. The discussion is expected to include plans of action moving forward on social justice issues.
ESPN story on one of the unforgettable 24 hours in NBA history. @ramonashelburne with the writing/reporting, @cristinadaglas editing and reporting with @MarcJSpears, @ZachLowe_NBA, @malika_andrews and me.
The resumption of playoff games could come as soon as Friday, but there is expected to be a return to this season by the weekend, sources tell ESPN.
Today's three playoff games will be postponed, source tells ESPN. Discussion underway on when teams will resume play.
The NBA's players have decided to resume the playoffs, source tells ESPN.
Conversations have been ongoing throughout the morning among owners, league executives, coaches and players about how the league can restart these playoffs, sources tell ESPN. The players and Board of Governors have separate meetings set to start now.
ESPN Sources: Several key members of Lakers -- and some peers around league -- stayed up until early AM hours talking through issues in The Bubble. Among key players in league heading into 11 AM meeting, there's optimism about a majority of players wanting to continue playoffs.
The Woj Pod with @Malika_Andrews goes inside the Bucks’ decision to boycott a playoff game to protest police brutality, its domino impact on shutting down games and a player meeting that left the season in peril: ESPN: Spotify:
The meeting is 11 AM -- coinciding with the timing of the NBA's Board of Governors call, per sources.
Reporting with @malika_andrews: The NBA players have another meeting set for Thursday morning in the bubble to continue the discussion on how they'll proceed with the playoffs.
Sources: As some in tonight's meeting wanted to hear Bucks' explanation for making an abrupt decision independent of rest of teams to boycott game, Boston's Jaylen Brown essentially said that the Bucks didn't need to explain themselves and he fully supported what they did today.
ESPN Sources: Among themes in meeting: NBPA explained financial implications of ending season, including possible lockout next year. Chris Paul on leaving meeting unified; CJ McCollum on needing a plan of action. Doc Rivers on using platform, voting, holding police accountable.
Discussions on continuing season will extend into tomorrow, sources tell ESPN, but appears unlikely the three playoff games on Thursday will be played. "Everyone is still too emotional," one high-ranking source tells ESPN. "There needs to be more time to come together on this."
The Clippers and Lakers voting on perhaps not continuing with the season was considered more of a polling, than a final vote, sources tell ESPN. The resumption of the playoffs remains still up in the air.
As one source in meeting said, "We're trying to figure out how to take action."
Before a packed room of teams in a hotel ballroom at Disney, the discussion is centering on whether to continue with the playoffs -- or end the season, sources tell ESPN. So far, there seems to be momentum not to play the three playoff games on Thursday, but nothing's decided.
So far, speakers in the meeting of NBA players tonight: NBPA president Chris Paul, NBPA VP Andre Iguodala, Kyle Korver and Clippers coach Doc Rivers, sources tell ESPN.
The NBA has scheduled a special Board of Governors meeting on Thursday morning, sources tell ESPN.
Within Bucks, there's sentiment that team wants to continue playing here, sources tell ESPN. The team's statement about it "imperative for the Wisconsin state legislature to reconvene after months of inaction..." was an important element of action that players want to influence.
Statement from @NBA_Coaches Association: The NBA coaches support our players 100 percent. The restart happened largely because of the platform it provided. The baseless shootings of Jacob Blake and other black men and women by law enforcement underscores the need for action...
Inside the locker room, the Milwaukee Bucks were on a conference call with Wisconsin Attorney General Josh Kaul and Lieutenant Governor Mandela Barnes, sources tell ESPN.
Tonight's meeting with players will go a long way toward determining how the players will move forward with rest of season, sources tell ESPN.
Emotions are raw, players were already worn out of bubble environment prior to the Jacob Blake shooting and sources say discussions within teams are ongoing about postponing tomorrow's three games too -- and beyond. "The season is in jeopardy," one vet player here tells ESPN.
Every NBA player is invited to join the meeting in The Bubble at 8 PM to discuss how they'll proceed from today's boycotts, sources tell @ZachLowe_NBA and me.
The NBA, owners and front offices didn't see this wave of player boycotts coming today. Hours ago, they all expected to be playing these games tonight. This is a pivot point for the NBA and professional sports in North America.
All games are postponed, and Game 5 of each series will be rescheduled, NBA says.
The Portland Trail Blazers and Lakers won't be playing Game 5 tonight, league says.
The Lakers have a team meeting soon to discuss the possbility of boycotting Game 5 tonight against Portland, sources tell ESPN.
The Bucks players made this decision in the wake of the Jacob Blake shooting in Wisconsin, ultimately deciding that they wouldn't leave the locker room for the start of Game 5 against Orlando.
The Milwaukee Bucks have decided to boycott Game 5, source tells ESPN.
Top NBA executives are outside of the Milwaukee locker room, but haven't gone inside, per source.
Game 5.
The Milwaukee Bucks still haven't come out to the court for Game 6 with the Orlando Magic and there's been some discussion within the Bucks about a boycott, sources tell @malika_andrews and me. NBA officials have gone into the Milwaukee locker room.
Houston’s Russell Westbrook is expected to test his strained quadriceps on the court prior to Game 5 vs. Oklahoma City today and make a gametime decision on returning, sources tell ESPN.
Players from both teams are expected to meet again tonight, sources tell @MarcJSpears.
D'Antoni isn't an inexpensive hire and that'll be a question for Pacers and small market teams with league revenue stagnant in pandemic: How far will they go to pay a coach? Indiana also plans to search pool of those they'd consider 'program builders' over long-term, per sources.
Rockets coach Mike D’Antoni — in the final year of his contract — will be an Indiana target should he become available, sources tell ESPN.
Pacers had reworked McMillan’s final year on contract for 2020-21 and added a team option for 2021-2022 in form of a soft extension.
Fred VanVleet: “...At the end of the day, if we're gonna sit here and talk about making change then at some point we're gonna have to put our nuts on the line and actually put something up to lose, rather than just money or visibility.”
NBA is moving toward pushing back this year's draft, scheduled for Oct. 16, along with Oct. 18 start of free agency, partly because of likelihood that the tentative opening of the 2020-21 season will be delayed from Dec. 1, per sources. Also allows more time to set a salary cap.
ESPN story on the NBA and NBPA agreeing to a delay in the CBA termination window -- and what it means to preparations for the 2020-2021 season.
NBPA executive director @MRobertsNBPA to ESPN: "Extending is an easy call. If everyone continues to be well-intentioned on how we deal with the economic effects of this virus, we'll just make the appropriate adjustments and there won't be a need to terminate the CBA at all."
Despite current and projected revenue losses impacting the NBA and NBPA revenue split, there’s optimism the sides can reach agreements on temporary changes to the CBA and agreeing on the next salary cap that would preclude the need to enact the nuclear option of terminating CBA.
This agreement guarantees an uninterrupted completion of the NBA playoffs and an opportunity for the league and union to make more informed decisions based upon on the pandemic’s course and the league’s revenue challenges for the 2020-2021 season and beyond.
ESPN Sources: For the second time, NBA and NBPA agree to push back 60-day window that preserves right of each side to terminate the Collective Bargaining Agreement in wake of the pandemic. The new negotiating deadline on modications to the CBA for 2020-2021 is October 15.
Discussed the dismissal of Brett Brown and what’s next with the 76ers on @GetUpESPN with @ESPNGreeny.
Brown is well-respected inside and outside the organization and credited with shepherding Sixers through The Process and eventually into playoffs. Of the man who fired him today, Brown calls Brand in a statement: "A high-character talent that the 76ers are fortunate to have."
Sixers managing partner Josh Harris:
The Sixers will run a coaching search and talk to multiple candidates, but the interest in Clippers assistant Ty Lue is expected to be mutual, sources said. The Sixers cornerstone talent and resources are intriguing to candidates, including Lue.
ESPN story on the 76ers dismissal of coach Brett Brown -- and looming changes elsewhere in the front office:
The franchise's plan is that Brand will continue to oversee basketball operations, sources said, but the personnel and structure in the front office is undergoing significant evaluation and change is looming.
Brown’s dismissal is expected to be a precursor for more upheaval with the 76ers, whose senior leadership  including general manager Elton Brand -- will begin exploring changes in the front office structure, sources said.
The Philadelphia 76ers fired coach Brett Brown, sources tell ESPN.
Juwan Howard on potential NBA interest in him
ESPN Sources: A possible NBA coaching candidate whose name is gaining traction within front offices: Michigan coach Juwan Howard. Howard has an obviously strong resume as a player and later an assistant under Erik Spoelstra. He interviewed for Lakers, Cavs before taking UM job.
Toronto-Boston Eastern Conference semifinals series: Game 1  Thursday, August 27 Game 2  Saturday, August 29 Game 3  Monday, August 31 Game 4  Wednesday, September 2 Game 5  Friday, September 4 Game 6  Sunday, September 6 Game 7  Tuesday, September 8
Boston beats Philadelphia in Game 4 to sweep the first-round series, and changes are coming for the Sixers. Brett Brown is without internal momentum to return for his eighth season as coach, and a final decision could come soon, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Pacers All-Star @Dsabonis11’s return to The Bubble — support for his teammates, not a return to court.
It isn't believed Indiana All-Star F/C Domantas Sabonis has been able to engage in basketball activity for past 6 weeks rehabbing plantar fasciitis and sources say there’s no expectation he'll rejoin active roster should Pacers still be alive once he clears quarantine this week.
San Antonio Spurs guard Derrick White had surgery on the second toe of his left foot, sources tell ESPN. White averaged a career-best 11.3 points this season.
ESPN story on Blazers losing starting forward Zach Collins to season-ending ankle surgery.
Portland — 1-1 with Lakers in opening-round series — will continue without Collins, Trevor Ariza, Rodney Hood and Nassir Little.
Portland’s Zach Collins will require season-ending ankle surgery, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on NBA’s Board of Governors discussing the delay of the draft, free agency and start of 2020-2021 season on call today.
ESPN Sources: Among the topics discussed on the NBA’s Board of Governors call with Adam Silver today: Delaying the mid-October NBA draft and start of free agency, and possible timeframes for starting the 2020-2021 season beyond current Dec. 1 date. No decisions yet.
ESPN story on Utah's Mike Conley Jr., returning for Game 3 vs. Denver today:
Utah Jazz guard Mike Conley Jr., is clearing quarantine soon and will be in lineup for Game 3 against Denver today, sources tell ESPN. Conley returned to Orlando on Monday night after attending the birth of his son, Elijah.
Adam Silver tells @Rachel__Nichols that December 1 starting date is “feeling a little bit early to me...”
Plus the Duke legends (@RealJayWilliams and @JayBilas) and me.
Telling stat on Gordon Hayward this season: Only player in NBA history to average at least 17 points, 6.5 rebounds, 4 assists, shoot 50 percent overall, 36 percent on 3-pointers -- with usage rate below 22 percent.
Raptors president Masai Ujiri statement:
Included in the story: Among many teams, there’s interest in connecting the mid-October draft and free agency periods so that they could be delayed together.
ESPN story on @TheNBPA preparing players for free agency getting pushed back several weeks from mid-October --- along with the tentative Dec. 1 start of the 2020-2021 NBA season.
Front offices are privately concerned about the lack of salary cap and luxury tax projections in place prior to October 16 draft, which would allow them to make crucial decisions --- including on possible trades --- with a clearer understanding of the financial ramifications.
Because of the uncertainty about next season’s projected league revenues, the delay on the October 18 start of free agency would give the NBA and NBPA a better ability to formulate the parameters of 2020-2021 salary cap and luxury tax thresholds.
Story filed to ESPN: In team meetings and conversations at Disney’s Wide World of Sports, @TheNBPA has been preparing players for the probability that the start of free agency in mid-October could be pushed back several weeks.
Aaron Gordon (hamstring) and Michael Carter-Williams (left foot) are ruled out of Orlando's Game 2 vs. Milwaukee today, team says.
Down 2-0 to the Raptors, Nets would have to push this series to a Game 6 or Game 7 for Harris to have a chance to return, quarantine and play again based on circumstances of departure, sources tell ESPN.
Joe Harris has left The Bubble for a non-medical matter, the Nets say.
Raptors spokesperson on release of video footage involving team president Masai Ujiri and a Bay Area police officer in moments after end of 2019 NBA Finals:
NBA nearing final steps on moving draft combine to a virtual event at regional sites, sources say
ESPN story on Utah's Mike Conley Jr., returning to Orlando on Monday night and optimism of clearing quarantine for Game 3 vs. Denver on Friday:
Jazz guard Mike Conley Jr., returned to The Bubble on Monday night and there's optimism that he could clear his quarantine for Game 3 vs. Denver on Friday, sources tell ESPN.
Boston's Gordon Hayward will undergo an MRI on his sprained right ankle tonight, sources tell @malika_andrews and me. He left the Game 1 victory over Philadelphia limping in the fourth quarter.
NBA tiebreakers broken today for selection order in 2020 NBA Draft: Sacramento over New Orleans. Oklahoma City over Houston and Utah.
Welcome to Elijah Michael Conley:
More depth concerns for Utah: Jazz F Ed Davis will miss the first-round playoff series against Denver with a left knee MCL injury, sources tell ESPN. He's expected to be re-evaluated in a few weeks, per sources.
Ty Lue looms large for contenders in the coaching marketplace  with the possibility of an additional championship asset on his staff: Chauncey Billups.
Full audio of Goran Dragic on Woj Pod:
Portland Trail Blazers center Jusuf Nurkic (@BosnianBeast27) announces on Instagram that his grandmother has died of the coronavirus. Blazers play the Grizzlies at 2:30 PM ET on ABC in Game 1 of the Western Conference play-in.
ESPN story with @_Andrew_Lopez on Pelicans dismissing coach Alvin Gentry after a disappointing run in the Orlando restart:
New Orleans has dismissed coach Alvin Gentry, sources tell @_andrew_lopez and me.
Most organizations have one or two top basketball executives in the bubble with teams. As teams advance into playoffs, there's expected to be more of an opportunity for owners and top front office executives to come inside the bubble for duration.
The NBA plans to revisit rules for owners and senior basketball executives about entry into The Bubble after the first-round of the playoffs, based on "campus conditions at that time," according to a memo shared with teams today. Most will attend first-round in the outer tier.
Full audio of Goran Dragic on Woj Pod:
The discussions for the eight teams left out of Orlando restart continue to center on in-market workouts starting in September, sources tell ESPN. Those teams remain anxious for chance to get teams back in gym during long hiatus — especially with no summer league.
Terrific visit with Miami Heat guard @Goran_Dragic on The Woj Pod: Heat culture in The Bubble, playing with Jimmy Butler, mentoring Luka Doncic, Shaq’s rookie hazing, his European basketball legacy, much more. ESPN: Spotify:
For now, Chicago's assistant coaching staff will remain in place to continue working with players at team facility, sources said. The top assistants -- Roy Rogers and Chris Fleming -- are under contract beyond this season.
Arturas Karnisovas makes the change on Boylen and will start a search right away for his replacement. Among many expected to be considered: Denver assistant Wes Unseld, Jr., former Brooklyn coach Kenny Atkinson; Toronto assistant Adrian Griffin; Bucks assistant Darvin Ham.
Bulls have fired coach Jim Boylen
Full audio of @goran_dragic on The Woj Pod:
These can be a difficult injury, especially for a player like Westbrook who performs with such force. Clearly, Westbrook is a unique individual with a proven capacity to play through physical adversity. In Bubble playoffs, less time between games -- essentially every other day.
As @Jonathan_Feigen reports, sources say Russell Westbrook is expected to minimally miss the start of Houston's first-round series with his strained right quad muscle. Westbrook's return will depend upon how he responds to treatment.
The NBA is suspending Milwaukee star Giannis Antetokounmpo for the Bucks’ final seeding game on Thursday for head bump on Wizards’ Mo Wagner, source tells ESPN.
ESPN story on The Bubble restrictions for player guests, including "any individual the player has not previously met in person ... or known only through social media."
Among those also NOT allowed as player guests, per memo: "current/prospective staff or business relationships...including agents, trainers, massage/physical therapists, personal chefs and tattoo artists."
So, those are the rules.
Here's who isn't eligible to come into The Bubble as a guest, per memo: "Any individual the player has not previously met in person or with whom the player has had limited in-person interactions. (For example)... known by the player only through social media or an intermediary."
Each player is allowed one ticket per playoff game for a guest -- plus an additional admission for a child (32 inches and below), per memo.
Player guests can quarantine in team's market for three days, travel to Orlando, and then again for four days; or travel directly to Orlando and quarantine seven days there, per league memo.
Players will be allowed to bring in family and "established longstanding personal friends," into The Bubble, per memo shared with teams today.
NBA/NBPA guidelines on guests, starting after first-round of playoffs, per sources. Four guests per player, but can be exceeded for children. Guests can travel on team charters following testing. Guests will be allowed to attend games.
Full audio of The Woj Pod with SGA:
ESPN Sources: Indiana Pacers coach Nate McMillan has agreed on a contract extension.
There isn’t a player in the NBA more important to his market and franchise than Dame Lillard is to Portland and the Blazers.
The Woj Pod with Oklahoma City Thunder guard Shai Gilgeous-Alexander: What Chris Paul's taught him, The Bubble, practicing against Patrick Beverley with Clippers, Canadian ball and much more. Spotify: ESPN:
ESPN story on Knicks hiring Kentucky's Kenny Payne as an assistant on Tom Thibodeau's coaching staff.
The New York Knicks have hired Kentucky associate head coach Kenny Payne as an assistant coach, sources tell ESPN. Payne is the first formal addition to new coach Tom Thibodeau’s staff with the Knicks.
There's optimism that the Embiid ankle injury isn't serious and that he'll be back soon, sources tell ESPN.
Ben Simmons had his left knee surgery to remove a loose body in Philadelphia today and will remain there for rehab. He's expected to miss the rest of the season.
Sixers All-Star Joel Embiid (left ankle) is out against the Suns on Tuesday, Sixers say.
Orlando’s Terrence Ross leaves The Bubble for off-site testing
Full audio of @deandreayton:
Ayton's description of his slow walk to Williams' hotel room to inform him of his early-season suspension is terrific; Williams' reaction is what stays with Ayton. Also some telling insight into what it's like to get dropped into the U.S. as a 12-year old basketball prodigy.
Woj Pod w/ Suns' star @DeandreAyton: How Monty Williams taught him to be vulnerable and trust a coach, embrace film, why Suns are thriving in Bubble and how to get run out of kid soccer (Be too big, of course). Apple: Spotify:
Joel Embiid won’t return to game vs. Blazers with left ankle injury, per Sixers.
Naismith Basketball Hall of Famer Paul Westphal has been diagnosed with brain cancer, according to his longtime friend @MikeLupica. Always considered one of the great gentlemen of the game, Westphal had a decorated career as an All-NBA player and head coach.
With @MariaTaylor on NBA Countdown: details on the league’s discussions for next season and Ben Simmons’ knee surgery.
ESPN’s @Rachel__Nichols joins The Woj Pod on The Bubble, the game environments, the uncertain structure of next season and much more. Spotify: ESPN:
ESPN story on Sixers All-Star Ben Simmons likely lost for season with looming left knee procedure:
This gives the Nuggets a chance to work the star guard back into these seedings games with a week-plus to spare before the playoffs. They're hopeful to get Gary Harris and Will Barton back soon too.
Denver guard Jamal Murray (hamstring) will return to the lineup today vs. Utah, source tells ESPN.
While the Sixers haven't ruled Simmons out for the season, sources say it would take a deep run into the playoffs to keep the door open on the possibility of a return --- and that's still an iffy proposition. For now, the Sixers need to prepare for a postseason without Simmons.
Simmons will leave the NBA's Bubble for the procedure, and a timetable on a return is forthcoming.
Philadelphia’s All-Star F Ben Simmons will undergo surgery to remove a loose body in his left knee, sources tell ESPN.
Inside The Bubble: How the NBA’s preparations for 2020-2021 are unfolding, the Olympics, Leftover 8 teams, Play-in drama, coaching jobs:
Orlando's Jonathan Isaac had surgery to repair his torn ACL and a meniscus tear today, the Magic says.
Evaluating the medical options on Ben Simmons could extend a few days and the hope would be to avoid a season-ending scope on that left knee. For now, the timetable on a return is unclear.
Ben Simmons suffered a subluxation of the left knee cap, Sixers say. He’s considering treatment options and currently out.
Early indications on Ben Simmons are encouraging — no swelling or pain in left knee after leaving court, sources tell ESPN.
X-Ray negative on Miami guard Goran Dragic's ankle, a slight spain, source tells ESPN.
Brutal blow for Jackson Jr., one of the best young forwards in the NBA. Suddenly, the fight for the No. 8 seed in the West becomes even greater for Memphis.
Grizzlies: Memphis F Jaren Jackson Jr., suffered a meniscus tear in his left knee and will miss the rest of the season.
As concern grew the league’s playoffs could be compromised with sidelining of players because of inconclusive coronavirus tests, NBA has tightened protocol on retesting and allowing players a chance to return within 24-hour window. ESPN story:
The NBA's 30 head coaches vote on the award. Toronto's Nick Nurse was one vote away from making it a three-way tie, per sources.
ESPN Sources: Milwaukee’s Mike Budenholzer and Oklahoma City’s Billy Donovan voted the @NBA_Coaches 2020 co-coaches of the year. Story:
NBA teams have been concerned that player availability could become jeopardized should an inconclusive test result fall in the middle of a playoff series and force someone to miss a game. In certain cases, this protocol change could shorten that quarantine window for players.
After entering quarantine, if a player is asymptomatic and tests negative on a first retest, he will be permitted to play in his next game as long another negative test is returned within 60 minutes of the game's start time. On average, every 5 in 1,000 tests can be inconclusive.
The NBA has adjusted its protocol for players who return inconclusive tests for the coronavirus, allowing for a quicker possible return to game action, according to a league memo shared with teams.
Isaac was having a breakout season prior to left knee injury on Jan. 1 -- a legitimate all-NBA defensive team candidate. He elevates a tough-minded and reslient Magic team. August timing and rehab length threatens his return for 2020-'21 season. Just brutal for him and franchise.
Disappointing news: Orlando Magic F Jonathan Isaac has suffered a torn ACL in his left knee, source tells ESPN. Isaac missed 31 games with knee injury earlier and worked his way back for restart. A much longer rehab awaits him now.
Orlando's Jonathan Isaac is on his way to the MRI on his left knee now, sources tell ESPN. As Magic coach Steve Clifford said, he will stay in The Bubble to be examined.
NBA Countdown on ESPN at 12:30 ET. @MariaTaylor, @JalenRose, @RealJayWilliams and @paulpierce34. I'm in The Bubble. Four games on ESPN today, starting with Miami-Denver at 1 PM.
Full audio of Bob Myers on The Woj Pod:
Full audio of Bob Myers on The Woj Pod:
Golden State’s Bob Myers on The Woj Pod: The NBA’s shutdown and restart, reshaping the Warriors roster, the job of running a franchise, KD, much more: Spotify: ESPN:
ESPN story with @MarcJSpears on Kings quarantining player after inconclusive coronavirus test result -- and how these scenarios could impact teams in seeding games and playoffs.
Organizations have feared inconclusive or “false positive” test results could play a role in the seeding games or playoffs, if a player is forced to sit out a game or more awaiting two negative test results in 48 hours in order to gain clearance for a return.
Reporting with @MarcJSpears: The Sacramento Kings had a player test with an inconclusive result for Covid-19 on Wednesday, but successive negative test results Thursday and Friday are expected to allow for his availability against Spurs tonight. Player quarantined through today.
In this business, few things are more difficult than staying power. For 22 years on radio, @espngolic has been a standard inside and outside of ESPN. Proud to have joined the show to talk ball, (and will miss the food spread outside his studio every morning). #ThankyouGolic.
ESPN story on NBPA-NBA agreement to significantly raise permanent disability benefits to players:
Also: NBPA and NBA agreed to keep the Force Majeure withholding percentage of players salaries to 25 percent, sources tell ESPN. NBA started to withhold 25 percent of remaining salary on May 15 and had a right to adjust percentage based on number of resumed or canceled games.
ESPN Sources: After months of talks, @TheNBPA has reached agreement with NBA to raise insurance policy coverage for players to a $2.5M benefit for career-ending injuries. Policy covers on-and-off court injuries, including complications from Covid-19. Previous payout was $312K.
After player warmups and immediately prior to the national anthem for the first four days of the restart, NBA will run a social justice feature on the video board, according to memo shared with teams.
NBA will allow the home teams in Orlando to submit content and graphics incorporating social justice messages to be displayed on the in-game venue video boards, league tells teams in a memo today.
NBA’s priority remains to get fans into arenas next season. Regional pods for extended periods are among brainstorms, but preference would be that those are finite in length, sources said. For example: A month or two inside, a month out. Early in planning; everything's on table.
Reporting from The Bubble on @GetUpESPN: The latest on injuries to Anthony Davis and Eric Gordon.
This could be a touch optimistic: Early estimates on Gordon's return to the Houston lineup center on 1-to-2 weeks, sources tell ESPN. More will be known after Wednesday's evaluation of his left ankle.
For now, Rockets will wait and see how the ankle responds overnight. Obviously, Gordon is an important part of the franchise's ability to make a deep run in the Western Conference playoffs.
X-Rays negative on Eric Gordon's left ankle, source tells ESPN.
Eric Gordon is getting an X-Ray on the ankle now, sources tell ESPN.
Finally, the Denver Nuggets have their entire roster in Orlando: Guard PJ Dozier arrived in The Bubble today, sources tell ESPN.
NBPA's Michele Roberts tells @TimBontemps on the possibility of an NBA bubble next season: "If tomorrow looks like today, I don't know how we say we can do it differently.”
This gives Williamson two practices with the Pelicans prior to making a decision on his availability for Thursday's game against Utah. He returned to The Bubble on Friday after eight days away attending to a family emergency.
Pelicans F Zion Williamson has cleared quarantine and will return to practice with the team in Orlando this evening, sources tell ESPN.
The United Talent Agency (UTA) has appointed Klutch Sports Group CEO and Founder Rich Paul to its Board of Directors, the company says.
While awaiting the players' final plan surrounding pre-game anthems, several NBA coaches tell @malika_andrews and me that they would also kneel on the court if their teams choose to do so, starting with Thursday’s seeding schedule.
The MLB couldn’t sell a bubble in Arizona to its players association. Without a comprehensive national plan to curb the spread of the coronavirus, the NBA never believed it could play outside of a closed environment. So far, the NBA's Orlando experiment is working.
Clippers guard Patrick Beverley has returned to the Orlando bubble after leaving for a family emergency on Tuesday, sources tell ESPN.
Before 5 PM on day before seeding games, NBA teams must designate a participation status for players in a league portal, according to a league memo; Five hours prior to tip in instances of back-to-back games.
Two young head coaching candidates who made a strong impression on the Knicks in the search process, per sources: Dallas' Jamahl Mosley and San Antonio's Will Hardy.
ESPN story on the Knicks and Tom Thibodeau finalizing terms on a five-year deal as head coach:
Knicks president Leon Rose and agent Spencer Breecker of CAA Sports are working to complete contractual terms and a signed agreement is expected in the near future, sources tell ESPN.
The New York Knicks and Tom Thibodeau are finalizing a five-year deal to make him the franchise’s next coach, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Pacers All-Star Domantas Sabonis leaving Orlando for treatment on a left foot injury -- and the possibility that his return this season could be in peril.
Indiana's Domantas Sabonis has a signficant foot injury and will leave the Orlando bubble to seek treatment from a specialist, sources tell ESPN.
Tom Thibodeau — the leading candidate for the New York Knicks coaching job — had his formal interview with the organization today, sources tell ESPN.
Gentry, 65, has been one of the league staff members undergoing further scrutiny before heading into bubble. Houston coach Mike D'Antoni, 69, is among those still awaiting word, although there's optimism that he'll be cleared too. Rockets leave for Orlando tomorrow.
New Orleans coach Alvin Gentry has been cleared to travel with the Pelicans to the Orlando bubble, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on the Brooklyn Nets losing another starter -- Taurean Prince -- for the Orlando restart:
Prince was 'declared out' of Orlando because the late-timing of his positive test put his build-up back to basketball in jeopardy; in his case, it is not an 'opt out.'
Prince is the fourth Nets player  including DeAndre Jordan, Spencer Dinwiddie and Wilson Chandler  to opt-out of the league’s restart. Nets are eligible to sign four substitute players. Team departed this evening for Orlando.
Brooklyn Nets forward Taurean Prince has tested positive for the coronavirus and will sit out the NBA’s restart in Orlando, sources tell ESPN.
The Detroit Pistons are hiring Milwaukee executive David Mincberg as an assistant general manager, sources tell ESPN. Mincberg was the Bucks’ VP of Basketball Strategy, working with GM Jon Horst for the past three years.
First team in The Bubble: The @OrlandoMagic are departing for the bus ride to Disney. Aaron Gordon, DJ Augustin, Jonathan Isaac, Steve Clifford and Nik Vucevic.
ESPN story on the Milwaukee Bucks shutting down practice facility after recent round of coronavirus testing:
Detroit Pistons assistant GM Pat Garrity will be departing the organization, sources tell ESPN. His contract was expiring and new GM Troy Weaver is starting to reshape the front office.
The Milwaukee Bucks have shut down the team’s practice facility after receiving results of a Friday round of coronavirus testing, sources tell ESPN. The team isn’t expected to reopen facility for workouts prior to the organization's traveling party leaving for Orlando Thursday.
NBA teams in Orlando will scrimmage against a team in opposite conference or an unlikely first-round playoff opponent in same conference, league tells teams in a memo.
New Orleans Pelicans associate head coach Jeff Bzdelik, 67, won’t be joining the team in Orlando, his agent Warren LeGarie tells ESPN. The organization is supportive of the decision.
Fantastic window into @DeandreAyton’s talent and growth with @Mike_Schmitz. Excited to see Ayton play with Monty Williams’ upstart Suns in Orlando.
ESPN story on Clippers shutting down practice facility today after positive coronavirus test:
After a positive test for the coronavirus in the Los Angeles Clippers traveling party headed to Orlando next week, the organization closed its practice facility to players and staff as a precaution today, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN’s Jackie MacMullan reporting on the 8 non-Orlando teams moving toward a second bubble’ in Chicago.
Kokoskov was Luke Walton’s top assistant with Kings. As Slovenia’s head coach, he was part of a EuroBasket title in 2017 with Luka Doncic leading the way. Kokoskov replaces the legendary Zelijko Obradovic with Fenerbache.
Sacramento Kings assistant Igor Kokoskov has agreed in principle to become the next head coach of Fenerbahce in Istanbul, sources tell ESPN. Kokoskov had been the Suns head coach and is currently the Serbian national coach.
NBA on further testing of players and staff:
NBA: In tests of 344 players between June 24-29, nine more players have tested positive for the coronavirus.
ESPN story on Houston's Thabo Sefolosha opting out of NBA's Orlando restart:
Houston Rockets F Thabo Sefolosha is opting-out of Orlando restart, sources tell ESPN.
Free agent guard JR Smith has signed his contract with the Lakers, agent Rich Paul of @KlutchSports tells ESPN. Story:
Jaylen Adams has signed his Blazers deal, per source.
JR Smith has signed his deal with the Lakers, source said.
ESPN story on several positive coronavirus tests shutting down Denver's practice facility:
The Nets practice facility re-opened today after being closed for several days, sources said. Nets had recent positive coronavirus tests with DeAndre Jordan and Spencer Dinwiddie.
Next few days of testing will determine when facility re-opens to players and staff in Denver, per sources.
After positive tests for the coronavirus within the traveling party headed to Orlando, the Denver Nuggets have closed team's practice facility for several days, sources tell ESPN. Facility was locked to players and staff starting Saturday, and could open again later this week.
ESPN story on Brooklyn's DeAndre Jordan testing positive for the coronavirus and ruling himself out of the Orlando restart.
Two Brooklyn Nets have tested positive for the coronavirus -- Jordan and Spencer Dinwiddie. Jordan has opted-out of Orlando, and Dinwiddie is strongly considering the same. Nets will sign a substitute for Jordan, per sources. Nets are presently the seventh seed in East.
DeAndre Jordan will not join Nets in Orlando.
The Portland Trail Blazers plan to sign guard Jaylen Adams as a substitute player to replace Trevor Ariza, sources tell ESPN. Adams was the G-League's MVP runner-up with Wisconsin. #Bonnies
The NBA is planning to paint Black Lives Matter on the court inside both sidelines in all three arenas it will use at Disney in Orlando when it resumes the 2019-20 season late next month, ESPN’s @ZachLowe_NBA and @RamonaShelburne report.
CAA is hiring @EvanDaniels to become an agent in its college basketball coaching division, sources tell ESPN. Daniels will work with agents Jimmy Sexton and Spencer Breecker.
ESPN story on JR Smith and Lakers:
The Cavaliers have converted the two-way contract of F Dean Wade into a multi-year deal, sources tell ESPN.
Lakers and Smith have been in talks since Avery Bradley opted-out of the restart, and those will culminate with a deal that will include him on the roster Lakers will submit to NBA on Wednesday, per sources.
Free agent guard J.R. Smith and the Lakers are working through final steps of a deal today and he will be added to roster for the Orlando restart, sources tell ESPN.
Free agent Justin Anderson is signing with the Nets, agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells ESPN.
ESPN story on @RBroekhoff45 signing with the 76ers.
Free agent F Ryan Broekhoff is signing with the Philadelphia 76ers, agent Andy Shiffman of @PrioritySports tells ESPN.
League has now announced those results.
Tests were administered on Tuesday within teams.
Sixteen NBA players have tested positive for the coronvavirus of 302 players tested, sources tells ESPN.
ESPN Sources: NBA agent Omar Wilkes has agreed to become the head of basketball for Klutch Sports, clearing the way for Rich Paul to expand his scope as the company’s CEO:
Free agent center Tyler Zeller is signing with Spurs for rest of season, source tells ESPN.
Two agencies -- Tandem and You First -- have merged, per release. Combined clients include Ja Morant, Kristaps Porzingis and Serge Ibaka. “Merging our efforts in basketball will create exciting new possibilities as well as broader expertise," Tandem's President Jim Tanner said.
The New York Knicks are hiring CAA’s William Wesley as Executive Vice President/Senior Advisor, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on JR Smith emerging as a leading candidate to join Lakers roster for Orlando restart.
Avery Bradley. Nikola Jokic. JR Smith. Nowhere else to end the day but with @NotthefakeSVP.
Free agent guard JR Smith has emerged as a leading candidate to replace Avery Bradley on the Lakers roster, sources tell ESPN.
Nets signed Johnson to a $50M offer sheet in 2016, which the Heat matched.
Free agent guard Tyler Johnson has agreed to a deal with the Brooklyn Nets, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on starting Los Angeles Lakers guard Avery Bradley opting-out of Orlando. “As committed to my Lakers teammates and the organization as I am, I ultimately play basketball for my family.”
At forefront of Bradley’s decision to remain w/ his family is the well-being of the oldest of his 3 children. His 6-year old son has a history of struggling to recover from respiratory illnesses and would’ve been unlikely to be medically cleared to enter bubble with his family.
Los Angeles Lakers guard Avery Bradley has opted-out of playing in the NBA’s Orlando restart of the season, Bradley told ESPN on Tuesday night.
Wednesday is turning out to be a soft target date for players to opt-out of Orlando  unless they want to enter process to be placed on excused/protected list to keep salary. Teams are largely treating July 1 as deadline, which is when rosters of eligible players are due to NBA.
ESPN story on Denver Nuggets star Nikola Jokic testing positive for coronavirus, awaiting clearance to return to the United States.
Reporting with @WindhorstESPN: Nuggets star Nikola Jokic tested positive for the coronavirus in Serbia and his return to the U.S. is temporarily delayed. He’s been asymptomatic since testing positive last week. Jokic is expected to be cleared to travel to Denver within a week.
Remember too: Even among the six teams trying to reach the playoffs via a play-in, none believe this restart is worth risking injuries on players that could carry into next season. For some, Orlando will be an extended summer league to develop young players and protect veterans.
All of this, of course, is hoping that those players testing positive experience little, if no, symptoms. While statistics are on the side of healthy, young NBA players not becoming seriously ill because of the coronavirus, there are no guarantees.
It's a bigger concern for non-guaranteed playoff teams to lose players to extended quarantine before Orlando. Playoff teams worried less about needing key players for seeding games in August have more time to get players back to shape. All are worried about soft-tissue injuries.
As coronavirus testing for players heading to Orlando starts today, teams are bracing for significant numbers of positive tests. One Western Conference playoff team had four positives in past few weeks, per sources. Full training camps start on July 11 at Disney.
NBA and NBPA have agreed to put into place an enhanced insurance plan for players in Orlando that would cover career-ending injuries related to Covid-19 or conventional basketball injuries, sources tell ESPN. Potential group policy would cover players for several million dollars.
One change for use to replacement players in Orlando, per league memo to teams: Replacing a player with Covid-19 must occur no later than 7 days following confirmed positive player resumes training.
As expected, NBA and NBPA have finalized terms of the revised CBA for the Orlando restart, sources tell ESPN. All items in Saturday’s league memo to teams are agreed upon. Transaction window starts at noon.
Full ESPN story on Portland's Trevor Ariza opting-out of the NBA's restart in Orlando.
Sources: Ariza has been involved in a custody case over his 12-year old son, and mother’s choice of granting a court-ordered one month visitation period during league’s quarantine of teams in Orlando left Ariza to choose those parenting responsibilities over competing in restart.
Portland Trail Blazers forward Trevor Ariza is opting-out of participation in the NBA’s Orlando restart of the season, committing instead to a one-month visitation window with his young son, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Washington's Davis Bertans -- a top unrestricted free agent -- deciding to sit out the NBA's restart in Orlando.
Sitting out is preventive measure, which Wizards fully support. Franchise is treating Bertans as a top offseason priority in free agency. Bertans -- 16 PPG, 42 percent on 3's -- still expected to participate in pre-Orlando training with team.
Reporting with @TimBontemps: Washington Wizards F Davis Bertans has decided to sit out the Orlando restart, sources tell ESPN. Bertans is entering free agency off of his most productive NBA season  with two ACL injuries in his past.
Teams can have four players June 23-30 at facility; 8 players in facility July 1-9. From there, teams will leave for Orlando and full training camps a
NBA will allow up to 10 coaches in facilities starting on Tuesday as players return for ramp-up, league tells teams in a memo.
ESPN story on @VicOladipo's plan with knee before committing to Orlando restart: “I know there’s risk going into it with the unique situation that I’m in - being off so long and trying to ramp it up that fast. I’ve just got to be smart, that’s all."
All-Star guard Victor Oladipo plans to ramp-up activity with the Indiana Pacers starting next week and evaluate his repaired torn quad tendon prior to making a final commitment to playing in the season’s restart in Orlando, Oladipo told ESPN on Saturday. Story soon.
Free agency negotiations will start at 6 PM on October 18, per sources. (Not a minute sooner, or that would be tampering, of course)
Source: Early entry withdrawl date: October 6 -- 10 days prior to draft.
Source: Free agency opens on October 18 still, with moratorium period on deals October 19-23.
Source: NBA Draft will be on October 16, with early entry deadline on August 17.
Dallas Mavericks assistant Jamahl Mosley has permission to interview for the New York Knicks coaching job, sources tell ESPN. In his sixth season with Rick Carlisle, Mosley has emerged as a head coaching candidate in league. He interviewed for Cavaliers job last year.
The Woj Pod with Masai Ujiri:
Toronto Raptors president Masai Ujiri on The Woj Pod: Orlando restart, race in America, hiring practices in NBA, President Obama and Prime Minister Trudeau, Adam Silver and how a championship impacted his life. Spotify: Apple:
Troy Weaver agreed to a four-year contract as GM, sources tell ESPN.
San Antonio has granted permission for assistant Will Hardy to interview for the New York Knicks coaching job, sources tell ESPN. Hardy, 32, is well-regarded within Spurs organization.
ESPN story on the Detroit Pistons hiring OKC executive Troy Weaver as general manager:
Weaver played a huge role in identifying several top Thunder draft prospects, including UCLA's Russell Westbrook at No. 4 in 2008 when few considered him that elite of a prospect.
Troy Weaver will become the ninth current black GM in the NBA and will work with Senior Advisor Ed Stefanski running the Pistons. Weaver's route to GM is groundbreaking: a high-profile AAU program to Syracuse assistant, NBA scout to a dozen years as an executive with Thunder.
Weaver's key role in Oklahoma City's strong history of player personnel decisions made him one of favorites from start of this search. Weaver is the fourth OKC executive under Sam Presti to leave for a GM job, including Rich Cho, Rob Hennigan and Michael Winger.
The Detroit Pistons are finalizing a deal with Troy Weaver to make him the franchise's new general manager, sources tell ESPN. Weaver has been the VP of Basketball Operations with Oklahoma City.
Warren LeGarie, the agent for Mike D'Antoni and Alvin Gentry, told ESPN on Wednesday: "I hope there is a basketball solution to this issue rather than a legal one."
ESPN story with @ZachLowe_NBA: NBA Coaches Association fears new league standards and guidelines that could bar team staffers in high-risk categories for coronavirus from Orlando restart could "severely jeopardize" their future employment opportunities.
Orlando Magic assistant Pat Delany will interview for the New York Knicks head coaching job, sources tell ESPN. Delany has been an assistant under Steve Clifford for five years after advancing within the Miami Heat organization. He spent a year as a G-League head coach with Heat.
Here’s how to donate to @MariaTaylor’s Winning Edge Leadership Academy:
"Players and team staff will not leave the campus absent extenuating circumstances (examples: team-directed medical care off-campus, birth of a child, severe illness, death in family, or family wedding) and only with prior league approval for such extenuating circumstance."
In the NBA's Health and Safety protocol: "The occurrence of a small or otherwise expected number of COVID-19 cases will not require a decision to suspend or cancel the resumption of the 2019-20 season."
My favorite detail in the 113-page health-and-safety protocol for Orlando shared with teams in past several minutes: No doubles in ping pong. "Until directed otherwise by the NBA, players should play singles only so that they can maintain six feet of distance from each other."
ESPN Sources: Former NBA executive Bryan Colangelo has purchased an ownership stake and will assume an advisory role with the Illawarra Hawks of Australia’s National Basketball League.
Avery Bradley helped organize a Lakers-wide social media post recently: "If you ain't wit us, we ain't wit you." The message was intended "for all those who have more financial power than us, but aren't taking a bigger stance when our community needs you," Bradley tells ESPN.
Bradley and the players' coalition described several priorities to ESPN, including improved hiring practices for black front office and head coaching candidates, donations to organizations serving black communities and partnerships with black-owned businesses and arena vendors.
Avery Bradley: “Regardless of how much media coverage will be received, talking and raising awareness about social injustice isn’t enough. Protesting during an anthem, wearing T-shirts is great, but we need to see real actions”
Story with @Malika_Andrews: Avery Bradley  co-leader of a players’ coalition with Kyrie Irving  tells ESPN his group is eager to hear the NBA’s, owners’ and sponsors’ plans of action on issues of importance to the black community prior to Orlando.
Story with @Malika_Andrews: With Kyrie Irving and Avery Bradley leading the way, a coalition of NBA players tell ESPN: “We are truly at an inflection point in history where as a collective community we can band together  unify - and move as one.”
ESPN Sources: Three serious candidates have emerged for the Detroit Pistons GM job: Clippers assistant GM Mark Hughes, Nets assistant GM Jeff Peterson and Thunder VP of Basketball Operations Troy Weaver. Those conversations are continuing this week.
NBPA's Michele Roberts: "It's a question of, does playing again harm a movement that we absolutely, unequivocally embrace? And then whether our play can, in fact, highlight, encourage and enhance this movement? That's what they're talking about."
ESPN story with @RamonaShelburne: NBPA’s Michele Roberts tells ESPN the players spent weekend discussing how they could best use "our obvious influence  to make sure we enhance and move this movement forward" rather than distracting from it.
Bam Adebayo, De’Aaron Fox, Kyle Kuzma, Donovan Mitchell and Jayson Tatum  members of the 2017 draft class soon eligible rookie extensions -- are talking with NBPA about facilitating with league on insurance allowances for players.
ESPN Sources: On cusp of hundreds of millions in contract extensions, several of NBA’s top young stars had a Friday call with NBPA officials about possibility of league-financed insurance policies to protect against career-threatening injuries in Orlando:
Amid his reservations on restarting season, Kyrie Irving has lent a strong voice to ongoing call w/ NBA players tonight. One player in text: "He's trying to give players a platform to be able to have a discussion -- on the bubble, racial equality and unity...It's a good call."
ESPN story on Kyrie Irving, the disruptor:
There's no singular conversation driving discussion among players now: It isn't just the Black Lives Matter movement, or the coronavirus, or bubble limitations, or family concerns, or risk of injury, or money. Many players are discussing and weighing it all.
One respected NBA player tells me: “Once we start playing basketball again, the news will turn from systemic racism to who did what’ in the game last night. It’s a crucial time for us to be able to play and blend that to impact what’s happening in our communities.”
The NBA and NBPA are still discussing details of an offseason program of camps, scrimmages and OTA's for the eight teams left out of the Orlando restart, sources tell ESPN. Executives with those teams have been in regular contact with each other and league.
Beginning on June 23, a head coach can be one of the two coaches working with players in voluntary workouts, per sources.
Players traveling outside of the U.S. need to report by June 15 to team markets -- rest of players need to arrive by June 22, per sources.
Timelines shared with teams are consistent with what's been reported, including the possiblity of an October 13 Game 7 -- which allows for NBA to avoid Monday Night Football on October 12.
NBA has instructed teams of full training camp timeline, including July 9-29 in Orlando with three intersquad scrimmages, sources tell ESPN. Again, season re-starts on July 30.
Spurs guard Lonnie Walker IV revealed he was the victim of sexual abuse as a child in a social media post tonight.
ESPN story with @BobbyMarks42 on clarity of total days teams could spend in Orlando, roster rules for the resumption and the eligibility guidelines for players available to join teams in bubble:
More timetables in Orlando: After second-round of playoffs -- a maximum of 67 days -- four teams will be left on the Disney campus. After conference finals -- a max of 82 days -- there will be two finalists.
Some timetables on 22 teams in Orlando: 6 teams eliminated after 35-40 days (based on play-in elimination). 14 total teams will be gone by 53 days, at latest.
The NBA is targeting a slightly earlier date for the restart of the season in Orlando, sources tell ESPN: July 30.
Sources: Players deciding against participating in Orlando could be replaced by a substitution player. NBA plans to allow replacements for players who test positive for COVID-19 or suffer injuries. Replaced players become ineligible for the rest of 2019-2020 season.
Sources: Different players are expressing different concerns on restart, but consistent among them all: restrictions surrounding quarantine in Orlando. Players are talking on conference calls -- and among each other. Both NBA and NBPA expected to further engage them on issues.
ESPN story on growing uncertainty among NBA players about entering Orlando bubble and allowances league plans to make for those deciding to stay home.
Sources: If a player has a medical issue that might be cause for him to be excused from the Orlando restart, he would be allowed to undergo an independent examination process. Even if the player was told that he’s fit to play, he could still stay home without consequence.
The NBA and NBPA are nearing completion on items needed to reach a final agreement on parameters of a return-to-play, sources said. Some players with hesitation have been discussing a number of issues on return, including family concerns, COVID-19, social justice, and more.
The NBA and NBPA are expected to agree on a provision that wouldn't require players to restart the season, nor subject them to discipline for staying home, sources tell ESPN. The players would lose a portion of salary for those games missed.
Sources: As NBA and NBPA are finalizing terms on return-to-play plan today, there’s a faction of players discussing as a group whether restarting season in the Orlando bubble is a good idea. Several dozen players participated in a conference call in last 24 hours to discuss it.
One of the significant factors in establishing risk for health complications due to the coronavirus is advanced age, which leaves three head coaches -- Alvin Gentry (65), Mike D’Antoni (69) and Gregg Popovich (71)  perhaps vulnerable to recommendations of those evaluations.
Legal experts consulted by ESPN, including a top attorney in the Miami office of the U.S. Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, agreed unanimously the NBA could not exclude any personnel from participating in Orlando solely on the basis of age.
Reporting with @ZachLowe_NBA: NBA team personnel are expected to submit personal medical histories to a panel of physicians who would review their individual risk of serious illness due to any spread of COVID-19 in the league's Orlando bubble.
Villanova sophomore forward Saddiq Bey -- a potential lottery pick -- is staying in the 2020 NBA Draft and signing with @Excelsm_bball, Bey tells ESPN. Story:
Reporting on @SportsCenter with @DavidLloydESPN on NBA’s plans for rosters and teams left out of Orlando.
Sources: The NBA's "transaction window" starting around June 22 will include all 30 teams -- not just the 22 returning to play in Orlando. Teams will be allowed to covert two-way players into NBA contracts and sign eligible free agents for the rest of season.
Full audio of JB Bickerstaff and James Borrego on The Woj Pod:
Cleveland Cavaliers coach JB Bickerstaff and Charlotte Hornets' James Borrego on The Woj Pod: Getting left behind in NBA's return, challenges for young teams, NBA coaching response to racial injustice, much more. Spotify: Apple:
How Adam Silver, NBA negotiated return: How NBA will allow for replacement players in Orlando How win percentage will set standings: How non-Orlando 8 teams want summer structured:
ESPN story with @BobbyMarks42 on NBA's discussions about replacement players for 22-team Orlando rosters in the event of positive coronavirus tests and injuries:
ESPN Sources: Fearful of setbacks in development of young players over months of inactivity, several teams left out of Orlando resumption have proposed ideas to NBA for regional mini-summer leagues, training camps and OTA's.
Much, much more than KD's status for the season in this insightful interview with @MarcJSpearsESPN.
Kyrie Irving suggested on the NBPA conference call today that it's possible he could join the Nets in Orlando this summer --- as an inactive player supporting his teammates, sources said. Irving had season-ending shoulder surgery on March 3.
"My season is over," Kevin Durant tells @MarcJSpearsESPN. "I don’t plan on playing at all."
Good luck trying to rattle @MariaTaylor. She’s too principled. Too resolved. Too talented. An absolute force of nature. Among a lot of things about her, Maria's conviction makes me proud to call her a friend and teammate. I support every word she said today.
As expected, Michele Roberts informed NBPA members that the starting dates for next season -- along with a myriad of items -- will be part of a negotiation with the NBA in coming weeks, per sources.
For those visiting Disney World this summer and hoping to see an active NBA player roaming the parks and getting on rides, well, the NBPA made it clear that won't be happening for players, nor the family members joining them, sources said.
The NBPA player leadership was informed of a plan to keep 1,600 people in Orlando bubble at any given time, sources tell ESPN. Player families will be allowed to arrive after first-round of playoffs — likely three members at a time.
The NBA and NBPA will work through a number of details in the next week on the resumption in Orlando, but sides are ready to move together toward the July 31 tip.
Sources: The NBPA’s player representatives approved the NBA’s 22-team format to complete the 2019-2020 season.
If it's late, it's must be @notthefakeSVP: On the possibility of limitations in Orlando for older coaches and the Blazers 'no' vote.
Incredible reporting and storytelling out of @ramonashelburne to go inside the key relationships that helped bring back the NBA.
Carlisle continued: ..."healthier than someone in their 30's or 40's. The conversation should never be solely about a person's age. Adam assured me that we would work through this together to help determine what is both safe and fair for all of our coaches."
NBA Coaches Association President Rick Carlisle: "I just spoke to Adam Silver and he admitted that he jumped the gun with his statement to TNT. The health and safety of our coaches is first and foremost. It's entirely possible that an NBA coach in his 60's or 70's could be..."
LeGarie agreed with his coaches: Let's let every coach follow the same safety protocol, if that includes masks and/or social distancing. For example, term "stigma" referred to how treating those coaches differently than their peers could impact perceptions of potential employers.
These are the kind of complex issues that await the NBA's return in Orlando. D'Antoni and Gentry share an agent, Warren LeGarie, who told ESPN that he worried about "stigmas" getting assigned to older coaches with these possible protocols.
On possibility of 65-year-old plus coaches wearing masks in games, D'Antoni and Alvin Gentry told ESPN they'd understand if every coach was required to do so, but didn't believe only they should be made to do so. Silver suggested on TNT those coaches may not be on bench at all.
Asked Mike D'Antoni yesterday about possibility of this older group of NBA coaches being required to wear masks on bench: "I am sure they want to keep everyone safe, but to start singling people out with more risk, well, I would hope they wouldn’t want to get into that.”
ESPN story on NBPA executive director Michele Roberts' reaction to the NBA's tenative timeline of a rapid return to start the 2020-2021 season: "I was surprised to see it."
Many of dates the NBA shared with teams today -- including Draft Lottery, Draft -- are considered tentative. The NBA and NBPA have a long list of financial and compeititve items to negotiate for the 2020-21 season, included with a Nov. 10 camp opening off an October 12 Game 7.
NBA’s tentative Nov. 10 training camp/Dec. 1 season opener targets for 2020-21 season surfaced as a quick-turnaround to many, including NBPA executive director Michele Roberts: “I was surprised to see it,” she tells ESPN. Those dates are likely to require negotiation with union.
Some preliminary expectations on Orlando format, per sources: 16-day regular season - 5-to-6 games per day. Each team expected to play one back-to-back among its eight regular-season games. NBA Finals format expected to include games every other day during best-of-seven series.
Portland's vote -- the lone dissenting in the 29-to-1 Board of Governors call today on the NBA's 22-team plan to resume season -- reflected the franchise's feedback from its players too, sources said.
Sources: Blazers are eager to resume season, but chose to vote “No” because franchise believed there were more competitive and innovative formats on table -- including those that addressed 2020 NBA Draft lottery odds based on regular-season game results in Orlando.
Sources -- NBA approves 22-team format to finish season by 29-1 vote
The NBPA’s team player representatives have a conference call set for Friday to approve the league’s 22-team plan on restarting the season, sources tell ESPN.
As the Knicks season ends now, President Leon Rose will soon begin his search for a new head coach -- with Tom Thibodeau a frontrunner out of the gate, sources tell ESPN.
Source: 29-1 vote
The NBA’s Board of Governors has voted to approve the league’s 22-team format to restart the 2019-2020 season in Orlando, source tells ESPN.
NBA has set an August 25 Draft Lottery and October 15 Draft, sources say.
Among teams left out of Orlando resumption, some members of NBA’s Board of Governors disagree with 22-team format - but do plan to cast “yes” votes on call starting soon, sources tell ESPN. Proposal requires three-fourths support. It's expected to clear that hurdle with ease.
Reporting on the NBA’s return with @elleduncanESPN on @SportsCenter.
While players and coaches will be allowed to golf and eat at outdoor restaurants in Disney, they will also be required to maintain social distancing, sources tell @ramonashelburne.
ESPN story on the NBA's plan for a return:
So the NBA's inviting 22 teams to Orlando: 13 Western Conference, 9 Eastern Conference. Eight-regular season games per team. Play-in for the 8th seeds. July 31-October 12. Vote tomorrow to ratify. The NBA's back.
The play-in format requires a double-elimination format for the 8th seed, a single-elimination for the 9th seed, per sources.
Sources: Joining the 16 current playoff teams in Orlando: New Orleans, Portland, Phoenix, Sacramento and San Antonio in the West and Washington in the East. If the 9th seed is more than 4 games behind the 8th, No. 8 makes playoffs; Fewer than 4 games, a play-in tournament.
The NBA's Board of Governors has a 12:30 PM ET call on Thursday with the intention of approving the league's plan for a 22-team return-to-play in Orlando, sources tell ESPN.
Each of the 22 teams will play eight regular season games in Orlando for seeding purposes for the playoffs, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on October 12 timeline as a last possible date for a Game 7 of NBA Finals in model of 22-team return-to-play format:
The NBA's Board of Governors has a Thursday meeting set for a vote on a finalized plan to restart the season, per sources. The league is still working through those details with the NBPA.
ESPN Sources: As the NBA models a 22-team format for a July 31 resumption in Orlando, the proposed timeline for teams as the last possible date for an NBA Finals Game 7: October 12.
Denver Nuggets President Tim Connelly started his front office career as an intern under Hall of Famer Wes Unseld Sr.: "Every personal or professional milestone that I reached included a call to Wes...one of the kindest people I've ever met."
Unseld was a player, coach and GM for Washington's franchise. He and his wife, Connie, were married for 50 years. Unseld was one of the absolute pillars of the NBA, an unbeatable blend of character, intelligence, professionalism and talent.
A mountain of man, Unseld is a member of the Naismith Basketball Hall of Fame. He was MVP and Rookie of the Year in '68-'69, a five-time All-Star, four-time NBA finalist and '77-'78 champion with Washington. His son, Wes Unseld Jr., is an assistant coach with the Denver Nuggets.
Baltimore/Washington Bullets legend Wes Unseld has died, his family says.
Full audio of The Woj Pod:
On @SportsCenter: NBA coaches are one more coalition trying to fill the gaping hole in leadership.
Full audio of The Woj Pod:
ESPN story with @ZachLowe_NBA inside the Board of Governors meeting on Friday, possible offseason camps for those teams left out of Orlando and structure still needing to be resolved with a 22-team format.
The Woj Pod with Atlanta's @LloydPierceLP and Utah's Quin Snyder: On the @NBA_Coaches call to action, burden weighing on Pierce in bastion of civil rights movement, lessons learned w/ Pop and Kerr on Team USA, Snyder on pushing himself to do more. ESPN:
With Atlanta's Lloyd Pierce leading way on initiative, NBCA is pushing for entire membership to be engaged on issue -- not only those who've traditionally been most active. Thirty head coaches were on a call Saturday, meetings Sunday and again Tuesday on plans of action.
In describing recent events of “police brutality, racial profiling and the weaponization of racism,” as “shameful, inhumane and intolerable,” the National Basketball Coaches Association establishes a committee to pursue solutions within NBA cities. Story:
Ujiri: “There is a sense of helplessness, but that must not paralyze us. Your voice matters, especially when you are a leader or influential figure, and especially if you are white.”
Toronto’s Masai Ujiri with a powerful editorial in the @globeandmail: “The conversation can no longer be avoided because it is hard. We have to have it. Now.”
ESPN story with @ramonashelburne on the NBA's Board of Governors planning to approve Adam Silver's eventual recommendation on a return-to-play plan in a vote on Thursday -- and growing support among ownership for 22 teams resuming season in Orlando.
Owners are largely planning to pledge support for Silver's final recommedation on a plan, which teams expect to include invitations for 20-to-22 teams to resume the season, sources tell @ramonashelburne, @ZachLowe_NBA and me.
The NBA is planning a Thursday vote of the Board of Governors -- with an expectation that owners will approve Adam Silver’s recommendation on a format to re-start the season in Orlando, sources tell ESPN.
Glad to sit down with @Rachel__Nichols on The Jump (3 PM ET, ESPN) to dig into the NBA's big decisions on return-to-play, but also: The role the Timberwolves want to play in Minnesota.
As hard as owners and teams are pushing for proposals rooted in some level of self-interest, there's still a sense they'll give Silver the latitude to implement the plan that he lands on with the NBPA. Most expect that'll come inside the next week.
Silver and NBPA will keep talking on details of a return-to-play proposal. Silver has spent a lot of time listening to factions of teams make cases, but in near future, he'll have to ask owners to get behind a plan that he believes to make the best sense.
Sources: Two-hour Board of Governors call this afternoon with Adam Silver included discussion/debate of the possible plans and financial implications of proposals. No broad ownership consensus on an idea, but that was probably always going to be case.
Understanding the plight of young African American men is a requirement to making the necessary connection to coach in the NBA, but he believes it is even more than that: It's a requirement of an American citizen who wants this carnage to end.
On a call with the NBA GM's this afternoon, Adam Silver confirmed that Friday's meeting of the Board of Governors would not include a formal vote on a return-to-play plan, sources tell ESPN. Talks on a plan will continue into the weekend.
“I am a white male in a position of leadership and I don’t take lightly the fact that I have not experienced some of these things our individual guys have had to experience.” How Ryan Saunders and the Timberwolves are responding to George Floyd's death.
The Woj Pod Crossover with @ZachLowe_NBA ESPN: Spotify: Apple:
The Naismith Basketball Hall of Fame enshrinement ceremony for Kobe Bryant, Tim Duncan and Kevin Garnett will be pushed to 2021, ESPN's Jackie MacMullan reports.
Story includes continued conversations about a return-to-play that includes the 16-playoff teams -- plus the four Western Conference teams on playoff bubble: Blazers, Kings, Pelicans and Spurs.
Reporting with @RamonaShelburne: The NBA and NBPA are progressing on a plan that would allow for a limited number of family members to eventually join players for the season's resumption inside an Orlando bubble environment.
While NBA’s Board of Governors meet with Adam Silver on Friday, there’s no current expectation for a decision on a finalized return-to-play plan to emerge from the session, sources tell ESPN. Talks on incorporating the three most serious plans remain ongoing with NBPA and teams.
ESPN story inside the NBA's decisions on constructing a playoff scenario for the resumption of the season: Part II of my conversations with @ZachLowe_NBA on the reporting and issues surrounding the NBA's return. The Woj Pod:
Here's Part II of the converation with @ZachLowe_NBA on The Woj Pod:
Zach and I taped home-and-home pods on the reporting and issues here. Coming soon.
The Detroit Pistons are opening a search to hire a general manager to work with senior advisor Ed Stefanski, sources tell ESPN. Stefanski and Palace Sports Vice Chairman Arn Tellem will be leading the process, which will be underway soon. Story:
NBPA Executive Director Michele Roberts tells @ramonashelburne: “It’s time. It’s been two-and-half months of What if?’ My players need some level of certainty. I think everybody does.”
The NBPA’s Michele Roberts is conducting team-by-team conference calls with players, detailing talks with NBA on formats for resumption of play in Orlando, financial implications of those options and gathering feedback, sources tell ESPN.
Georgetown coach Patrick Ewing has returned home after a hospital stay with the coronavirus, his son Patrick Jr., says.
Here's my ESPN story from Friday evening about the possible playoff formats for the season's resumption and teams interested in moving directly to Orlando site for training camps.
The NBA’s plans to resume the 2019-2020 season are taking shape.
Jackie MacMullan on Jerry Sloan:
Teams prefer to avoid having to quarantine significant portions of their rosters twice; once upon returning to more restrictive Covid-19 markets and again upon arrival at the bubble/campus site.
ESPN Sources: Some franchises in restricted markets -- including NYC, Boston, Toronto -- are inquiring to NBA on option for players to bypass returns to those cities in June and report directly to proposed bubbles for eventual start of training camps.
Pop on Sloan: “It’s a sad day for all of us who knew Jerry Sloan. Not only on the basketball court but, more importantly, as a human being. He was genuine and true. And that is rare.”
Spurs coach Gregg Popovich on Jerry Sloan: “....He was a mentor for me from afar until I got to know him. A man who suffered no fools, he possessed a humor, often disguised, and had a heart as big as the prairie.”
Full audio of The Woj Pod with Tom Thibodeau:
Jerry Sloan has passed away.
Full audio of The Woj Pod with Tom Thibodeau:
Tom Thibodeau on The Woj Pod Apple: Spotify:
Sources: NBA teams expecting guidelines around June 1 for players' return
Teams also expect that around June 1 they’ll be allowed to expand workouts that are already underway with in-market players, sources tell @ZachLowe_NBA and me.
Reporting with @ZachLowe_NBA: NBA teams are expecting the league office will issue guidelines around June 1 that will allow franchises to start recalling players who’ve left their markets to return as a first step toward a formal ramp-up for the season’s resumption.
Tom Thibodeau on The Woj Pod: What NBA coaches face restarting with teams post-shutdown, revisiting and reevaluating runs with Bulls and Timberwolves, watching old practice tapes of Jordan's teams in Chicago, what he wants next as a coach, much more.
Full audio of The Woj Pod with @jeffpassan:
As part of ESPN's #OneTeam Speaker Series for the Boys and Girls Clubs of America (@BGCA_Clubs), we had a great visit with Atlanta Hawks All-Star guard @TheTraeYoung and LA Sparks/ESPN star @Chiney321.
ESPN story on Utah Jazz F Bojan Bogdanovic undergoing season-ending surgery to repair the Scapholunate ligament in his right wrist.
Utah's Bojan Bogdanovic has been one of two NBA players to average 20 points, shoot 40 percent on three-pointers and 90 percent on free throws this season, per @ESPNStatsInfo. Milwaukee's Khris Middleton is the other.
Bogdanovic injured wrist in January and played in pain throughout season. The discomfort/injury emerged again during shutdown, sources said. Decision for surgery makes sense to protect him and franchise for long-term. He signed a four-year, $73M deal last summer.
Utah Jazz F Bojan Bogdanovic is undergoing season-ending surgery on his right wrist, sources tell ESPN. Full recovery expected for start of 2020-21 season. He's averaged 20 points per game for Jazz, fourth-seed in West.
How dramatic are differences in NBA and MLB relationships between commissioners/owners and players? And how does it influence a return? ESPN's MLB Insider @JeffPassan on The Woj Pod. Apple: ESPN: Spotify:
Father-son Woj Pod with Detroit Pistons GM Ed Stefanski and Cleveland Browns coach Kevin Stefanski: Apple: ESPN: Spotify:
The Houston Rockets are re-opening facility for voluntary workouts on Monday, @dmorey says.
How NBA owners and players are delivering Adam Silver full room to operate, govern and drive the decison on return to play. No power grabs, no factions, no public criticisms. Column on ESPN:
Full Woj Pod audio of Pistons executive Ed Stefanski and Browns coach Kevin Stefanski:
Terrific @tsnmike ode to the great Tom Konchalski. When I think of some of the political appointments to the Naismith Hall of Fame's Contributor wing, I hope there's a place for Tom on merit there. He revolutionized amateur scouting.
Small steps for NBA: In advising teams on players/staff returning to market for workouts, league shares travel recommendations in memo: "...If within reasonable driving distance of their team markets," they should drive, not fly, "to avoid more crowded travel settings."
NBA’s hopeful that 22 of the 30 franchises will have facilities open for voluntary workouts by Monday, sources say.
Adam Silver told those on the NBA’s Board of Governors call Tuesday that if a positive test would "shut us down, we probably shouldn't go down this path,” sources said.
Once the NBA formalizes a return to play, the league indicated to teams that the plan would be to standardize coronavirus testing among the 30 teams, sources said.
Among factors league's studying in ramp-up to final decision: Understanding trajectory of new cases, understanding who's getting severely ill and why, developments in testing and how other sports are handling positive tests among participants and continuing to play, sources say.
ESPN story on NBA's Board of Governors call with Adam Silver today and optimism growing toward a resumption of play this season.
Sources: In discussion with BOG/owners, Silver used the term "campus environment" when referencing what's been called a bubble. Call included significant detail on how other pro sports/leagues -- here and abroad -- are working toward their returns.
ESPN Sources: Attendees left Board of Governors call w/ Adam Silver today feeling positive about momentum toward an NBA return to play this season. Discussion included how league/players will need to get comfortable w/ some positive tests for virus not shutting down a resumption
In NBPA regional rep Tim McCormick's group text to players, he wrote: "Michele (Roberts) asked for me to reach out and ask the simple confidential question: "Do you want the season to start again?"
ESPN story on NBPA reps reaching out to players to conduct an informal survey on returning to play this season.
Yes: 1, No: 0
Sources: Some teams received the question as part of a group text that included the entire roster. One rep asked a team's players: "Do you want to try and play this season, yes or no?" Another rep worded to a different group: "Do you want the season to start again?"
National Basketball Players Association regional representatives started texting NBA players today with a 'yes or no' question it says will be kept confidential: Do you want to try and play again this season? The union's trying to gauge broader sentiment of its 400-plus players.
Jumped on with @NotthefakeSVP to discuss our news today on the NBA and NBPA -- and what financial trouble looms for the league. Plus, we broke down SVP's all-time Terps starting five.
Reporting with @BobbyMarks42: As NBA and NBPA agree to extend the league's deadline to terminate the Collective Bargaining Agreement, a stark financial landscape looms over talks. Adam Silver tells union: "This CBA was not built for an extended pandemic."
ESPN story on NBA, NBPA agreeing to extend the deadline on league's right to terminate the Collective Bargaining Agreement in wake of pandemic.
Thank you to Heat coach Erik Spoelstra and ESPN's @MariaTaylor for participating in our ESPN #OneTeam Speaker Series for The Boys and Girls Clubs of America. (@BGCA_Clubs). Some great insight and perspective for those young and old in our Florida region.
Pushing back the deadline allows for the league and union to gather a clearer picture of the economic losses and bargain on a number of crucial financial issues, including salary caps and luxury tax thresholds. Story soon on ESPN dotcom.
The NBA and NBPA reached an agreement to extend through September the 60-day window that preserves the league’s right to terminate the Collective Bargaining Agreement in the wake of the pandemic, sources told ESPN. The original 60-day window was closing early this week.
Inside everything about an NBA return-to-play -- and the league's future -- with @Rachel__Nichols and @BobbyMarks42 on The Woj Pod. Spotify: Apple: ESPN:
Full audio of The Woj Pod with @Rachel__Nichols and @BobbyMarks42:
ESPN’s @Rachel__Nichols and @BobbyMarks42 join The Woj Pod to go inside Adam Silver’s call w/ players, testing, playoff structures, how game broadcasts could change, free agency, more. Spotify: Apple: ESPN:
Joined the great @ESPNSteveLevy on @SportsCenter to go inside Adam Silver's call with the NBPA.
Full ESPN story on NBA Commissioner Adam Silver's conference call with players. "...The single greatest challenge of all our lives."
Filed updated story on Adam Silver call with players, including the commissioner preparing players for realization that there are no guarantees when fans could fully return to NBA arenas next season.
Orlando and Vegas were the two 'bubble' sites that Silver mentioned on the call, sources said. He said that there were a number of other cities that inquired about hosting the NBA.
Among players on the call, there seemed to be an appreciation that Silver was trying to answer questions as candidly as he could -- especially given the uncertanties facing league and country with virus.
Broader Adam Silver message on call to players: This is going to be hard -- and hard for a long time. We need to work together. Hard choices are coming. No one will agree on everything. There are some difficult days of collective bargaining coming with grim financial realities.
Asked on NBPA call about how long a training camp could be should this season resume, Silver suggested "three weeks" as the minimum length that's been discussed within the league, sources said.
If the season were to resume and players wanted a safer way to get back into market, Silver did leave open the possibility that idea would be addressed again, sources said.
Sources: Silver explained to players why the league wouldn't allow teams to use private team jets to bring players worried about commericial travel back to market for voluntary workouts. He cited trying to manage the competitive advantage among teams as one of his reasons.
Silver told players that he believes each of his 30 owners wants to play again this season -- despite suggestion made to him on call of short-term financial advantages for some teams not to resume season. He called his owners, "Competitors."
Michele Roberts asked Silver on the call about financial impact moving foward for the league and players, and Silver flatly said that the collective bargaining agreement "wasn't built for an extended pandemic." Silver called it all: "The greatest challenge" of our lifetime.
With fans in buildings constituting 40 percent of league revenue, the NBA is working on creative ways on TV to deliver the games to audiences, Silver told players. Silver started to prepare players for possibility of no fans in arenas next year without a vaccine, sources said.
Sources: Silver told players that he still hoped that the playoffs would include a 7-game series in every round. He told players that those series could move faster without the need for travel, staying in a single site. Orlando and Vegas still tops.
Some players told Silver that they were feeling pressure from organizations to return to volunteer workouts at facilities, and Silver said he'd address it with teams, sources said.
Sources: On call with players today, Adam Silver told NBPA membership: 1) "It would be safer to be in a single location, or two locations, to start." 2) That the NBA doesn't have to make a decision on re-starting in season in May, nor does it have to decide right away in June.
Among teams opening today, including Portland and Cleveland, the Covid-19 testing option isn't in place. Blazers and Cavaliers are among teams planning to participate in the Mayo Clinic Coronavirus Antibody Study that'll provide confidential test results to players, sources said.
Magic: "We have been assured we are not taking any tests from healthcare workers, 1st responders or anyone whether they are experiencing symptoms or asymptomatic. As we've been told, the general public in our community can go to numerous locations to receive a Coronavirus test."
Orlando has been granted written authorization from the Orange County (FL) Department of Health and approval from NBA to test its players for the coronavirus, a team spokesman said.
The NBA recently informed teams of a "limited exception" to guidelines. Essentially, the NBA will approve a written authorization from a local health authority that confirms a "robust testing program in place for at-risk health care workers" in the team's community.
Organizations such as Magic, Lakers and Clippers are expected to be among those able to conduct coronavirus tests of every player and staff member re-entering facilities for workouts --- regardless of whether they're experiencing symptoms. ESPN Story:
Story filed to ESPN: In municipalities where coronavirus testing has become readily available for at-risk healthcare workers, teams opening facilities for voluntary workouts will be allowed to administer Covid-19 tests to asymptomatic players and staff.
The Denver Nuggets are planning to re-open the team practice facility for voluntary individual player workouts on Monday -- not today, sources tell ESPN.
In a statement, the Indiana Pacers reflect on Mike Storen, the organization's founder and first GM: "It is impossible to overstate the formative impact Storen had on our franchise and the American Basketball Association..."
ESPN story on the passing of Mike Storen: Innovative sports executive, ABA Commissioner, NBA GM and father of @HannahStormESPN.
Mark Cuban's concerns on the inability for a team to test asymptomatic players entering the gym for these volunteer workouts is shared by other franchises. "I just don't think the risk is worth the reward," Cuban said.
Head coaches will not be allowed to participate or observe the player workouts, per sources.
Teams opening practice facilities for volunteer workouts will be able to designate six assistant coaches or player development personnel to provide supervision of player workouts on the courts, source tells ESPN.
Had a fantastic visit with Miami Heat coach Erik Spoelstra and ESPN's @MariaTaylor for @BGCA_Clubs members in our #Oneteam Speaker Series tonight. Look for the entire Q-and-A session soon on ESPN's Youtube page.
This originates as an NBPA conference call with union membership -- with Adam Silver joining Michele Roberts in what's expected to be an informational check-in with players.
Without widespread coronavirus testing available to country, NBA remains sensitive on using tests w/ players showing no symptoms entering facilities to start workouts. If/when NBA opens camps for a formal return to play, there's an understanding testing protocols would change.
Sources: As some practice facilities become able to re-open starting Friday, teams are still instructed not to test asymptomatic players for coronavirus. For now, NBA's informed teams of updated measures on cardiac screening for certain players prior to voluntary workouts.
Joined @minakimes on the ESPN Daily Podcast to discuss how the G-League's professional pathway program is impacting the NBA and NCAA.
“I was in awe of him,” Pat Riley tells Dan Le Batard on Don Shula. Been waiting to read this one:
These are so good
Reporting on @SportsCenter on The NBA Board of Governors' discussions on pushing back start of 2020-2021 season to December.
ESPN Sources: As ownership support grows for the idea, NBA and Board of Governors continued discussions on Friday about delaying start of 2020-2021 season until December.
Among the discussion topics today on the call: The merits of moving back the start of the 2020-2021 until December, sources said. Part of that ongoing converation surrounds the opportunity a delay could give NBA teams to get more fans in arenas for more games next season.
The NBA's Board of Governors voted on those items in a conference call today, but held off on formally pushing back the June 25 Draft date -- although sources still expect that will eventually be done.
Both events were scheduled for May in Chicago.
The NBA postponed the May Draft Lottery and Combine today, sources tell ESPN.
Inside the NBA's most pressing decisions as it works to finish this season
The Woj Pod with @AdamSchefter and @JeffPassan: Spotify: Apple:
The Woj Pod with @AdamSchefter and @JeffPassan: We discuss the futures of the NBA, NFL and MLB, crisis leadership in sports, reporting our beats in these times, Adam's bookshelf and Jeff's fledgling singing career.
Let's make that @spidadmitchell
If you're able, please consider giving to a Boys and Girls Club of your choice I'm matching donations to $25K at my childhood club in Bristol. For many young people, these club services have never been so crucial. #oneteam
Doors to Boys and Girls Clubs of America may be closed for now, but @BGCA_Clubs are still reaching out to kids in our communities. Proud to work w/ @ESPNCitizenship for a series of regional Q-and-A sessions. My visit w/ Donovan Mitchell (@SpidaMitchell):
Incredible window into life and death in our state right now. Morgues. Hospital ICU’s. Food kitchens. Family kitchens. Train stations. Hours waiting on hold with unemployment. Bravo @starledger and @njdotcom.
New story soon ESPN, but to be clear: The NBA was already working to push back its initial May 1 date to re-open facilities independent of Atlanta's decision to delay its own re-opening. The league was getting feedback from all corners on the issue.
Despite pushback among many franchises, there are still other teams embracing idea of re-opening facilities, believing that a clean, safe and monitored team environment is needed now to keep players from potentially searching out less safe gymnasium environments to stay in shape.
There's some expectation the NBA could move that re-opening date back from Friday -- perhaps a week or so -- especially with Hawks now holding off on re-opening their facility until they have a better sense of how loosening of restrictions impacts region.
NBA has received significant pushback from teams about idea of re-opening practice facilities in selected states and municipalities, team officials tell ESPN. Competive balance hasn't been issue -- player/staff safety has. Teams are still awaiting a more detailed NBA plan today.
Hawks President of Basketball Operations/GM Travis Schlenk tells ESPN that Hawks won’t be opening team facility to players Friday. “We are going to wait and see what happens in the state over the couple of weeks,” Schlenk tells ESPN. Georgia relaxed stay-at-home policies.
Ball Brothers signing with Raymond Brothers, Roc Nation’s President of Basketball
ESPN story on 76ers executive Marc Eversley agreeing to a deal to become the general manager of the Chicago Bulls.
Eversley, a native of Canada, will become the first black GM in franchise history. He comes to the Bulls after front office runs with the Sixers, Wizards, Raptors and a decade at Nike. Michael Reinsdorf has now fully remade the Bulls front office now.
Sixers assistant GM Marc Eversley has agreed to a deal to become the Chicago Bulls new general manager, league sources tell ESPN. Eversley will join EVP of Basketball Operations Arturas Karnisovas to lead a reshaped front office.
ESPN story on NBA opening practice facilities for players in markets where governments are loosening stay-at-home restrictions.
NBA's decision on opening practice facilities to players in markets where governments may be loosening stay-at-home orders doesn't mean a resumption of season is imminent. The NBA is still unsure on if/when it can play again. But getting players safely into gyms was a priority.
As Georgia moves toward opening certain businesses -- including gymasiums -- some players were asking their teams if they should consider traveling there to find a way to play. Organizations wants players in safe/clean team environments, not a fitness center in suburban Atlanta.
Sources: Teams will be allowed to make facilities open to players on a voluntary basis for individual work, but larger group workouts will still be prohibited. In NBA markets that aren't loosening restrictions, league plans to work w/ teams on other arrangements for players.
Beginning on May 1, the NBA is allowing teams to open their practice facilities to players in cities and states where local governments have eased stay-at-home orders, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on 6-foot-11 Makur Maker entering the 2020 NBA Draft:
ESPN story on G-League players voting to form a union -- with an assist from @TheNBPA:
Among agents and players, there’s been optimism that the vote will render the union’s formation  which would allow G-League players to collectively bargain with the NBA and G-League. Issues for G-League players in the past have included housing, salary and travel.
NBA’s G-League players will begin voting Saturday on the creation of a union, sources tell ESPN. The NBPA's assisting in the formation of a G-League-governed players association that would need more than 50 percent of players to sign an electronic authorization card for passage.
Memphis Grizzlies assistant Niele Ivey is returning to Notre Dame to replace Hall of Famer Muffet McGraw as coach, school says. McGraw retired after 33 seasons today. Ivey joined the Memphis staff last season after 17 seasons as an assistant and player in South Bend.
The week in The Woj Pod: Patrick Ewing and Jeff Van Gundy on Knicks-Bulls battles in the 90’s: Jonathan Givony (@Draftexpress) on NBA’s pro pathway program and future of draft:
ESPN story on NBA and NBPA finalizing plan to withhold 25 percent of player paychecks starting on May 15.
A formal ratification of the plan is underway this afternoon.
ESPN Sources: The NBA and NBPA have agreed on the withholding of 25 percent of each player paycheck beginning on May 15. Deal gives gradual reduction in salary should Force Majeure provision be enacted with cancellation of regular season games. May 1 checks will be paid in full.
The Last Dance starts Sunday on ESPN
Full audio of The Woj Pod on the NBA/NCAA changing landscape:
Kentucky freshman Tyrese Maxey -- a projected lottery pick -- has signed with agent Rich Paul of Klutch Sports, Paul tells ESPN.
As NBA/NBPA talks on eliminating one-and-done remain stalled, strengthening the pro pathway initaitive became even more important to Adam Silver. In many ways, this is a bridge to that eventual day. LaMelo Ball and RJ Hampton signing in Australia accelerated these changes.
The Woj Pod with @DraftExpress detailing how Adam Silver and Shareef Abdur-Rahim decided to financially compete with the NCAA and Australia to bring the elite players into the NBA pipeline and how it'll change the landscape of basketball. Listen here:
G-League President Shareef Abdur-Rahim tells ESPN: "The NBA is the best development system in the world, and those players shouldn't have to go somewhere else (abroad) to develop for a year. They should be in our development system."
Green's committing to become part of year-long developmental program with G-League oversight that'll include pro coaching, top prospects and veteran players who’ll combine training and exhibition game competitions against likes of G-League teams, national teams and NBA Academies.
Full ESPN story with details on the NBA's elevated pro pathway program that could change the landscape of basketball:
Reporting w/ @Draftexpress: Jalen Green is making the leap to a reshaped NBA professional pathway program, a G-League initiative that’ll pay elite prospects $500K-plus and provide a one-year development program outside of minor-league’s traditional team structure. Story soon.
Full episode of Patrick Ewing and JVG on the 90’s Knicks-Bulls rivalry:
The Woj Pod with Patrick Ewing (@CoachEwing33) and Jeff Van Gundy on the 1990's Knicks-Bulls rivalry, Michael Jordan, Pat Riley, the playoff battles, the 'Con Man' game, and much more. Apple: Spotify:
Full episode of the Woj Pod with Patrick Ewing and Jeff Van Gundy:
ESPN Sources: The Bulls and Arturas Karnisovas had permission granted to interview three of the franchise's GM candidates this week: Marc Eversley (76ers), Mark Hughes (Clippers) and Matt Lloyd (Magic).
Next up on The Woj Pod: @CoachEwing33 and Jeff Van Gundy on the 90’s Knicks-Bulls rivalry.
Bulls will start calling for permission on hiring the GM to work with Karnisovas and those interviews will start in short order, per sources. Booth is a serious candidate for promotion to replace Karnisovas as GM in Denver.
Sources: Arturas Karnisovas is planning to start discussing Chicago’s GM job with candidates soon, a pool that’s expected to include several assistant GM’s: Calvin Booth (Denver), Marc Eversley (Sixers), Mark Hughes (Clippers) and Matt Lloyd (Magic) — among others.
Connelly -- with a strong background in player personnel -- is moving quickly toward joining a reshaped Chicago front office that already includes New Orleans executive J.J. Polk, as @KCJHoop reported. Formal Bulls announcement on Karnisovas' hiring could come as early as today.
ESPN Sources: Another candidate in serious talks to join Arturas Karnisovas' front office with the Chicago Bulls: Denver scout Pat Connelly, who was previously an assistant GM with Suns.
Reporting with @DraftExpress: As information gathering on draft-eligible prospects remains limited in a pandemic, many NBA teams are united in hopes of encouraging the league office to push the date of the June 25 draft until no sooner than August 1. Story soon on ESPN.
Full episode with Vanderbilt coach @JerryStackhouse:
NBA and NBPA have been negotiating a withholding of a percentage of players salaries per upcoming paycheck dates. Next up: May 1 checks. League would keep percentage of salaries based on canceled games.
NBA will pay players full checks on April 15, league tell teams in a memo.
Summer pod with Arturas Karnisovas on a remarkable journey to the Bulls, including KGB’s role in letting him leave for Seton Hall — where he loaded up on math and science classes until he learned English. A year later, he became a Big East Scholar-Athlete.
ESPN story on the Chicago Bulls hiring Denver GM Arturas Karnisovas to run basketball operations.
Bulls offered the job to Karnisovas earlier this evening, and negotiated the details through the night, sources said. Karnisovas will leave Denver for Chicago after helping Tim Connelly and Josh Kroenke to rebuild the Nuggets into a Western Conference contender.
The Chicago Bulls are finalizing a deal with Denver Nuggets GM Arturas Karnisovas to become the franchise’s new Executive VP of Basketball Operations, sources tell ESPN. Karnisovas will be tasked with hiring a new GM and reshaping the front office.
Full episode of The Woj Pod with @JerryStackhouse:
No offer has yet been extended, but Denver Nuggets GM Arturas Karnisovas has emerged as the strong front-runner to become the Chicago Bulls’ next Executive VP of Basketball Operations. Story on ESPN:
Sources: Denver's Arturas Karnisovas completed a second lengthy interview with the Bulls late this afternoon, which included both owner Jerry Reinsdorf and COO Michael Reinsdorf. Karnisovas is the clear frontrunner in franchise's process to hire a new top basketball executive.
Story on NBA and ESPN finalizing plans for HORSE competition with @CP3, @TheTraeYoung and @ZachLaVine on board to compete in event.
ESPN story on Denver GM Arturas Karnisovas emerging as a focus of the Chicago Bulls search for a new top basketball executive.
Sources: The NBA and ESPN plan to televise a HORSE competition is nearing completion and among those expected to participate include Chris Paul, Trae Young and Zach LaVine. Competition will also include a couple of WNBA players and recent NBA alumni.
Full episode with Vanderbilt’s @JerryStackhouse on The Woj Pod:
Denver GM Arturas Karnisovas has made a strong impression on the Bulls in the franchise's process for a new top basketball executive, sources tell ESPN. Those conversations are ongoing.
Former Atlanta Hawks GM Wes Wilcox interviewed for the Chicago Bulls Executive VP of Basketball Operations job today, sources tell ESPN. Wilcox helped build an Eastern Conference contender with the Hawks. Wilcox is currently an analyst with NBA-TV.
Vanderbilt's @JerryStackhouse on The Woj Pod: The legend of a high school Kobe beating all the 76ers (“Could you imagine a 17-year old beating me consistently? I had have hurt him first."), why Stack didn’t love his NBA season w/ MJ, the Vandy challenge.
Most important would be a significant increase in available coronavirus tests with a quick turnaround time, which sources familiar with the plan believe will happen by early May and allow MLB's testing not to diminish access for the general public.
Utah Jazz GM Justin Zanik did a video interview with the Chicago Bulls today for the franchise's Executive VP of Basketball Operations opening, sources tell ESPN. Denver Nuggets GM Arturas Karnisovas will interview with Bulls mid-week.
Here is ESPN story from last week explaining those talks:
NBPA has postponed today's conference call with player agents until Tuesday, sources tells ESPN. Several topics covered expected to include current negotiations with NBA on payment schedules for withholding percentage of player salaries based on possibility of canceled games.
ESPN story on Stanford guard Tyrell Terry entering the 2020 NBA Draft.
Stanford freshman guard Tyrell Terry is entering the 2020 NBA Draft, sources tell ESPN. He shot 40.8 percent on three-pointers, and 89 percent from the free throw line. He had nine 20-point-plus games for Stanford.
Story on NBA and ESPN working on televising a H-O-R-S-E competition.
The NBA and ESPN are working on televising a H-O-R-S-E competition involving several high-profile players, sources say. Players would shoot in isolation  presumably in home gyms  and match shots against competitors. Details are still being finalized.
On conference call with Trump and pro sports leaders today, NBA Commissioner Adam Silver spoke of a possible return to play once there was an "all clear" from public health officials, sources familiar with call tell ESPN.
In ESPN story with @AdamSchefter on White House call with pro sports leagues, Trump also raised idea of the leagues working together to lobby for tax credits that once existed to deduct the purchase of tickets and concessions.
NBA commissioner Adam Silver told those on Trump conference call that the leagues were the first to shut down and that they would love to lead the way in starting the economy once there was an “all clear” from public health officials, sources familiar with call told ESPN.
Full episode of The Woj Pod with @BobbyMarks42:
The Woj Pod with ESPN front office insider @BobbyMarks42 on the Bulls search for a new top basketball executive, the runway to an NBA return this season and shutdown's impact on league's future and free agency. ESPN Pods link:
Statement to ESPN from Larry H. Miller Group that owns Jazz
As part of cutbacks within approximately 80 companies within the Larry H. Miller Group, there are layoffs underway with the Utah Jazz, organizaton tells ESPN. Sources say those cutbacks are limited to non-basketball staff and some employees are taking compensation reductions.
A new top basketball executive in place if/when the season resumes gives him a chance to evaluate the roster and coaching staff before the off-season starts.
ESPN story on the Chicago Bulls plans to begin talking with candidates to run the franchise's basketball operations, including plans to contact Denver's Arturas Karnisovas and Toronto's Bobby Webster.
Among the Bulls initial plans will be to seek permission to interview Denver Nuggets general manager Arturas Karnisovas and Toronto GM Bobby Webster, among other candidates, sources tell ESPN.
Ownership has discussed the plan with Executive VP of Basketball Operations John Paxson and GM Gar Forman, sources said. Paxson is likely to continue in an advisory role with franchise; there are expected to be more conversations with Forman about his future too.
Story filed to ESPN: The Chicago Bulls have started a formal search process to hire a new top executive with full authority on basketball decisions, sources tell ESPN.
On World Autism Day: The Ingles family story
Marshall Leonard used to play pro soccer for the New England Revolution. Now he’s working as an emergency room doctor in New York City. Here’s his final thought with @NotthefakeSVP tonight:
If NBA does lose games and trigger the Force Majeure, it provides the league an option within 60 days of re-opening and renegotiating CBA with NBPA. Deal runs through 2025. The NBA's expressed no interest in executing that option under these current circumstances, sources said.
Players lose approximately 1 percent of salary per cancelled game based on Force Majeure provision, which covers several catastrophic circumstances, including epidemics/pandemics. Once/if there’s a cancellation of games, Force Majeure automatically triggers under language of CBA.
ESPN Sources: The NBA and NBPA are discussing scenarios for withholding up to 25 percent of players remaining salaries in a league escrow should regular-season games eventually be cancelled. Story:
Currently, the NBA has Board of Governors meetings set for April 16-17, but it's extremely doubtful those can be held in person. It is more likely the BOG could have a conference call meeting on April 17, per sources.
Update: The NBA is planning to hold Board of Governors meeting at a later date, but this week is expected to include meetings with front office commitees.
This is really outstanding.
This Tweet from @wojespn has been withheld in response to a report from the copyright holder. Learn more.
#Oneteam
The Week in The Woj Pod: Doris Burke: Denver President Tim Connelly: Italian League coach Tom Bialaszewski:
Detroit Pistons scout Maury Hanks has survived a great deal in a remarkable basketball life: Falling through his attic floor and fracturing his back, a car crash. This time, he's fighting the coronavirus in the ICU. Story:
Full episode with Doris Burke:
Spotify:
Doris Burke joins The Woj Pod to reveal she's tested positive for the COVID-19 virus. She details her symptoms, her hospital testing experience, recovery and goal of sharing importance of social distancing and other measures underway to combat pandemic.
Plus we talked some 80’s pro wrestling
Full episode of The Woj Pod with Denver Nuggets President Tim Connelly:
Pistons scout Maury Hanks has survived it all: Falling through his attic floor and fracturing his back, a car crash, career changes and firings. Now, he's fighting the coronavirus in a Tennessee ICU. ESPN story on the irrepressible Mo Hanks:
The Woj Pod with Denver Nuggets President Tim Connelly on the NBA shutdown, the franchise's quarantine, the impact of the virus on our lives and economy and ... our favorite 1980's/1990's pro wrestling storylines. ESPN Pods:
ESPN story on NBA reducing base salaries 20 percent of top-earning league office executives around the world, including commissioner Adam Silver and deputy Mark Tatum.
This salary reduction includes commissioner Adam Silver and deputy commissioner Mark Tatum, sources said. There are no widespread cuts to the rest of organization; no support or administrative staff are impacted. Top executives and senior leaders are first to takes these cuts now
When reached, NBA spokesman Mike Bass wouldn’t confirm, but told ESPN: “These are unprecedented times and, like other companies across all industries, we need to take short-term steps to deal with the harsh economic impact on our business and organization.”
The NBA is reducing base salaries by 20 percent of approximately 100 of the league office’s top-earning executives around the world, sources tell ESPN.
Maury Hanks is a well-respected scout with the Detroit Pistons. He’s also worked in the NBA with the Nets and Raptors and coached for decades in college ball. He’s in a battle right now with the coronavirus. A lot of people on all levels of ball are pulling for him.
Dayton’s Obi Toppin — No.9 in ESPN’s Top 100 — has entered the 2020 NBA Draft.
An emotional Karl-Anthony Towns revealing that his mother, diagnosed with the coronavirus, is in a coma and connected to a ventilator. He’s clearly trying to further alert the public to the seriousness of the pandemic.
ESPN story on IMG Academy's Kenyon Martin Jr., entering the 2020 NBA Draft --- 20 years after his father Kenyon Sr., was the No. 1 overall pick to the Nets.
IMG Academy forward Kenyon Martin Jr., has declared for the 2020 NBA Draft, his father Kenyon Martin Sr., tells ESPN. Martin Jr., is eligible for draft, because he did the post-graduate year at IMG after graduating from Sierra Canyon H.S. in SoCal.
Full episode of The Woj Pod with Italian League coach Tom Bialaszewski on life in isolation and Kobe’s reach to his childhood home.
How NBA teams are dealing with the crisis of a lifetime, an ESPN story with assists from @espn_macmahon, @TimBontemps, @BobbyMarks42 and @cristinadaglas.
Sixers ownership statement to ESPN: ''....After listening to our staff and players, it's clear that was the wrong decision. We have reversed it and will be paying these employees their full salary."
76ers ownership is planning to change course, pulling back on salary reductions for staff, league source tells ESPN.
The Woj Pod: Olimpia Milano assistant Tom Bialaszewski on life in isolation in Italy, working w/ Kobe Bryant as Lakers assistant, night Kobe tore his Achilles, impact of Kobe’s loss in his childhood home of Italy. Spotify: ESPN:
Other NBA owners are watching Sixers and weighing the PR fallout vs. desire to do the same with salary reductions -- including some considering furloughs, staff cutbacks, etc. No owner wants to log into Twitter and see his net worth trending after announcing this kind of news.
Only at-will employees -- over $50K a year in salary -- are required to accept the Sixers salary reductions. Those under contract are needed to "volunteer" to do it.
Members of Sixers coaching staff and front office on contracts have until Thursday to agree to 20 percent salary reduction, sources tell ESPN. Among many so far, there's apprehension on committing to giving back money -- especially with uncertainty surrounding employment futures.
Iowa State sophomore guard @TyHaliburton22 is entering the 2020 NBA draft, he tells @DraftExpress and me. Haliburton, the No. 7 prospect in ESPN’s Top 100, has emerged as one of the draft's elite point guard prospects.
For those missing Dr. Fauci today on the coronavirus, here’s my podcast with another expert and truth-teller
The United States Olympic Committee has requested to the IOC that the 2020 Tokyo Olympics be postponed.
University of Minnesota sophomore F/C Daniel Oturu plans to enter the 2020 NBA Draft, he tells ESPN.
Duke sophomore guard Tre Jones -- the ACC Player of the Year -- will enter the 2020 NBA Draft, he tells ESPN. Story:
Full Woj Pod with @ASlavitt:
ESPN story on NBA keeping its options open on exercising Force Majeure provision that would withhold payment to players for cancelled games.
The NBA and NBPA have had ongoing discussions on this issue -- and a number of others. The NBA can withhold 1/92.6 percent of a players' salary per cancelled game -- about one percent of an annual salary.
The NBA informed teams that league will provide "additional guidance" on the April 15 payment date, per memo today. Force Majeure language in CBA allows for a percentage of contracts to be withheld in extreme circumstances. It isn't a surprise NBA would wait on April 15 date.
The NBA plans to pay players their next checks on April 1, but haven't committed yet to next payments due on April 15, league sources tell ESPN.
Full episode of the Woj Pod with @ASlavitt:
At the end, I asked @ASlavitt from where he thinks our leadership will come during this pandemic. I loved his answer.
Former Obama healthcare head @ASlavitt on The Woj Pod: Coronavirus threat to our lives and country, what needs to happen now, realism in timelines of an NBA return, role NBA has played in educating the public, much more. ESPN audio:
Potential No. 1 overall NBA draft pick Anthony Edwards of Georgia has declared for the NBA Draft, he tells @EvanDaniels.
Pod will be posted early this afternoon.
Just taped The Woj Pod with @ASlavitt, one of the vital experts and voices on what we're facing with the coronavirus and how the NBA fits into everything. I've never told you a pod is a must-listen. I hope you'l consider this a must-listen. (Also, Andy's a Bulls/Timberwolves fan)
Sixers statement
Sixers tested players, coaches, and specific basketball operations support staff, team says. The three positive tests came out of that grouping.
Three members of the Sixers staff have tested positive for the coronavirus, team says.
"The person, who was tested after experiencing symptoms consistent with COVID-19 on March 16, is currently under care of team medical staff and in self isolation."
The Denver Nuggets say a member of organization has tested positive for the coronavirus.
In safeguarding players health, the NBA's directive on playing ball in these times is clear: Outside of perhaps a personal home gym, shut it down.
Teams had been encourging of idea of shuttering faciltiies for immediate future. As much as franchises wanted players to have an outlet to come get work in, teams and league were uneasy about contact even in that limited environment. This was an inevitable move for a long hiatus.
Players will not be allowed to travel outside of North America, league tells teams in a memo.
Sources: NBA has informed teams that players are allowed to travel out of market, but preference remains that players stay in cities they play. As expected, teams facilities will close down to players and staff starting tomorrow.
Dr. @celinegounder on @LeBatardShow on lack of basic protections for medical professionals in hospitals now: "I’ve been on the front lines working as an Ebola aid worker in West Africa. We were never asked as aid workers to go in this unprotected and unprepared."
Opinion  A New York Doctor’s Coronavirus Warning: The Sky Is Falling - The New York Times
.@MRobertsNBPA: "The problem that more of us can't get the tests -- and I'm not apologetic about saying it --- in my view, that rests at the foot of the federal government. They were responsible for making sure we were protected in that regard and I think they failed."
The OKC Thunder say test results are negative for the coronavirus for players and staff.
ESPN story on NBA raising credit line up to $1.2 billion — and Board of Governors bracing for a long, tough road to a resumption of play.
The NBA discussed the plan on a call with the Board of Governors on Tuesday, sources said. For the NBA, this would allow the league to increase cash flow through what’s expected to be an extended shutdown of the season.
Amid the coronavirus pandemic, the NBA is planning to raise its credit line up to $1.2 billion, sources tell ESPN. The previous credit line has been $650 million.
Sources: The ex-US surgeon general Vivek Murthy delivered NBA Board of Governors call a message consistent with other credible health organizations on grim potential impact of coronavirus pandemic in U.S., but left owners with hope of re-starting season/playoffs before July.
Sources: Brooklyn tested the team upon returning from San Francisco and results came back today. Nets paid out of pocket to a private company to conduct tests. One player awoke with some aches today; rest have experienced no symptoms.
Organization says it's notifying anyone who has had known contact with the players, including recent opponents. All Nets players and traveling party have been told to remain isolated.
Four Nets have tested positive for the coronavirus, team says.
Players may have to make decisions on entering 2020 NBA Draft with reality that there could be no opportunity to audition for teams individually, or attend a combine. The unknown certainly extends to college underclassmen.
Reporting with @DraftExpress: NBA VP Kiki VanDeWeghe sent a memo to NCAA coaches telling them that league’s accepting applications to the Undergraduate Advisory Committee, which gives feedback to players on potential draft stock. The pre-draft process remains murky amid crisis.
The NBA Shutdown on The Woj Pod: Answering your questions on what’s happening in wake of the coronavirus pandemic  and what comes next for the NBA. ESPN: Apple: Spotify:
The NBA will hold a Board of Governors call on Tuesday, sources tell ESPN. This is the third meeting with owners and commissioner since Wednesday. As information flows into league on the coronavirus pandemic, there's plenty to discuss, analyze and eventually make decisions on.
The NBA Shutdown on The Woj Pod: Flying solo with your questions on what’s happening in the wake of the coronavirus pandemic  and what could come next for the NBA. ESPN: Apple: Spotify:
The Self-Isolation edition of The Woj Pod is on the way with your help. Tweet me your NBA shutdown questions, if you’d like. Send the Brady inquiries to @AdamSchefter, however).
NBA has sent memo to teams telling them that players can leave respective cities during hiatus, league source tell ESPN.
Story includes NBA’s willingness to consider team practice facilities for games with no fans — and perhaps a unique television viewing experience. Everything’s on the table.
ESPN story on NBA owners and executives preparing for a minimum three month hiatus — and awaiting league office’s projections on financial damage.
Beyond obvious calender issues, the fact G League teams travel on commericial airlines and generally are money-drains for NBA teams make it even harder to move forward for rest of the season. No imminent announcement and G-League teams have been told to stay in town for now.
Reporting with @malika_andrews: NBA teams operating G League franchises expect rest of the minor-league season will soon be cancelled, sources tell ESPN. Regular season runs thru end of March, playoffs into April. Players have been informed they'll be paid thru end of schedule.
CDC recommendation of no events of 50-plus people for next two months comes as a number of NBA owners and executives increasingly believe a best case scenario is a mid-to-late June return to play -- with no fans. League's scouting for possible arena dates all the way thru August.
Life at the epicenter of N.J.’s coronavirus outbreak - ROI-NJ
1) Some important information for these times. 2) I love basketball too.
There's been no discussion about the league/owners trying to trigger the Force Majeure should the season be lost because of coronavirus pandemic -- but union clearly wants to make sure players understand it exists.
In email to players, the NBPA spelled out terms on a doomsday provision included in CBA that could free owners from paying players a percentage of their salaries should rest of season be lost to the coronavirus pandemic. Story on ESPN:
Adam Silver letter to NBA fans
NBA Commissioner Adam Silver said on TNT that the NBA hiatus will be "at least 30 days."
A charter flight carrying members of the Utah Jazz has landed back in Salt Lake City, league sources tell ESPN. It is immediately unclear if Rudy Gobert or Donovan Mitchell were on the flight from Oklahoma City. Both All-Stars have tested positive for the coronavirus.
NBA owners are encouraging of commissioner Adam Silver to re-evaluate the league's suspension in 30 days, sources tell ESPN. League is expected to make a formal announcement on an initial timetable soon.
The NBA has pushed back a Board of Governors call today by three hours -- now set to start at 3:30 PM ET, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Donovan Mitchell:
Jazz star Donovan Mitchell has tested positive for the coronavirus, league sources tell ESPN. Jazz players privately say that Rudy Gobert had been careless in the locker room touching other players and their belongings. Now a Jazz teammate has tested positive.
The Rockets did favor a 3-4 weeks pause that would allow the NBA to play into the summer, sources said. They were less enthusiastic about the idea of playing games in the short-term without fans.
ESPN Sources: Besides the Knicks, two other teams on the Board of Governors call Wednesday expressed reservations on eliminating fans from games without first receiving a formal governmental mandate to do so: Houston and Indiana.
NBA owners and executives have slammed league office with a myriad of procedural and bigger picture questions. The league’s response: Sit tight until Thursday and let us work through it all. Some teams are planning to close facilities today and give players a couple of days away.
Jazz and Thunder officials worked together on Wednesday as they awaited results of Rudy Gobert's coronavirus test, sources tell ESPN. Jazz wanted to make sure no OKC player had physical contact or became exposed to any Utah player before the result of Gobert's test was known.
The Jazz will need to coordinate with Oklahoma and Salt Lake City public health organizations before they can return to Utah, per sources. For now, the team is quarantined in OKC.
The Jazz and Thunder players are currently quarantined in the OKC arena, league sources tell ESPN. This is following Rudy Gobert testing positive for the coronavirus.
The NBA "will use hiatus to determine next steps moving forward," league says.
The NBA has suspended the season.
Several teams were willing to put the games on hiatus, but the rest wanted to move toward eliminating fans from arenas to continue playing games, sources tell ESPN. One team wanted to keep status quo until a governmental/public mandate dictated change: The New York Knicks.
New story filed to ESPN: The NBA’s Board of Governors shared a consensus on Wednesday to continue the season playing games without fans in arenas amid the coronavirus crisis, and Commissioner Adam Silver is expected to move in that direction with a decision on Thursday.
The greater consensus among the teams is continuing to play games without fans in arenas, and the league is expected to move toward a resolution on Thursday, sources tell ESPN.
Reporting with @ZachLowe_NBA: Consensus among owners on Board of Governors call with league office was either continue season with no fans in arenas -- or have NBA take a hiatus for a period time. NBA is expected to have a decision as soon as Thursday on next steps.
The NBA's exploring ways to allow the league to continue playing and televising games during the coronavirus crisis, even with it increasingly likely that'll be done in empty arenas. The Board of Governors/owners with NBA was set for 4:30 PM ET.
ESPN story with @ZachLowe_NBA on NBA/NBPA meeting today that included discussions and brainstorming on how to proceed with the looming and inevitable absence of fans in league arenas.
Story filed to ESPN with @ZachLowe_NBA: In a meeting with the NBPA on the coronavirus crisis today, NBA and union discussed ways to continue the season without the cancellation or loss of games --- while conceding sport's trending toward period of time without fans in attendance.
"In addition to playing the Nets-Warriors game without fans," would be a clearer way to start that sentence.
In addition to Thursday's game against Brooklyn, the Chase Center has cancelled or postponed all events at the downtown San Francisco arena through March 21.
Golden State players are set to meet with members of team management soon to be updated on the latest information, sources said.
Warriors stil meeting on the matter and further direction could come from league owner’s call this afternoon, per sources. For now, the Chase Center is expected to be empty for game vs. Brooklyn on Thursday. Warriors are away until March 25th, so that buys them time at Chase.
The Golden State Warriors are planning to play foreseeable home games without fans in observance of the San Francisco Health Office's order prohibiting group of events of 1K or more from assembling, source tells ESPN.
NBA’s discussing a number of possibilities -- including eliminating fans from games or, more drastically, suspending game operations for a period of time. Decisions on those options remain complicated by fact there’s been such a limited amount of public testing for coronavirus.
ESPN Sources: NBA is discussing scenarios that include moving some games to cities that have yet to suffer outbreaks --- including opponent arenas or neutral sites.
Cleveland and coach JB Bickerstaff's new contract extends four years -- through the 2023-2024 season, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story with @WindhorstESPN on NBA's plan to shut down media's locker room access to players in wake of the coronavirus:
League told teams these are among recommendations of infectious disease and public health experts. Essential team personnel in locker room would include coaches, front office, basketball staff, PR staff, etc).
Reporting with @WindhorstESPN: NBA is planning to limit locker room access to only players and essential team personnel in wake of coronavirus. Teams are also instructed to create a 6-to-8 foot distance between players and media in availability sessions outside locker rooms.
ESPN story with @ZachLowe_NBA on NBA planning a Wednesday call with team owners/governors to discuss the coronavirus.
Concerns are escalating among owners and executives that more drastic steps could be coming for the league, including games played with only essential personnel in arenas; the precise scenario that the NBA has required teams be prepared to execute.
Reporting with @ZachLowe_NBA: The NBA has set a conference call with team owners/governors for Wednesday afternoon to discuss the escalating coronavirus crisis and next steps for teams, league sources tell ESPN.
Jontay Porter, a rookie F/C out of Missouri, has signed a multi-year deal with the Grizzlies, his agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells ESPN. Porter rehabbed two separate knee injuries, but has progressed well and is expected to be ready for training camp next season.
ESPN story on the NBA’s latest directives to teams on preparing for the coronavirus.
New memo to to teams says each is required to have several plans in place by Tuesday, including arrangement with an infectious disease specialist, the IDing of a facility to test for coronavirus, a plan to limit number of team and arena staff who'd interact with players.
NBA team doctors and trainers will have a conference call on Monday morning to discuss next steps with coronavirus, league sources tell ESPN.
Milwaukee’s Giannis Antetokounmpo is getting a precautionary MRI on his left knee, league sources tell ESPN. The MVP landed hard on the floor and tweaked the knee in second half of the loss to the Lakers Friday night, but stayed in the game.
Kenny Atkinson will be in tremendous demand on the market, especially with teams executing a rebuild. There's no question about his comfort level and track record leading those teams.
Sean Marks and Atkinson had several conversations and the sense had been that a change was inevitable and both sides decided that there was no sense waiting on it. Both had felt that Atkinson and Nets had run course together. They have maintained a close relationship.
Team has announced now
The Nets are mutually parting ways with coach Kenny Atkinson, league source tells ESPN.
Magic coach Steve Clifford was diagnosed with dehydration and discharged from a Minneapolis hospital. He has been cleared to resume coaching the team.
Clifford was examined by doctors at the arena and will get an additional precautionary look at a local Minneapolis hospital. Team was already planning to stay overnight. Clifford had 2 stents put in his heart in 2013, but there’s no indication that this is a heart-related issue.
Steve Clifford left Magic’s game after feeling ill and will be examined at a hospital in Minnesota.
ESPN story on Joakim Noah joining the Clippers.
The Clippers are signing free agent center Joakim Noah, league sources tell ESPN. Noah, a two-time All-Star, is expected to join the team next week.
NBA statement: A team owner’s effort to influence refereeing decisions during and after a game creates perception of an unfair competitive advantage and thereby undermines the integrity of the game. Demeaning league employees also creates an intimidating workplace environment.
ESPN Sources: NBA has fined Mark Cuban $500K -- and rejected the Dallas Mavericks petition to replay the final seconds of a Feb. 22 loss to Atlanta. Cuban assailed league’s officiating leadership and system in a tirade — and twice went on court in final minutes to confront refs.
Full episode of The Woj Pod with Dell and Sonya Curry:
The Woj Pod: Terrific visit with Dell and Sonya Curry on Curry family matters, Steph’s return, a lifetime of experiences that shaped them as parents and hosting their new podcast “Raising Fame: Sports Edition.” Apple: Spotify:
NBA is fining Boston’s Marcus Smart $35K for interaction with refs in loss to Nets, per source.
Dragan Bender is signing a second 10-day contract with Golden State, league source tells ESPN.
Free agent guard Troy Daniels is finalizing a deal with Denver, league sources tell ESPN. His agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports worked out a release with Lakers, and Daniels cleared waivers today.
The Detroit Pistons are claiming G/F Jordan McRae off waivers, league sources tell ESPN. He agreed to a buyout with Denver. Phoenix had hoped to claim McRae but Detroit’s worse record allows Pistons to be higher on waiver list.
Full episode of The Woj Pod:
The Woj Pod with Memphis coach Taylor Jenkins: Coaching Ja Morant, convincing RC Buford to let him coach in minors, mentors Mike Budenholzer, Quin Snyder, Pop, more. Plus: Mini-Pod with Ja and Jaren Jackson Jr. Spotify: Apple:
Golden State Warriors star Draymond Green is signing a shoe deal with Converse, sources tell ESPN. He will become the brand’s highest profile athlete since Dwyane Wade. Green had been with Nike.
Welcome to the Knicks, Leon Rose
Reporting with @ZachLowe_NBA: In memo to teams on coronavirus, NBA suggests players choose fist-bumps over high-fives and avoid taking items such as pens, balls and jerseys to autograph. Teams also concerned about corona impact on pre-draft process. Story:
No news conference for new Knicks president Leon Rose, per source. He will attend the Rockets-Knicks game tonight at MSG. His plan is to stay behind-the-scenes initially, observe/listen and stay away from big public proclamations.
ESPN story with @mcten on Lakers hosting Dion Waiters for a workout on Monday:
ESPN story on the Lakers creating an open roster spot:
As Vogel told reporters, Lakers have no imminent plans to add another player. They still plans to meet w/ Dion Waiters, per source, but now Lakers can react should an injury occur, or perhaps add another ballhandling guard/playmaker later. Rob Pelinka plans to take his time.
Bartelstein tells ESPN: "Rob (Pelinka) and Kurt (Rambis) were fantastic in giving Troy optionality based upon all the scenarios that could play out in the coming weeks."
Lakers will waive G Troy Daniels, agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells ESPN. Two sides had been working together to find a solution that will give Daniels an opportunity elsewhere, and also give Lakers an open roster spot into March.
ESPN story on G/F Jordan McRae agreeing to buyout with the Nuggets, clearing way to likely join the Suns.
ESPN Sources: Denver has agreed to a contract buyout with G/F Jordan McRae. The Phoenix Suns are the likely destination for McRae.
Minnesota has agreed to a contract buyout with Allen Crabbe, league source tells ESPN.
No deadline buyout discussions with Knicks and F Mo Harkless, league sources tell ESPN. He will finish season with New York, despite some options with contenders. Sunday is deadline for players to be waived and become eligible for a playoff roster elsewhere.
New Orleans' JJ Redick (left hamstring strain) is doubtful to return tonight, per team.
No structural damage to left shoulder for Joel Embiid, re-evaluated in a week, per source l.
ESPN’s @Maxkellerman joins The Woj Pod on Philadelphia’s trajectory, Embiid-Simmons, James Dolan’s Knicks, Doncic-Porzingis and much more. Apple: Spotify:
Joel Embiid is out tonight vs. Knicks. More evaluation on left shoulder sprain ongoing, per source.
Joel Embiid left the 76ers game against the Cavaliers for the locker room after a shoulder injury, only to return to the bench and then exit for the locker room again. Now he’s ruled out with a left shoulder sprain.
There's no timeline for a Simmons return, but an evaluation in two weeks is more of an initial benchmark date than an expectation of a quick return to the lineup.
Ben Simmons will be re-evaluated in 2 weeks for nerve impingement in lower back, but there's little expectation that he'd be ready to return to lineup that soon, sources tell ESPN. Doctors are hopeful treatment can drive improvement, but Sixers are preparing to play without him.
ESPN story on Sixers star Ben Simmons, whose back injury will sideline him for an undetermined period of time.
ESPN Sources: Sixers star Ben Simmons is still undergoing treatment and evaluation on his back and there’s expected to be a course of action decided upon soon. This isn’t a day-to-day injury; Simmons will miss time. How much time? That’s still unclear.
NBA plans to await Adam Silver's ruling on a Dallas game protest before leveling possible discipline on Mark Cuban for his behavior during and after Atlanta loss. "We’re going to review the matter in its totality,” league spokesman tells ESPN. Story:
Morris has cleared waivers, per source.
Once F Markieff Morris clears waivers at 5 PM ET, he will sign with the Lakers into the $1.75M Disabled Player Exception, league sources tell ESPN.
After lower back injury on Saturday, Ben Simmons underwent initial evaluation in Philadelphia today and will undergo further testing tomorrow, league sources tell ESPN. He will be out for Monday's game vs. Atlanta.
Memphis F Jaren Jackson Jr., has a sprained knee and will be re-evaluated in two weeks, team says.
Amid concern, Sixers star Ben Simmons will undergo further testing on his lower back Sunday.
Philadelphia's Ben Simmons will undergo an MRI on his lower back on Sunday, league source tells ESPN. He was definitely in some pain tonight after game vs. Bucks.
The Washington District will select John “JBM” Mascone with the first pick in the 2020 NBA2K League Draft, per source.
ESPN NBA Countdown interview with James Wiseman
ESPN story with @ramonashelburne: Despite his hopes to rehab ACL for a playoff return, Lakers are waiving DeMarcus Cousins to create a roster spot.
In his first interview since leaving the University of Memphis, potential No. 1 overall NBA Draft pick James Wiseman tells ESPN: "I was really in the middle of a hurricane."
Lakers are waiving DeMarcus Cousins, league sources tell @Ramonashelburne and me.
NBA Countdown, ESPN, 7 PM ET: The first post-U of Memphis interview with potential No. 1 overall draft pick James Wiseman.
Bender is expected to sign the 10-day on Sunday. He was waived in Milwaukee after a roster spot was needed for Marvin Williams. The 7-footer was the No. 4 pick in 2016 NBA Draft. He's still only 22.
Dragan Bender plans to sign a 10-day contract with Golden State, league source tells ESPN.
Full statement: "We thank the court for its ruling. This was an incident that no one was happy about. Maybe now there can be peace between us."
Knicks statement on James Dolan's legal victory over Charles Oakley: "...Maybe now there can be peace between us."
ESPN story on the ending of John Beilein's brief, turbulent tenure as coach of the Cleveland Cavaliers.
Story filed to ESPN: After a brief and tumultuous tenure, John Beilein is leaving as Cleveland's coach. Associate HC JB Bickerstaff will be elevated to head coach. Beilein's expected to say goodbye to staff and players on Wednesday upon team's return from All-Star Break.
The Cavaliers had planned for a Beilein-Bickerstaff succession plan, but never imagined it would come at the All-Star break of Beilein's first season. Bickerstaff would be promoted to the full-time coaching role, not on an interim basis, per sources.
Cavaliers, coach John Beilein remain in discussions on his future with franchise -- including on terms of a contract settlement, league sources tell ESPN. Both sides believe he's coached his final game, but there's no resolution yet. JB Bickerstaff would elevate to head coach.
ESPN story on guard Reggie Jackson agreeing to contract buyout with the Pistons -- and planning to sign with the Los Angeles Clippers.
Guard Reggie Jackson has agreed to a contract buyout with the Detroit Pistons and plans to sign with the Los Angeles Clippers upon clearing waivers, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Rockets plans to sign DeMarre Carroll and Jeff Green.
Jeff Green will initially sign a 10-day contract with the Rockets, giving him a chance to become comfortable with the fit before commiting to a deal for the rest of the season, per sources.
Houston plans to use its two open roster spots on forwards DeMarre Carroll and Jeff Green.
San Antonio and forward DeMarre Carroll have agreed to a contract buyout, agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells ESPN. Houston is a frontrunner to sign Carroll once he clears waivers, league sources tell ESPN.
Irving replaces Pau Gasol as a Vice President of the NBPA. Gasol’s three-year term expired.
Kyrie Irving elected as VP at Players Association meeting today, per source.
All-Star Weekend Woj Pod w/ Patrick Beverley, Jackie Mac and @ryenarussillo: Spotify: Apple: All-Star Game Live Pod: Trae Young, Joel Embiid, Pascal Siakam, Nick Nurse. ESPN’s Bontemps and Malika: Spotify:
Woj Pod Live at an unforgettable 2020 All-Star Game: @TheTraeYoung, @JoelEmbiid, @pskills43 and coach Nick Nurse. Plus ESPN’s @Malika_Andrews and @TimBontemps on Kobe’s imprint on weekend, the dramatic ASG game and the stretch run for Lakers/Clippers.
ESPN story on Cleveland and John Beilein discussing his early exit as coach — perhaps as soon as this week.
Sources: Beilein left for the All-Star break weighing his future as coach -- including the possibility that he's coached his final game, league sources tell ESPN. He has yet to make convey a decision, but there's been conversation w/ management about the option of a prompt exit.
Reporting with @WindhorstESPN: Cavaliers and John Beilein have discussed possibility of him stepping down as coach during the NBA All-Star Break. No decision’s been reached. After signing 5-year deal to leave Michigan, Beilein’s struggled w/ transition to NBA.
The Woj Pod Live in Chicago: Patrick Beverley (@patbev21), Jackie MacMullan and @RyenRussillo join me on a tour around the NBA. Apple: Spotify:
Two of the greatest to ever do it.
Been waiting to read this one. Fantastic.
Back to his original Knicks assignment, it appears.
Knicks benched Steve Stoute
Update in story via @WindhorstESPN and me: Lakers expected to have exploratory conversation with Dion Waiters in near future.
Suns waiving guard Tyler Johnson, who has $7M left on his $19.2M expiring contract.
The Phoenix Suns are waiving guard Tyler Johnson, league sources tell ESPN. He will become an unrestricted agent upon clearing waivers. That will open up a roster spot for Suns.
ESPN story on free agent guard Darren Collison staying retired after considering a mid-season return with the Lakers or Clippers.
Veteran guard Darren Collison has decided that he won’t return to the NBA this season and plans to stay retired, league sources tell ESPN. Lakers and Clippers had been courting him, but Collison has informed teams that the timing isn’t right for him.
Reporting with @espn_macmahon: Charlotte is finalizing a contract buyout with F Michael Kidd-Gilchrist. Dallas has emerged as a possible destination once MKG clears waivers.
Milwaukee is waiving Dragan Bender, clearing the way to sign F Marvin Williams as soon as Monday, league sources tell ESPN. Williams buyout is complete with Charlotte and will be waived as soon today.
Hard to miss a call worse than officials did on a Gobert goaltend of a Lillard drive and lay-in in final seconds of a brutal loss. Back-to-back at altitude in Utah, bench depleted — just a hellacious end. Orlando on Thursday, Portland tonight. Sloppy run of NBA officiating.
ESPN story on Charlotte F Marvin Williams finalizing a contract buyout — clearing way for him to join a contender.
Forward Marvin Williams is finalizing a contract buyout with the Charlotte Hornets, league sources tell ESPN. Williams, 33, will become a free agent target for contending teams.
ESPN Sources: If free agent G Darren Collison finalizes decision to return to NBA in meeting with agent Bill Duffy in coming week, the next step will be setting up formal meetings with Lakers and Clippers.
NBA fines Orlando coach Steve Clifford $25K for "abusing" officials in Thursday loss to Knicks --- after L2M report concluded that officials failed to see/hear him asking for timeout with 4.4 seconds left and missed a foul call on Knicks with four seconds left.
Cavaliers are signing F Alfonzo McKinnie to a multi-year deal, league sources tell ESPN.
Fantastic story
Detroit is waiving guard Tim Frazier, league source tells ESPN.
No deals for the Indiana Pacers, league source tells ESPN.
No deals for the Oklahoma City Thunder, league source tells ESPN.
The Clippers, Knicks and Wizards have agreed to a three-team trade that will land Marcus Morris and Isaiah Thomas with the Clippers, league sources tell ESPN. Jerome Robinson will join the Wizards, Moe Harkless and a 2020 first-round pick to the Knicks.
Philadelphia has traded James Ennis to Magic for a second-round pick, league source tells ESPN.
Washington has traded Jordan McRae to Denver for Shabazz Napier, league source tells ESPN.
Future second-round pick to the Pistons -- lesser of Golden State or Cleveland's 2023 pick, source tells ESPN. Knight and Henson too.
Minnesota has joined the Miami-Memphis deal -- and will trade Gorgui Dieng for James Johnson, league source tells ESPN.
Cleveland is finalizing a trade for Detroit's Andre Drummond, league source tells ESPN.
Portland is trading Skal Labissiere and cash to Atlanta, league source tells ESPN.
Clarification: Minnesota's second-round pick going to Golden State is in 2021 -- not 2022.
Memphis has the right to swap the least favorable of Dallas' and Miami's second-round picks in 2023 for Houston's second-round pick in 2023 -- as long as Houston's pick is not 31 or 32, league source tell ESPN.
Houston has traded Jordan Bell to Memphis for Bruno Caboclo, source tells ESPN. Teams exchange second-round picks too.
Timberwolves 2021 pick protected to No. 3, and becomes unprotected in 2022, per sources. Minnesota kept pushing for Russell, who it has wanted since summer free agency and finally got the point guard Gerssson Rosas imagined pairing with KAT.
Golden State has agreed to trade D'Angelo Russell to Minnesota for a deal that includes Andrew Wiggins, a 2021 protected first-round pick and a 2022 second-round pick, league sources tell ESPN. Warriors will send Jacob Evans and Omari Spellman to Timberwolves too.
Clippers are trading G Derrick Walton Jr., to the Atlanta Hawks for cash, league sources tell ESPN.
If Miami and Oklahoma City could reach a deal on Gallinari, there's still time to make this a three-team trade -- but those talks are fully stalled, league sources tell ESPN.
Miami has agreed to trade Justise Winslow, Dion Waiters and James Johnson to Memphis for Andre Iguodala, Solomon Hill and Jae Crowder, league sources tell ESPN. No picks in the deal.
Memphis and Miami are focusing on a two-team deal on Andre Iguodala, with Miami and Oklahoma City still unable to reach an agreement on a three-team trade that would land Danilo Gallinari with the Heat, league sources tell ESPN. Talks are fluid until 3 PM.
ESPN story with @ramonashelburne on the New York Knicks plan to hire CAA player agent Leon Rose as President.
Knicks adopting a model that has gained popularity w/ the successes of Bob Myers (Warriors) and Rob Pelinka (Lakers). Rose has been one of the top agents in basketball for years, w/ clients including Joel Embiid, Chris Paul, Devin Booker, Karl-Anthony Towns and Carmelo Anthony.
The Knicks plan to make CAA player agent Leon Rose the franchise's next President, league sources tell ESPN.
Reporting with @RamonaShelburne: CAA player agent Leon Rose has emerged as a top target to run the New York Knicks basketball operations, league sources tell ESPN.
Andre Iguodala agreed to a two-year, $30M extension with Heat, but second year of deal includes team option that gives Heat cap flexibility, per sources. Miami wants space for max player in summer of 2021.
Miami and reps for OKC’s Danilo Gallinari were working on a contract extension overnight to help finalize three-team trade, league sources tell ESPN. The challenge: Miami’s desire to preserve cap space for 2021. He can become a free agent this summer.
Sixers are working on additional trades to create roster spots needed to add Burks and Robinson III, league sources tell ESPN. Without a deal before the 3 PM ET deadline, Philadelphia will have to waive two players.
Sixers GM Elton Brand has delivered his roster some much-needed shooting and scoring off its bench.
Sixers are sending Warriors a 2020 second-round via Dallas, and a 2021 second-round pick via Denver, and 2022 second-round pick via Toronto, league source tells ESPN.
Philadlephia has acquired Golden State's Glenn Robinson and Alec Burks, league source tells ESPN. Philadelphia sending draft compensation to the Warriors.
Brooks, 24, has had a breakthrough season with the Grizzlies. He's averaging 16.1 PPG and started 50 games in Memphis' resurgent year.
Memphis has agreed to a three-year, $35M extension with Dillon Brooks, league sources tell ESPN.
Here's one key to getting this three-team deal done and Gallinari to Miami, league sources tell ESPN: Can OKC get Miami to lift the protections on a 2023 first-round pick the Heat owe the Thunder? The pick was originally protected in the top 14.
Miami, Memphis and Oklahoma City are working on an elaborate three-team deal that would land the Heat both Andre Iguodala and Danilo Gallinari, league sources tell ESPN. Talks are ongoing and could extend into Thursday, sources said.
Sacramento is sending Atlanta a 2020 and a 2021 second round pick in deal, sources tell @ZachLowe_NBA and me.
Sacrameto is trading Dewayne Dedmon to Atlanta for Jabari Parker and Alex Len, sources tell @ZachLowe_NBA and me. Atlanta also gets two second round picks.
With a team-option for the 2021-22 season, Iguodala is allowing the Heat to keep salary cap flexibility for free agency, league sources tell ESPN. If Miami misses on recruiting a max star, the plan would be for Miami to guarantee that season's $15M, per sources.
Justise Winslow is part of the package headed to Memphis in the Iguodala trade, league sources tell ESPN.
Memphis has agreed to a deal to send Andre Iguodala to Miami, league source tells ESPN. Iguodala agreed to trade and has agreed to a two-year, $30M extension with Miami.
Pat Riley clearly sees an opportunity to make a run with these Heat: Riley has been working to trade for Memphis' Andre Iguodala AND Oklahoma City's Danilo Gallinari, league sources tell ESPN. Talks are ongoing.
Detroit's discussions with Phoenix on a Luke Kennard trade have reached an impasse, league sources tell ESPN. Sides unable to agree on protections for a Suns first-round pick that would have been in the deal.
Warriors still mulling several trade options on guard Alec Burks, who will sit out tonight’s game in Brooklyn.
The Woj Pod: On the eve of the NBA Trade Deadline, The Woj &amp; Lowe Show takes a lap around the latest intel leading into the 3 PM ET buzzer on Thursday. ESPN: Spotify:
Coming up ...
It's true.
Atlanta is waiving Chandler Parsons and his expiring $25.1M contract to create roster space to complete four-team trade, league sources tell ESPN.
New Orleans continues to be content with Jrue Holiday remaining on roster through Thursday’s NBA Trade Deadline, league sources tell ESPN. The kind of overwhelming offer it would take to pry Holiday hasn’t surfaced in the marketplace.
ESPN story with @espn_macmahon on the late-night, four-team deal that became the NBA’s most expansive trade in 20 years.
The trade leaves the Rockets with a brief window until Thursday's trade deadline to expand this four-team trade to include up to $12M in salary on another player. They could add a player who helps now, take on a player for assets and use those to further upgrade the team, etc.
The Atlanta/Denver/Houston/Minnesota trade -- 12 players -- is the biggest NBA deal since the Knicks moved Patrick Ewing to Seattle in 2000, according to ESPN's @BobbyMarks42.
Discussing the Knicks President/GM job with @notthefakeSVP
So Denver fortifies its bench with G Shabazz Napier and F Noah Vonleh with losses of Beasley and Hernangomez. Denver will be active until Thursday's deadline at 3 PM ET.
Minnesota's Noah Vonleh goes to the Nuggets, per source.
More players in the deal: Denver's Jarred Vanderbilt is on his way to Minnesota, league sources tell ESPN. Jordan Bell to Houston.
Minnesota's Keita Bates-Diop is going to Denver in deal, source tells ESPN.
Deal is agreed upon, and players are being informed now.
ESPN Sources: 4-team trade agreement: Houston: Robert Covington; Atlanta: Clint Capela and Nene; Minnesota: Malik Beasley, Juancho Hernangomez, Evan Turner, ATL 1st round pick via Nets; Denver: Gerald Green, Houston FRP.
Among the serious candidates to emerge as a new fourth team in this trade scenario, league sources tell ESPN: The Denver Nuggets. Talks with teams elsewhere are ongoing too.
Golden State, Minnesota traded deal concepts today and tonight -- but a significant gulf remains. Warriors are investigating deals that shed salary and lower tax bill -- as well as bring back some draft value. Holding onto D'Angelo Russell thru deadline has always been an option.
Minnesota, Houston and Atlanta are still engaged in talks on a three-team deal -- with no new progress in discussions on adding Golden State to deal, league sources tell ESPN. Talks remain fluid through Thursday 3 PM ET deadline.
You know the drill. Join us (please)
ESPN Sources with @ramonashelburne: Knicks owner Jim Dolan is already considering a front office model that is working with Golden State (Bob Myers) and the Lakers (Rob Pelinka): Hiring a top basketball executive out of the player agent ranks.
Just yesterday, Steve Mills was on the phone trying to negotiate trades for the Knicks, including a pursuit for Golden State's D'Angelo Russell, league sources tell ESPN. Ownership pushed to change course on plans to forgo trade talks for Marcus Morris, too. He's available now.
There still remains a gulf to overcome on the Minnesota-Golden State component of these talks.
ESPN Sources: Minnesota orchestrating three-team trade talks with Houston and Atlanta -- with hopes of ultimately turning discussions into a four-way deal that brings Golden State G D'Angelo Russell to Timberwolves.
Dolan has already had converations with one possible candidate, sources tell ESPN. The process for a successor is likely moving faster than the time needed to wait on an Ujiri courtship.
Masai Ujiri has long been Jim Dolan's dream candidate to run Knicks, but here's what's already complicating that pursuit: Ujiri's contract, and Knicks reluctance to give up draft compensation to Toronto, sources tell ESPN.
Knicks owner Jim Dolan is targeting Toronto president Masai Ujiri to ultimately oversee New York’s operations, league sources tell ESPN. He is under contract through 2020-2021 in Toronto.
It is expected that GM Scott Perry will continue in his role as Knicks GM for forseeable future, league sources tell ESPN.
New York is parting ways with President Steve Mills, league source tells ESPN.
Clippers guard Patrick Beverley will participate in the Skills Challenge at All-Star Weekend in Chicago, league sources tell ESPN.
The Woj Pod: Front-Office Insider @BobbyMarks42 joins me to go inside the NBA trade deadline. Plans, players, and priorities. Eastern Conf.: Apple: Western Conf.: Apple:
ESPN story on Suns discussing a deal to acquire Pistons guard Luke Kennard.
Possible package gaining traction for Kennard, per sources: Jevon Carter, Elie Okobo and a first-round pick. Suns imagine Kennard as a 30 minute-plus per game floor spacer to complement Devin Booker, Kelly Oubre, Jr., and Ricky Rubio.
Detroit and Phoenix are discussing a deal centered on guard Luke Kennard, league sources tell ESPN. Suns' first-round pick is in play. Kennard has missed 22 straight games with bilateral knee tendinitis.
Sources: The Atlanta Hawks remain a possible landing spot for Capela too. Rockets are pursuing first-round picks to flip into a deal for a wing player and another center. Robert Covington and Andre Iguodala are among several Houston targets.
ESPN Sources: Another team engaged with the Houston Rockets in trade talks for center Clint Capela: The Boston Celtics.
Longtime and well-respected agent Steve Kauffman will serve in an advisory role to division. Kauffman served as commissioner of the Continental Basketball Association before becoming an agent for such players as Ben Wallace, Doc Rivers and Dominique Wilkins.
Sources: CAA Sports has acquired Kauffman Sports Management and named Spencer Breecker head of the Basketball Coaches and Executives division. Breecker will partner w/ agent Jimmy Sexton in a division now repping nine NBA head coaches and several top executives and NCAA coaches.
Sources: Knicks have remained enthusiastic about idea of signing Marcus Morris to a new deal this summer, but as trade offers become richer in assets this week, they’ll stay open to idea of moving him. Many contenders have interest in him.
The Woj Pod(s): Front-Office Insider @BobbyMarks42 joins me to go inside the NBA trade deadline. Plans, players, and priorities. Eastern Conf.: Apple: Western Conf.: Apple:
The Woj Pod: ESPN Front-Office Insider @BobbyMarks42 and I discuss Eastern and Western Conference trade deadline scenarios. Full breakdown on marketplace, players, teams. Eastern Conference Pod: Western Conference Pod:
ESPN story on Houston’s serious engagement in trade talks centered on Clint Capela.
The Woj Pod: ESPN front office insider @BobbyMarks42 and I discuss Eastern Conference trade deadline scenarios. ESPN:
Capela could be a way for the Rockets to get the draft asset(s) the team needs to flip for a wing player, per sources. Rockets talks around the league suggest they'd like to acquire a wing and a center before deadline.
As trade deadline looms on Thursday, Houston is engaged with several Eastern Conference teams -- including Atlanta -- on C Clint Capela, league sources tell ESPN. There are a few multi-team trade scenarios in play.
ESPN story on Brooklyn’s Kyrie Irving undergoing an MRI on right knee sprain.
Irving will undergo an MRI on right knee Sunday, per source.
ESPN story w/ @BobbyMarks42 on new projected luxury tax estimates that could eventually cost several teams -- including Boston, Brooklyn, Golden State, Houston and Philadelphia -- $6M-$8M more in penalties next year.
Many teams and agents had prepared for a bit lower projection, so there will be some encouragement with these 2020-2021 salary cap and luxury tax projections. Still, no figure will be finalized until numbers are officially calculated in late June.
The luxury tax projection will be $139M, per sources.
The NBA has informed teams of projected 2020-2021 salary cap: $115M, league source tells ESPN. Original projection was $116M. That is still an increase from $109.1M in 2019-20.
Despite an expected decline in the original projection, an overall increase in revenues will still elevate the cap from $109.1M this year.
League office is expected to deliver updated projections as soon as later today, an accommodation allowing for teams to make more informed financial and roster decisions ahead of next Thursday's trade deadline. Loss of China revenue a primary factor in anticipated decline.
ESPN reporting with @BobbyMarks42: NBA has alerted teams to impending release of adjusted 2020-'21 salary and luxury tax projections, signaling a likelihood that a decline in revenue will cause a drop in the figures. Story:
Joining @stephenasmith to discuss the NBA Trade Deadline
Outstanding
I'm joining @KNegandhiESPN in studio at 9 PM ET on ESPN for the re-air of Kobe's 60-point farewell to the NBA. I was courtside at Staples Center that evening -- and I'm anxious to watch the game again and discuss Kobe and Lakers with Kevin.
Discussions among the NBA, Lakers and Clippers played out over the past several hours --- ultimately with no objection from the Clippers to honor Lakers request of postponing Tuesday's game in aftermath of Kobe Bryant's passing, per sources.
Lakers-Clippers game tomorrow postponed, NBA says.
Genius and maniacal, unrelenting and unapologetic, creative and combative. Yes, flawed too. There was no one like him. My window into the late, great Kobe Bryant:
A wealth of Kobe Bryant history, memories and moments with @RamonaShelburne on The Woj Pod. Spotify: Apple:
The Woj Pod with @ramonashelburne on the horrific helicopter tragedy surrounding the loss of nine lives and our memories and understanding of Kobe Bryant. Apple: Spotify:
The Woj Pod with @ramonashelburne: Remembering Kobe Bean Bryant.
Sources: Kobe Bryant was on his way to a travel basketball game with his daughter Gianna when the helicopter crashed. Those aboard the helicopter also included another player and parent.
Kobe Bryant is among those dead in a helicopter crash outside Los Angeles, a source confirms to ESPN.
My ESPN NBA Countdown story on how Autism has impacted the Utah Jazz's @Joeingles7 and his family's journey.
Dallas is sending Golden State a 2020 second-round pick (via Utah) for Cauley-Stein, league source tells ESPN.
Dallas gets a center in the wake of Dwight Powell's season-ending injury.
Golden State is finalizing a deal to trade C Willie Cauley-Stein to Dallas, league sources tell ESPN.
Doc Rivers and Erik Spoelstra visited The Woj Pod together in September: They share a lot of common history  Celtics-Heat playoff battles, Pat Riley’s mentorship and coaching NBA champs. Clippers/Heat meet at 8 PM on ESPN, NBA Countdown at 7 PM. Apple:
Proud of the reporting and telling of @Joeingles7 and @RenaeIngles family story with our ESPN team, including Tina Cerbone and Lydelle King. NBA Countdown, 7 PM.
Links to recent editions of The Woj Pod: Milwaukee GM Jon Horst: Boston's Jaylen Brown: Zion Williamson Debut:
Full debut night audio of @zionwillamson, Alvin Gentry and David Griffin on The Woj Pod:
Full audio of The Woj Pod with @zionwilliamson, David Griffin and Alvin Gentry:
The Woj Pod on site of Zion's memorable NBA debut, including visits with @ZionWilliamson, Pelicans EVP David Griffin, coach Alvin Gentry. The rehab, the 4th quarter, the decision to end his night, and what's next: ESPN: Spotify:
Timberwolves President of Basketball Operations Gersson Rosas tells ESPN's @E_Woodyard: "Karl-Anthony Towns is as untouchable as they come....He's the guy we're building around."
Essay for @SportsCenter on Zion’s arrival
Denver Nuggets center Mason Plumlee is expected to miss two weeks to a month with a right foot injury, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story with @AdamSchefter on Arizona Cardinals 11-time All-Pro WR Larry Fitzgerald purchasing a minority stake with the Phoenix Suns.
Reporting with @AdamSchefter: Arizona Cardinals wide receiver Larry Fitzgerald has purchased a minority stake in the Phoenix Suns, becoming second active NFL player with an NBA ownership share, league sources tell ESPN. Green Bay’s Aaron Rodgers has a stake in Milwaukee Bucks.
Full audio of Boston’s Jaylen Brown on The Woj Pod:
Full audio of Boston’s Jaylen Brown on The Woj Pod:
Jaylen Brown (@FCHWPO) on walking into a playoff team as the No. 3 pick with little room for a teenager's mistakes, the pressure/scrutiny on a Boston pro athlete, his message to auditoriums of students at Harvard and MIT. Enjoyed this pod a great deal.
The Woj Pod with Boston’s Jaylen Brown on the education disparity in America, Harvard in his DM’s, starting to negotiate extension directly w/ Danny Ainge, Team USA summer, Kemba’s refreshing leadership, much more. Apple: Spotify:
ESPN story on Royce O’Neale, Utah Jazz extending on a $36M deal.
Utah Jazz forward Royce O’Neale has agreed to a four-year, $36 million contract extension, agents Ty Sullivan and Steven Heumann of @caa_sports told ESPN.
ESPN story on five-player Portland-Sacramento trade that saves Blazers $12.5M-plus in salary and significantly cuts luxury tax bill.
Kings continue to search for an avenue to unload center Dewayne Dedmon, who's in the first season of a three-year, $40M contract. Dedmon, fined for publicly requesting a trade, is averaging 13.8 minutes in 26 games.
Blazers save $12.3M on the deal, cuts luxury tax bill in half.
Portland has traded Kent Bazemore and Anthony Tolliver and two second- round picks to Sacramento for Trevor Ariza, Wendell Gabriel and Caleb Swanigan, source tells ESPN.
Join us for NBA Countdown on ABC at 3 PM ET with @MariaTaylor, @JalenRose and @Rjeff24. Clippers-Pelicans at 3:30 PM ET. Big hoops day on ABC, including Lakers-Rockets at 8:30 PM ET.
Milwaukee GM Jon Horst on @Giannis_An34's present and future, the Bucks machine, the environment needed to surround a superstar, and his college life as a trailer park maintenance manager. The Woj Pod: Apple: Spotify:
ESPN story on NBA pushing back April owner's vote on dramatic change of league calendar.
Among concerns for key elements of calendar changes, league feedback on in-season tournament has been to protect existing events like Christmas Day games. Re-seeding of Final 4 continues to have travel concerns. More time to discuss and study it all now.
NBA had hoped that an April BOG vote of calendar changes could give ample planning to implement changes for 75th Anniversary season in 2021-22. That season hasn't been ruled out yet for changes, sources say, but it's a tight window for all the planning that needs to occur.
NBA has been working closely with teams, NBPA and stakeholders and wants to continue studying how in-season tournament, play-in for 7/8 seeds and re-seeding of Final Four could best be planned and monetized in the long-run. League plans an update for owners at April BOG meeting.
NBA has informed teams that it will continue to take long look at changes to NBA calendar, but will no longer take a vote of the NBA's Board of Governors in April, sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on three-player trade that sends Minnesota’s Jeff Teague back to Atlanta.
Atlanta has traded guard Allen Crabbe to Minnesota for PG Jeff Teague and Treveon Graham, league sources tell ESPN. Hawks get a backup for Trae Young.
As @MikeAScotto reports, Nets let Justin Anderson’s 10-day deal expire.
Nets signing Timoth Luwawu-Cabarrot to a 10-day contract, source tells ESPN.
Wizards center Thomas Bryant is returning to lineup today after missing six weeks with a right foot stress reaction, league source tells ESPN.
ESPN’s @AdamSchefter is reporting the Cleveland Browns are hiring Vikings OC Kevin Stefanski as head coach. Kevin is the son of the Detroit Pistons top basketball executive, Ed Stefanski.
Forward Vic Law — an undrafted rookie out of Northwestern — is signing a two-way deal with Orlando, his agent @KB_Sports tells ESPN. Law earned the deal with a strong season for Magic’s G League affiliate in Lakeland.
Irving has been out since mid-November with a right shoulder injury. He recently returned to 5-on-5 workouts in practice and is preparing for his return Sunday in Brooklyn.
Kyrie Irving is likely to make his return to the Nets lineup on Sunday against Atlanta, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN reporting with @ramonashelburne on VP/GM Rob Pelinka signing a contract extension with the Lakers.
Pelinka agreed to a five-year contract upon his hiring in 2017, and now gets an extension on the heels of acquiring LeBron James and Anthony Davis and reshaping a lottery roster into a championship contender.
Lakers extended contract of GM Rob Pelinka to go along with his promotion to VP of Basketball Operations, league sources tell @RamonaShelburne and me.
Sixers All-Star Joel Embiid had successful surgery on left hand today, per source. Reevaluating in 1-2 weeks.
Full audio of Patty Mills on The Woj Pod:
The Woj Pod: San Antonio's @Patty_Mills on his Australian homeland burning, the 2013 and 2014 NBA Finals vs. Miami, Duncan/Popovich and fighting to preserve the Spurs culture. Spotify: Apple:
Toronto Raptors star Pascal Siakam is expected to practice Friday with hopes of returning to lineup in the next week, league sources tell ESPN. He’s been out since Dec. 18 with a groin injury.
Team has announced.
Sixers center Joel Embiid will have surgery on left hand tomorrow and be re-evaluted in one to two weeks, league source tells ESPN.
Cavaliers GM Koby Altman traveled to Detroit and met with Beilein and players. Altman talked individually with players to get a sense of how they viewed verbiage in yesterday’s film session and how accepting they were of today’s apology, per sources.
Sources: Cavaliers coach John Beilein met with team in what was described as an emotional apology prior to shoot-around in Detroit today. He’s coaching Cavaliers tonight and franchise plans to continue with him on the job.
Beilein: “I didn’t realize I had said the word 'thugs' but my staff told me later I did and so I must have said it. I meant to say slugs, as in slow moving. We weren’t playing hard before...now we were playing harder. That’s what I was trying to say. I meant it as a compliment."
After stunning players in a film session with a verbal suggestion that they were no longer playing “like a bunch of thugs,” Cavaliers coach John Beilein reached out individually to players tonight to insist he meant to use the word “slugs.” Story on ESPN:
G Damion Lee and the Warriors are working to finalize a multi-year deal that includes partial guarantees in future seasons, league sources tell ESPN. Lee had been on a two-way contract and Golden State cleared roster spot to keep him.
ESPN story with @ZachLowe_NBA on NBA reconsidering the conference final reseeding proposal, which has included pushback on concerns of a possible 60 percent travel increase and and loss of traditional rivalries.
News filed to ESPN with @ZachLowe_NBA: The NBA is seriously reconsidering idea of reseeding the four conference finalists as part of larger proposal to reshape league calendar. That element could be eliminated before Board of Governors vote in April. Story soon.
Warriors plan to complete a deal with G Damion Lee to keep him on 15-man roster, league source tells ESPN. He had run out of days on a two-way contract. Warriors waived Marquese Chriss to create a roster spot.
Cavaliers are waiving undrafted rookie F Tyler Cook, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Andre Drummond trade talks.
Drummond has a $28M player option for next season that he is unlikely to exercise, forcing the Pistons to consider possibility of losing him in free agency. Among teams, there's an increasing belief that Drummond will be moved before February 6 trade deadline.
Detroit and Atlanta have been engaged in talks on a trade centered on Andre Drummond, league sources tell ESPN. No deal imminent, but Detroit is talking to Hawks and several other teams on Drummond, sources said.
Brooklyn is waiving two-way F Henry Ellenson, league sources tell ESPN. Nets will likely add another backcourt player on a two-way or 10-day contract.
ESPN Sources: After missing seven weeks following thumb surgery, Brooklyn Nets guard Caris LeVert is expected to return to lineup against Toronto on Saturday.
Tough blow for Isaac and Magic. Isaac was making a case for the NBA's All-Defensive team, ranking among league leaders in steals and blocks.
An MRI on left knee of Orlando Magic F Jonathan Isaac shows a severe sprain and bone contusion and team plans to re-evaluate his status in approximately two months, league sources tell ESPN. Good news: There was no structural damage to ACL, MCL or PCL ligaments.
Full Woj Pod audio of @JalenRose on David Stern:
The Woj Pod on David Stern's rule of the NBA with @JalenRose. How Stern shaped players, owners, TV, marketing, Dream Team, All-Star Weekend, officiating and much more. ESPN: Apple:
ESPN column on how David Stern ruled the NBA:
Excellent @JeremySchaap remembrance of David Stern
On the life and NBA legacy of David Stern, a generational force of nature.
Full ESPN story on veteran guard Darren Collison considering return -- with Lakers and Clippers emerging as frontrunners.
David Stern — the Hall of Fame ex-NBA Commissioner — has died at 77 years old. He oversaw tremendous growth in his 30 years as commissioner, retiring in 2014. Stern had been hospitalized since a brain hemorrhage on Dec. 17.
Story filed to ESPN: After a stunning retirement prior to free agency, veteran guard Darren Collison is considering a February return to the NBA  with the Lakers and Clippers emerging as his two preferred destinations.
Happy New Year, league sources tell ESPN.
Clippers guard Patrick Beverley is expected to miss a few games with his right wrist sprain, league sources tell ESPN.
Seven-footer James Wiseman's college career at Memphis is officially over, signing with @excelsm_bball for his pro representation. Wiseman has a chance to be the No. 1 pick in the June NBA Draft.
ESPN NBA Draft analyst @Mike_Schmitz with a preseason video breakdown on James Wiseman, the gifted Memphis 7-foot candidate to be the No. 1 overall pick in June.
Wiseman averaged 19.7 points, 10.7 rebounds and 77 percent shooting in three games for Memphis. The NCAA suspended him for 12 games, which led Wiseman to leave school on December 19. He met with several agents before signing with Excel Sports today.
Memphis 7-footer James Wiseman -- a potential No. 1 overall pick -- has signed with @excelsm for his NBA representation, league source tells ESPN. Wiseman will start preparing for the June NBA Draft now.
Veteran forward Jeff Green has cleared waivers and become a free agent, league source tells ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Pacers All-Star Victor Oladipo hopeful for a late January/early February return from ruptured quad tendon:
Celtics-Raptors noon on ESPN. NBA Countdown with @MariaTaylor, @JalenRose, @RealJayWilliams and me at 2 PM on ABC before Bucks-76ers. Merry Christmas!
ESPN story on the Denver Nuggets extending coach Michael Malone through 2023.
Two straight years of awarding Malone an extension early in the season. Josh Kroenke, Tim Connelly and Arturas Karnisovas hired Malone at the start of a difficult rebuild, stayed patient and grew together. This is how it's supposed work with management and a coach.
The Denver Nuggets extension with coach Michael Malone takes him through the 2022-2023 season, league source tells ESPN.
Nuggets, Michael Malone agree to a contract extension, team says.
Story with @McTen: After an impromptu Christmas Eve morning practice, LeBron James and Anthony Davis are expected to play vs. PG/Leonard and Clippers Wednesday. 8 PM ET, ABC.
Reporting with @McTen: Stars are aligned for Lakers-Clippers on Christmas Day. Lakers conducted impromptu practice this morning and LeBron James (groin) and Anthony Davis (knee) are expected to play vs. Paul George and Kawhi Leonard at 8 PM ET on ABC.
ESPN story on Jazz agreeing to deal with G League revelation Rayjon Tucker, who had a host of NBA suitors.
Tucker's deal with Jazz is done, agents Reggie Brown and Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tell ESPN. Wisconsin coach Chase Buford: "...Great work ethic, passion...elite athlete that competes at a ridiculously high level ... a human highlight reel...A very exciting prospect..."
Wisconsin Herd coach Chase Buford was effusive in his praise of Tucker at The Showcase. Tucker's been the best player on one of the elite G League teams this season. Milwaukee has hoped to keep him, with several other teams in hot pursuit lately. Good developmental find for Jazz.
Tucker, undrafted out of Arkansas-Little Rock, made a strong impression on several teams at G-League Showcase. He'll get a guaranteed deal for rest of season, per sources. Utah waiving Jeff Green to create roster spot, per source.
Utah is finalizing a multi-year deal with Bucks G-League forward Rayjon Tucker, league sources tell ESPN.
And ... the drought ends: First NBA trade since Russell Westbrook-Chris Paul blockbuster on July 11.
Cleveland and Utah have worked together on three trades since February of 2018, including that trade deadline three-way with Kings that included Jae Crowder and Rodney Hood. Jazz acquired Kyle Korver for Alec Burks and two second-round picks last November.
ESPN story on Utah acquiring Cleveland's Jordan Clarkson to bolster bench, sending out former No. 5 overall pick Dante Exum and two second-round picks.
Utah will also send two future second round picks to Cleveland in the trade, sources tell ESPN.
Cleveland has agreed to trade Jordan Clarkson to Utah for Dante Exum, league sources tell ESPN.
Isaiah Thomas suspended two games for entering stands to confront fan, NBA says.
ESPN story on discussions for a $1M per player purse for winners of proposed in-season tournament, including ownership and front office concerns on implementing idea.
Story filed to ESPN: The NBA is discussing a $1 million per player purse for the winners of the proposed 30-team, in-season tournament. Reporting with more details on discussions for possible 2021-2022 league calendar change soon on site.
Toronto Raptors center Marc Gasol will miss a period of weeks with a left hamstring injury, league sources tell ESPN.
Heat guard Goran Dragic (groin) is missing his ninth straight game tonight vs. Sixers, but there’s optimism that he can make his return on Friday against New York, league sources tell ESPN. Dragic’s averaged 16 points in 28 minutes a game this season.
Complete audio of Trae Young on The Woj Pod:
Full @TheTraeYoung audio on The Woj Pod:
The Trail Blazers have been granted a $2.86M injury exception for Rodney Hood, league source tells ESPN.
The Woj Pod: Atlanta Hawks guard @TheTraeYoung. Full audio here:
Full audio and bonus YouTube segments of The Woj &amp; Lowe Show on The Woj Pod. The Trade Season Special.
Bonus YouTube segments of ESPN's Woj &amp; Lowe Show: Spurs, plus larger marketplace: Jazz: Heat:
Conversation with NBPA and some G League players started at 2018 Showcase event and will continue on a larger scale at this week’s event. The union shared an email with player agents this morning.
National Basketball Players Association leadership is meeting with G-League players to discuss possibility of unionizing the NBA’s minor-league, sources tell ESPN. Discussions with players will come at G-League Showcase event in Las Vegas this week.
Actually, we are up as soon as the Clemson-South Carolina game is over on ESPN2... (and the 3OT’s sure to come)
Woj &amp; Lowe: Trade Season Special, 7 PM ET on ESPN2
Orlando’s @NikolaVucevic is active and available to play at New Orleans today, team says.
Moderate ankle sprain for Doncic, league source tells ESPN.
Clippers guard Landry Shamet will return to the Clippers lineup against Chicago tonight, league sources tell ESPN. He’s been out since mid-November with an ankle injury.
Charlotte Hornets rookie F P.J. Washington is expected to be sidelined through Christmas with fractured finger, league sources tell ESPN. The Hornets play five games in that stretch. He's averaged 12.3 points and 5.3 rebounds.
New season, new intel
Stern collapsed at the Brasserie 8.5 Restaurant in Manhattan today and was rushed to the hospital for the emergency surgery.
Miami has suspended Dion Waiters again for “failure to adhere to team policies, violation of team rules and continued insubordination,” team says. He can return after Heat’s game on Dec. 23.
Jeez
For @SportsCenter on the Toronto Raptors — post-Kawhi Leonard
The Woj Pod: Brooklyn's Taurean Prince on his improbable journey to the NBA. Homeless, but never hopeless as a teenager living with his dad in shelters. Why he bounces on hotel mattresses, Nets future with Kyrie/KD, much more.
Starting line for the trade deadline
This is fantastic
As NBA trade possibilities expand beginning Dec. 15, Cleveland’s prepared to listen to trade offers for All-Star forward Kevin Love. Story:
On Carmelo Anthony for NBA Countdown
ESPN story on Knicks firing coach David Fizdale:
Knicks assistants Mike Miller and Pat Sullivan are candidates to become interim head coach, league sources tell @ramonashelburne and me.
Fizdale was 21-83 in less than two seasons with the Knicks, one more MSG coaching victim to a gutted, rudderless roster.
Knicks also dismissed assistant Keith Smart, league source tells ESPN.
Knicks fired coach David Fizdale, league source tells ESPN.
Full audio of The Woj Pod with OKC’s Sam Presti:
The Woj Pod with OKC's Sam Presti live at @EmersonCollege. The summer trades, a decade of championship pursuit, the volatility of the modern GM role, tampering, TV ratings, and much more. Spotify: Apple:
Minnesota Timberwolves F Andrew Wiggins is signing with @CAASports for his new representation, league sources tell ESPN.
Portland had until early January to fully guarantee the deal for the season. Anthony had signed a non-guaranteed contract last month.
The Trail Blazers will amend Carmelo Anthony’s contract so that it becomes fully guaranteed for the remainder of the season, league sources tell ESPN.
Magic are determining if knee can be treated without surgery, sources said. Aminu was averaging 20 minutes a game since signing a free agent deal in July.
Orlando Magic F Al-Farouq Aminu has suffered a torn meniscus in his right knee and will be out indefinitely, league sources tell ESPN.
The Week’s Woj Pods Zach Lowe: Inside the Luka Doncic Phenomenon:
I believe @Mike_Schmitz will regret turning down the @BillWalton offer to hold the sign.
Full audio of The Woj Pod featuring @ZachLowe_NBA:
We dig into the how and why of an NBA season that could look dramatically different in 2021-22: Shorter schedule, in-season tourney, postseason play-in, reseeding of conference finals. @ZachLowe_NBA on The Woj Pod Spotify: Apple:
The Woj Pod with @ZachLowe_NBA on NBA/NBPA discussions centered on sweeping changes to NBA calendar. Full audio:
Full audio of The Woj Pod on Luka Doncic:
Joined @JayHarrisESPN to discuss the potential of sweeping changes in the NBA schedule.
Proposals would lower regular season to a minimum of 78 games. Discussions are progressing with hope of bringing a vote to an April meeting of Board of Governors that would introduce some, if not all, of these proposals into the NBA’s 75th anniversary season of 2021-2022.
Reporting with @ZachLowe_NBA: NBA’s engaged in serious discussions w/ NBPA and broadcast partners on sweeping, dramatic changes to league calendar that include re-seeding of conference finals, an in-season tournament and a postseason play-in. Story:
Nets evaluated Irvings right shoulder tonight and determined he will miss road trip that includes stops in New York, Cleveland and Boston.
Kyrie Irving will miss next three games, Nets day.
Early indications are that Boston’s Kemba Walker did not suffer a significant injury in collision tonight, league source tells ESPN. Team has diagnosed him with concussion-like symptoms.
After a collision with a teammate that appears to have injured his neck, Boston's Kemba Walker is getting carted out of arena in Denver on a stretcher. With his head down, Walker had crashed into Semi Ojeleye.
ESPN story on the dropping of misdemeanor harassment charges against DeMarcus Cousins:
Third-degree harassment charges against Lakers center DeMarcus Cousins have been dropped, his attorney Moshae Donald tells ESPN. The case, filed in a Mobile, Alabama court, has been dismissed.
Full audio of The Woj Pod on Luka Doncic:
Recent Woj Pods: Inside the Luka Doncic Phenomenon: Shareef Abdur-Rahim: Bradley Beal:
The Phenomenon of @luka7doncic with @ESPN_MacMahon, @Draftexpress and @HoopConsultants on The Woj Pod. Spotify: Apple:
Magic plan to re-evaluate @NikolaVucevic in 7-to-10 days with ankle sprain.
Gasol:
Portland has waived F/C Pau Gasol, per Gasol. He’s been unable to successfully rehab left foot following surgery. Blazers had protections in 1-year deal. Gasol, Blazers working on details of coaching role as future HOFer remains in Portland to rehab.
Kawhi Leonard and Paul George finally together on floor for Clippers (10 PM ET vs. Celtics on ESPN)
The Woj Pod: G League President and ex-All-Star Shareef Abdur-Rahim on the minor league’s impact on the NBA, expansion years with Vancouver, 2000 Olympics with KG/Team USA, living as a Muslim in America, much more. ESPN: Apple:
The possibility of Carmelo Anthony starting in his Blazers debut tonight has been considered, league sources tell ESPN. Decision will come closer to tip against New Orleans at 8 PM ET.
ESPN story on Brett Brown/Australia:
Australia is finalizing an agreement with Sixers coach Brett Brown to become its national team coach again, sources tell ESPN. Brown would coach Aussies in 2020 Olympics. Brown coached Australia in 2012 London Games.
Portland President Neil Olshey to ESPN: “For us, Melo can be another guy who is a threat. He can change the geometry on the court. He can get to the free throw line late in a game. And he has the poise to handle himself in those late game situations we’ve struggled in.”
Carmelo Anthony on “My next chapter with the Portland Trail Blazers.”
Duncan handled the first post-Popovich huddle.
Gregg Popovich has been tossed with two techs against Blazers. Tim Duncan, Becky Hammon and Will Hardy working together to replace him for rest of game.
Carmelo Anthony needed the Blazers, the way the Blazers needed him. ESPN story on why 'Melo landed in Portland:
Full Woj Pod with Bradley Beal:
Another Golden State All-Star is out: Warriors guard D'Angelo Russell will be re-evaluated with a sprained right thumb in two weeks.
(Nets say).
Kyrie Irving is out for tonight's game against Bulls, Nets says.
Utah’s Mike Conley makes his Memphis return on ESPN now.
Full Woj Pod with Bradley Beal:
ESPN Sources: Carmelo Anthony isn't expected to make his Blazers debut before Tuesday's game at New Orleans:
“At first, I thought Paul was a pure asshole. I thought he hated everybody. I thought he didn’t like people. But it was the complete opposite.” Full Woj Pod with Bradley Beal:
Wizards star @RealDeal23 on The Woj Pod: On Ray Allen’s advice, Paul Pierce’s professionalism, the infamous practice, his Dirk/Dallas ambitions for DC, the scarcity of NBA patience, evolution of Wall relationship. Spotify: Apple:
Neil Olshey and Anthony’s agent, Leon Rose of CAA Sports, had stayed in contact on Anthony since the preseason, sources said. Conversations picked up over the past two days, and Olshey and Terry Stotts talked directly with Anthony on Thursday before reaching an agreement.
Carmelo Anthony agrees to deal with Blazers. Story on ESPN:
Anthony will join the Blazers on upcoming road trip, per source. Power forward was the position that Blazers were most vulnerable and injury to Zach Collins only amplified void there. Melo comes for a specific role and need.
Deal is non-guaranteed, per source.
Portland is signing Carmelo Anthony, league source tells ESPN.
Coming Friday: Bradley Beal on The Woj Pod: Subscribe at ESPN: and Apple Pods:
Timeline on a Caris LeVert return to Nets after today’s surgery to repair ligaments in thumb: Four to six weeks, per sources.
Free agent guard Iman Shumpert is signing with the Brooklyn Nets, league sources tell ESPN. Nets have a 16th roster spot until Wilson Chandler suspension ends in mid-December
Clippers guard Landry Shamet has avoided a significant injury: An MRI reveals Shamet suffered a Grade 2 high sprain on his left ankle, league sources tell ESPN. Timeline for return to be determined.
Los Angeles Clippers All-Star Paul George will make his franchise debut during upcoming roadtrip to Houston (Wednesday) and New Orleans (Thursday), league sources tell ESPN. George and Clippers still deciding on first game. He had been rehabilitating offseason shoulder surgeries.
Launch day: Download the Disney  App or go to You can package with ESPN  and Hulu.
Hayward will undergo surgery in New York this afternoon, a timeline on his return will come after the procedure, Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells ESPN.
Boston’s Gordon Hayward will undergo surgery on his fractured left hand today, agent Mark Bartelstein tells ESPN.
Even before Sunday news conference, Knicks president Steve Mills had started to lay internal groundwork for the eventual ouster of coach David Fizdale. ESPN story with @malika_andrews:
Fizdale: "I live in that sense of urgency. I don't need anyone to speak to give me a sense of urgency. I'm not cruising through this thing acting like I've got a bunch of time to get a team together."
Mills and Perry answered questions for several minutes after embarrassing 108-87 loss to Cavs -- prior to David Fizdale news conference. Essentially, management suggested effort and execution should be better, that team is built for more success than it has experienced so far.
Knicks president Steve Mills and GM Scott Perry addressing media after blowout loss to Cavs. Mills: "We aren't happy where we are. This is not where we expected to be...(Jim Dolan) still believes in the plan that we put together." Knicks have lost 8 of 10 games.
Boston's Gordon Hayward will see a specialist on Monday for his fractured left hand, a visit that could include surgery:
Boston's Gordon Hayward will see a specialist on Monday to determine need for surgery on fractured left hand, agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells ESPN. If needed, surgery will take place Monday. Timeline on a return is unclear until then.
ESPN story on All-Star Blake Griffin planning to make his season-debut on Monday:
After missing 10 games to start the season, Detroit Pistons forward Blake Griffin plans to make his season-debut against Minnesota on Monday, league sources tell ESPN.
Portland will recall Moses Brown and Jaylen Hoard from the Texas Legends to join Blazers for Sunday’s game vs. Atlanta, league source tells ESPN.
Memphis gets emergency restraining order allowing Wiseman to play against UIC tonight
2018, not 2008. No small detail, I know.
Memphis coach Penny Hardaway assisted Wiseman and his family's move to Memphis in 2008, attorney Leslie Ballin said in a news conference --- and the NCAA has deemed Hardaway a booster.
The NCAA has ruled Memphis F/C James Wiseman -- the possible No. 1 overall pick in 2020 NBA Draft -- ineligible, his lawyers said in Memphis.
Mike Fratello will coach a USA Basketball entry for two games of FIBA World Cup qualifying vs. Puerto Rico in February, sources tell ESPN. This is an initial qualifying event for the 2023 Cup. Team USA will be comprised of G League players.
Indiana Pacers president Kevin Pritchard on Victor Oladipo, competing with a low payroll, Larry Bird, winning a national title with Danny &amp; The Miracles at Kansas, and much more. The Woj Pod: ESPN: Spotify:
An illuminating Jackie MacMullan story on Cleveland Cavaliers assistant coach Lindsay Gottlieb.
Here's a view of what happened: Kawhi Leonard is private. He doesn't want his injury information public. Only, it has to be public for the Clippers to escape league punishment on violating resting rules. Doc Rivers was trying to be supportive of Leonard. They'll take the fine.
Remember, NBA doctors evaluate the medical info provided by the Clippers. The league doesn't take the team's word that Clippers aren't violating resting rules. Essentially, Rivers is trying to be supportive of Leonard in public -- and it comes at cost of $50K for franchise.
The NBA accepts the Clippers medical determination that Kawhi Leonard is injured. It fined the team for Rivers essentially saying publicly that Leonard is healthy.
Rivers said: “He feels great. But he feels great because of what we’ve been doing. We’re just going to continue to do it. There’s no concern here. But we want to make sure. I think Kawhi made a statement that he’s never felt better. It’s our job to make sure he stays that way..."
NBA has fined Clippers $50K for Doc Rivers statements on Kawhi Leonard health status.
ESPN story on NBA's response to Clippers star Kawhi Leonard sitting out two national TV games within a week. "Kawhi Leonard is not a healthy player under the league's resting policy..."
Decisions on sitting games are made well in advance as part of Leonard's "load management" schedule. It is possible Leonard will play in back-to-back games for Clippers this season, but that isn't in plans for the near future.
Leonard is missing his second straight back-to-back game tonight vs. Bucks -- which happened to also be a national TV game. He sat back-to-back last week against Jazz on national TV. Clippers have worked closely with NBA, sharing required medical information on Leonard's knee.
Bass continued: "...is comfortable with the team medical staff's determination that Leonard is not sufficiently healthy to play in back-to-back games at this time."
NBA spokesman Mike Bass on Kawhi Leonard: "Kawhi Leonard is not a healthy player under the league's resting policy, and, as such, is listed as managing a knee injury in the LA Clippers injury report. The league office, in consultation with the NBA's director of sports medicine.."
Benign mass on back of left knee of Toronto's Patrick McCaw was removed in procedure -- reevaluated in a month, Raptors say.
A year ago today, one of my most memorable trips. Help us honor Tyler Trent’s dream of curbing childhood cancers. Donate to the Tyler Trent Fund at The V Foundation:
Since the summer, that's three players -- Brooklyn's Wilson Chandler, Phoenix's DeAndre Ayton and now Atlanta's John Collins -- hit for 25 games in violation of NBA/NBPA Anti-Drug policy.
Collins has emerged as one of league's most impressive young forwards and a cornerstone with Trae Young on the Hawks rebuild. So far, he's averaging 17 PPG on 47 percent 3-point shooting. Suspension ends Dec. 23 vs. Cavaliers.
John Collins is working with the NBPA to begin the appeal process.
Collins continued: "....in arbitration so I can get back on the court as soon as possible and continue to contribute to our 2019-20 campaign."
"...frustrated and disappointed in myself for putting all us in this position. I have always been incredibly careful about what I put in my body, but I took a supplement, which unbeknownst to me, had been contaminated with an illegal component. I plan to appeal my suspension..."
Collins statement to ESPN: "First I want to apologize to my teammates, the Hawks organization, our fans, partners and community as a whole for this situation. I understand the impact this matter has on what we are trying to achieve together this season, and I am incredibly ..."
Collins tested positive for Growth Hormone Releasing Peptide 2, league says.
Atlanta forward John Collins has been suspended 25 games for violating NBA's Anti-Drug policy.
It’s a long season but Monty Williams is resurrecting a broken franchise. Here’s the coach laying out his vision on a springtime visit to The Woj Pod
Cleveland's Kevin Porter Jr. suspended one game for making contact with a ref on Sunday in loss to Mavericks, NBA says.
Wizards are moving guard Isaiah Thomas into the starting lineup tonight against Detroit, league sources tell ESPN. He’s averaged 16.3 PPG and 7.3 APG in his first three games. He hasn’t started an NBA game since 2018 with Lakers.
Atlanta guard Trae Young (ankle) is expected to practice today, league sources tell ESPN. Barring a setback, he will likely return to lineup Tuesday vs. San Antonio, per sources.
Bret Just, a prominent NBA and NCAA coaching agent, has joined WME, sources tell ESPN.
Dr. Steven Shin -- who performed surgery on Steph Curry's left hand -- also did procedure on Drew Brees' broken thumb. For Curry, significant part of return depends on ability to take hit on hand and not re-injure it. This is truly 3-4 month timeline to make sure bone fully heals
Forward/Center Amile Jefferson has agreed to a two-year NBA contract with the Orlando Magic, agent Michael Tellem of @CAA_Basketball tells ESPN. Jefferson had been on a two-way deal with Magic.
ESPN story on Cleveland GM Koby Altman agreeing to a long-term contract extension.
Cleveland Cavaliers general manager Koby Altman has agreed to a long-term contract extension, league sources tell ESPN.
So Kiki VanDeWeghe and the league office now has the responsibility of examining video replays of the Sixers-Timberwolves scuffle, conduct interviews with players, refs, team officials and ultimately come to a decision on meting out punishment.
Sources: Sixers and Brand are communicating to the NBA that they believe KAT was the aggressor in the scuffle with Joel Embiid. Also, they've "doubled-down" on referee assessment that Simmons was peacemaker --- and delivered that message to league office too.
Sixers GM Elton Brand: "First and foremost, we obviously don’t condone the altercation that happened last night. As a former player, I have experienced situations like that in the past. I understand how our players reacted in the moment. I have their backs."
ESPN Sources: As NBA investigation into Embiid-Towns skirmish begins, Minnesota is rejecting referee determination of Ben Simmons as a "peacemaker" -- citing "dangerous choke hold" on Towns. Story:
Celtics picked up third-year option on center Robert Williams, league source tells ESPN.
Television replay shows Brooklyn's Garrett Temple kneed Turner in the lower leg on play, so there was clearly contact involved in the injury.
Good news for Atlanta guard Trae Young, per sources: Improvement on his right ankle today. No plans for an MRI. He could return as soon as next week.
X-Rays were negative on Atlanta guard Trae Young’s right ankle, and there’s optimism that this isn’t a serious injury, league sources tell ESPN. Young will undergo an MRI soon.
Clippers exercised third-year option for 2020-2021 on G Landry Shamet, league sources tell ESPN.
The Woj Pod with @ryenarussillo. We talk Lakers/Clippers, Miami and Minnesota revivals, Kyrie/Brooklyn, Golden State, Harden/Westbrook/CP3, Milwaukee/Giannis, a bunch more. Apple: Spotify:
Veteran agents Roger Montgomery and Derrick Powell will represent players together at the Elite Athlete Group. Montgomery previously repped Rudy Gay and PJ Washington at Roc Nation; Powell co-reps Jarrett Allen and Jordan McRae. Powell previously worked w/ Ja Morant at Tandem.
Ryen Russillo joins The Woj Pod to discuss the early season of the NBA, including Lakers-Clippers, Warriors, Harden/Westbrook, Kyrie Irving/Nets, Trae Young-Luka Doncic, Giannis/Bucks, much more: Listen here:
Portland F Zach Collins will get an MRI on his dislocated left shoulder Monday, league source tells ESPN. He was hurt in victory over Dallas tonight.
Tonight for Nunn: 18 points (4-5 on 3’s) at halftime. Another scouting find for Miami.
The Portland Trail Blazers will assign rookies Moses Brown and Jaylen Hoard to the Texas Legends of the G League, league source tells ESPN.
For NBA Countdown: Donovan Mitchell. Jazz-Lakers, 10:30 ET on ESPN.
Prepping for our regular season debut with @MariaTaylor, @JalenRose, @RealJayWilliams and @paulpierce34
Full Woj Pod with Draymond Green and Bob Myers:
ESPN story on Phoenix Suns center Deandre Ayton's 25-game suspension and the NBPA's plans to pursue an immediate reduction in arbitration.
More Ayton: “I do understand the unfortunate impact that this has on so many others, and for that I am deeply sorry. I’m extremely disappointed that I’ve let my team down. I will continue to work with the NBPA to go through arbitration and am hopeful of a positive resolution.”
Deandre Ayton statement: “I want to apologize to my family, the entire Suns organization, my teammates, partners, our fans and the Phoenix community. This was an unintentional mistake and unfortunately I put something in my body that I was completely unaware of..." (Continued)
Follow-up testing on Phoenix's Deandre Ayton showed no traces of any other banned substances, sources with knowledge of results tell ESPN. NBPA is likely to fast-track arbitration process to push for a reduction as soon as possible, per sources.
The NBPA is already preparing arbitration case to reduce or rescind penalty, based on belief positive test falls under CBA provision of unintentional ingestion', league sources tell ESPN. Ayton was the No. 1 overall pick in the 2018 NBA Draft.
Suns center Deandre Ayton is facing a 25-game suspension for violating NBA’s Anti-Drug policy with a positive test for a diuretic, league sources tell ESPN. The NBA informed Ayton and Suns of looming suspension tonight.
Source: Atlanta awarded Wallace.
Atlanta is expected to be awarded Minnesota guard Tyrone Wallace off waivers at 5 PM ET today, league sources tell ESPN.
Full audio of Draymond Green and Bob Myers on The Woj Pod:
Full Woj Pod with Draymond Green and Bob Myers:
Full episode of The Woj Pod with Marc Gasol:
ESPN story on the Utah Jazz's @Joeingles7 agreeing to a 1-year, $14M extension.
Utah Jazz forward Joe Ingles has agreed to a one-year, $14 million extension, keeping him under contract with the franchise through 2021-2022, agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells ESPN.
ESPN story with @malika_andrews on Brooklyn's Taurean Prince signing a $29M extension.
Another key player in summer restricted free agency: Sacramento's Bogdan Bogdanovich.
Without rookie extension deals at 6 PM ET, summer class of restricted free agents include: Brandon Ingram (New Orleans), Jakob Poeltl (Spurs), Thon Maker (Detroit), Malik Beasley (Denver), Damian Jones (Atlanta).
Brooklyn Nets F Taurean Prince has agreed to a two-year, $29M contract extension, CAA Sports' Steve Heumann tells ESPN.
Zion Williamson has surgery today to repair torn meniscus in right knee and is expected to miss six to eight weeks, Pels say.
Sabonis has a chance to make as much as $85M with bonuses in deal, agent Greg Lawrence tells ESPN.
Domantas Sabonis has agreed to a four-year, $77M guaranteed extension with the Pacers, league sources tells ESPN.
Brown's agent @JGlushon and Danny Ainge negotiated much of the deal over the weekend in Boston. This is Ainge's first rookie extension deal as GM since Rajon Rondo in 2009.
Boston Celtics forward Jaylen Brown has agreed to a four-year, $115M million contract extension, agent Jason Glushon tells ESPN.
Johnson had come to Pistons camp with a non-guaranteed contract. Pistons deciding to use roster spots for Christian Wood and continued development of young guard Khryi Thomas.
The Pistons are waiving Joe Johnson, league source tells ESPN.
Minnesota is waiving guard Tyrone Wallace, league source tells ESPN.
Full episode of Marc Gasol on The Woj Pod:
ESPN story on Buddy Hield, Kings reaching agreement on extension.
Deal includes exceedingly reachable bonuses (Top 10 three-point shooting, etc.) that get $86M base guarantee to $94M. Tougher climb to $106M.
Sacramento Kings guard Buddy Hield has agreed to a four-year, $94M contract extension with bonuses that could reach $106M, league sources tell ESPN.
Raptors make official Pascal Siakam's four-year, $130M max extension: "Pascal has been relentless in everything he has achieved," GM Bobby Webster says.
The Woj Pod: @MarcGasol on his whirlwind championship run with the Raptors, Mike Conley Jr./Memphis, Spanish national team, Pau, much more. ESPN: Apple:
ESPN Sources: Utah Jazz coach Quin Snyder has agreed to a long-term contract extension. Story:
ESPN story with @ZachLowe_NBA on Pascal Siakam and Toronto agreeing on a four-year, $130M maximum rookie contract extension.
Siakam's max deal: four-years, $130M.
Toronto Raptors forward Pascal Siakam has agreed to a four-year, max contract extension, agents @TRamasar and @choufani_lsme tells Zach Lowe and me.
A severe injury has been ruled out for Zion Williamson’s right knee, but he is expected to miss period of weeks to start regular season, league sources tell ESPN. Pels are clearly treating injury with an abundance of caution but there’s no shortage of confidence on full recovery.
Portland is converting the Exhibit 10 contract of 7-foot rookie Moses Brown into a two-way deal, league sources tell ESPN.
How Bradley Beal’s two-year, $72M max extension impacts the NBA’s power couples.
A clip of The Woj Pod with Doris Burke (Full audio:
Jumping on @GetUpESPN at 8 AM ET to report out all the implications for Bradley Beal's remarkable commitment to stay the course with the Wizards.
Washington Wizards All-Star Bradley Beal has agreed to extend his deal for two years on a $72M maximum contract, agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells ESPN. Deal includes player option for 2022-23. Total value: 4-years, nearly $130M. Story:
ESPN's Doris Burke on The Woj Pod: LeBron James and China, the Lakers and Clippers championship aspirations, the reshaped Celtics and Jazz, Kyrie/Nets, state of the Knicks, much more. Spotify: Apple:
MRI on right thumb of Anthony Davis returned clean today, league source tells ESPN.
Celtics are converting 7-foot-6 rookie Tacko Fall to a two-way contract, league sources tell ESPN. He will spend most of his season developing with G-League affiliate Maine, but can spend up to 45 days with Celtics in NBA.
Bonus Youtube segments of the Woj &amp; Lowe Show: Breakout candidates, including Portland's Anfernee Simons and Miami’s Bam Adebayo: Rookie contract extension candidates, including Siakam, Hield, Sabonis and Jaylen Brown:
The Woj Pod: Audio edition of The Woj &amp; Lowe Preseason TV Special -- @ZachLowe_NBA and I discuss the NBA's China quagmire, title contenders, in-season trade possibilities and rookie extension scenarios. Subscribe and listen:
Hey guys — we will be there. Tonight, ESPN2
The Pacers are picking up the fourth-year option on forward T.J. Leaf's contract, league sources tell ESPN. Leaf was the 18th overall pick in the 2017 NBA Draft.
Scott Skiles has been contacted about his interest in replacing David Blatt as coach of Greece’s Olympiakos, his agent Keith Glass tells ESPN. Skiles has coached four NBA teams, most recently with Orlando in 2016. “Coaching still interests Scott,” Glass said.
Fired up to join our new host @MariaTaylor, @JalenRose and @RealJayWilliams for the preseason debut of NBA Countdown at 7 PM ET on ESPN.
Breaking: Kyle Lowry and the Toronto Raptors have agreed on a one-year, $31M contract extension that takes the five-time All-Star guard out of July’s free agency market, agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells ESPN.
Full audio of Cavaliers coach John Beilein on The Woj Pod:
Cleveland Cavaliers coach John Beilein on the leap to the NBA at 66, implementing his unique style in the pros, inside the high-stakes '80's recruitment of Jeff Van Gundy to Nazareth College, much more. The Woj Pod: Apple: Spotify:
Coming Friday: Cleveland Cavaliers coach John Beilein on The Woj Pod. Subscribe here:
Complete audio of trainer/author @RobMacNBA on The Woj Pod:
Full audio of The Woj Pod with NBA trainer Rob McClanaghan:
The Woj Pod: Trainer Rob McClanaghan  author of Net Work: Training the NBA’s Best and Finding the Keys to Greatness  w/ a window into KD, Steph Curry, Kevin Love, Derrick Rose, decade of free agency and drafts. Book: Apple Pods:
Recent editions of The Woj Pod: @ZO2_: @WindhorstESPN : Doc Rivers/Erik Spoelstra:
ESPN story on Erik Spoelstra, Heat agreeing on contract extension. Spoelstra, who's won two titles as coach, is the NBA's second longest tenured active coach with one team -- behind only Gregg Popovich.
Story filed: Miami Heat coach Erik Spoelstra has agreed to a long-term contract extension, league sources tell ESPN. Spoelstra, who had one year left on deal, quietly negotiated extension that's been finalized on the eve of his 12th season as head coach.
Full audio of Lonzo Ball on The Woj Pod:
Full audio of Lonzo Ball on The Woj Pod:
Lonzo Ball on The Woj Pod: “I’m controlling everything now. You really can’t tell me what to do. It’s my life, my career. I’m making all the decisions.” Spotify: Apple:
The WNBA legend and former college head coach will work in a player development role.
New Orleans is hiring Teresa Weatherspoon to its coaching staff, league sources tell ESPN.
Attorney/Agent Raymond Brothers has been hired as Director of Basketball and Sports Technology/Speciality Projects for @RocNationSports, sources tell ESPN. Brothers roster of clients include Markelle Fultz, Spencer Dinwiddie, DJ Augustin, others.
Portland has exercised fourth year option on Zach Collins and third year option for Anfernee Simons, league source tells ESPN.
The Woj Pod with @WindhorstESPN on how free agency could look different with tampering enforcement, flipping order of NBA Draft and free agency, why elimination of one-and-done remains stalled, much more. Apple: Spotify:
The Woj Pod: How free agency works in the NBA  and how its future could be impacted. Inside Adam Silver's threat of elevated enforcement of tampering and salary cap circumvention with @WindhorstESPN. Apple: ESPN:
Here's yesterday's story with @ZachLowe_NBA that's still relevant in aftermath of vote today.
NBA's been wild, wild west in recent years. Few feared repercussions in chasing free agents, or chasing deals for clients. Some abide by rules more closely than others; most live in grey. Something had to change. Small markets still most bothered by player-to-player tampering.
What worries team officials: If evidence of tampering isn't found on those devices, what else could the NBA discover that could be deemed an issue for that individual or team? The NBA's an information business, and people want to protect their information.
GM's and agents do believe free agency will be impacted. How much? We'll see. But both sides more apprehensive on negotiating/agreeing to deals ahead of June 30 start. One GM said, "I'll follow the rules -- until I find out others aren't and I'm at a competitive disadvantage."
Adam Silver on tampering punishments: "Suspending executives...taking away draft picks....voiding contracts...All those provisions are on the table. The ultimate goal is compliance." Silver says fining teams can often be the least effective avenue to rules compliance.
Adam Silver says provisions passed unanimously.
Just how much of the NBA's complete proposal was approved in BOG vote is still unclear. There had been apprehension on approving the random team audits. Adam Silver has a news conference soon in New York.
The NBA Board of Governors passed a stricter package of measures to enforce compliance with tampering and salary cap circumvention, league sources tell ESPN.
NBA owners wanted Adam Silver to get tougher on tampering, clean up free agency and level playing field. The commissioner has a plan and a vote’s on tap. ESPN reporting with @Zachlowe_NBA:
G League Winter Showcase is set for December 19-22 at Mandalay Bay Convention Center in Las Vegas -- with $100K prize for players on the winning team in a new tournament format.
Free agent G Isaiah Taylor has agreed to a partially guaranteed deal with Toronto, league sources tell ESPN. Taylor has played previously with Atlanta and Houston.
Orlando exercised option on former No. 1 overall pick Markelle Fultz through the 2020-21 season, team says.
ESPN story on new Brooklyn Nets owner Joe Tsai's first major move, hiring former Turner executive David Levy as CEO:
Doc Rivers and Erik Spoelstra get deep into those Celtics-Heat playoff battles. Full Woj Pod here:
The Nets are hiring former Turner president David Levy as CEO, league sources tell ESPN. An announcement is expected once Joe Tsai's new majority ownership is approved at the NBA's upcoming Board of Governors meeting.
ESPN story on NBA agents pushing back on NCAA's power grab.
Contents of signed letter the NBPA will send to NCAA on behalf of player agents refusing to be a part of NCAA certification process to advise undergrads testing draft waters.
Agents letter to NCAA: “Our goal is to work collaboratively with the NCAA, its member institutions, and the NBPA to ensure that these kids have access to the best possible representation.”
“....men’s basketball student-athletes in deciding whether to remain in school or to enter the NBA draft.”
Letter to NCAA on proposed certification: “...It is more of a mechanism for NCAA to garner access to personal and private information of Certified Agents in what amounts to subpoena power to embark upon investigations that are wholly unrelated to protecting the interests of...”
NBPA has been talking with the NCAA on finding common ground on behalf of the agents, sources said. In letter, agents are willing to take bi-annual online seminar on protecting players amateurism. Entire discussion has been centered on players "testing the waters" of NBA Draft.
Agents are certified by union and some states, but are pushing back on NCAA's insistence it should hold regulatory/investigative power on agents. "There's no rational connection between certification process," and NCAA's stated purpose of protecting men's basketball players.
The NBA's agents have signed a letter that informs the NCAA that player agents will not register for the NCAA's proposed agent certification process, according to the letter obtained by ESPN. The @TheNBPA will transmit letter to the NCAA soon, per sources.
Shaun Livingston is retiring.
Portland has signed Troy Caupain and London Perrantes to training camp contracts with Exhibit 10 deals, league sources tell ESPN.
Spo and Doc on The Woj Pod:
Doc Rivers and Erik Spoelstra on The Woj Pod:
Clippers coach Doc Rivers and Heat coach Erik Spoelstra together on the craft, those Boston-Miami playoff battles, the influence of Pat Riley, the declining attention-span of players and much more. A high-level hour on The Woj Pod:
Sources: Minnesota hiring ROC Nation agent Joe Branch as assistant GM. Branch completes a front office transformation under Gersson Rosas. Branch’s clients included Caris LeVert, Justise Winslow and Josh Hart. His resume includes Nike, league office and Northwestern basketball.
And that’s all I have on “Ninja-style headwear.”
Source: The NBA’s Competition Committee discussed “Ninja-style headwear” in Chicago meeting today and some members expressed concerns on safety, including looseness of headwear. Safety concern remains at center of review of concept in future.
ESPN story on the end of the short, but memorable life of the NBA's "Ninja-style headwear."
Competition Committee is discussing issue in meetings today. As Bass said, teams raised concern about size, length "how they are tied which requires a thorough review before consideration of any rule change." Among players who wore them: Jimmy Butler, Jrue Holiday, Jarrett Allen.
Bass: "When some players began wearing them last season, we didn't want to cause a disruption by intervening midseason..." NBA notified teams in May that the headwear "would not be a part of this seasons uniforms."
The NBA notified teams that it won't allow players to wear "ninja-style headwear" this season, NBA spokesman Mike Bass tells ESPN. The headwear "...hasn't been through the league approval process. Teams have raised concerns regarding safety and consistency of size, length ..."
UCLA center Moses Brown has signed a training camp deal with Portland, league source tells ESPN.
The Tyler Trent Student Gate is open on Purdue’s campus. It is fitting Tyler shares a birthday with ESPN, because he’s part of the network’s history too. He would’ve been 21 years-old today. His spirit lives on.
Back together again: @dpshow and @KeithOlbermann
Sources: Charlotte is signing Virginia Tech guard Ahmed Hill to a two-way contract. Elsewhere, Houston has converted training camp deals for rookie guards Shamarie Ponds and William McDowell-White into two-way deals.
ESPN story on Eric Gordon extension with Rockets.
Clearly, @Jonathan_Feigen first reported the extension.
Eric Gordon will get three-years, $54.5M guaranteed on his extension, per source, starting with the 2020-2021 season -- $16.9M, $18.2M, and $19.6M. The non-guaranteed season would earn him $20.9M.
The fourth year of Eric Gordon extension is non-guaranteed, league source tell ESPN. He gets fourth-year if he makes All-Star team or Rockets win a championship, source tells ESPN.
Free agent center Eric Moreland has agreed to a training camp deal with Oklahoma City, league sources tell ESPN.
An arrest warrant issued for DeMarcus Cousins.
This substance has been on the NBA’s banned list since the 2016-2017 season.
Chandler continued: I accept responsibility and apologize to my Nets teammates, coaches, front office and fans for this mistake. I will continue to work hard to prepare for the upcoming season.
Wilson Chandler: During my injury rehab process, before I signed with the Nets, I was prescribed a treatment that included small doses of a substance recently added to the NBA’s prohibited substance list. I did not realize this substance was banned, and neither did the doctor...
NBA makes suspension official, says Chandler tested positive for Ipamorelin.
Brooklyn Nets forward Wilson Chandler is facing a 25 game suspension for testing positive for PED use, league sources tell ESPN. The NBA is expected to make an announcement later today.
7-footer Spencer Hawes is working out for the 76ers Thursday, league sources tell ESPN. Hawes, 31, has played 10 years in NBA and played with Lakers G-League team last season. @MarcJSpearsESPN reported Joe Johnson is part of Philly workout too.
Los Angeles Lakers F Kyle Kuzma has signed with @CAA_Basketball for his on and off court representation.
Free agent guard Andrew Harrison has agreed to a training camp deal with Golden State, agent @KB_Sports of @BDA_Sports tells ESPN. Warriors have 14 guaranteed contracts on the roster.
Los Angeles-based NBA agent James Dunleavy has joined @Excelsm. His roster of clients includes New York’s Allonzo Trier, Atlanta’s Chandler Parsons, Dallas’ Courtney Lee and Houston’s Gerald Green.
ESPN story on @CarisLeVert and the Brooklyn Nets reaching agreement on a $52.5M contract extension.
LeVert is eligible for his rookie extension as a member of the NBA’s draft class of 2016. His new deal will begin with the 2020-'21 season.
Brooklyn Nets guard Caris LeVert has agreed to a three-year, $52.5 million contract extension, league sources tell ESPN. LeVert turns 25 today.
Memphis reclaimed the full value of what Howard can make with the Lakers: $2.6M.
Sources: Dwight Howard surrendered nearly $2.6M of his $5.6M guaranteed salary to Memphis in buyout. He can earn $2.6M on his vet minimum deal with Lakers -- if he survives on roster past early January. Ideal outcome for Grizzlies, who never intended to bring Howard to camp.
ESPN story on a cautious Lakers organization bringing back Dwight Howard on a non-guaranteed deal.
Howard came to meet Lakers after dropping 25 pounds; showed his back was healthy. Lakers want him to protect rim/rebound in limited role. There was sense Howard realized he hit "rock bottom" and had been humbled. Still they'll judge him on actions, not words. He's been warned.
Lakers are entering a Howard partnership with caution. For years, he's talked about making changes in how he interacts with coaches and teammates. He's still saying those things now, but the ability to cut him without cost keeps leverage with organization.
Dwight Howard's deal with the Lakers will be non-guaranteed, league source tells ESPN. Howard had several meetings with Lakers officials, and they'll give him a chance to show he's made changes in how he conducts himself. Lakers players were involved in process.
Lakers completed workouts and meetings with Dwight Howard and Joakim Noah on Thursday and have Mo Speights at the team’s facility today, league sources tell ESPN. Both Howard and Noah left impressions that they could be helpful to the team.
In a North Carolina court today, attorneys for New Orleans No. 1 pick Zion Williamson filed additional amendments to a lawsuit that's attempting to enforce the termination of a signed agreement with a Florida marketing company. ESPN story:
The NBA preseason schedule:
The best compliment I can give @RamonaShelburne on “The Sterling Affairs” 30-for-30 podcast series: I finished the five episodes and I’d binge listen to five more of them. It is riveting and revelatory. Ramona and I talked about it all on The Woj Pod.
ESPN story on Lakers planning workouts with available centers, including Joakim Noah and Dwight Howard. Marcin Gortat is a consideration, too.
Howard is under contract with Memphis, but they’re letting him explore opportunities elsewhere. Grizzlies would gladly work on a buyout with him.
Sources: Lakers planning individual workouts to evaluate centers Joakim Noah, Dwight Howard and Mo Speights this week in Los Angeles. Another consideration currently overseas: Marcin Gortat. Lakers want a window into physical condition and mindset of a potential addition.
Former Turner Sports executive David Levy has emerged as a serious candidate to replace Brett Yormark as CEO of the Brooklyn Nets, league sources tell ESPN.
Bucks are signing free agent guard Jaylen Adams to compete in training camp, league sources tell ESPN.
Cavaliers signed former first-round pick F Jarrell Martin to a one-year, non-guaranteed deal, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on @pdpatt agreeing to deal with the Clippers.
Free agent forward Patrick Patterson has agreed to a one-year, $2.3 million deal with the Los Angeles Clippers, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on exam results today: Lakers center DeMarcus Cousins has a torn ACL.
Test results are conclusive today in Los Angeles: Lakers center DeMarcus Cousins has suffered a torn left ACL, agent Jeff Schwartz of @excelsm tells ESPN
ESPN story on Lakers center DeMarcus Cousins suffering possible knee injury and undergoing further testing in Los Angeles.
Lakers center DeMarcus Cousins has suffered a possible knee injury and will undergo further testing today in Los Angeles, league sources tell ESPN. Cousins was working out in Las Vegas on Monday when he had to leave the court, sources said. He signed a one-year deal in July.
This is awesome. I’ll miss these guys together.
After suffering a knee injury in competition last week, Miami Heat F Kelly Olynyk will be unable to compete for Canada in the FIBA World Cup, source tells ESPN. Olynyk is expected to be ready for the start of the NBA season.
Guard PJ Dozier has agreed to a one-year deal with the Denver Nuggets, agent @KB_Sports tells ESPN. Dozier was on a two-way with Celtics and earned a G-League All-Star spot last season.
Lowry hasn’t been cleared to resume playing after July surgery on right thumb. He went to training camp despite a fear that injury wouldn’t allow him to play. He played on gold medal 2016 team and remains hopeful for a spot on 2020 Olympic team.
Kyle Lowry withdraws from USA Basketball World Cup team.
Full NBA schedule release on The Jump at 3 PM ET on ESPN.
Sources: Earlier times for national TV doubleheaders this season: 22 of ESPN’s 36 doubleheaders and 12 of TNT’s 31 doubleheaders to start at 7:30/10 PM ET or 7/9:30 PM ET instead of 8/10:30 PM.
Darvin Ham left Texas Tech after three years for the NBA. He played 8 seasons and eventually started a coaching career that’s now landed him as the top assistant with the Bucks. Twenty-three years later, he completed his degree and walked in graduation ceremonies today.
CJ McCollum talks star USA players and the FIBA World Cup summer on The Woj Pod.
Blazers guard @CjMcCollum on Portland, the wild Western Conference, NBA officiating, Cleveland Browns, re-selecting his 2013 NBA Draft and what would’ve changed his mind on playing Team USA this summer. The Woj Pod: Apple: ESPN:
ESPN story on Vince Carter agreeing to play his final year with the Atlanta Hawks, passing Dirk, KG, Robert Parish and Kevin Willis with a 22nd NBA season.
Make no mistake: Next summer, the competition for Vince Carter -- the television analyst free agent -- will be intense.
Carter will play his 22nd year at 42 years old -- with an expectation that he will retire after the 2019-20 season.
Free agent Vince Carter has agreed to a deal to return to the Atlanta Hawks, league source tells ESPN.
Remarkable @MerrillLiz story
We need courageous leadership. Go to #TakeActionNotSides
Draymond Green’s total deal now: 5-years, $118M
ESPN story on @Money23Green agreeing to a four-year, $100M extension with Warriors.
Green’s extension pays him $22.2M, $24M, $25.8M and $27.6M over the course of the deal. The Warriors will have $129M and $138M committed to their four max players — Curry, Thompson, Green and Russell — in the 2020-21 and 2021-22 seasons, respectively.
The new deal, which starts with the 2020-21 season, brings the total length and value of Green’s contract to five years, $118M.
With free agency looming next summer, three-time All-Star Draymond Green has agreed to a four-year, $100M maximum contract extension with Golden State, agent Rich Paul of Klutch Sports tells ESPN.
Sources: Christmas Day games set for 2019-2020 NBA season include — Clippers-Lakers at Staples Center New Orleans at Denver Boston at Toronto
Clippers G Landry Shamet has withdrawn from USA Basketball Select Team camp, agent @GeorgeLangberg tells ESPN. “He was appreciative of the opportunity and hopes to be part of USAB again in future,” Langberg tells ESPN. Shamet's preparing for what could be deep LAC playoff run.
David Griffin on The Woj Pod:
Covered a lot of ground in recent pod with David Griffin on building around LeBron James in Cleveland and his consistent context was this: The scrutiny and unforgiving pressure surrounding the environment inspired the joylessness of Cavs title run, not James himself.
ESPN story on Patrick Patterson agreeing to buyout with Thunder -- with Clippers on the horizon.
Once his $5.7 million salary clears waivers, Patterson’s intention is to sign with the Los Angeles Clippers, league sources tell ESPN
Oklahoma City and forward Patrick Patterson have agreed to a buyout on the final season of his contract, allowing him to become a free agent, league sources tell ESPN.
Wizards GM Tommy Sheppard is hiring Clippers executive Johnny Rogers to a newly created role of VP of Pro Personnel, league sources tell @ZachLowe_NBA and me. Rogers has built a strong scouting reputation both here and abroad with the Clippers and Thunder.
ESPN story on @CJMcCollum and the Blazers reaching agreement on a three-year, $100M extension. Total deal now: Five-years, $157M.
McCollum became eligible for the extension last week  and joins All-NBA teammate Damian Lillard in summer deals that solidify the Blazers backcourt into the mid-2020’s.
Portland Trail Blazers guard CJ McCollum has agreed to a three-year, $100 million contract extension --- extending his current deal to five years and $157 million, his agent, Sam Goldfeder of Excel Sports, tells ESPN.
Denver GM Arturas Karnisovas on The Woj Pod:
Denver GM Arturas Karnisovas on Western Conference arms race, discovering/developing Nikola Jokic, waiting on Russian KGB to allow him to Seton Hall, playing with Sabonis against '92 Dream Team. The Woj Pod: ESPN: Apple:
After 10 years in the Lakers front office, Director of Player Personnel Ryan West is leaving the organization, league sources tell ESPN. West has been well-regarded league-wide for his role in many of the Lakers draft successes of the past decade.
Miami Heat center Bam Adebayo has accepted an invitation to Team USA training camp for the FIBA World Cup tournament in China, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on USA Basketball extending guard JJ Redick an invitation to join Team USA's FIBA World Cup roster.
Free agent F Dragan Bender has agreed to a two-year deal with the Milwaukee Bucks, league source tells ESPN. Bender, 21, was the No. 4 overall pick to Phoenix in the 2016 NBA Draft.
JJ Redick has an invitation to join USA Basketball's depleted roster for the FIBA World Cup. "I'm thrilled beyond belief to be considered but also trying to work through our family's transition to New Orleans," he tells ESPN. He expects to have an answer for USA officials soon.
ESPN Sources: The endorsement agreement aligning No. 1 overall pick Zion Williamson and Jordan Brand extends five years and becomes the richest annual rookie shoe deal in NBA history. Story:
ESPN story on future Hall of Famer @paugasol reaching a deal with the Portland Trail Blazers:
Gasol -- a future Hall of Famer with a championship pedigree -- joins a loaded rotation that includes Whiteside and Collins and eventual return of Nurkic.
Free agent Pau Gasol has agreed to a one-year deal with the Portland Trail Blazers, league source tells ESPN.
ESPN story on @FurkanKorkmaz returning to the Sixers on a two-year deal:
Free agent F Furkan Korkmaz has agreed to a two-year deal to return to the Philadelphia 76ers, agent Mike Lindeman of @excelsm tells ESPN.
Spurs name RC Buford as CEO and Brian Wright as GM.
Wizards GM Tommy Sheppard on The Woj Pod:
In his first extended interview as Wizards GM, Tommy Sheppard joins The Woj Pod: Bradley Beal/John Wall, reshaping way franchise does business, crisis PR for Tark at UNLV. Stitcher: ESPN Pod Center: Apple:
Kyle Lowry can be a free agent next summer.
With two years, $55.8M left on current deal, John Wall out with Achilles injury and significant work to be done on roster, Sheppard understands why Beal may pause. "We need to show him that we are about building this the right way," Sheppard tells ESPN.
With Bradley Beal eligible for a three-year, $111M extension on Friday, Wizards GM Tommy Sheppard tells ESPN: "At the very first moment allowed, we are going to offer Brad the full max..." Story includes reaction from Beal's agent Mark Bartelstein.
ESPN story talking to Wizards owner Ted Leonsis and GM Tommy Sheppard on the reshaped front office and organizational direction.
Tommy Sheppard official as Wizards GM now, w/ reshaped front office: John Thompson III leading athlete development and engagement department; former NFL executive Sashi Brown, chief planning and operations; Daniel Medina  late of 76ers  as chief of athlete care and performance
ESPN story on Kyle Korver agreeing to free agent deal with the Bucks.
Korver had a tough decision between Sixers and Bucks but relationship and history with Mike Budenholzer certainly played a major factor in Korver’s choice.
Free agent Kyle Korver has agreed to a one-year deal with the Milwaukee Bucks, agent Jeff Schwartz of @excelsm tells ESPN.
Wizards plan to make announcement within next several days on Sheppard appointment as new GM, sources say. Terms on a deal still to be finalized. Sheppard won over ownership as the interim GM.
Free agent F Cam Reynolds has agreed to a two-way deal with Milwaukee, agent @JamesDunleavy3 tells ESPN.
ESPN story on Kyle Lowry’s procedure to repair tendon in left thumb.
Toronto Raptors All-Star guard Kyle Lowry had a procedure to repair tendon injury in his left thumb, league source tells ESPN. Lowry hopes to be ready for USA Basketball training camp and FIBA World Cup later in summer.
Suns are banking on coach Monty Williams growing Diallo, 22, who was the 33rd overall pick in the 2016 NBA Draft out of Kansas and Mali.
Free agent F Cheick Diallo has agreed to a two-year deal with the Phoenix Suns, league source tells ESPN. In three seasons with Pelicans, Diallo averaged 5.5 points and 4.6 rebounds in 133 games.
ESPN story on the Oklahoma City Thunder and Chris Paul preparing for the likelihood that they'll start the 2019-20 season together.
OKC has been working with Paul and his representatives on finding a trade, but nothing is materializing so deep into summer free agency, sources said. Both sides believe there are benefits to Paul, 34, playing out the year with the Thunder.
Story filed to ESPN: Oklahoma City’s discussions to move nine-time All-Star guard Chris Paul onto a new destination are parked and an increasing expectation exists that he will start the season with the Thunder.
Knicks free agent Reggie Bullock underwent surgery for a cervical disc herniation today, team says.
Mike D’Antoni discusses coaching @JHarden13 and @russwest44 on The Woj Pod
Simmons also has Designated Rookie Extension language in his contract that would elevate his compensation if he earns a spot on one of the All-NBA teams in 2019-20, per source.
Details on Ben Simmons' five-year, $170M contract with the Sixers: No option in final year and a 15 percent trade kicker, league sources tell ESPN.
If you're a student/parent/guardian/educator, you'll be grateful you watched "The First Day" -- a follow-up on Chris Herren from the "Unguarded" 30-for-30. 8 PM today on ESPN. Another remarkable Jonathan Hock film.
Houston’s Mike D’Antoni on The Woj Pod
Once guard JR Smith clears waivers, the Los Angeles Lakers are an unlikely destination, league sources tell ESPN.
Houston Rockets coach Mike D'Antoni joins The Woj Pod: Stitcher: Spotify: Apple:
Free agent F Henry Ellenson is signing a two-way contract with the Brooklyn Nets, league sources tell ESPN.
Rockets coach Mike D'Antoni on The Woj Pod: Russell Westbrook/Chris Paul trade, power of James Harden's play and personnel preferences, coaching without an extension, ownership's strong hand, a lingering regret of Suns-Spurs rivalry. Listen and subscribe:
Story on free agent F Tyler Lydon agreeing to a two-year deal with the Kings, agent Andy Shiffman of @PrioritySports tells ESPN.
Free agent F Tyler Lydon has agreed to a two-year deal with the Sacramento Kings, league source tells ESPN.
Philadelphia 76ers star Ben Simmons is "doubtful" to play for Australia in the FIBA World Cup this summer, his agent Rich Paul tells ESPN. Simmons is more likely now to spend his full offseason preparing only for the Sixers season -- free of national team responsibilities.
Rockets had been recruiting Chandler for weeks, but reunion of Harden-Westbrook seems to have played a part with veteran center committing to join team.
Free agent center Tyson Chandler has agreed to a one-year deal with Rockets, agent Jeff Schwartz of @excelsm tells ESPN.
Houston hoped to find third-team destination preferable to Chris Paul, but ultimately leaves it OKC to execute next step once Presti confers w/ CP3 agent Leon Rose. Miami remains possibility for Paul (3 years, $124M) -- and OKC obviously has picks to incentivize deal, if needed.
Clarification on Rockets first-round pick protection in 2024: It is 1-to-4, not 1-to-14.
ESPN story on blockbuster deal reuniting former MVP's Russell Westbrook and James Harden on the Houston Rockets -- with CP3 on his way to the Thunder.
I left out Thunder's Jerami Grant deal with Denver: OKC has acquired EIGHT first-round picks since draft night: 2020: Denver (1-10), 2021: Miami; 2022: LAC; 2023: Miami (1-14), 2024: LAC; 2024: Houston (1-14); 2026: LAC; 2026: Houston (1-4).
Oklahoma City GM Sam Presti worked with Westbrook and his agent, Thad Foucher, to deliver the former MVP to his preferred destination: A reunion with James Harden, per sources.
Thunder are playing a long-game unseen in recent NBA history: Seven additional first-round picks lined up through 2026 -- plus four pick swaps -- via deals for Paul George and Chris Paul.
Reporting story with @royceyoung: Houston has reunited Russell Westbrook and James Harden. Story soon ESPN.
The Oklahoma City Thunder have agreed to trade Russell Westbrook to the Houston Rockets for Chris Paul, first-round picks in 2024 and 2026, pick swaps in 2021 and 2025, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Spurs finally pulling Marcus Morris' free agent offer after his waffling, agreeing on a two-year deal with F Trey Lyles; Morris agrees on Knicks deal.
Lyles is finalizing terms on a two-year deal with Spurs, league source tells ESPN.
As expected now, Morris will sign a one-year deal with New York, per sources.
Spurs have pulled offer to Marcus Morris and agreed to a deal with free agent Trey Lyles, league sources tell ESPN.
Oubre Jr., gets financial security now with an opportunity to return to the marketplace as a 25-year-old unrestricted free agent in 2021.
Restricted free agent Kelly Oubre Jr., has agreed to a two-year, $30M deal to stay with the Phoenix Suns, agent Nima Namakian of @BDA_Sports tells ESPN.
New Orleans Pelicans EVP of Basketball Operations David Griffin goes inside the Anthony Davis deal, the art of the superstar trade, Zion-era, the relatively joyless nature of Cavaliers' 2016 title run and team building in this impatient age. The Woj Pod:
Among reasons for not matching on Jones: Minnesota is pursuing max cap space in 2020 free agency. Without space this summer, Wolves were a finalist for D’Angelo Russell. They’ll work to get back into market with real flexibility next year.
Memphis makes a successful play to acquire another young asset. Jones, 23, will get a chance to develop behind No. 2 overall pick Ja Morant. De’Anthony Melton, 21, could be a viable third PG in time.
The Minnesota Timberwolves are declining to match the Memphis Grizzlies’ three-year, $28M offer sheet for restricted free agent guard Tyus Jones, league sources tell ESPN.
Free agent F Khem Birch has agreed to a two-year, $6M deal to return to Orlando, agents Mike George of @OneLegacySports and Jeff Schwartz of @excelsm tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Warriors waiving Shaun Livingston, who joins a pool of free agents in marketplace of contenders searching for championship experience.
Sources: Warriors are waiving guard Shaun Livingston, who is guaranteed $2M of his $7.7M salary for season. Livingston, 33, is determined to continue playing and becomes one more valuable free agent candidate for contenders. He’s won three NBA titles and reached five Finals.
Among the allowable coaching challenges starting next season: a personal foul charged to coach’s team, a called out-of-bounds violation, and goaltending and basket-interference violations.
Sources: Besides approving coach's challenge, Board of Governors approved replay center's ability -- in addition to game refs -- to trigger instant replay. Approved circumstances include whether it's a 2 or 3 point FG; and if a shot was made prior or after the shot clock expired.
Story also includes details on Reggie Bullock situation with Knicks.
ESPN story with @MarcJSpearsESPN: Free agent forward Marcus Morris considers bailing on deal with Spurs to sign with Knicks.
In a brief conversation with ESPN, Bauman was complimentary of how the Knicks handled this emerging situation with Bullock. He cited how accommodating ownership, front office and medical staff had been in dealing with new issues facing deal: “First-class throughout,” Bauman said.
Reporting with @MarcJSpearsESPN: Free agent Marcus Morris -- who committed to a two-year, $20M Spurs deal w/ player option -- is re-considering agreement. Morris is now considering a free agent deal with Knicks, who'll have additional cap space with reworking of Bullock deal.
ESPN Sources: The New York Knicks and free agent Reggie Bullock are re-working an original two-year, $21M deal, with both sides motivated to find an agreement with new terms. Agent David Bauman and the Knicks are re-evaluating Bullock’s fitness to play a full season in 2019-20.
ESPN story on Russell Westbrook welcoming idea of Oklahoma City searching out a trade that would end his Thunder career:
Story filed to ESPN: In aftermath of Paul George’s departure, OKC star Russell Westbrook is welcoming to idea of Sam Presti engineering a trade that would bring an end to his illustrious 11-year Thunder tenure. Miami's expressed interest, a destination that appeals to Westbrook.
Mike Conley Jr., (@mconley11) joins The Woj Pod: The Jazz and Donovan Mitchell, the end of an era in Memphis, how Conley/Gasol run fits into a changing NBA world of movement. Plus: Jazz GM Justin Zanik inside franchise's significant reshaping of roster.
ESPN story on G Avery Bradley agreeing to deal with the Lakers once he’s cleared waivers.
Once guard Avery Bradley clears waivers today, he plans to sign a two-year, $9.7M deal with the Los Angeles Lakers, his agent Bill Duffy of @BDA_Sports tells ESPN. Bradley will have a player option on the second season.
ESPN story on Thunder trading Jerami Grant to the Nuggets for a 2020 first-round pick.
The Thunder acquired Danilo Gallinari to start at Grant’s F spot in Paul George trade. Denver gets another long versatile wing for a loaded roster pursuing the Western Conference title.
Oklahoma City Is trading F Jerami Grant to Denver for a 2020 first-round pick, league sources tell ESPN. Deal brings OKC it’s sixth future first in past week and saves Thunder $39M in salary and luxury tax.
Memphis created ability to sign G Tyus Jones to offer sheet with flexibility created in sign-and-trade that allowed G Delon Wright to take similar Dallas deal.
ESPN story on Delon Wright joining Mavericks on $29M deal.
Guard Delon Wright is signing a three-year, $29M deal to play for Mavs, agent Greg Lawrence tells ESPN.
Memphis continues to accumulate assets, and Mavs get a guard that they’ve wanted in free agency.
Sources: Memphis and Dallas are agreed on a sign-and-trade for G Delon Wright. Dallas will send Memphis two second-round picks.
Free agency week on The Woj Pod Russillo: Windhorst: Jared Dudley: Ramona: Zach Lowe:
Deal: two years, $5.5M
Free agent guard Alex Caruso has agreed to a one-year deal to return to the Lakers, league source tells ESPN.
Spurs are finalizing a trade to send F Davis Bertans to the Wizards, league sources tell ESPN. Bertans will be absorbed into an exception, allowing Spurs to complete deal for DeMarre Carroll.
The Spurs and agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports reworked free agent F DeMarre Carroll's deal to make it three-years, $21M, Bartelstein tells ESPN. The original agreement was two-years, $13M.
Cousins' one-year deal with the Lakers is $3.5M.
Four-time All-Star center DeMarcus Cousins agrees to a one-year deal with the Los Angeles Lakers.
The Woj Pod with @ZachLowe_NBA -- crossover edition. How Paul George and Kawhi Leonard demolished obstacles to land with the Clippers, Russell Westbrook's future in OKC, the Raptors, and much more.
ESPN story on center @ivicazubac agreeing to a $28M deal to return to the Clippers.
Free agent Rajon Rondo is signing a two-year deal with the Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell @ramonashelburne and me.
IVICA....I own it Ivica!
The Miami Heat had interest in Cousins, but several Lakers players -- including Anthony Davis -- helped convince him on joining LA, league sources tell ESPN.
Free agent center DeMarcus Cousins has agreed to a one-year deal with the Lakers, agent Jeff Schwartz of Excel Sports tells ESPN.
Restricted free agent center Ivaca Zubac has agreed to a four-year, $28M deal to stay with the Los Angeles Clippers, Excel Sports agents Jeff Schwartz and Mike Lindeman tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Russell Westbrook and his agent Thad Foucher are engaged with OKC GM Sam Presti on next steps for the All-Star guard, including the possibility of trade this summer.
In the end, Toronto didn't have assets to satisfy OKC --- with or without Siakam in any proposed deal. The fear of Toronto entering into trade talks with OKC only proved to guarantee the Clippers would go the distance with five first-round picks and SGA in deal for George.
ESPN story on OKC’s Sam Presti leveraging the Clippers and Raptors on a Paul George trade, a deal ultimately dictating the balance of power in the NBA.
Story soon on ESPN: In a dramatic night of negotiations, Thunder GM Sam Presti leveraged the Clippers and Raptors in trade talks on Paul George. The Clippers ability to deliver an unprecedented pool of picks and PG Shai Gilgeous-Alexander ruled day.
ESPN story on the Clippers bombshell acquisitions of Kawhi Leonard and Paul George:
The Clippers are waiving guard Tyrone Wallace, league sources tell ESPN.
In the end, Kawhi Leonard didn't want to construct a Super Team with the Lakers. He wanted a co-star across the Staples corridor with the Clippers, and made it clear to Steve Ballmer and Lawrence Frank: Get PG, and I'm coming.
Sources: Leonard and George met in LA earlier in week. Clippers had long been frontrunners for Leonard, but it is unlikely he would've made final leap to sign without PG trade. Clippers imagined Leonard as part of a Lakers Big 3 --- and knew they had no choice. They did OKC deal.
Sources: As expected, Kawhi Leonard: four-year, $142M maximum contract.
Free agent guard Danny Green will sign a two-year, $30M deal with the Los Angeles Lakers, league source tells ESPN.
Going onto SportsCenter now to report on the Clippers landing Kawhi Leonard and Paul George.
The Clippers are sending the Thunder four unprotected first-round picks, one protected first-round pick and two pick swaps, league sources tell ESPN. Those picks go to OKC with Gallinari and SGA.
After Leonard pushed George to find a way to get to the Clippers, Paul George approached the team and requested a trade, league sources tell ESPN. OKC was left with no choice and made the best out of a difficult situation, per sources.
Kawhi Leonard has been recruiting Paul George to find a way to get to the Clippers and LA pulled it off tonight: George goes to the Clippers with Leonard, and together they walk into Staples Center to go head-to-head with LeBron James and Anthony Davis.
Sources: Oklahoma City is getting a massive package of future picks, including Shai Gilgeous-Alexander and Danilo Galllinari, to deliver Kawhi Leonard who he wanted to partner with: Paul George.
Oklahoma City is trading All-Star Paul George to the Los Angeles Clippers for a record-setting collection of draft choices, league sources tell ESPN.
Free agent forward Kawhi Leonard has informed runners-up teams of his plans: He's signing with the Clippers, league sources tell ESPN.
The Grizzlies are trading CJ Miles to Washington for Dwight Howard, league source tells ESPN. Deal saves Memphis $3.1M. Grizzles will waive or trade Howard, per source.
The Woj Pod: @RamonaShelburne on the dynamics of KD’s final season with the Warriors.
New York's RJ Barrett makes his NBA Summer League debut against Zion Williamson and the Pelicans tonight at 9:30 ET on ESPN.
The Woj Pod: @ramonashelburne inside the unraveling of Kevin Durant's relationship with Warriors, why the Nets, cost of Knicks failing to repair Porzingis relationship and pressure on Clippers to land Kawhi Leonard. Listen/subscribe here:
Tyler Trent’s family, friends and admirers lost him six months ago this week, but his legacy lives on through the Tyler Trent Fund/V Foundation and his moving memoir, The Upset:
ESPN story on sign-and-trade agreement that delivers Portland F Jake Layman to Minnesota on a three-year deal.
Bartelstein on Layman sign-and-trade: "The deal couldn’t have happened without the Blazers looking out for Jake’s best interests.”
Minnesota absorbed Layman into a trade exception. "We’re extremely appreciative of how hard (Portland President) Neil Olshey worked with us to accommodate what we were trying to accomplish in this sign and trade,” Bartelstein told ESPN.
Portland restricted free agent F Jake Layman is signing a three-year, $11.5M deal with Minnesota, agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells ESPN. Minnesota is acquiring Layman in a sign-and-trade agreement with the Blazers.
ESPN story on Suns-Grizzlies trade, including Kyle Korver on his way to waivers and free agency.
As @BobbyMarks42 says, Phoenix now has the salary cap space to sign free agent Ricky Rubio to his three-year, $51M deal.
Josh Jackson is a free-look for the Grizzlies, but Melton is a prospect that Memphis has long evaluated as a prospect with some staying power. Suns future second-round picks typically convey in the low-to-mid 30's. Suns save $5.5M on Korver buyout vs. Jackson salary.
Suns are planning to buyout the partially guaranteed contract of Kyle Korver, league sources tell ESPN. Lakers, Sixers and Bucks are frontrunners to sign Korver once he clears waivers, sources said.
The Grizzlies make a run at resurrecting the No. 4 overall pick in the 2017 NBA Draft, Josh Jackson.
The Grizzlies are trading Kyle Korver and Jevon Carter to the Suns for DeAnthony Melton, Josh Jackson 2020 second-round pick and 2021 conditional second-round pick, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on free agent guard TJ McConnell agreeing to deal with the Pacers.
Source: Deal is two-years, $7M.
Free agent TJ McConnell has agreed to deal with Pacers, league source tells ESPN.
On his way from the Nets to Lakers, @JaredDudley619 tells The Woj Pod: “When Kevin Durant comes...no one's going to be like, 'Who are the Knicks getting in 2021?' No one is going to care."
ESPN story with @espn_macmahon: Finally, the Chandler Parsons Era ends with the Grizzlies.
Memphis and Parsons were unable to agree on a buyout number, so Grizzlies made the trade with Atlanta. As @BobbyMarks42 says, it's easier to move out salaries by breaking Parsons' $25M into two smaller contracts. Hawks free a roster spot.
Memphis has agreed to trade Chandler Parsons to Atlanta for Solomon Hill and Miles Plumlee, league sources tell ESPN.
Free agent Darius Miller has agreed to a two-year, $14.25M deal to stay with New Orleans, league source tells ESPN. The second-year is non-guaranteed.
Lakers free agent Jared Dudley on pitching LeBron James on his candidacy, "Once I got the OK from LeBron, when he signed off on it...we were going to make it happen." Plus: Nets getting KD and Kyrie. @JaredDudley619 on The Woj Pod:
Jared Dudley was determined to play with LeBron James and Anthony Davis on the Lakers. He recruited them. @JaredDudley619 makes his case to Kawhi Leonard on The Woj Pod. Listen here:
As @espn_macmahon says, Mudiay's development stands to continue an upward trajectory with coach Quin Snyder and Mike Conley Jr. The Jazz program is significant reason why Mudiay's agent, BJ Armstrong, believed Utah's such a good fit for his 23-year-old client.
Free agent guard Emmanuel Mudiay has agreed to a one-year deal with the Utah Jazz, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on @JaredDudley619 getting his wish: He's going to the Lakers.
Agent Greg Lawrence emphasizes recovery window of 5-to-7 months after Thompson's ACL surgery is tilted toward back end of that timetable: "While we are optimistic on a return as quickly as possible, Klay and the team are committed to taking the necessary time with the process."
Dudley had a real impact on the Nets young roster a year ago, and really wanted the chance to play for the Lakers. He'll get a chance to impact on a roster that needs veterans capable of contributing in a pressure environment.
Free agent Jared Dudley has agreed to a one-year, $2.6M deal with the Los Angeles Lakers, agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells ESPN.
ESPN story on the forward Jeff Green agreeing to a free agent deal with the Utah Jazz. He joins Mike Conley Jr., and Bojan Bogdanovic on a roster reshaped for Western Conference contention.
Free agent Jeff Green has agreed to a one-year, $2.5M deal with Utah, league sources tell ESPN.
Thompson is expected to make a full recovery. There's no timetable on a return, but his agent Greg Lawrence has said that Thompson is expected to follow a standard recovery time of 5-to-7 months. Thompson recently agreed to a new 5-year, $190M contract with Golden State.
Warrior All-Star guard Klay Thompson underwent successful surgery today to repair his torn ACL, league source tells ESPN. Dr. Neal ElAttrache performed procedure at the Kerlan Jobe Institute in Los Angeles.
Free agent guard Brad Wanamaker is returning to the Boston Celtics on a one-year deal, agent Steve McCaskill tells ESPN. Wanamaker played six seasons in Europe before joining the Celtics last season as the oldest rookie (29) in the NBA.
Restricted free agent F/C Daniel Theis has agreed to a two-year, $10M deal to stay with the Boston Celtics, CAA agents Michael Tellem and Aaron Mintz tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Sixers, Ben Simmons progressing toward a five-year, $170M maximum contract extension.
Under new salary cap projections, Ben Simmons' maximum contract total has crept slightly higher: $170M.
Philadelphia has offered a five-year, $168M maximum contract extension to Ben Simmons and the Sixers and agent Rich Paul are expected to work through the details toward an eventual agreement, league sources tell ESPN.
Free agency on The Woj Pod with @WindhorstESPN: Kawhi Leonard, The Super Team Era, the speed of dealmaking this June/July, and much, much more. Listen and subscribe here:
ESPN story on free agent guard @isaiahthomas agreeing to a deal with the Wizards.
Isaiah Thomas has agreed to a one-year deal with the Washington Wizards, league source tells ESPN.
Kevon Looney is returning to the Warriors on a three-year, $15M deal, agent @tramasar tells ESPN.
Free agent C @paugasol wants to return next season and says he's recovering well from left foot procedure. He tells ESPN: "My recovery from surgery has been smooth and I expect to be fully cleared for basketball activities in early August. I cannot wait to start training again."
ESPN story with @ZachLowe_NBA on completion of a four-team trade that secures Jimmy Butler's four-year, $142M contract with Miami.
Golden State is moving Shabazz Napier, Treveon Graham and cash onto Minnesota, league sources tell ESPN. Napier and Graham are part of the D'Angelo Russell sign-and-trade.
So the Clippers get a future first-round pick to take on Harkless, who is another starting level forward with significant playoff experience to surround -- potentially --- Kawhi Leonard.
The Sixers get Miami's Josh Richardson in the deal, too. And ... Jimmy Butler gets his four-year, $142M max deal.
Miami is also sending a future first-round pick to the Clippers, league sources tell ESPN.
Maurice Harkless is on his way to Clippers in the deal, league source tells ESPN.
Jimmy Butler deal is complete with Heat -- with Clippers added as a fourth-team in trade that also includes Philadelphia and Portland, league sources tell @ZachLowe_NBA and me.
ESPN story on Wesley Matthews agreeing to a deal to join the Milwaukee Bucks.
Nerlens Noel is agreed on a deal with OKC -- again, league source tells ESPN.
Free agent Frank Kaminsky has agreed to a two-year, $10M deal with the Suns, agent @KB_Sports tells ESPN.
The NBA's Executive of the Year Jon Horst did a tremendous job building out the Bucks bench a summer ago. Solid addition on a minimum deal here. Several contenders were in pursuit of Matthews, who played his college ball at Marquette.
Free agent G Wesley Matthews has agreed to a deal with the Milwaukee Bucks, league sources tell ESPN.
Warriors owner Joe Lacob says in statement on Kevin Durant's departure for Brooklyn: As long as he's co-chairman, "No player will ever wear No. 35 for the Warriors again."
Free agent G Edmond Sumner has agreed to a three-year deal with the Indiana Pacers, Excel Sports agents Sean Kennedy and Jared Mucha tell ESPN.
Golden State All-Star Klay Thompson's new five-year, $190M contract includes a 15 percent trade kicker, agent Greg Lawrence tells ESPN.
Latest ESPN story on Warriors/Nets finalizing the sign-and-trade for D'Angelo Russell and his $117M max contract.
The Woj Pod makes its debut on the ESPN platform in the aftermath of one of the wildest free agency days ever. @ryenarussillo joins me to go inside a dramatic NBA power shift. Listen and subscribe here:
Rivers deal includes a player option on the second year, source tells ESPN.
Free agent guard Austin Rivers has agreed to a two-year deal to return to the Houston Rockets, league source tells ESPN.
Deal will include Golden State sending a protecting future first-round pick to Brooklyn, league sources tell ESPN.
The Warriors and Nets are on course to complete the sign-and-trade that will deliver All-Star guard D’Angelo Russell to Golden State on a four-year, $117M maximum contract, league sources tell ESPN. Kevin Durant and his camp had to help work deal to completion overnight.
Portland gets a starting caliber center on an expiring deal as it awaits Jusuf Nurkic's return from a serious leg injury. Blazers offseason: Whiteside, Kent Bazemore, retain Rodney Hood and draft Nassir Little. Another Western contender loading up.
Deal is agreed on, per sources.
Miami is finalizing a trade to send center Hassan Whiteside to Portland for Mo Harkless and Meyers Leonard, league sources tell ESPN.
Curry deal: Four years, $32M, agent Alex Saratsis tells ESPN.
Guard Seth Curry has reached an agreement with Dallas, league source tells ESPN.
Free agent guard Michael Carter-Williams has agreed to a one-year deal to return to the Orlando Magic, league source tells ESPN.
This isn't the free agency that New York fans imagined, but Knicks gathering group of serious-minded, professional players: Ellington, Bobby Portis, Taj Gibson and Julius Randle. No stars, but Randle's young and talented. It's a hard-playing, competitive group for David Fizdale.
Free agent Wayne Ellington has agreed to a two-year, $16M deal with the New York Knicks, agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells ESPN.
ESPN story on point guard Tomas Satoransky signing a $30M deal with the Bulls -- with Wizards gathering draft assets in the sign-and-trade.
Sources: Washington gets some pick value in sign-and-trade: Chicago eliminates protections on 2023 second-round pick to Washington; Wizards get better of Memphis and Chicago's 2020 second-round pick; Wiz get right to swap Lakers 2022 second w/ better of Chi/Det. 2022 seconds.
Tomas Satoransky's three-year deal with the Bulls: $30M, league sources tell ESPN.
Satroransky started 54 games for the Wizards a year ago, and Bulls have been in marketplace for a starting PG. Satoransky will get that opportunity in Chicago on a three-year deal, per sources.
Chicago has reached agreement on a sign-and-trade with Washington for guard Tomas Satoransky, league sources tell ESPN. Bulls are signing Satoransky to a three-year deal, league sources tell ESPN.
Pelicans are sending 2021 and 2023 second-round picks -- both via Warriors -- in trade for Favors, league source tells ESPN.
ESPN story on @patbev21 agreeing to a $40M deal to stay with the Clippers.
Beverley was run out of U of Arkansas, exiled to the Ukraine and Greece and then fought all the way to a $40M NBA contract. Hell of a journey for @patbev21.
Free agent guard Patrick Beverley has agreed to a three-year, $40M deal to stay with the Clippers, his agent @KB_Sports tells ESPN.
To make clearer the terms: It's a two-year deal, with the second year a player option.
Free agent Bobby Portis has agreed to a two-year, $31M deal with the Knicks, agent Mark Bartelstein tells ESPN.
Memphis' new front office has been gathering up young assets and draft picks in past several months.
Golden State is trading Andre Iguodala to the Memphis Grizzlies, league source tells ESPN. Warriors are sending a 2024 protected first-round pick in the 2024 (protected 1-4), 2025 (protected 1) and 2026 unprotected.
Golden State has to unload salary elsewhere to make this sign-and-trade happen --- which means Andre Iguodala could be on the move, league sources tell ESPN.
Golden State and Brooklyn have agreed on a sign-and-trade, sending D’Angelo Russell to the Warriors on a four-year, $117M maximum contract, league sources tell ESPN.
Next up on The @notthefakeSVP Show: Boston Celtics guard Kemba Walker.
Free agent F Mario Hezonjia has agreed to a one-year minimum deal -- with a player option --- with the Portland Trail Blazers, CAA agent Michael Tellem tells ESPN.
Free agent F/C Mike Muscala has agreed to a deal with the Oklahoma City Thunder, agent Sean Kennedy of Excel Sports tells ESPN.
Free agent Nerlens Noel has asked OKC for time to re-evaluate their earlier commitment on a new deal, and sides are continuing discussions, league sources tell ESPN.
Davis brings the Jazz a big, physical presence who's relentless on the boards, defends and can play with -- or behind -- center Rudy Gobert.
Free agent F Ed Davis has agreed to a two-year, $10M with the Utah Jazz, CAA agent Aaron Mintz tells ESPN.
Reporting this story with @ramonashelburne.
Free agents Kevin Durant and Kyrie Irving are taking less than the max to allow DeAndre Jordan to get the $10M annual salary with Brooklyn, league sources tell ESPN.
DeAndre Jordan has agreed to four-year, $40M deal with the Nets, Excel Sports agent Jeff Schwartz tells ESPN.
ESPN story on Al Horford agreeing to a free agent deal with the 76ers, who have transformed their roster again.
The Horford contract has $97M guaranteed and $12M in bonuses tied to championships, league sources tell ESPN.
Five-time All-Star F/C Al Horford has agreed to a four-year, $109M deal with the Philadelphia 76ers, agent Jason Glushon tells ESPN.
The deal will include Josh Richardson to the 76ers, league sources tell ESPN.
Miami is finalizing a sign-and-trade with Philadelphia to acquire Jimmy Butler, league sources tell ESPN.
Taj Gibson has agreed to a two-year, $20M deal with the Knicks, agent Mark Bartelstein tells ESPN.
We will absolutely record this tonight, Ryen.....Eventually.
ESPN story on free agent Julius Randle agreeing to a $63M deal with the New York Knicks.
Free agent Julius Randle has agreed to a three-year, $63M deal with the New York Knicks, CAA agents Aaron Mintz and Steve Heumann tell ESPN.
Nerlens Noel has agreed to a deal to return to the Thunder, league source tells ESPN.
Deal includes no player option, team source tells ESPN.
Free agent forward Tobias Harris has agreed to a five-year, $180M contract to return to the Philadelphia 76ers, his agent and father, Torrel Harris of Unique Sports Management, tells ESPN.
Neil Olshey had traded for Kent Bazemore as protection in case Blazers lost Hood in free agency. Now, Hood and Bazemore return together and Blazers remain among the elite of the Western Conference.
Free agent F Rodney Hood has agreed to a two-year, $16M deal to return to the Portland Trail Blazers, CAA agents Ty Sullivan and Austin Brown tell ESPN. Deal includes a player option.
Once Nikola Mirotic made a surprising decision to return to Europe, new Jazz GM Justin Zanik pivoted and made a strong push to sign Bogdanovic out of Indiana. In his first few months as GM, Zanik has landed Mike Conley and Bogdanovic. Jazz are a legitimate Western contender now.
Thomas Bryant has agreed to a three-year, $25M deal to return to the Washington Wizards, agent Todd Ramasar (@tramasar) tells ESPN.
Indiana has agreed to a free agent deal with Jeremy Lamb, league sources tell ESPN.
Malcolm Brogdon has agreed to a four-year, $85M deal with Indiana, league sources tell ESPN.
Malcolm Brodgon has agreed to a four-year, $85M deal with Indiana, per sources.
Indiana is trading a first-round and two future second round picks to the Milwaukee for Malcolm Brogdon, league sources tell ESPN.
league sources also told ESPN.
Indiana's Bojan Bogdanovic has agreed to a four-year, $73M deal with the Utah Jazz, league sources tells EPN.
Danuel House has agreed to a three-year, $11.1M deal to return to the Houston Rockets, league source tells ESPN.
Free agent Al-Farouq Aminu has agreed to a three-year, $29M deal with the Orlando Magic, league sources tell ESPN. Player option on third year.
EuroLeague power forward Nicolo Melli has agreed to a two-year, $8M deal with the New Orleans Pelicans, agent Sam Goldfeder of Excel Sports tells ESPN.
Garrett Temple has agreed to a two-year, $10M deal with Brooklyn, agent Mark Bartelstein tells ESPN.
Free agent Terrence Ross has agreed to a four-year, $54M deal to return to the Orlando Magic, CAA agent Aaron Mintz tells ESPN.
The 76ers have started discussions with agent Rich Paul on a contract extension for All-Star guard Ben Simmons, league sources tell ESPN.
Gerald Green is returning to the Houston Rockets on a one-year deal, agent James Dunleavy tells ESPN.
Free agent center Jonas Valanciunas has agreed to a three-year, $45M deal to return to the Memphis Grizzlies, CAA agent Leon Rose tells ESPN.
Free agent guard Derrick Rose has agreed to a two-year, $15M deal to join the Detroit Pistons, league sources tell ESPN.
Free agent F Harrison Barnes has agreed to a four-year, $85M deal to stay with the Sacramento Kings, Excel Sports agent Jeff Schwartz tells ESPN.
Free agent Khris Middleton has agreed to a five-year, $178M deal to return to the Milwaukee Bucks, Excel Sports agent Mike Lindeman tells ESPN. Deal includes a player option.
Free agent Kemba Walker has agreed to sign a four-year, $141M maximum contract to join the Boston Celtics, Excel Sports agent Jeff Schwartz tells ESPN.
Free agent guard JJ Redick has agreed to a two-year, $26.5M deal to join the New Orleans Pelicans, league sources tell ESPN.
Kevin Durant and his business manager Rich Kleiman met with Warriors GM Bob Myers Sunday in New York and delivered him the news on the decision to leave Golden State, league sources tell ESPN. Rest of teams were informed later this today. Teams thought process was forthright.
Once free agency opens at 6 PM, All-Star Khris Middleton plans to return to the Milwaukee Bucks on a five-year, $178M contract, league sources tell ESPN. The deal is expected to include a player option on final year.
Sources: Durant will sign a 4-year, $164M deal with the Nets; Irving will sign 4-years, $141M.
Brooklyn is making a clean sweep tonight: Brooklyn will sign Kevin Durant, Kyrie Irving and DeAndre Jordan, league sources tell ESPN.
Durant's planning to make a formal announcement on The Board Room Instagram at 6 PM. Durant's camp won't confirm his decision, and says "Details will be revealed at 6."
Kevin Durant is planning to sign with the Brooklyn Nets, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on center Brook Lopez's plans to sign a four-year, $52M deal to return to the Milwaukee Bucks.
Once free agency opens at 6 PM ET, Brook Lopez is planning to sign a four-year, $52M deal to stay with the Milwaukee Bucks, league sources tell ESPN.
Source: Kevin Durant will announce his free agent decision tonight on his company owned sports business network:
Sources: Boston's showing interest in a 3-team sign-and-trade w/ Kyrie Irving (Nets), Kemba Walker (Celtics) and Terry Rozier (Hornets). Boston wants to create a full MLE and would likely need to surrender at least a first-round pick to Nets. So far, talks are exploratory.
ESPN story on free agent C Jonas Valanciunas planning to commit to a three-year, $45M deal to return to the Memphis Grizzlies.
Once free agency opens at 6 PM ET, center Jonas Valanciunas is expected to commit to a three-year, $45M contract to return to the Memphis Grizzlies, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Pelicans finalizing deal with EuroLeague PF Nicolo Melli.
EuroLeague power forward Nicolo Melli is finalizing a two-year deal with the New Orleans Pelicans, sources tell ESPN. Melli, 28, was the top scorer in the EuroLeague Finals for Fenerbahce last season.
Welcome to 2019 NBA free agency, courtesy of @BobbyMarks42
ESPN story on Kyrie Irving and the Brooklyn Nets meeting Sunday as a prelude to a four-year max deal -- and the Lakers beginning pursuit of D'Angelo Russell.
The Los Angeles Lakers reached out to D'Angelo Russell's agents at CAA -- Austin Brown and Aaron Mintz -- to set up a meeting with the All-Star guard, league sources tell ESPN. The Lakers and Russell share a mutual interest in a reunion. Lakers have the cap space to sign him.
Nets will be willing to work with Russell and his reps on ways to get him to a team of his choice, including sign-and-trade scenarios, league sources tell ESPN. If Russell and Nets found a sign-and-trade deal that works for both, obviously, there's no need to renounce his rights.
Once Kyrie Irving commits to a deal, Nets are expected to renounce All-Star guard D'Angelo Russell and allow him to become an unrestricted free agent, league sources tell ESPN. Russell led Nets to the playoffs this past season. There's tremendous league-wide interest in Russell.
Free agent G Derrick Rose will meet with the Pistons on Sunday, with both sides motivated on finding a pathway to a two-year contract, league sources tell ESPN.
Sources: Jimmy Butler expected to meet the Miami Heat in South Fla. Sunday. Butler/Rockets meeting likely early week in LA. Sixers haven’t ruled out working with Butler on sign-and-trades, which Miami and Houston need to acquire the All-Star guard.
Free agent Kyrie Irving is meeting with the Brooklyn Nets in New York on Sunday and both sides are motivated to move quickly toward reaching a 4-year, $141M deal, league sources tell ESPN.
Charlotte has declined to exercise qualifying offer on Frank Kaminsky, allowing him to become an unrestricted free agent, league source tells ESPN. There's significant interest in Kaminsky in the marketplace
Charlotte has been scouring the free agent point guard market, considering such options as Elfrid Peyton, TJ McConnell, Ish Smith and Emmanuel Mudiay, league sources tell ESPN.
As reported this week, the Celtics and Walker both intend for the All-Star guard to commit to a four-year, $141M maximum contract once free agency opens on Sunday at 6 PM. Walker is traveling to New England to meet with Celtics officials at 6 PM ET.
Kemba Walker plans to be in Boston on Sunday to finalize a formal agreement with the Celtics, league sources tell ESPN.
Boston is declining to extend a qualifying offer to guard Brad Wanamaker, who becomes an unrestricted free agent, league source tells ESPN. Celtics could still revisit Wanamaker in free agency.
Boston has extended a qualifying offer to C Daniel Theis, making him a restricted free agent, league source tells ESPN.
Another quality big on the market: Houston center Nene is declining his $3.8M option and will become a free agent, league sources tell ESPN.
The Nuggets are extending a qualifying offer to F Trey Lyles, who'll become a restricted free agent, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Denver keeping four-time All-Star F Paul Millsap with a $30M team option, promising a loaded roster in pursuit of a Western Conference title.
Denver will bring back Millsap for the final season of his three-year contract at $30.3M, have available their $9.2M mid-level exception AND still stay under the luxury tax. Denver is loaded to compete for the Western Conference title.
Denver is picking up the option on Paul Millsap's $30M contract, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story with @ramonashelburne on Kevin Durant and Kawhi Leonard sharing conversations on a possible free agent future together.
Reporting w/ @RamonaShelburne: Kevin Durant and Kawhi Leonard have been discussing free agent scenarios that could include a future with them playing together. For now, there are two clear possibilities for them to sign into the same franchise: Clippers and Knicks. Story soon.
Moving back the date gives the Warriors some flexibility in decision-making as free agency unfolds for them.
The Golden State Warriors and Shaun Livingston have agreed to move back the guarantee date on his $7.7M contract to July 10, league sources tell ESPN. There had been a June 30 date for Warriors to guarantee his full deal for 2019-20 -- or waive him with a $2M payout.
Darren Collison was on target to secure a $10M-$12M annual salary in free agency. He retires at 31.
ESPN story on Kevin Durant's plans to engage with Brooklyn, Golden State, LA Clippers and New York Knicks once free agency opens on Sunday.
Story filed to ESPN: Golden State’s Kevin Durant is planning to engage four teams in discussions upon the opening of NBA free agency on Sunday  the Brooklyn Nets, Los Angeles Clippers, New York Knicks and Warriors, league sources tell ESPN.
That clears that up.
Minnesota is waiving Cam Reynolds, league source tells ESPN.
ESPN story on Golden State planning a five-year, $190M max offer to keep All-Star Klay Thompson -- and expectation a deal will be completed as soon as Sunday night.
Sources: Golden State is planning to offer All-Star Klay Thompson a 5-year, $190M maximum contract when free agency opens Sunday at 6 PM ET --- which is expected to accelerate process of GM Bob Myers and Thompson’s agent, Greg Lawrence, quickly reaching formal agreement.
ESPN story on the Boston Celtics hiring Kara Lawson as an assistant coach:
The Boston Celtics are hiring Kara Lawson as an assistant coach, league sources tell ESPN. Lawson, an ex-WNBA and Olympic champion, has been an NBA commentator with ESPN and the TV analyst for the Washington Wizards.
ESPN story with @ZachLowe_NBA and @BobbyMarks42: Rob Pelinka trades three contracts to the Wizards, Anthony Davis declines his $4M trade bonus and the Lakers are on the cusp of $32M in cap space.
Free agent Kawhi Leonard is expected to allow the Toronto Raptors to make the final meeting presentation among the teams visiting with him in Los Angeles next week, league sources tell ESPN. The incumbent often prefers to go last in trying to convince a player to stay with team.
The Wizards had previous draft interest in Mo Wagner, who was a Lakers first-round pick out of Michigan in 2018. Wagner will get an opportunity with Washington.
Lakers GM Rob Pelinka has found a way to complete the Anthony Davis trade on July 6 with max space to spend on a single free agent -- or divide the money among multiple players.
The Lakers will start free agency with $32M in salary cap space. The Lakers have the ability to sign a max player now.
Anthony Davis is waiving his $4M trade kicker, league sources tell ESPN.
The Lakers are trading Mo Wagner, Isaac Bonga and Jemerrio Jones to Wizards as part of the Anthony Davis deal with New Orleans, league sources tell @ZachLowe_NBA and me. Deal clears contracts and creates more cap space for free agency.
Memphis is declining to make a qualifying offer on guard Tyler Dorsey, who'll become an unrestricted free agent, league sources tell ESPN. Grizzlies are open to the idea of revisiting a scenario for Dorsey to return in future.
Clippers guard Landry Shamet has been invited to participate with the Select Team at Team USA's National Team camp in Las Vegas in August, league source tells ESPN. Shamet will join the younger group that includes No. 1 overall pick Zion Williamson.
ESPN story on the Boston Celtics becoming strong frontrunners to sign Charlotte All-Star guard Kemba Walker once free agency opens:
The Boston Celtics have emerged as the frontrunner to sign Charlotte All-Star guard Kemba Walker once free agency opens Sunday at 6 PM ET, league sources tell ESPN.
New Orleans is declining the qualifying offer on Cheick Diallo, which will make him an unrestricted free agent, league sources tell ESPN. Diallo, 22, adds another quality young big to the marketplace next week.
Team announced Gasol decision.
Toronto Raptors center Marc Gasol is exercising his $25.6M player option for next season, returning to the defending NBA champions, league sources tell ESPN. Gasol could’ve entered free agency.
ESPN story with @ZachLowe_NBA on the Rockets continued pursuit of a sign-and-trade deal for Philadelphia's Jimmy Butler.
Reporting with @ZachLowe_NBA, of course -- not this poor other guy I tagged.
Philadelphia has been privately expressing confidence around NBA that it can re-sign Butler and Tobias Harris, but Houston remains on case of selling Butler/76ers with a sign-and-trade scenario once free agency starts on Sunday.
Reporting w/ @ZachLowe: Houston’s offering Clint Capela, Eric Gordon and PJ Tucker individually to teams w/ space to absorb salary. Rockets trying for best available first-rounder for any of those three, hoping to redirect pick to Philly in pursuit of Jimmy Butler sign-and-trade.
Phoenix has extended qualifying offer to Kelly Oubre Jr., which will make him a restricted free agent, league sources tell ESPN. Oubre is a target for significant offer sheets in the market, especially with cap space teams who miss out on high-profile unrestricted free agents.
Minnesota has extended a qualifying offer to G Tyus Jones, making him a restricted free agent, league source tells ESPN.
ESPN story on Kevin Durant declining his $31.5M player option with the Warriors --- and officially opening the door to free agency.
Golden State Warriors star Kevin Durant has declined his $31.5M player option and will become an unrestricted free agent, league sources tell ESPN. Durant and his business manager Rich Kleiman are in New York, evaluating free agency options. So far, process has stayed private.
One of the greatest to ever to do it and a role model for an entire industry. Congratulations Bob.
Bonus segment of The Woj &amp; Lowe Free Agency Special on Youtube: The Nuggets, Blazers, Clippers and much more:
Houston's priority for free agency, league sources tell ESPN: Pursue a sign-and-trade for Sixers All-Star Jimmy Butler.
No pressure but ... we'll be here.
Portland has given F Jake Layman his qualifying offer, making him a restricted free agent, league sources tell ESPN.
Let's go!
Cap neutral deal for Blazers and Hawks. Portland acquires a wing in Bazemore who'll provide an insurance policy on free agent Rodney Hood. Hood's market value exceeds Portland's ability to keep him using the taxpayer MLE.
Portland is trading Evan Turner to Atlanta for Kent Bazemore, league source tells ESPN.
The Celtics are hiring Fairmont (WV) State coach Joe Mazzulla as an assistant coach, league sources tell ESPN. Mazzulla made a strong impression with Celtics G League staff before returning to college two years ago. He played for John Beilein at WVU.
Suns guard Tyler Johnson has exercised his $19.25M player option for the 2019-20 season, league sources tell ESPN.
Miami Heat center Hassan Whiteside has exercised the $27.1M player option on his contract for 2019-20, league source tells ESPN.
Syracuse's Tyus Battle has agreed to an Exhibit 10 contract with Minnesota, league source tells ESPN.
De Colo is essentially a Raptors restricted free agent. They can extend a qualifying offer and match any offer sheet; Seems more likely the NBA champs would let De Colo, 32, become an UFA.
After five years away, EuroLeague star guard Nando De Colo planning return to the NBA. ESPN story:
ESPN story on Rick Pitino turning down executive and coaching offer to return to Greece, focusing on finding another chance in the NBA.
Pitino wants to return to a full-time pursuit of a job in the NBA --- coaching, player personnel or an advisory role, he said.
Naismith Hall of Fame coach Rick Pitino has turned down an offer to return as president and coach of Panathinaikos, the franchise he led to a Greek League championship this season, Pitino tells ESPN.
Wake Forest F Jaylen Hoard will sign a two-way contract with Portland, league source tells ESPN.
Memphis is signing Purdue-Ft. Wayne guard John Konchar to a two-way contract, league sources tell ESPN.
Detroit has traded for the rights to Tennessee guard Jordan Bone, league source tells ESPN.
Utah is selecting Yale's Mye One with No. 58, league source tells ESPN. Warriors sold it to Jazz.
Brooklyn is selecting UCLA's Jaylen Hands at No. 56, league source tells ESPN.
Utah is selecting Hosftra's Justin Wright-Foreman with No. 53, league source tells ESPN.
Boston is selecting Tremont Waters with No. 51, per source.
Jazz selected Jarrell Brantley with No. 50.
Indiana has traded No. 50 to Utah, league source tells ESPN.
Spurs are selecting Quinndary Weatherspoon, league source tells ESPN.
The Clippers are focused on Florida State's Terence Mann at 48, league source tells ESPN.
The Lakers are focused on Iowa State guard Talen Horton-Tucker, per source.
Denver is drafting a second straight rehab project --- Michael Porter Jr., and now Bol Bol. Porter Jr., was a redshirt with the Nuggets and has showed the tremendous promise of his high school career in recent months. Now, Denver turns its attention to Bol.
Denver has acquired Bol Bol in a trade, league source says.
Miami is focused on Bol Bol at No. 44, league sources tell ESPN.
The Lakers have a deal to acquire the 46th pick from the Magic, league sources tell ESPN.
Washington is focused on Admiral Schofield at No. 42, league source tells ESPN.
New Orleans is trading No. 39 to Golden State, league source tells ESPN.
Oregon's Bol Bol had been considered a preseason Top 5 pick -- and he's still on the board approaching No. 40.
Chicago is focused on Arkansas 7-footer Daniel Gafford with No. 38, league source tells ESPN.
Clarify: Detroit traded for the No. 37 pick from Dallas, not 35.
Detroit has traded for the No. 35 pick and choosing Deividas Sirvydis, league source tells ESPN.
Charlotte is focused on Cody Martin at No. 36, league source tells ESPN.
Indiana has traded No. 32 to Miami for three second-round picks, league source tells ESPN.
Nets plan to keep Claxton, who made remarkable improvement under Tom Crean at Georgia last season.
Brooklyn is focused on Nic Claxton at No. 31, league source tells ESPN.
Brooklyn has No. 31 on the trade block, league sources tell ESPN.
Cavaliers made a deal with the Pistons to target Porter, league sources tell ESPN. Cavs will give new coach John Beilein three rookies: Darius Garland, Dylan Windler and Kevin Porter Jr.
Cavs are trading for the No. 30 pick -- and focused on Kevin Porter, league sources tell ESPN.
San Antonio is focused on Keldon Johnson with the No. 29 pick, league source tells ESPN.
Golden State is focused on Michigan's Jordan Poole at No. 28, league source tells ESPN.
Clippers will send the Nets a 2020 first-round pick via Philadelphia and the 56th pick tonight, league source tells ESPN.
Clippers are focused on Florida State's Mfiondu Kabengele, league source tells ESPN.
Brooklyn has traded No. 27 to the Clippers, league source tells ESPN.
Windler, of course.
Cleveland is focused on Belmont's Dylan Winder, league source tells ESPN.
The Suns are acquiring Celtics center Aron Baynes as part of the Ty Jerome trade, league source tells ESPN.
The Suns are sending the Celtics a 2020 first-round pick via the Bucks in Ty Jerome trade, league sources tells @TimBontemps and me.
Portland is focused on UNC's Nassir Little with No. 25, league source tells ESPN.
Boston is trading No. 24 to the Suns --- who are focused on taking Ty Jerome, league source tells ESPN.
Oklahoma City is focused on Darius Bazely with No. 23, league source tells ESPN.
Boston is focused on Tennessee's Grant Williams at No. 22, league source tells ESPN.
Oklahoma City will get the No. 23 pick tonight and a 2024 second-round pick in the trade, league source tells ESPN.
Oklahoma City has traded the No. 21 pick to Memphis, league source tells ESPN. Memphis is targeting Gonzaga's Brandon Clarke with No. 21.
Deal is agreed on -- and Sixers will send Boston Nos. 24 and 33 in this draft, league sources tell ESPN.
Boston is selecting Mattise Thybulle at No. 20 -- and possibly trading him to the Sixers, league source tells ESPN.
Indiana is focused on Goga Bitadze at No. 18, league source tells ESPN.
Orlando is focused on Auburn's Chuma Okeke at No. 16, league source tells ESPN.
Detroit is focused on Sekou Doumbouya with No. 15, league source tells ESPN.
Boston is focused on Indiana's Romeo Langford with No. 14, league source tells ESPN.
Oklahoma City is engaged in several conversations with teams to move back in first-round from No. 21, league sources tell ESPN.
Miami is focused on Tyler Herro at No. 13, per source.
Charlotte is focused on Kentucky's PJ Washington, league source tell ESPN.
Charlotte is still discussing trades with the No. 12 pick, per sources.
Phoenix VP of Basketball Operations Jeff Bower had Cam Johnson on campus for a recruiting visit in his one season as head coach at Marist College. A week later, Pitt offered him and Bower lost him to the ACC. Five years later, Bower gets Johnson on his team with 11th pick.
Atlanta is focused on Duke's Cam Reddish at 10, league source tells ESPN.
David Griffin imagines the most athletic frontcourt in the NBA with Zion Wiliamson and Texas C Jaxson Hayes together.
New Orleans is focused on Jaxson Hayes at No. 8, per source.
New Orleans still discussing trades at No. 8, league sources tell ESPN.
"Perfect fit," is how the Bulls front office describes Coby White. "Love him."
Bulls are focused on ... Coby White at No. 7, per source.
Chicago has been searching for an impact point guard --- and UNC's Coby White is available on the board at No. 7.
Minnesota is focused on Texas Tech's Jarrett Culver, league source tells ESPN.
Minnesota is on the clock for No. 6 --- and still on the phones discussing trade propositions, league sources tell ESPN.
Barring a trade, the Cavaliers are focused on Vandy guard Darius Garland with the No. 5 pick, league sources tell ESPN.
Atlanta GM Travis Schlenk made that move into No. 4 with an unmistakable prospect in mind: Virginia F DeAndre Hunter. A year ago, he wanted Trae Young. This time, he wanted Hunter. Hawks building a legitimate young core.
Cleveland is still discussing possible trades including the fifth overall pick --- and separate deals to unload JR Smith's partially guaranteed expiring contract that would absorb a bad contract into the Cavs space attached to another first-round pick, league sources tell ESPN.
Minnesota is engaged in multiple conversations on the No. 6 pick acquired in the deal with Phoenix, league sources tell ESPN.
Live from Brooklyn, the #NBADraft is on ESPN and streaming on the ESPN app. Let’s go!
Rob Pelinka and David Griffin, upon completion of Anthony Davis deal, had agreed that if a third team was looped into trade, teams would finalize on July 6. No third team wanted to wait until late July. Once Atlanta was brought in today, Pelinka was already on board.
Cleveland GM Koby Altman is still entertaining offers for the No. 5 pick, league sources tell ESPN.
Minnesota president Gersson Rosas tried to get to No. 4, No. 5 and finally moved up to No. 6.
Minnesota has traded No. 11 and Dario Saric to Phoenix for the No. 6 pick in the draft, league source tells ESPN.
And David Griffin gets maximum value again for the No. 4 pick -- expanding that Lakers trade even more.
Atlanta is pursuing Virginia's DeAndre Hunter with the No. 4 pick, league sources tell ESPN. Atlanta GM Travis Schlenk makes a big move in lottery second year in a row to get his man. Last year, it was Trae Young. This time, DeAndre Hunter.
Atlanta is also sending a Cleveland heavily protected first-round pick in 2020 to the Pelicans, league sources tell ESPN.
Atlanta has acquired New Orleans No. 4 pick in the draft for No. 8 and 17 and 35, league sources tell ESPN. Pelicans are sending Solomon Hill, No. 57 pick and a future second-round pick.
As @BobbyMarks42 says, Pacers will still have $31M in cap space after absorbing Warren into the roster. One significant Indiana target in free agent, per sources: point guard Ricky Rubio.
Pacers will send cash to Suns in deal, league source tells ESPN. Suns wanted to unload the three years, $35M on Warren’s deal to create space.
Suns will send the No. 32 pick to Pacers too, source tells ESPN. Pacers are taking Warren into salary cap space.
Indiana has traded for Phoenix’s TJ Warren, league source tells ESPN.
UNC guard Coby White -- perhaps the fastest rising prospect on the board -- had a private workout with the Knicks at team's facility today, league sources tell ESPN. Knicks have been locked on RJ Barrett at No. 3, but summoned White after Darius Garland's workout yesterday.
ESPN Sources: Golden State has acquired Atlanta’s No. 41 pick in tonight’s NBA Draft. The cost: $1.3M and a 2024 second-round pick. Atlanta moved No. 44 to Miami yesterday. Hawks have Nos. 8, 10, 17 and 35 tonight. Golden State has Nos. 28, 41 and 58.
Boston has offered center Aron Baynes -- $5.4M expiring contract -- into salary cap space elsewhere, league sources tell ESPN. Without Kyrie Irving and Al Horford on the books, moving Baynes without taking back salary could get the Celtics to $23M in space.
Every first-round draft pick tonight will be getting their custom @tissot NBA team watch to remember the moment. Each watch will have their name engraved on the case back, making it one of a kind. #ThisIsYourTime #AD
So the Pistons will be have the 15th and 30th picks in the draft on Thursday. Bucks saved $4M in salary this year, and won’t have Snell’s $12M in salary on books for 2020-21.
Pistons are sending Jon Leuer to Bucks. Bucks are sending 30th pick on Thursday in deal too.
Milwaukee is trading Tony Snell to Detroit, league source tells ESPN.
Vanderbilt guard Darius Garland had his workout with the Knicks today, but New York remains locked on selecting Duke’s RJ Barrett with the NBA Draft’s third overall pick on Thursday, league sources tell ESPN.
The Jazz will send a protected 2020 first-round pick to the Grizzlies, league sources tell ESPN. That pick will convey as a late-lottery pick in 2020 or 2021, or become a lightly-protected pick from 2022-'24. Deal complete on July 6.
Memphis has traded guard Mike Conley to the Utah Jazz for Grayson Allen, Kyle Korver and Jae Crowder, the 23rd pick in Thursday's Draft and a future first-round pick, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Milwaukee All-Star Khris Middleton joining free agency, a step closer to a max contract this summer.
Middleton is expected to command a five-year max contract to stay with the Bucks  or a four-year, max deal elsewhere in the NBA.
Milwaukee Bucks All-Star forward Khris Middleton is declining his $13M player option and will become an unrestricted free agent, his agent, Mike Lindeman of Excel Sports, tells ESPN. Middleton and Bucks are planning to work together toward a new long-term deal, sources said.
ESPN story with @BobbyMarks42 on the Lakers scrambling to expand the Anthony Davis trade to create cap space and their pursuit of second-round picks.
Lakers are aggressively pursuing the purchase of second-round picks in Thursday's NBA Draft too, league sources tell ESPN. Those picks will offer two important things for LA: acquisition of inexpensive labor and ability to exceed the salary cap with those minimum contracts.
Lakers are trying to expand Anthony Davis trade and create ability to open max salary slot on July 6, sources tell @BobbyMarks42 and me. Lakers offering contracts of Mo Wagner/Jemerrio Jones/Isaac Bonga to additional teams, so LA can satisfy CBA rules on creating $32M in space.
Boston and Al Horford had discussed contract scenarios, but the gulf is too great for sides to believe they can close on a new deal now, league sources tell ESPN. Horford is prepared to enter the free agency to find a three or four year deal elsewhere.
“This guy’s a top-five talent. No doubt about it.  He handles like a guard. He can shoot it off the dribble. The only other guy I can think of that when they’re at their best offers that blend of skills at 7-3 is Porzingis. ... He’s the most polarizing guy in this draft.”
“Can his type of player make it through an 82-game season? Weighed in at 208 pounds at the combine, coming off of the foot injury, the reality of being 7-foot-3 in today’s NBA. How many minutes can you play?” - @Mike_Schmitz on Bol Bol Woj Pod:
Great visit with ESPN's @Mike_Schmitz ahead of Thursday's NBA Draft: Zion, Pelicans leverage at No. 4, Ball and Ingram future, Garland vs. Morant, how Africa will impact the future talent base of the NBA, and much more. The Woj Pod:
ESPN story on Sacramento Kings forward Harrison Barnes entering free agency, per agent Jeff Schwartz of @excelsm:
Sacramento Kings forward Harrison Barnes is declining his $25.1M player option and becoming an unrestricted free agent, his agent, Jeff Schwartz of Excel Sports, tells ESPN. Barnes, 27, and Kings are open to exploring a new deal together this summer, sources said.
ESPN story on Celtics All-Star center Al Horford joining free agency -- with an intention to work toward a new deal with Boston.
Boston Celtics center Al Horford will not exercise the $30.1M option on his 2019-20 contract and become an unrestricted free agent, league sources tell ESPN. Horford and the Celtics both have interest in working toward a new deal in July, sources tell ESPN.
David Griffin has believed Alvin Gentry’s style of play fits the personnel he’s assembling with Pels — and now commits to another year on his coach’s contract.
I’ll be doing a live Q&amp;A and meet-and-greet post-NBA Draft on Friday at @tissot NYC boutique on 34th Street. Stop by and say hello. #ThisIsYourTime #AD.
After Brooklyn declines to make a qualifying offer, F Rondae Hollis-Jefferson will become an unrestricted free agent, league sources tell ESPN. Hollis-Jefferson, 24, defends multiple positions well. For now, Nets have $46M in cap space.
If Pelicans and Lakers waited until July 30 to complete trade, Lakers could’ve had $32.5M in cap space --- enough to pursue a max level free agent. By waiting 30 days, Lakers would be acting like a team over the cap and thus allowed to use 4th overall pick in draft as salary.
For now, expectation is Anthony Davis trade will be completed on July 6, league sources tell @BobbyMarks42 and me. Assuming Davis declines to void $4M trade bonus, this leaves Lakers with $23.7M in space. There is chance that could be amended to July 30, but it’s still 6th now.
Here we go.
ESPN story on the Lakers landing All-NBA star Anthony Davis --- for a steep price to the Pelicans.
Teams are already expressing significant interest in the No. 4 overall pick belonging now to the Pelicans, league sources tell ESPN. Talks are expected to continue over the next few days. This deal could get even bigger for the Pelicans.
Monster haul for David Griffin and the Pelicans. They maximized the AD trade without needing a third team. History of Griffin deals typically include strong pick protections, which could made trade even better. And now, LeBron gets his second star in LA. Here we go.
The Pelicans have agreed to a deal to trade Anthony Davis to the Lakers for Lonzo Ball, Brandon Ingram, Josh Hart, and three first-round picks  including the No. 4 overall in 2019 Draft, league sources tell ESPN.
Even if Warriors are able to keep Klay Thompson and Kevin Durant in free agency, it'll be a fight to reach playoffs in the Western Conference. Thompson's ACL rehab could take him into February or March -- and Durant likely misses entire season. Devastating turn of events.
Golden State’s Klay Thompson has suffered a torn ACL in his left knee, his agent Greg Lawrence tells ESPN.
ESPN Sources: The Washington Wizards are preparing to make a prolific offer to Toronto's championship architect Masai Ujiri -- as much as $10M annually -- to run its basketball operations.
The Sacramento Kings are hiring former Suns coach Igor Kokoskov as an assistant coach, league source tells ESPN.
Here's a link to the lawsuit Zion Williamson and his attorney filed today in North Carolina federal court:
Jeffrey S. Klein, an attorney for Williamson, told ESPN in a statement: "Prime Sports Marketing's actions towards Mr. Williamson blatantly violated the North Carolina statute specifically designed to protect student athletes..."
Zion Williamson is suing to enforce his termination of an agreement he signed with a Florida marketing company, maintaining their deal was unlawful under North Carolina law. Story on ESPN:
ESPN story on Memphis center Jonas Valanciunas declining $17.6M option to become free agent; intent is to negotiate new multi-year deal with Grizzlies.
Sources: Memphis center Jonas Valanciunas plans to decline the $17.6M option on 2019-20 contract, clearing way to become a free agent. His primary intention will be to negotiate a new deal with Memphis, where he averaged 19.9 PPG and 10.7 RPG after February trade from Toronto.
ESPN story on Kyrie Irving changing representation on the cusp of free agency.
Boston's Kyrie Irving is expected to partner with ROC Nation Sports for representation, league sources tell ESPN.
Within weeks of free agency, Boston Celtics star Kyrie Irving and his longtime agent Jeff Wechsler have parted ways, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on the Celtics and Lakers trade pursuit of New Orleans star Anthony Davis.
To be clear, of course: The Celtics and Lakers are trying to negotiate independent deals with New Orleans for Anthony Davis. There's no spirit of cooperation here. The Lakers No. 4 pick would be used to acquire Davis in a multi-team deal that does NOT include Boston.
So far, Boston has been undeterred in pursuing Davis -- despite his agent insisting AD would be a 2020 flight risk in free agency. For Boston, Davis could still be its best case to keep Kyrie Irving. Story soon on
Kevin Durant announcing he ruptured Achilles and underwent surgery today:
Celtics and Lakers are engaged in trade talks with New Orleans on All-NBA star Anthony Davis, league sources tell me, @ZachLowe_NBA, @ramonashelburne and @WindhorstESPN. Lakers No. 4 pick has been discussed as trade chip to help Pels acquire high-level player in multi-team deals.
ESPN story on a historic first in the NBA: The Cavaliers are hiring one of the top coaches in women's college basketball -- Cal's Lindsay Gottlieb -- to their coaching staff.
Gottlieb  a Final Four and seven-time NCAA Tournament head coach for Cal  is the first women’s collegiate head coach recruited to an NBA coaching staff.
In a landmark appointment for the NBA, the Cleveland Cavaliers are hiring University of California-Berkeley women’s head coach Lindsay Gottlieb to be an assistant coach on John Beilein’s staff, league sources tell ESPN.
Charlotte’s Marvin Williams has exercised his $15M player option for the 2019-2020 season, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Memphis hiring Taylor Jenkins as coach.
Jenkins is third NBA head coach to come directly off of Mike Budenholzer’s coaching staff, including Utah’s Quin Snyder and Brooklyn’s Kenny Atkinson.
The Memphis Grizzlies are hiring Milwaukee Bucks assistant Taylor Jenkins as the franchise’s next head coach, league sources tell ESPN.
Golden State's Kevin Durant plans to play in Game 5 tonight, league source tells ESPN.
“He’s proven that he can find players undrafted in VanVleet ... in the second round, Norman Powell ... in the late-20s like Pascal Siakam. This roster has not been built through bottoming out with top 5 picks.” - @BobbyMarks42 on Masai Ujiri Woj Pod:
ESPN Sources: New Orleans EVP of Basketball Operations David Griffin has started to provide Anthony Davis' trade suitors with the framework of the package he's seeking in a deal ---- which is likely to need multiple teams to complete. Story:
ESPN’s Bobby Marks: Golden State-Toronto Game 5 Kevin Durant’s imminent return Kawhi Leonard genius talent Warriors/Raptors future Masai Ujiri’s team building The Woj Pod:
The New Orleans Pelicans are hiring former UConn and WNBA star Swin Cash to a senior front office role, reports @ZachLowe_NBA:
ESPN story on Bucks GM Jon Horst signing a contract extension.
Milwaukee Bucks general manager Jon Horst  an NBA executive of the year candidate  has signed a three-year contract extension, league sources tell ESPN.
Minnesota is hiring Brooklyn’s player development coach Pablo Prigioni as an assistant coach, league sources tell ESPN. Prigioni has common Rockets history with Minnesota President Gersson Rosas. He’ll focus on offensive end under coach Ryan Saunders.
Expect Will Hardy, one of the league's impressive young coaches, to take on a more prominent role on the Spurs coaching staff with Udoka's departure.
After seven years under Gregg Popovich, Spurs assistant Ime Udoka has agreed to become Brett Brown’s lead assistant with the 76ers, league sources tell ESPN. Brown reaches back to his Spurs roots on a strong replacement for Monty Williams.
ESPN story on Brooklyn's daring trade of two first-round picks to clear double max-salary slots for free agency. Kyrie Irving is absolutely serious about the Nets, per sources. Free agency is on.
Atlanta had been motivated to keep No. 8 and use 10 to trade back for a future asset, league sources tell ESPN. Now, Nos. 8, 10, 17, 35, 41 and 44 give the Hawks the flexibility to move up -- perhaps as high as Cleveland's pick at No. 5. Hawks GM Travis Schlenk has options.
Atlanta has three picks now (8, 10 and 17) in the top 20 of the 2019 NBA Draft.
Kyrie Irving is serious about the Nets -- and the Nets are serious about beating the Knicks -- and rest of league -- to the biggest free agents in the marketplace, per league sources.
Nets 2020 first-round pick to the Hawks is protected 1-14, league source tells ESPN.
Brooklyn is clearing $18M in additional salary cap space for July, which gives the Nets $46M in salary cap space to sign a max free agent and even retain restricted free agent D'Angelo Russell. Without Russell, the Nets have two max salary slots.
Brooklyn is trading Allen Crabbe and No. 17 pick in 2019 NBA Draft and protected first in 2020 to Atlanta for Taurean Prince and 2021 second-round pick, league sources tell ESPN.
Sources: Minnesota is hiring Portland assistant David Vanterpool as associate head coach. He’ll run defense and play key role in support of Ryan Saunders. Vanterpool spent seven years with Blazers, playing a prominent part in growth of Damian Lillard and CJ McCollum.
Sacramento Kings forward Harrison Barnes will participate in USA Basketball’s August training camp ahead of the FIBA World Cup in China, league sources tell ESPN.
Reporting with @ramonashelburne: Golden State officials prefer Klay Thompson sit out Game 3 to protect his sore hamstring for the rest of NBA Finals, but Thompson has continued to lobby them on playing tonight. Decision looms prior to tip.
San Antonio's LaMarcus Aldridge and Detroit's Andre Drummond will participate in the Team USA training camp in August, league sources tell ESPN. Team USA is putting together a roster for the FIBA World Cup in China in September.
Milwaukee Bucks forward Khris Middleton has accepted an invitation to the 18-man Team USA training camp in August, league source tells ESPN. Team USA is fielding a roster to bring to the FIBA World Cup in China in September.
ESPN story on USA Basketball and Gregg Popovich's training camp roster for September's FIBA World Cup in China.
Two more tough-minded, veteran players discussed as Team USA training camp possibilities for the FIBA World Cup roster, per sources: Houston's PJ Tucker and Denver's Paul Millsap.
As NY Times reported, Anthony Davis, Kemba Walker, Donovan Mitchell and James Harden also planning to play for Team USA.
ESPN Sources: Among additional players expected to join USA Basketball’s training camp in August on way to a roster spot in September’s FIBA World Cup in China: Bradley Beal, Eric Gordon, Kyle Kuzma, Damian Lillard, Brook Lopez, Kevin Love, CJ McCollum and Jayson Tatum.
ESPN story on the Lakers hiring Lionel Hollins as an assistant coach.
The Lakers are hiring Lionel Hollins as an assistant coach, league sources tell ESPN. Hollins is the all-time winningest coach in Memphis and also led Brooklyn to the playoffs. Hollins joins Jason Kidd on Frank Vogel’s new staff.
Avery Johnson is interviewing for a job on Brett Brown's staff with the 76ers, league sources tell ESPN. Johnson has previously been a head coach with Alabama, the Nets and Mavericks.
Further detail on Looney injury, per sources: non-displaced first costal cartilage fracture. There could be more evaluation, but there isn't great optimism on a return this season. DeMarcus Cousins' emergence in Game 2 looms even bigger for the Warriors.
Former Rockets assistant Roy Rogers has agreed to a three-year deal to join the Chicago Bulls an assistant coach, league source tells ESPN.
Duke forward RJ Barrett  the presumptive No. 3 pick in the NBA Draft  will make a visit to the New York Knicks early next week for meetings, medical evaluation and light court work, league sources tell ESPN. The Knicks are selecting third in this month's draft.
ESPN story on prized point guard prospect Ja Morant undergoing minor knee procedure.
ESPN Sources: Point guard Ja Morant — the projected No. 2 pick in the June NBA Draft — will undergo a minor scope on his right knee to remove a “loose body” on Monday. He’s expected to be fully recovered in 3-to-4 weeks.
ESPN story on Mike D’Antoni ending extension talks with Rockets.
Houston Rockets coach Mike D’Antoni has ended talks with management on a contract extension, league sources tell ESPN. D’Antoni plans to complete the final season of his deal in 2019-20. Story soon on ESPN.
CAA agent Austin Brown and Lisa Joseph-Metelus will represent Zion Williamson, per sources.
Kentucky F EJ Montgomery will pull out of the 2019 NBA Draft and return to school for his sophomore season, source tells ESPN.
ESPN story on Anthony Davis and Pelicans EVP David Griffin meeting today in Los Angeles.
Florida freshman guard @AndrewNembhard is pulling his name out of the 2019 NBA Draft and returning to school for his sophomore season, sources tell ESPN.
New Orleans star Anthony Davis and Pels EVP David Griffin met this morning in Los Angeles and are expected to continue a dialogue moving forward, league sources tell ESPN. Griffin is making his case to AD on a future with the Pelicans. Davis can be a free agent next summer.
"Isaiah gets someone a lob. We go back down, don’t score and I look over at Brad and he goes Again.’ I'm like 'Oh my goodness gracious.' And Isaiah scores again. I think I got subbed out after that and I was like Welcome to the NBA.’" Woj Pod:
.@TJMcConnell on his NBA debut against the Celtics: "It was one of the most embarassing moments of my life. ... They called a play as soon as I checked in and @isaiahthomas came off, scored. Boston brings the ball back down, I look over at Brad Stevens and he goes Again.’"
ESPN story on Rockets making entire roster and future picks available in trade talks.
Sources: In calls to front offices, Houston GM Daryl Morey is showing an aggressive desire to improve roster with all players and picks available in talks. Hard to imagine James Harden scenario, but the rest under contract - perhaps even Chris Paul - could be moved in right deal.
Team has announced now. Birdsong joins Hawks executive Jeff Peterson as new assistant GMs under Sean Marks.
Spurs executive Andy Birdsong has agreed to become an assistant GM with Nets, league source tells ESPN.
Cleveland Cavaliers owner Dan Gilbert was admitted to a Detroit-area hospital this morning after experiencing stroke-like symptoms, a Quicken Loans company spokesman said. “He received immediate medical attention and is currently recovering comfortably,” the statement said.
Budenholzer has started to build an impressive coaching tree, including Quin Snyder (Jazz) and Kenny Atkinson (Nets).
Milwaukee assistant Taylor Jenkins interviewed for the Memphis Grizzlies coaching job, league sources tell ESPN. Jenkins has been on Mike Budenholzer’s staff with Bucks and Hawks and served as a Spurs G League head coach.
“We are building trust right now. All you can do in any relationship is build equity. At some point, I’m going to have to pull from that equity.” - Monty Williams on working with Suns owner Robert Sarver Woj Pod:
ESPN story on Neil Olshey’s extension with the Blazers.
After consecutive seasons as the third seed in the Western Conference playoffs, the Blazers advanced to the WCF for the first time in 19 years this season. Portland has reached playoffs six straight times.
Portland Trail Blazers President of Basketball Operations Neil Olshey has agreed to a contract extension through 2024, league sources tell ESPN.
Phoenix Suns coach Monty Williams joins The Woj Pod
"We can share the basketball. We can defend and have a high care factor. Those are the things that build culture. Some families don’t have that." - Monty Williams Woj Pod:
“I’m big on culture. The word family is used a lot. I don’t know why we use that in sports because we’re not family. But we can have a great culture. We can show up on time. We can work hard." - Suns coach Monty Williams Woj Pod:
Suns coach Monty Williams: The job, the challenge and his comeback from personal tragedy. “If I didn’t get help, it was not only going to hurt me -- it was going to hurt my kids. I’m not ashamed to tell people that I was broken." The Woj Pod:
NBA All-Rookie teams
The Memphis Grizzlies recently interviewed Toronto Raptors assistant Adrian Griffin for the franchise’s head coaching job, league sources tell ESPN.
Memphis has been granted permission to interview Portland assistant Nate Tibbetts for franchise’s head coaching job, league sources tell ESPN.
"The lifeblood of the U.S. is an immigrant community which makes it the greatest country in this world. I take that responsibility incredibly personal." - @GerssonRosas on being a trailblazer for the Latin community in the NBA Woj Pod:
"In a day and time when many of those individual are looked down upon, there’s so much hope. There’s so much fight. There’s so much belief in this country because of the opportunities that are given and because of what it means to be an American." - @GerssonRosas
ESPN story on Denver’s Tim Connelly turning down an offer to run the Washington Wizards.
Washington’s search is expected to turn back toward the finalists, including OKC’s Troy Weaver, Danny Ferry and interim GM Tommy Sheppard.
Connelly had been impressed with Leonsis’ vision for franchise, but Denver’s Josh Kroenke made an aggressive case to keep Connelly once Wizards extended an offer over weekend, per sources. Major coup for Denver.
Denver Nuggets President of Basketball Operations Tim Connelly is remaining with the franchise, league sources tell ESPN. Connelly met with Washington owner Ted Leonsis on Friday about running the Wizards.
Minnesota is hiring Brooklyn’s Gianluca Pascucci has an assistant GM, league sources tell ESPN. Pascucci was the Nets Director of Global Scouting and had previously worked closely with new Timberwolves President Gersson Rosas with Houston.
Deal is expected to be completed soon, sources tell ESPN. Saunders is working on a staff. Gersson Rosas met with candidates at Draft Combine but search turned back to Saunders, the interim coach.
Ryan Saunders and Minnesota are nearing agreement on a multi-year deal to make him the Timberwolves coach, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Houston and Mike D'Antoni beginning extension talks. “I’ve let Rockets know that I’m energized to keep coaching --- and believe that I can continue to do this at a high-level for at least another three years," D'Antoni, 68, tells ESPN.
Bickerstaff had talked with Sixers, Celtics, Lakers and Kings about lead assistant roles, but Beilein and GM Koby Altman helped convince him to play a central role in helping ex-Michigan coach transition to NBA. Bickerstaff was HC with Grizzlies and Rockets.
Cleveland has hired JB Bickerstaff as associate head coach, league sources tell ESPN. Bickerstaff was a target of several teams, but Cavs were determined to pair him with John Beilein and made him one of league’s top paid assistants.
“We’ve got a great foundation piece in Karl-Anthony Towns. My job is really to do everything possible from every perspective to maximize not only his talent but his career on the court and off the court.” - Timberwolves President @GerssonRosas Woj Pod:
New Minnesota President @GerssonRosas joins The Woj Pod: Timberwolves reset, KAT, Rockets years, including Harden trade/Yao/Morey/JVG, his immigrant journey from Colombia, the privilege and responsibility as NBA's first Latin top basketball executive.
Coming up on ESPN2: Four hours of NBA Draft Combine coverage with @MariaTaylor, @JayBilas, @Mike_Schmitz and @BobbyMarks42. GM’s, coaches, prospects and games.
Guard Jalen Lecque of Brewster Academy (NH) has decided against playing today at the NBA Combine based on feedback to his family, per source. Lecque’s athleticism was certainly evident for NBA executives on Thursday.
Connelly has a core of talent set for years in Denver and a close relationship with President/Governor Josh Kroenke. It’ll take an aggressive Wizards offer and strong connection with Ted Leonsis to get him to seriously consider jump to Washington.
ESPN story on the Washington Wizards looming meeting with Denver's Tim Connelly to discuss franchise's President of Basketball Operations job --- and the hometown ties that inspire Connelly's willingness to listen.
Denver ownership’s willingness to allow its Executive of the Year candidate to meet with Wizards is based on Connelly’s Maryland-roots and extenuating family considerations  plus confidence in Nuggets GM Arturas Karnisovas to assume full leadership if necessary, per sources.
The Washington Wizards have been granted permission to discuss franchise’s President of Basketball Operations job with Denver Nuggets President Tim Connelly, league sources tell ESPN. Meeting is expected this week.
About to start four hours of NBA Draft Combine coverage at 3 PM ET on ESPN2 with @MariaTaylor, @JayBilas, @BobbyMarks42 and @Mike_Schmitz. Lottery picks, GM’s and coaches on set. First hour includes Ja Morant, John Beilein and Neil Olshey.
Murray State PG Ja Morant met Wednesday with the top three teams in next month’s NBA Draft — New Orleans, Memphis and New York, league sources tell ESPN. Grizzlies are focused on Morant at No. 2.
Only one way to end the night — with @notthefakeSVP
ESPN Sources: New Minnesota president Gersson Rosas plans to interview candidates for franchise's coaching job, including Miami assistant Juwan Howard and Portland's David Vanterpool. Ryan Saunders remains a prominent candidate in process. Story:
ESPN story on Brett Brown returning as Sixers coach --- and starting work on next season.
Brett Brown will return as the Philadelphia 76ers coach next season, managing partner Josh Harris told ESPN on Monday night. Harris, Brown and GM Elton Brand met today to discuss offseason priorities, including draft and free agency.
Cavs coach John Beilein and JB Bickerstaff expected to soon discuss possibility of an associate head coaching role, sources tell ESPN. Bickerstaff interviewed for Cavs and Lakers openings. He remains a sought-after top assistant on market. Beilein wants an experienced NBA staff.
ESPN story on the Cleveland Cavaliers agreeing with Michigan's John Beilein to a five-year contract to become franchise's new coach.
Talks escalated over the weekend, with a deal reached on Sunday, league sources tell ESPN. Beilein informed his administration on Monday morning of his decision to make leap to NBA, and is telling his players now.
Michigan’s John Beilein has agreed to a five-year deal to become coach of the Cleveland Cavaliers, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on the Lakers hiring of Frank Vogel as coach -- with Jason Kidd on his staff.
Under Vogel, the Lakers are unlikely to distinguish between a top assistant and the rest of the coaches. One Lakers source described it as "the Phil Jackson model" of assembling a staff. The influence of Jackson and Kurt Rambis weighs heavily in the Vogel hiring.
Frank Vogel's contract with the Lakers, per sources: Three years.
Jason Kidd has agreed to join Vogel's Lakers staff in a prominent assistant coaching role, league sources tell ESPN.
Frank Vogel has agreed to a deal to become the next coach of the Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on the Cavaliers GM Koby Altman interviewing head coaching candidates in Denver today ahead of Blazers-Nuggets Game 7.
Frank Vogel has emerged as the frontrunner to be offered the Lakers coaching job. ESPN story with @NotoriousOHM:
As the Lakers head coaching search has become focused on Frank Vogel, Jason Kidd remains a strong candidate to play a prominent role as an assistant coach, league sources tell ESPN.
Orlando assistant Steve Hetzel interviewed for the Cleveland coaching job today, league sources tell ESPN. Hetzel has been with Steve Clifford in Charlotte and Orlando, but initially worked for Cavs as a video coordinator and G League head coach.
ESPN story with @NotoriousOHM on Frank Vogel’s emerging candidacy to become the Lakers next coach.
Before Phil Jackson hired Jeff Hornacek with New York, Vogel had been a favorite of Jackson’s in that coaching search.
ESPN reporting with @NotoriousOHM: Former Orlando and Indiana coach Frank Vogel made a strong impression on Lakers in his interview and sides are expected to talk again on head coaching job. Story soon.
“What are we doing now? Are we giving teams a two-year window and then if it doesn’t work you’re going to blow it up?” - @ryenarussillo After a first-round loss last year, Portland stuck with @Dame_Lillard, @CJMcCollum and Terry Stotts. Woj Pod:
ESPN's @ryenarussillo on The Woj Pod: NBA Playoffs, Game 7's, rebuilds vs. rebooting, NBA Draft, free agency and the looming return of the @notthefakeSVP/@ryenarussillo show.
ESPN Sources: The Utah Jazz are elevating general manager Dennis Lindsey to Executive VP of Basketball Operations and making Justin Zanik the franchise’s new GM. Zanik has been Utah's assistant GM for five years. Story:
Warriors will have to find a way to beat Houston in Western Conference semifinals, but Kevin Durant could be back for the Western Finals.
Golden State’s Kevin Durant has suffered a mild strain on his right calf and expected to be re-evaluated next week, league source tells ESPN.
Early indications on Kevin Durant's lower leg, league source tells ESPN: It doesn't appear to be an Achilles injury.
Lakers advisor Kurt Rambis is playing a major role in the franchise's coaching search, league sources tell ESPN. He's emerging as a powerful voice in basketball operations.
After Monty Williams and Ty Lue passed on the Lakers job, franchise will continue search for its next head coach.
ESPN story on Lakers, Ty Lue talks ending without a deal to make him the franchise's coach.
Bulls coach Jim Boylen is hiring Nets assistant Chris Fleming to serve as his top assistant coach, league sources tell ESPN.
Discussions have included talks on contract and assistant coaching staff, sources said. Among Lakers hopes on a Lue staff: Jason Kidd. He made a strong impression with management in his head coaching interview and had a productive history w/ Bucks developing young talent.
Negotiations between the Los Angeles Lakers and Ty Lue have reached an impasse without a deal to make him the franchise’s next head coach, league sources tell ESPN.
Story includes details on further procedures with George and Westbrook, including George's labrum in left shoulder and 'proactive maintenance' on Westbrook's right knee.
ESPN Sources w/ @RoyceYoung: OKC’s Paul George underwent rotator cuff surgery to repair right shoulder tendon and minimally will miss start of training camp. Also, Russell Westbrook had procedure to repair torn ligament in finger on his left hand. Story:
"He might not bring that but guess what: I imagine if you talk to all the guys in that locker room, do they feel confident going into a must-win game with Kawhi Leonard as their teammate? They have to because they just know he’s going to perform." - @mcten
"You might not see the traditional leadership qualities out of him that we’ve been accustomed to seeing out of NBA superstars. You want to see the grit or playing to the crowd or all these things, the pageantry if you will." - @mcten on Kawhi Leonard Pod:
ESPN's Dave McMenamin (@mcten) on Kawhi Leonard's dominant postseason, Raps/Sixers, Ty Lue/LeBron/Lakers and much more. Woj Pod:
Raptors list Pascal Siakam as doubtful for Game 4 with right calf contusion.
San Antonio Spurs assistant Ime Udoka will interview for the Cleveland Cavaliers head coaching job this weekend, league sources tell ESPN.
Harkless tested his right ankle sprain in warmups and determined himself ready to go against the Nuggets.
Portland's Mo Harkless is available to play Game 3 tonight, league source tells ESPN.
ESPN story with @malika_andrews on Bulls extending the contract of coach Jim Boylen.
Bulls ownership and management consider Boylen the teacher the franchise needs now with a young roster, and loved the way he's been able to build relationships with players along with holding them accountable and coaching them hard.
Jim Boylen has agreed to a multi-year contract extension with the Chicago Bulls, league sources tell ESPN.
The Lakers are proceeding toward an offer to Ty Lue in the coming days, and have no plans to introduce new candidates into the head coaching search process, league sources tell @ramonashelburne and me.
New Suns coach Monty Williams will stay with Sixers until the end of the playoff run, league sources tell ESPN.
The expectation is the Lakers will move toward Ty Lue as head coach, but there's been no offer made to him yet, league sources tell ESPN.
Monty Williams is finalizing a deal to become Phoenix’s coach, league sources tell ESPN.
Brooklyn Nets guard Allen Crabbe has exercised his $18.5M player option for the 2019-20 season, league sources tell ESPN.
Cleveland has been granted permission to interview Denver assistant Wes Unseld Jr., for franchise's head coaching job, league sources tell ESPN.
Sources: Phoenix owner Robert Sarver met with Sixers assistant Monty Williams in Philadelphia on Wednesday night. Williams remains Suns top target to hire as head coach, but no offer has been yet extended. Williams remains in talks for Lakers job, vying with Ty Lue.
ESPN story with @WindhorstESPN: As the Memphis Grizzlies dig into a coaching search, a candidate of significant interest: Lithuania’s Sarunas Jasikevicius, a EuroLeague rising star.
Houston GM Daryl Morey on Minnesota hiring Gersson Rosas as President of Basketball Operations: “He’s more than earned his shot, although I wish he would’ve gone East. We’re going to have an extremely tough competitor in the West." ESPN story:
Rosas met with owner Glen Taylor today, his second interview with the Timberwolves.
The Minnesota Timberwolves are hiring Houston’s Gersson Rosas as the franchise’s next President of Basketball Operations, league sources tell ESPN.
Besides Danny Ferry and Houston’s Gersson Rosas, OKC Thunder VP of Basketball Operations Troy Weaver interviewed for the Washington Wizards GM job today, league sources tell ESPN. Weaver is a DC native. Interim GM Tommy Sheppard is also under consideration for permanent role.
A Popovich extension has been a foregone conclusion for months, but a new deal doesn't change the fact that he'll continue to take his coaching future on a year-to-year basis. Spurs ownership believes he’s entitled to manage his future how he wishes.
Sources: Once Gregg Popovich formally commits to his 24th season as San Antonio Spurs coach, he's expected to sign a three-year contract that will keep him as the NBA's highest paid coach. Story on ESPN.
Redden staying w/ owner Steve Ballmer/President Lawrence Frank comes after GM Michael Winger turned down a chance to interview for Minnesota's President of Basketball Operations job. Clippers are operating like a big market, destination franchise -- and those are hard to leave.
Sources: After meeting with New Orleans' top executive David Griffin about a high-ranking front office job, assistant GM Trent Redden will stay with Clippers. Redden has great belief in Griffin, but is still too connected to LAC group and the unfinished business remaining there.
Chauncey Billups will be Minnesota’s final interview on Monday in search for a new President of Basketball Operations, league sources tell ESPN. Denver’s Calvin Booth, Brooklyn’s Trajan Langdon and Houston’s Gersson Rosas have already met with team officials.
There’s optimism that Thompson will play Game 1 but bigger question is whether there will be limitations on his mobility, sources tell ESPN.
An MRI on the right ankle of Golden State’s Klay Thompson returned clean on Saturday night, league sources tell ESPN. His status for Game 1 will be clearer after a pregame workout.
The Los Angeles Sparks have acquired Connecticut All-Star and ESPN analyst Chiney Ogwumike for a 2020 first-round pick, sources say. Chiney reunites with her sister, Nneka, the 2016 WNBA MVP. (However, @Chiney321’s no-trade clause with ESPN remains).
Rising Brooklyn star @CarisLeVert on Nets/Sixers, playing for John Beilein at Michigan, working out with Kevin Durant, returning from his ankle injury and more. Woj Pod:
ESPN story on Suns coaching search.
After a head coaching interview with Sixers assistant Monty Williams tonight in Toronto, Suns officials are flying to Portland to meet Blazers assistants David Vanterpool and Nate Tibbetts on Saturday, league sources tell ESPN.
Wasserman agents Thad Foucher and Joe Smith have a 2019 NBA Draft class that includes: Virginia’s De’Andre Hunter, Virginia Tech’s Nickeil Alexander-Walker, UCLA’s Kris Wilkes, Wake Forest’s Jaylen Hoard, Tennessee’s Jordan Bone and Utah’s Sedrick Barefield.
Jerry West on Hondo: “Playing in Boston, with so many great teams and so much success winning titles, the legend of John grew. He improved a lot through his career. It was a sign of how hard he worked at his game. Toward the end of his career, he became a terrific scorer.”
Just spoke with Jerry West on the passing of John Havlicek. "The thing with John, he competed against you at the highest level and he wanted to win badly," West tells ESPN. "But he was always a really nice person. I don’t think that I ever heard anyone say a bad word about John."
ESPN story on Phoenix's pursuit of Sixers assistant Monty Williams advancing with a Friday meeting in Canada.
Phoenix Suns officials will travel to Toronto to meet with the franchise’s top coaching candidate, Philadelphia assistant Monty Williams, on Friday, league sources tell ESPN. The Sixers play the Raptors in an Eastern Conference semifinal Game 1 on Saturday.
Phoenix’s permission to speak to Sixers assistant Monty Williams was granted Tuesday. He’s focus of team’s search, but both Portland assistants have moved into position to be serious candidates for available head coaching jobs.
Phoenix has received permission to interview Portland assistants Nate Tibbetts and David Vanterpool for franchise’s head coaching job, league sources tell ESPN.
Cleveland has received permission to interview Portland assistants Nate Tibbetts and David Vanterpool for franchise's head coaching job, league sources tell ESPN.
Monty Williams is Phoenix's top target in coaching search, league sources tell ESPN.
The Sixers have granted permission to the Suns to meet with assistant coach Monty Williams about coaching job, league source tells ESPN.
ESPN story on Suns firing coach Igor Kokoskov --- and preparing to challenge Lakers in pursuit of Monty Williams.
Here's a factor in the timing of Kokoskov's dismissal: The Suns are planning to target Philadelphia 76ers assistant Monty Williams, league sources tell ESPN. Lakers are planning a second interview with Williams soon, sources said.
Suns had planned to bring Kokoskov back for a second season, especially after the team's stronger play in late stages of the season. Kokoskov has been a well-respected tactician who becomes another victim of the constant turnover in Phoenix.
Phoenix has fired coach Igor Kokoskov, league sources tell ESPN.
NBA has fined Nets owner $35K for this tweet.
Atlanta Hawks coach Lloyd Pierce has joined Gregg Popovich's USA National team staff. Steve Kerr and Jay Wright are also assistant coaches on Team USA.
Sources: Nets and GM Sean Marks were livid over belief Embiid’s flagrant 1 fouls in Games 2/4 should’ve been deemed a 2. More than message to league with ref challenge, Marks intended to message his team on how franchise is determined to support way they're competing in series.
The Woj Report on ESPN’s YouTube page: Lakers coaching search, DeMarcus Cousins, Portland’s staying power and David Griffin’s arrival with Pelicans.
ESPN story with @mcten on next steps for Ty Lue and Monty Williams in Lakers coaching search -- plus plans to meet with Juwan Howard on Tuesday.
ESPN reporting with @McTen: Ty Lue’s meeting w/ Lakers GM Rob Pelinka today was similar to Monty Williams’ earlier in week: Get to know each other, setting up second interviews focused more on specifics. Lakers plan to bring back both coaches for sit-downs including Jeanie Buss.
Brooklyn Nets assistant GM Trajan Langdon will interview for the President of Basketball Operations job with the Minnesota Timberwolves, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Ty Lue meeting with Lakers GM Rob Pelinka today in SoCal --- and an expectation that Monty Williams and Lakers will talk again.
Lakers GM Rob Pelinka is meeting with coaching candidate Ty Lue today, league sources tell ESPN.
New Pelicans Exec. VP of Basketball Operations David Griffin and Redden worked together in Cleveland.
ESPN story on New Orleans getting permission to discuss a senior front office role with Clippers assistant GM Trent Redden.
Cho was a GM with Charlotte and Portland and Grunwald with New York and Toronto. Zach Kleiman was recently promoted to Executive VP of Basketball Operations and leading the day-to-day for Grizzlies.
Memphis Grizzlies are adding two former GM’s to front office, hiring Rich Cho as VP of Basketball Strategy and Glen Grunwald as Senior Advisor, league sources tell ESPN. Memphis expected to make more additions in front office this offseason.
Moser is informing his team now that he turned down St. John's, source tells ESPN.
Loyola-Chicago coach Porter Moser has turned down a St. John's offer, sources tell ESPN. Moser will remain with the Ramblers.
“Guys are not being their own men. The outside world distracts them. They are listening to whoever: their dad, their brothers, who know nothing about nothing. Sometimes you have to be your own man." - @KendrickPerkins Woj Pod:
ESPN story on Minnesota receiving permission to discuss President of Basketball Operations job with Clippers GM Michael Winger.
Minnesota owner Glen Taylor has targeted a short list of potential candidates to oversee the Timberwolves operations --- with Winger emerging among them, league sources tell ESPN.
The Minnesota Timberwolves have been granted permission to meet with Los Angeles Clippers general manager Michael Winger in the franchise’s search for a President of Basketball Operations, league sources told ESPN.
Pelicans will introduce new EVP of Basketball Operations David Griffin at a news conference on Wednesday.
Doctors are still determining severity of Cousins' quad tear, which will determine the length of the recovery process, league sources tell ESPN.
From overnight: Warriors fear Cousins has been lost for season.
ESPN story on Golden State fearing DeMarcus Cousins has suffered a season-ending quad tear.
There's significant concern that DeMarcus Cousins has suffered a torn left quad, but there won't be complete certainty until his MRI on Tuesday, league sources tell ESPN. The hope is that it's just a strain.
Warriors center DeMarcus Cousins will undergo an MRI on his quad tomorrow, league source tells ESPN.
Kendrick Perkins on The Woj Pod.
Fifty-five minutes of pure gold: @KendrickPerkins on The Woj Pod. Retirement. Coaching. Garnett. KD. Calipari's recruiting jet stocked with apple juice and M &amp; M's. Mostly, I just tried to get out of the way.
ESPN story on Lakers leadership traveling East to meet coaching candidate Monty Williams.
Lakers management plans to travel East to meet with Sixers assistant Monty Williams between Games 2 and 3 of playoff series with Brooklyn, league sources tell ESPN. Williams has emerged as a top candidate for Lakers coaching job.
Cavaliers expect to interview several assistants involved in playoffs, including Utah's Alex Jensen and Portland's David Vanterpool, sources tell ESPN. For now, they can do a round with non-playoff coaches.
ESPN Sources: Cleveland will begin conducting interviews in coaching search this week, including Miami assistant Juwan Howard and Dallas assistant Jamahl Mosley. Story:
Here’s The Woj &amp; Lowe Show playlist on the ESPN Youtube page:
The Woj &amp; Lowe Show, podcast edition: NBA playoffs, Lakers coaching search and more: Art19:
ESPN story on Lakers assistant Mark Madsen hired as new coach at Utah Valley in the WAC.
Los Angeles Lakers assistant Mark Madsen has been hired as the new men’s basketball coach at Utah Valley University, sources told ESPN.
ESPN story on Lakers receiving permission to meet with Sixers assistant Monty Williams to discuss coaching job.
In this circumstance, it is likely to start with a phone conversation and/or Lakers officials flying to meet with Williams. He wouldn’t be traveling to Los Angeles in the middle of a playoff series.
The Lakers have been granted permission to meet and discuss head coaching job with 76ers assistant Monty Williams, league sources tell ESPN.
Luke Walton and the Sacramento Kings are progressing rapidly on a deal to make him the franchise’s new coach, league sources tell ESPN. A formal announcement is expected as soon as this weekend.
Sacramento GM Vlade Divac is offering Luke Walton his franchise’s coaching job and there’s confidence on both sides that a deal can be reached quickly, league sources tell ESPN. Divac and Walton are meeting this weekend.
ESPN Sources: Toronto’s OG Anunoby could be lost until a potential berth in the Eastern Conference Finals.
ESPN Sources: Milwaukee Bucks coach Mike Budenholzer voted Michael H. Goldberg NBCA Coach of the Year.
ESPN Sources with @IanBegley: Thirty-four years ago, Dave DeBusschere famously pumped his fist upon winning the No. 1 pick to select Patrick Ewing. Next month, Patrick Ewing will represent New York at the Draft Lottery for a chance to get Zion.
Rio Grande Valley (Rockets) defeats the Long Island (Nets) 129-112 to win a decisive Game 3 in the G League Finals. RGV has won three G League titles now.
ESPN story on David Griffin agreeing to run the New Orleans Pelicans.
Likely title for David Griffin with the Pelicans, source says: Executive VP of Basketball Operations.
The Monty Williams candidacy is a serious one with the Lakers, league sources tell ESPN. He has history with LeBron James as a Team USA assistant and a successful run w/ Pelicans as a head coach. Ty Lue checks the boxes too: ex-Laker, championship coach, LeBron James-approved.
Pelicans and David Griffin have an agreement in principle, league sources tell ESPN. Griffin will take over the franchise and now oversee the trade process for Anthony Davis.
David Griffin is finalizing a deal to become the next President of Basketball Operations with the New Orleans Pelicans, league sources tell ESPN.
Ferry (cont). "...I am happy to stay on to help them continue with the transition and to consult the next head of basketball operations if so desired..."
Ferry: "I let the Pelicans know throughout the process that for a few reasons the timing wasn't right for my family to move full time to New Orleans. It's a great job and deserves a full time focus. I have had a great experience with the Pelicans..."
Danny Ferry has pulled out of the Pelicans GM process, he tells ESPN.
Sixers assistant Monty Williams joins Ty Lue as the central candidates in the Lakers search, league sources tell ESPN. Process is expected to center on them.
Ty Lue is a strong frontrunner for the Lakers coaching job, league sources tell ESPN.
Atlanta Hawks guard Kent Bazemore plans to exercise his $19.2M contract option for the 2019-20 season on Monday, agent @AustinGWalton tells ESPN.
Raptors guard @OAnunoby had an emergency appendectomy, team says.
Memphis G CJ Miles has opted into his $8.7M for the 2019-20 season, league sources tell ESPN.
Florida freshman Andrew Nembhard will enter the NBA Draft. He has until late May to withdraw and return to school.
The Woj Lowe Show, today at 3:30 PM ET on ESPN2.
Cleveland is expected to examine the college head coaching ranks too, sources said. Player development will likely be one of the premium factors in the hiring process.
Milwaukee Bucks assistant Darvin Ham is expected to be another assistant who'll start getting more attention for head coaching jobs, including with the Cavaliers, league sources said.
As expected, Cavaliers opening search for a new head coach. Cleveland plans to run a wide-ranging process, but expect experienced NBA assistants like Utah's Alex Jensen, Portland's David Vanterpool and Nate Tibbetts, Denver's Wes Unseld Jr., to be among multiple candidates.
ESPN story on organizational overhaul in Memphis, including dismissal of coach JB Bickerstaff and reassignment of GM Chris Wallace.
Grizzlies will start a search for a new head coach and pursue some more experienced personnel to join the front office, sources said. For now, though: Zleiman completes an ascent in front office to top basketball role, essentially replacing Wallace. Major changes for Memphis.
Sources: The Grizzlies are promoting Jason Wexler to President, overseeing both business and basketball -- and Zach Kleiman to Executive VP of Basketball Operations as the day-to-day lead on basketball matters.
The Grizzlies dismissed coach J.B. Bickerstaff and reassigned GM Chris Wallace to a scouting capacity in the front office, league sources tell ESPN. VP John Hollinger will also move into a senior advisory role.
Kings fired coach Dave Joerger, league source tells ESPN.
ESPN story on Vlade Divac's plans to fire Kings coach Dave Joerger today -- after franchise's best season in 13 years.
Joerger engineered the Kings most successful season since 2006, but Divac is consolidating power around himself. Philadelphia assistant Monty Williams has been a primary target for Kings management, sources said. He's expected to be a candidate for openings elsewhere this spring.
Kings GM Vlade Divac is planning to fire coach Dave Joerger in a face-to-face meeting today, league sources tell ESPN.
Vlade Divac is pushing to consolidate his power as Kings top basketball executive, seriously weighing dismissal of coach Dave Joerger, league sources tell ESPN. Divac/Joerger set for meeting today. Joerger led Kings young core to a 39 win season. He has a year left on deal.
Tough blow for the Celtics, who will miss Smart tremendously to start the postseason.
Marcus Smart has suffered a torn oblique on left side and could be sidelined for the first two rounds of the playoffs, league source tells ESPN.
Jeff Bower has agreed to a deal to become the Senior VP of Basketball Operations with the Phoenix Suns, league sources tell ESPN. Bower has been to the playoffs as a GM with Detroit and New Orleans.
Nets signed rookie Theo Pinson for the rest of season, league source tells ESPN. He was on a two-way contract.
ESPN story with @DraftExpress on renewed NBA/NBPA talks on lowering draft age and urgency to find resolution to keep 2022 as a target date.
Duke’s RJ Barrett has entered the NBA Draft.
ESPN story on the latest with Minnesota:
Minnesota is finalizing plans to keep GM Scott Layden and coach Ryan Saunders, league sources tell ESPN.
Luke Walton has two years left on his contract, but only next season is guaranteed, per source. Lakers hold option on 2020-21 season. Johnson planned to fire him, but stumbled into his own resignation on the way. Somehow, Walton survived Magic Johnson. He didn't see that coming.
Magic Johnson and Rob Pelinka visited with LeBron James and agent Rich Paul on Saturday, league sources tell ESPN. Johnson offered no indication that he was on the brink of bailing on the Lakers, sources said.
Lakers coaching staff fully expected to be fired in hours after the final game of the season. They had believed they were gone for months. Now? Magic quits in public, saying he's too scared to tell Jeanie Buss face-to-face. What an embarrassing episode for a historic franchise.
Since taking over as president of the Lakers, Magic Johnson never fully committed to the job. Often he was traveling and away from the team. His office hours were limited. He didn't do a lot of scouting. Running an NBA team takes a tremendous commitment of time and energy.
Clippers claim Miami forward Rodney McGruder off waivers, league source tells ESPN. He isn’t playoff eligible.
Memphis Grizzlies assistant Nick Van Exel has interest in the head coaching job at his alma mater, Cincinnati, sources tell ESPN. Jerry Stackhouse recently left Grizzlies staff for Vanderbilt job.
New Orleans interim GM Danny Ferry is meeting with franchise officials today about the permanent GM job, league sources tell ESPN. Ferry is the final interview among several candidates, including David Griffin, Larry Harris, Trajan Langdon, Gersson Rosas and Tommy Sheppard.
Even sweeter for Steve Clifford to clinch Orlando’s return to the playoffs in Boston tonight. He’s a Maine kid who once worked down the street at BU for Brett Brown’s dad, Bob. Few league coaches maximized their roster the way Clifford did this season.
Strained oblique for Boston’s Marcus Smart, league source tells ESPN. They’ll see how it responds in next 24-48 hours.
The Nets return to the playoffs, traveling a hard road.
The Clippers waiving of Luc Mbah A Moute -- who was lost for the season with knee surgery -- gives the franchise a roster spot to sign another player prior to the playoffs. That scenario is a consideration for Clippers before end of regular season.
ESPN Sources: Phoenix owner Robert Sarver has become focused on the candidacy of former Detroit and New Orleans GM Jeff Bower to assume a high-ranking front office role with Suns.
Remember, Divac and Webber are finalists in different categories. Webber, North American group; Divac, International. Every year, there's one international inductee slotted into Springfield. Divac's international resume is Hall-worthy on its own -- even if he never came to NBA.
Three prominent finalists for the Naismith Basketball Hall of Fame's Class of 2019 -- Marques Johnson, Ben Wallace and Chris Webber  were not selected for enshrinement, sources tell ESPN.
Via the International Committee, Vlade Divac has been chosen for induction into the Naismith Basketball Hall of Fame Class of 2019, sources tell ESPN. He’s one of seven NBA players with 13K points, 9K rebounds, 3K assists and 1,500 blocks. Divac had a storied FIBA career.
Bobby Jones has been selected for enshrinement into the Naismith Basketball Hall of Fame Class of 2019, sources tell ESPN. As a forward, he was NBA All-Defensive first-team eight times with the 76ers, and twice ABA All-Defensive first-team. Formal announcement on Saturday.
Paul Westphal has been elected into the Naismith Basketball Hall of Fame's Class of 2019, sources tell ESPN. Westphal was a 5-time All-Star and 4-time All-NBA guard. As a coach, he was 318-279 (.532) with a trip to NBA Finals and two conference semifinals with Suns.
Sidney Moncrief has been elected into the Naismith Basketball Hall of Fame’s Class of 2019, sources tell ESPN. A formal announcement will come Saturday in Minneapolis. Moncrief was a five-time All-Star and five-time All-NBA guard with the Milwaukee Bucks.
Washington is waiving Wesley Johnson, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Jerry Stackhouse agreeing to a six-year deal at Vanderbilt.
Memphis Grizzlies assistant Jerry Stackhouse has agreed to a six-year contract to become Vanderbilt’s head coach, sources tell ESPN.
Free agent center Tyler Zeller is signing with Memphis for rest of the season, league sources tell ESPN. Grizzlies are waiving Dusty Hannahs.
Sources: MRI on Miami guard Josh Richardson’s groin reveals no damage, but he could miss two weeks — which is an obvious blow to Heat’s chances of securing a playoff spot in final days of season.
Veteran F/C Donatas Motiejunas plans to sign with the Spurs today, league sources tell ESPN. He will meet team on its current trip. Motiejunas has been playing in China for the past two seasons
Not a bad day for @pskills43: 28-10-5 vs. Nets and makes his SVP debut.
Rising Raptors star Pascal Siakam has been playing basketball for less than 10 years, and he's still growing as a player. “The more I play and the more I learn about the game, the more curious I get. I just want to learn more.” - @pskills43 Woj Pod:
The biggest concern for potential candidates with Washington: How to engage on a rebuild with John Wall’s massive long-term contract and serious injury looming over franchise.
Washington job has appeal to current GM’s under contract elsewhere too. Pelicans search has been underway, with Brooklyn’s Trajan Langdon, Golden State’s Larry Harris and Houston’s Gersson Rosas set to interview this week, per sources.
Wizards ownership has been active in pursuing search firms to help with process for a new GM, sources tell ESPN. Wizards are an attractive job for potential candidates, largely because of resources and geography.
ESPN Sources: Brooklyn Nets coach Kenny Atkinson and his staff completing contract extensions with franchise.
UNC forward Nassir Little, ESPN's No. 16 prospect in Top 100 is entering the NBA Draft, per @DraftExpress.
More from Riopelle: "...that we previously provided to the federal authorities in support of our extortion complaint. We are confident that, after the District Attorney reviews these materials, they will recognize that the complaint made in this case is completely meritless."
Kristaps Porzingis' attorney Roland G. Riopelle tells ESPN: "We have been contacted by (New York County) the District Attorney's office and we are cooperating fully with their investigation. We have agreed to provide the District Attorney's Office with the materials..." (more)
ESPN reporting on woman reaching out to Knicks to mediate a Kristaps Porzingis payment in aftermath of alleged assault. Story includes emails and texts, including interaction between her and Porzingis.
On the February trade call to finalize the Dallas-New York deal, the Knicks informed the Mavericks of the pending rape allegation against Kristaps Porzingis, league sources tell ESPN. The league office had been previously made aware of the allegations.
Lakers are sitting out LeBron James for the rest of the season, team says.
Sources: Fred Hoiberg's deal terms with Nebraska: Seven years, $25M. He is signing the contract this afternoon.
Raptors coach Nick Nurse on The Woj Pod
New Orleans has been granted permission to interview several front office candidates for GM job, including Golden State’s Larry Harris, Brooklyn’s Trajan Langdon and Houston’s Gersson Rosas, league sources tell ESPN. There are more candidates expected to be in the process.
“I was in smaller leagues, but I got up every day trying to win the whole thing whether I was in England -- I was chasing that championship every day.  It doesn’t feel that much different to me.” - Nick Nurse on Toronto’s title aspirations Woj Pod:
Discussions between Nebraska and Fred Hoiberg remain ongoing today for the school's head coaching job, sources tell ESPN.
Toronto Raptors coach Nick Nurse on Kawhi Leonard, the pressure of expectations, life as a player/coach in England and much more. The Woj Pod:
Sit-down w/ @Giannis_An34 for NBA Countdown: Why the Greek Freak won't stay out of the gym. Why he isn't friendly w/ competitors. Why MVP should be judged on winning. And why it took a $100M deal to convince Giannis to upgrade from coach flights. Video:
Inevitable evolution of the podcast game: NBA owners interviewing NBA owners.
“Most people think stars just want to join a bunch of stars. No, stars want the right role players around them to make them even better stars and clearly they need another star with them as well.” - Doc Rivers on the Clippers’ free agency hopes Woj Pod:
Rockets-Bucks tonight. Harden vs. Giannis in the MVP race. My full sit-down with @Giannis_an34 debuts Wednesday on NBA Countdown, but here’s a peek.
“As a coach, there’s days you want to drive to practice going 35 in a 55 and then there’s days you want to drive 75 in a 55. I’m doing 100 every time I get in the car. I want to get to my guys.” - Doc Rivers on the joy of coaching these Clippers Woj Pod:
Doc Rivers on ceding presidential power and recapturing his love for coaching, negotiating his deal and relationship with Steve Ballmer, complications of coaching his son and why he thinks he can build a Clippers champion with Lawrence Frank. The Woj Pod:
Massive blow for Nurkic and Blazers. His finest season -- and best career-scoring night w/ 32. As Thunder slide, Blazers were positioning to make deep playoff run. Late-season injuries hounding Portland in recent years. Brutal night in Rip City. Stotts on Nurkic: "Devastating."
Kidd will be among the serious candidates for the Lakers coaching job if Luke Walton is dismissed, league sources tell ESPN. That’s expected to give Kidd some pause on pursuing the Cal opening now.
“I was happy to take that passenger seat and say, Hey, I’m here. Whenever you want me to take the wheel, I’ll drive. Whenever you get tired, I’ll jump in. I’m here to do whatever it takes. Let's go.’” - @paugasol on playing with @kobebryant Woj Pod:
The great @paugasol joins The Woj Pod on his Hall of Fame career, impacting Milwaukee's environment, the evolution of the European star, his medical school dreams, getting traded for his brother, co-existing with Kobe and much more.
The Spurs are nearing a deal with veteran NBA F/C Donatas Motiejunas, league sources tell ESPN. He’s been playing in China for the past two seasons.
ESPN story on Phoenix F Kelly Oubre Jr.'s season ending with thumb procedure, heading into restricted free agency on best stretch of career.
Phoenix F Kelly Oubre, Jr., will undergo minor procedure on his left thumb and miss rest of season, sources tell ESPN. Oubre's recovery will be 4-to-6 weeks. He heads into restricted free agency on best stretch of career: 20 PPG, 5.7 RPG since becoming starter post-All-Star break
New Orleans has claimed Christian Wood off waivers, league source tells ESPN.
Let’s do it. Join our group!
The Revitalization of the Brooklyn Nets. Story for NBA Countdown:
I suspected @NotthefakeSVP would make Phil Martelli’s shocking dismissal his One Big Thing tonight. As usual, he nailed it. Few coaches I admire more than the legend on Hawk Hill.
Steve Ballmer and Doc Rivers did a short extension over the summer that allowed both sides a chance to escape deal in 2019. As Rivers told reporters, that's been replaced with a longer-term deal. For Rivers, Lakers were never a consideration. He wanted to crush that talk today.
Raptors guard Kyle Lowry is undergoing testing on right ankle injury that caused him to leave game, but belief is that it’s not serious, league sources tell ESPN.
Best possible news for McCollum and Blazers, who avoided a serious injury.
Sources: Portland guard CJ McCollum has a popliteus strain in his left knee. He will be re-examined in a week.
Pretty good story in G-League: Spencer Hawes, out of NBA a year ago, carved body into best shape of his life and has made impressive return to Lakers affiliate. Over 20 PPG past 5 games, including 29 tonight. Shooting 59 percent on 3's. He's on NBA's radar for a call-up.
Portland guard @CJMcCollum will undergo an MRI on his left knee on Sunday, league sources tell ESPN.
Promises to be concern for Blazers guard @CJMcCollum, who landed hard and clutched lower left leg in pain on floor in San Antonio. Teammates helped him to the locker room.
Milwaukee's Malcolm Brogdon is expected to miss six-to-eight weeks with minor plantar fascia tear in his right foot, league sources tell @malika_andrews and me.
NBA Countdown Show on ABC at 8 PM ET for my full sit-down with OKC star Paul George. Warriors- Thunder at 8:30 PM.
"But the delta between them and the next group of teams - at least based upon the regular season results, point differentials, where we’re at offensively, where we’re at defensively - it looks like it could be a tournament this year." - Dennis Lindsey
“Four years ago when Golden State started their dominance it was almost like Tiger Woods. You felt like he was going to win every tournament for a while. I think the whole league felt that way on Golden State.“ - Jazz GM Dennis Lindsey Woj Pod:
Whoa
Utah Jazz GM Dennis Lindsey on rest of NBA closing gap with Warriors, trade deadline fallout, Rudy Tomjanovich's Hall of Fame candidacy and much more. The Woj Pod:
The Woj Pod: @utahjazz GM Dennis Lindsey.
There is optimism about the MRI results on right knee of Minnesota All-Star center Karl-Anthony Towns, league sources tell ESPN. He left victory over Washington with injury on Saturday night.
Free agent center Tyler Zeller has agreed to a 10-day contract with the Atlanta Hawks, league sources tell ESPN. He is expected to sign on Friday.
The @NBA2KLeague Draft starts soon and ... the Utah Jazz will select "Ria" (Spencer Wyman) with the No. 1 overall pick, league sources tell ESPN.
“Another GM wanting job security might take it a little light, grow into it, get 2 years under your belt, but me, I’m going for it.” - @sixers GM Elton Brand on pushing for a title now Woj Pod:
Bringing 'Melo into team that may not have meaningful games left makes little sense for the organization or him. Lakers had waited to see who could be available for them in buyout market. For now, makes more sense for Lakers to use minutes on young players than a 34-year-old FA.
The Lakers and free agent Carmelo Anthony are pausing talks on a possible contract agreement unless the franchise makes a turn back toward pursuit of playoffs contention. Story on ESPN:
Sixers GM Elton Brand on The Trades, how July free agency impacts locker rooms/organizations year-round, the first underclassman star to leave Duke, life with the Sterling Clippers, AAU ball with Odom and Artest. The Woj Pod:
ESPN story on Bucks guard Eric Bledsoe agreeing to a four-year, $70M extension.
Bledsoe, 29, is having his best NBA season with Bucks and was determined to stay with franchise. He could've gone into free agency this summer, but his deal starts to set the market for free agent guards in July. Deal gives Bucks chance to focus on Khris Middleton in July FA now.
Guard Eric Bledsoe has agreed to a four-year, $70M extension with the Milwaukee Bucks, league sources tell ESPN.
Gasol gives Milwaukee something it's missing on the roster: Championship experience. There are few better teammates and mentors in the NBA.
ESPN story on Pau Gasol agreeing on a Spurs buyout with plans to join the Milwaukee Bucks.
Pau Gasol is planning to sign with the Milwaukee Bucks, league sources tell ESPN.
The San Antonio Spurs and center Pau Gasol have agreed on a contract buyout, clearing the way for the six-time All-Star to be playoffs-eligible for his next team, league sources told ESPN.
Deal includes a team option for the 2019-20 season, per sources.
The Knicks plan to sign forward Henry Ellenson for rest of season once his 10-day contract expires on weekend, league sources tell ESPN. Ellenson (13 points, nine rebounds, five assists) made impression in victory over Magic. Ellenson was 18th overall pick to Pistons in 2016.
Pelicans and Bertans finalizing agreement now, per @DraftExpress and me. Deal includes a team option on 2019-20 season.
ESPN story with @DraftExpress on Pelicans' advanced contract talks with Euroleague guard Dairis Bertans.
New Orleans is seriously discussing a deal with Euroleague shooter Dairis Bertans, league sources tell @DraftExpress and me. Bertans is older brother of Spurs’ Davis Bertans. Dairis is playing in Italy, shooting 54 percent on three-pointers.
New Orleans has waived guard Tim Frazier, league sources tell ESPN.
Reggie Hearn's incredible buzzer-beater caps Team USA's comeback victory over Argentina in Greensboro. Under coach Jeff Van Gundy, USA finishes FIBA World Cup qualifying with a 10-2 record
Kevin Durant’s new show on ESPN 
Jonathan Givony (@Draftexpress) on Zion Williamson and the lowering of the NBA Draft age limit. The Woj Pod:
ESPN story on Grizzlies losing cornerstone rookie Jaren Jackson Jr., to a quad injury.
Sources: Memphis Grizzlies rookie forward Jaren Jackson Jr., has suffered a right quad injury and will be sidelined for the foreseeable future. Organization will be cautious with its young star.
“He’s made himself a lot of money and he’s going to keep making himself more money if he goes deep in the tournament, goes to the Final Four. That endorsement money is only going to get bigger and bigger.” - @DraftExpress on Zion Williamson Woj Pod:
ESPN NBA Draft Analyst Jonathan Givony (@DraftExpress) on Duke's Zion Williamson, how Duke/college basketball impacted his NBA trajectory, the NBA/NBPA talks on lowering draft age, G-League vs. NCAA, and much more. The Woj Pod:
Free agent guard Ron Baker underwent surgery to repair a torn right labrum and is expected to make a full recovery in four to six months, league sources tell ESPN. Dr. Neal Elattrache performed procedure in Los Angeles.
The Rockets are signing G League guard Chris Chiozza to a 10-day contract, league sources tell ESPN. A rookie out of Florida, he was preparing to play with Jeff Van Gundy and USA Basketball at the FIBA qualifiers in Greensboro.
From October: Here’s how the NBA and NBPA are still differing on lowering the age limit:
Pelicans star Anthony Davis will play on Friday in Indiana, coach Alvin Gentry told reporters.
Free agent guard Jodie Meeks is signing a 10-day contract with the Toronto Raptors, league sources tell ESPN.
Ex-Lakers forward Michael Beasley is finalizing a deal with .... Guangdong of the Chinese Basketball Association, sources tell ESPN. Short run of two months, significant cash.
“The more swings you get the more chances you have to get a hit. To be able to take 1 lottery pick and essentially turn it into 2, that made sense for us.” - @ATLHawks GM Travis Schlenk on the Trae Young-Luka Doncic trade Woj Pod:
Atlanta Hawks GM Travis Schlenk on the franchise's rebuild, Trae Young/Luka Doncic draft night trade, his years at the ground floor of Warriors dynasty, working in Pat Riley's film room and much more. The Woj Pod:
ESPN story on Tim Connelly’s contract extension with the revitalized Denver Nuggets.
Connelly’s contract could’ve expired at end of this season, but discussions with Nuggets president Josh Kroenke had been ongoing in recent weeks and culminated with a new deal, league sources said.
Denver Nuggets president of basketball operations Tim Connelly, architect of one of the NBA’s most impressive recent rebuilds, has agreed to a contract extension, league sources tell ESPN.
Ferry has worked with the Pels in a part-time capacity as a consultant, but his most recent work as GM for the Atlanta Hawks was viewed league-wide as a clinic on how to reshape a roster and franchise without bottoming out into the lottery.
New Orleans has now named Danny Ferry the interim GM, league sources tell ESPN.
New Orleans consultant Danny Ferry -- former Hawks and Cavs GM -- is the likely choice for Pelicans interim GM, league sources tell ESPN. Details are still being finalized.
ESPN story on New Orleans dismissing Dell Demps -- and what's next.
Jumping on @SportsCenter with the latest on the Dell Demps dismissal in New Orleans.
Ownership’s plan with a new GM will be continuing to push back on Anthony Davis preferred trade destinations if they don’t make sense for Pels — especially with a full year left on his contract, per sources.
Ownership and senior management have been pleased with coach Alvin Gentry and his staff and believe players are largely responding in what’s been a tumultuous stretch, sources tell ESPN.
Ownership was livid with an injured Anthony Davis leaving arena during Thursday night’s game, sources say. Gayle Benson is telling associates she wants an overhaul of Pelicans and a search for a GM to take command of Davis trade talks and the reshaping of team’s future.
Organization is discussing internal candidates for interim GM job, including David Booth and Danny Ferry, sources tell ESPN. Pelicans planning to be aggressive in marketplace to hire a high-level basketball executive.
New Orleans has parted ways with GM Dell Demps, league sources tell ESPN.
Powerful and poignant
ESPN story on center Enes Kanter signing a deal with the Portland Trail Blazers.
Blazers beat a crowded field for Kanter, including the Lakers, per sources. Kanter is an important addition for Blazers, where he'll play a good share of minutes. Portland signed Kanter to a $70M offer sheet in 2015, which OKC matched.
Kanter's agent Mark Bartelstein confirms deal to ESPN now, too.
Enes Kanter has agreed to a deal with Portland, league sources tell ESPN
The Atlanta Hawks are converting the two-way contract of rookie guard Jaylen Adams into a regular NBA deal, league sources tell ESPN. Adams will get a partial guarantee on the 2019-20 season. Adams was undrafted out of @BonniesMBB.
Jonathan Givony is the best.
ESPN story on @isaiahthomas making his return to NBA play tonight for the Denver Nuggets.
Eleven months after hip surgery, Denver Nuggets guard Isaiah Thomas will make his return tonight against Sacramento, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN story on Isaiah Thomas’ possible return on Wednesday against the Kings.
Denver guard Isaiah Thomas will decide early in the day about possibly making his season debut vs. Sacramento on Wednesday, league source tells ESPN. Nuggets have upgraded Thomas to questionable. He's been out since hip surgery last March.
This Simmons-Lakers tampering probe was an easy one for NBA: Open and shut. Elton Brand made that clear yesterday: "No issue."
NBA: "Sixers initiated contact w/ Lakers by requesting meeting between (Magic) Johnson and (Ben) Simmons. Both organizations ultimately concluded that such a meeting did not make sense...Johnson's response to a media inquiry regarding Simmons does not run afoul of league rules."
Sources: The NBA G League plans to have its elite Ignite team -- featuring top prospects Jalen Green, Jonathan Kuminga, Isaiah Todd -- face G League alumni in closed-door scrimmages in Walnut Creek on Nov. 15-22 and two streamed scrimmages in December.
Victor Oladipo on @TheAthleticNBA: "I know there have been people saying that I have asked players to trade for me. That's just not true, period. I love my teammates, I cherish the state of Indiana and I'm focused on leading this franchise to a title.”
Two-time All-Star Victor Oladipo has informed the Pacers that he is fully committed to the franchise and direction of team entering the upcoming season, he tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Goran Dragic sits down on @Stadium: Leadership and sacrifice, revealing he is now fully recovered from the plantar fascia tear he suffered in the Finals, desire to stay in Miami while listening to offers in free agency and more.
Lakers guard Avery Bradley tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium he is changing representation and plans to sign with agent Charles Briscoe. He is evaluating whether to decline his $5M player option.
Sources: The NBA has informed its teams of the basketball related income (BRI) from the 2019-20 season: $6.865 billion.
Houston's James Harden remains committed to the Rockets and is "locked in" for the season, sources tell @KellyIkoNBA and me.
Rockets’ Russell Westbrook wants out of Houston, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Lakers home games will be held without fans until further notice for the 2020-21 season.
For arena suites at 25% capacity or less, testing would not be required for fans. Teams would be permitted for 50% if all fans were tested or if local county's positivity rate is three percent or below and seven-day average of new cases per 100K residents is 10 or fewer.
All fans are required to wear masks (above age of 2), socially distance, undergo symptom surveys. Food and beverage are not allowed for those within 30 feet of court. Teams would have option to install a plexiglass behind benches.
The NBA has sent its 30 teams a memo with protocols for eligible markets to host fans, requiring people within 30 feet of court to register negative coronavirus test two days prior to game or rapid test on day of game, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The New York Knicks have shut down their facility after employees tested positive for coronavirus.
Sources: NBA players who accepted 25 percent salary withholding on May 15 will receive a refund of approximately two-thirds of all amounts on Dec. 1. Due to success of Orlando restart, additional player escrow of four percent was needed to satisfy revenue split.
Sources: NBA free agency will start on Nov. 20 at 6 p.m. ET, signings start on Nov. 22 at 12:01 p.m. ET. For the 2020-21 season, the NBA’s salary cap will be $109.140 million and the tax level will be $132.627 million.
The NBA and NBPA agreed to create the Social Justice Coalition -- group to advance equality and social justice -- in aftermath of the Bucks leading teams walking out of games in late August. Adam Silver, Mark Tatum and Michele Roberts will also be on the Board, sources said.
Sources: NBA Social Justice Coalition Board: Governors: Micky Arison, Steve Ballmer, Clay Bennett, Marc Lasry, Vivek Randadive Players: Carmelo Anthony, Avery Bradley, Sterling Brown, Donovan Mitchell, Karl-Anthony Towns Coaches: Lloyd Pierce, Doc Rivers
Along with financial settlement in Sterling Brown’s lawsuit stating officers used excessive force with Taser/racially profiled him, the city of Milwaukee would admit to constitutional violation and commitment to incorporate changes to the Police Department operating procedures.
Bucks Sterling Brown has reached a $750,000 settlement with city of Milwaukee for his civil rights lawsuit accusing police officers of race-based arrest and excessive force in January 2018, @TheAthleticNBA learned.
The NBA and NBPA are extending today’s deadline to Monday for either side to serve notice on terminating the collective bargaining agreement, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Sides will continue working to finalize CBA issues.
Sources The NBA and NBPA are discussing a minimum of 2 percent annual growth in the salary cap and luxury tax for the duration of the collective bargaining agreement. Cap is expected to be $109M this offseason.
The NBA and NBPA will now work to finalize health and safety protocols for the 2020-21 season. Sides are discussing a 17-to-18 percent escrow of player salaries over the next two years — with the hope the withholding amount is down to normal 10 percent in 2022-23.
The National Basketball Players Association has voted to tentatively approve NBA’s proposal for the 2020-21 campaign starting on Dec. 22 and playing 72-game season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. NBA set to tip off Christmas week.
The coronavirus pandemic has made life fluid, and a clinical vaccine will play a role in this too. NBA's goal is some amount of fans to start the season, depending on each market's restrictions. Courtside fans, for instance, would be about 10-to-12 feet away, sources said.
Sources: The NBA aims to have arena suites open to fans at 25-to-50 percent capacity for 2020-21 season tipoff, based on local regulations. An amount of fans — under protocols such as masks, social distancing and coronavirus testing — is a goal to start season.
The New Orleans Pelicans are openly discussing star Jrue Holiday in trade talks and several contending teams are pursuing, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Rockets are near agreement on deal with John Lucas to be an assistant coach under Stephen Silas, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The NBA and NBPA are negotiating player salary escrow: a three-year withholding period — with league desiring 25 percent and NBPA proposing 15 percent.
Sources: The NBPA will vote as soon as Thursday on the NBA’s 72-game, Dec. 22 proposal -- growing belief around players is that Christmas week start is inevitable. Details on @TheAthleticNBA:
Oklahoma City assistant Maurice Cheeks is joining Billy Donovan’s staff as an assistant coach with the Chicago Bulls, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
76ers GM Elton Brand has signed a multiyear contract extension, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Daryl Morey’s five-year deal to be new 76ers President of Basketball Ops. is now official and he will be introduced on Monday afternoon.
NBPA statement to @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium on collective bargaining agreement talks with the NBA, which are now extended to Nov. 6 deadline for opt-out: “We are confident we will get there.”
If either side provides notice by Nov. 6, the CBA will terminate by December 14 — unless the parties agree otherwise.
The NBA and NBPA are extending today’s deadline to Nov. 6 for either side to serve notice on terminating the collective bargaining agreement, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The NBA has informed its 30 teams that they are now allowed to open practice facilities for group practices, workouts and scrimmages with up to 10 players, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Timberwolves guard Malik Beasley is being charged with fifth-degree drug possession and threat of violence following a September 27 arrest at his Plymouth, Minnesota, residence, @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium learned. Joint statement from his attorneys, Steve Haney and Ryan Pacyga:
Ahead of next deadline on NBA CBA, NBPA’s Michele Roberts tells @TheAthleticNBA: “The union and the players...will not be rushed. Given all that has to be resolved between now and a Dec. 22 dateit defies common sense that it can all be done in time.”
Within hours of Daryl Morey parting ways with Rockets, Sixers ownership, led by Josh Harris, was in pursuit -- culminating in a NYC dinner on Oct. 18 -- and worked to upgrade its front office.
Sources: Former Rockets GM Daryl Morey will sign a five-year deal with the Philadelphia 76ers as soon as this weekend to run the franchise’s basketball operations.
The NBA has sent its 30 teams the game presentation protocols for 2020-21 in conditions of limited/no fans: - Enhanced theatrical lighting - Crowd from arena noises/NBA 2K/prerecorded chants - Possibility of team arena entertainers
NBA and NBPA have been in conversations about the Dec. 22 proposal. It’s been important for teams and players to get back on a normal schedule, allow players to receive their summers. Dialogue will continue.
NBA league office informed Board of Governors of projected value for teams and players with Dec. 22 start versus later: More than $500 million, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The NBA continues to prefer in-market play for 2020-21 season -- avoiding bubbles. Arena protocols when fans are allowed could include testing for some and better air purifiers in buildings. Full details on @TheAthleticNBA:
Stoudemire and Nash formed the league's lethal pick-and-roll duo for years in Phoenix -- one Kevin Durant and Kyrie Irving are sure to duplicate. Stoudemire will focus on player development in Brooklyn, sources said.
Six-time All-Star Amar’e Stoudemire has agreed to a deal to join new Brooklyn Nets coach Steve Nash’s staff as an assistant coach, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Nash and Stoudemire starred together in Phoenix.
Beginning 2020-21 around Christmas Day means return to semi-normal schedule, significant financial ramifications, potentially allowing stars to play in Olympics, sources say. Details on @TheAthleticNBA:
The NBA is targeting Dec. 22 for the start of the 2020-21 season and a 72-game campaign that finishes before the 21 Olympics, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie has parted with Roc Nation agency and is seriously considering representing himself, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Stan Van Gundy agreed to a four-year deal to be the new Pelicans head coach.
Sources: The Lakers have requested a career-ending injury application to have Luol Deng’s salary removed from team books. Deng agreed to buyout with Lakers in 2018, retired last October and is owed salary through 2022.
The Indiana Pacers are hiring Raptors assistant Nate Bjorkgren as their new head coach, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Interim Executive Committee of Basketball Players Union (G League Union): President: Andre Ingram VP: David Stockton Secretary-Treasurer: Isaiah Todd
The Philadelphia 76ers and GM Elton Brand are hiring Pacers executive Peter Dinwiddie as Executive VP of Basketball Ops., sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Crushing loss for the NBA, Houston Rockets and the basketball community: Rockets scout BJ Johnson has passed away. BJ was a standup and genuine human and a basketball purist all over the world.
New Clippers head coach Ty Lue’s coaching staff will include: NBA champion, ’04 Finals MVP and five-time All-Star Chauncey Billups and former Hawks/Bucks/Cavaliers head coach Larry Drew, per source.
Sources: The Los Angeles Clippers are hiring Ty Lue to be their next head coach -- with Chauncey Billups as a lead assistant.
Sources: Anthony Davis plans to opt out of contract and re-sign with the Lakers. Inside Pass on Davis, Lakers/Heat offseasons and more across league at @TheAthleticNBA:
Within 72 hours of prospect visits, all individuals must register negative coronavirus test. Three NBA team executives allowed per visit with 2020 prospects; the prospect is allowed to bring three individuals (family member, agent, etc).
The NBA is allowing teams to begin conducting in-person meetings (medical evaluation, workout) with 2020 Draft prospects from Oct. 16-Nov. 16, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Teams receiving up to two visits per player; no more than 10 total among prospects.
In recognition of efforts during a historic season, NBA commissioner Adam Silver informed league employees in “Thank You” letter that they are all receiving a $1,000 bonus and four Fridays off beginning Oct. 30 as well as Thanksgiving week.
Anthony Davis FaceTimed his ex-teammate, DeMarcus Cousins, in championship locker room tonight. Cousins is eligible for a Lakers ring.
Lakers GM Rob Pelinka’s first call of championship night: Magic Johnson, who has supported throughout postseason.
LeBron James FaceTimes his mother Gloria after winning his fourth title: “Everything that you had been through, everything that I had seen, there’s nothing that can stop me. I hope I continue to make you proud, Mom.”
NBA/NBPA Bubble arrangement, overriding protocols: Allowing Jared Dudley’s family in yellow zone to come celebrate championship with @JaredDudley619 on the court.
LeBron James: Championship trophy, MVP trophy — and some dancing.
2020 NBA Finals Bill Russell MVP: LeBron James.
 LeBron James wins his fourth NBA championship  Anthony Davis, Dwight Howard win first title; second for Rajon Rondo  Lakers win No. 17  NBA finishes historic season amid coronavirus; zero positives among players over 4 months
Miami’s Goran Dragic is listed active for Game 6 vs. Lakers.
Mavericks Kristaps Porzingis underwent surgery to repair a meniscus tear in his right knee.
Heat guard Goran Dragic (torn plantar fascia) is missing Game 5 of NBA Finals against the Lakers, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
NBA team personnel will be allowed to scout 2020-21 college season games that are open to the general public given ongoing coronavirus situation -- but not permitted to attend college practices, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Inaugural Board members of NBA Foundation: Michael Jordan, Adam Silver, Toronto’s Larry Tanenbaum, NBPA’s Michele Roberts, New Orleans’ Gayle Benson, Atlanta’s Tony Ressler, Tobias Harris, Harrison Barnes.
After a one-year suspension that began last October, China’s CCTV says it will resume showing the NBA with Game 5 of the Finals tonight.
NBA’s 2019-20 Executive of the Year: Clippers president Lawrence Frank.
The Los Angeles Lakers will wear their Black Mamba jerseys for potential championship-clinching Game 5 of the NBA Finals vs. Miami on Friday.
Clippers Montrezl Harrell has won the 2019-20 NBA Hustle Award, which honors player that makes the energy and effort plays to help his team win throughout the season.
Heat’s Goran Dragic will not play in Game 4 of NBA Finals against the Lakers, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Dragic attempted to play on torn plantar fascia, warmed up pregame.
Miami Heat guard Goran Dragic will warm up before Game 4 of NBA Finals tonight to attempt to play, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. If Dragic can tolerate pain with torn plantar fascia in foot, he will play.
NBA players have selected Pelicans Jrue Holiday as the 2019-20 Twyman-Stokes Teammate of the Year Award based on selfless play, on- and off-court leadership, and commitment to team.
Aug. 26: Doc Rivers challenges NBA players to have more than the 20% registered eligible voters Oct. 6: Over 90% of eligible players registered to vote
Players appointed for NBA Foundation and new Social Justice Coalition: Foundation: Harrison Barnes (@hbarnes), Tobias Harris (@tobias31) Coalition: Donovan Mitchell (@spidadmitchell), Carmelo Anthony (@carmeloanthony), Sterling Brown (@thatnegus_sb)
“I think we’re going to get to a mutually acceptable result, but it’s going to take time” — NBPA’s Michele Roberts tells @TheAthletic on NBA’s future. On Jan/Feb. start to ’21 season, free agency, financial factors, union resuming search for successor:
Heat’s Bam Adebayo upgraded to questionable for Game 4 of NBA Finals vs. Lakers. Goran Dragic is doubtful.
Free agent Isaiah Thomas says he underwent resurfacing surgery on his right hip in May and will be ready for the 2020-21 NBA season. Thomas has dealt with the hip issue for the past three years and underwent procedure to fully resolve it.
The Atlanta Hawks reveal their new 2020-21 City Edition uniforms — honoring Martin Luther King Jr. Proceeds from sale of jersey will go to support economic empowerment programs for Atlanta’s communities of color.
Miami’s Bam Adebayo and Goran Dragic have been ruled out for Game 3 of the NBA Finals against the Lakers.
Miami’s Bam Adebayo and Goran Dragic being listed doubtful for Game 3 of NBA Finals against the Lakers, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Howard decided in early July to play in NBA’s restarted season, said he would donate his salary and use his foundation to give back. This is part of that initiative.
Lakers center Dwight Howard and his Breathe Again foundation will host a high school basketball circuit in Virginia area to provide exposure for 84 players who are currently not in school/AAU leagues due to coronavirus pandemic.
Sources: Miami is starting Meyers Leonard and Tyler Herro in place of Bam Adebayo and Goran Dragic in Game 2 of the NBA Finals vs. Lakers.
Heat guard Goran Dragic (torn plantar fascia) has been ruled out of Game 2 of the NBA Finals against the Lakers, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Dragic is Miami’s second-leading postseason scorer at 19.9 points per game.
Clippers assistant Ty Lue is meeting with the New Orleans Pelicans today regarding their head coaching job, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
President Donald Trump and the First Lady have tested positive for coronavirus.
Doc Rivers-Philadelphia 76ers coaching agreement: Five-year deal, sources say.
Heat All-Star Bam Adebayo has been diagnosed with a neck strain after an MRI, team says.
Miami’s Bam Adebayo and Goran Dragic are listed as doubtful for Game 2 of NBA Finals vs. Lakers.
Heat guard Goran Dragic has suffered a torn plantar fascia, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. He will continue to be re-evaluated.
Miami's Jimmy Butler is staying in Game 1 of Finals after left ankle sprain.
Former President Barack Obama is part of virtual fans for Game 1 of NBA Finals.
Source: Lakers starting Dwight Howard at center tonight in Game 1 of Finals. He’ll spend time on Heat All-Star Bam Adebayo throughout series.
Former Clippers coach Doc Rivers will meet with the 76ers in the Philadelphia area, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Mark Cuban reached out to Delonte West's mother, Delphina Addison, asking how he can help. Answer was simple: Find Delonte. Cuban did on Monday, waited with West until his mother arrived to hotel, and West finally took step many close to him have awaited: Entered rehab. 
A Delonte West update, as people close to the ex-NBA player going through very difficult personal struggle continue to offer help: Sources say Mavs owner Mark Cuban reunited West with his mother in Dallas on Monday — and now West has checked into rehab facility in Florida.
New court design for the 2020 NBA Finals in Orlando:
Dwight Howard was done with LA. He didn’t want to play for the Lakers. “Then I had to really understand the power of forgiveness” Howard opens up on @TheAthleticNBA: Redemption, playing for NBA title again in Orlando, Kobe, much more.
Lakers-Heat 2020 NBA Finals: G1: Sept. 30, 9 pm ET G2: Oct. 2, 9 pm G3: Oct. 4, 7:30 pm G4: Oct. 6, 9 pm G5: Oct. 9, 9 pm G6: Oct. 11, 7:30 pm G7: Oct. 13, 9 pm
2020 NBA Draft Combine participants list — LaMelo Ball will participate; projected top selections Anthony Edwards, James Wiseman and Obi Toppin are not:
Minnesota's Malik Beasley has been released from jail and there are no official charges at this time, per his attorney Steven Haney. Details on @TheAthleticNBA:
Attorney for Malik Beasley, Steve Haney, tells @TheAthleticNBA in a statement: “At the time of the incident, multiple individuals were present at the residence. The allegations against Malik will be defended vigorously.”
Story with @JonKrawczynski: Minnesota Timberwolves guard Malik Beasley arrested and in police custody on charges of marijuana possession and concealing stolen property.
2020 NBA Finals schedule scenarios:
First Conference Finals winner in NBA’s bubble: The Lakers. Face winner of Miami-Boston next week.
To prepare for possible return to NBA arenas for 2020-21 season, the league sent teams a 32-page manual with cleaning and disinfecting protocols to "reset" arenas, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Los Angeles Lakers are moving Dwight Howard into starting lineup for Game 4 vs. the Nuggets, replacing JaVale McGee.
Denver Nuggets Paul Millsap is turning his own training facility, CORE4 Atlanta, into a 2020 general election early voting center from Oct. 12-30.
Terms on Billy Donovan's Chicago Bulls head coaching deal: Four years and $24 million-plus, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
NBA icon Michael Jordan is starting a NASCAR team with Denny Hamlin and his first driver is Bubba Wallace.
Sources: The NBA G League is seriously discussing tournament featuring the elite Ignite team — led by Jalen Green and Jonathan Kuminga — and other teams (undrafted players, etc.) in a bubble environment in November/December. Decisions are still fluid.
As 76ers GM Elton Brand leads head coaching search, the franchise expects to bring shortlist of candidates — including Mike D’Antoni, Billy Donovan, Ty Lue — to Philadelphia area for next round of interviews. Details on Inside Pass at @TheAthleticNBA:
Lakers’ Anthony Davis buzzer-beating three-pointer to beat Denver in Game 2.
Sources: Celtics Gordon Hayward is available to play in Game 3 vs. Miami after missing a month with ankle sprain. He will come off bench.
Denver star Jamal Murray sits down on @Stadium: Naysayers after $170M max deal (“I stopped listening. It’s what you allow in your head") — Rise of Nuggets — Leadership (“Chris Paul can give you 15 extra points just by leading”) — facing his idol LeBron in WCF.
Sources: Boston’s Marcus Smart and Jaylen Brown had heated confrontation after Game 2 loss, needed to be separated. Details on @TheAthleticNBA:
Good news: Celtics guard Kemba Walker has emerged from tunnel area and returned to Boston huddle.
The Sacramento Kings are hiring Houston Rockets assistant GM Monte McNair as new head of basketball operations, sources tell me and @sam_amick.
NBA will run predraft process and distribute to teams. League interviews consist of 10 questions; teams assigned 20 players for 30 min. each. Prospects travel by car to nearest team market for medical/strength/agility testing, 8 on-court shooting drills. No team personnel allowed
Sources: The NBA has sent teams revamped guidelines informing them that it is organizing the 2020 pre-Draft process (preliminary schedule Sept. 21-Oct. 16) — which will include 85 prospects conducting in-market medical exams, testing, and shooting 45-minute “Pro Day Video.”
2019-20 All-NBA teams: First: LeBron James, Giannis Antetokounmpo, Luka Doncic, Anthony Davis, James Harden Second: Damian Lillard, Kawhi Leonard, Nikola Jokic, Chris Paul, Pascal Siakam Third: Ben Simmons, Jayson Tatum, Jimmy Butler, Rudy Gobert, Russell Westbrook
The Denver Nuggets upset the Los Angeles Clippers after 3-1 series deficit, advance to Western Conference Finals vs. Lakers.
2019-20 NBA All-Rookie teams: First team: Ja Morant, Kendrick Nunn, Zion Williamson, Brandon Clarke, Eric Paschall Second team: Coby White, Tyler Herro, Terence Davis II, PJ Washington, Rui Hachimura
NBA players will debut new warm-up shirts displaying “VOTE” for the remainder of the Eastern and Western Conference Finals and 2020 NBA Finals.
Toronto Raptors coach Nick Nurse has signed a multiyear extension.
The NBA is allocating 40 seats in Tier 4 (20 per team) for off-campus guests for the NBA Finals, sources say. Each player can invite two guests per game -- including family, longtime friends, managers/agents.
The NBA will allow teams advancing to the Finals to bring three more staff members and 12 team staff guests into the Orlando bubble, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Former NBA champion and Sixth Man of the Year Leandro Barbosa says he is retiring from basketball and returning to the Golden State Warriors as a player mentor coach.
Miami Heat assistant GM Adam Simon has decided not to pursue Kings head of basketball operations position, per sources. Simon and Pelicans Trajan Langdon have pulled out in recent days.
Positive update on Boston’s Jaylen Brown from Orlando: He is staying in game after apparent injury.
The NBA has informed teams that, for the 2020-21 season, it prefer in-market competition with an amount of fans and reduced travel -- instead of current bubble structures. Details on the NBA’s current and future at @TheAthleticNBA:
Sources: The NBA is planning for Draft Combine process beginning later this month with two parts: - Mid-September to early October: In-market medicals and on-court; virtual interviews - Mid-October to Draft date: In-person interviews; no workouts
NBA investigation showed that Danuel House had a guest in his hotel room for multiple hours on Sept. 8 who was not authorized to be on campus.
Houston's Danuel House has left the NBA bubble after investigation and will not return.
The NBA has approved all teams to place an additional sponsorship asset on practice jerseys for use during team practices and shootarounds, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
NBA’s league office informed Board of Governors today that the 2020-21 season won’t begin earlier than Christmas Day, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Nov. 18 Draft date, 20-21 start date remain fluid.
Latest at @TheAthleticNBA on NBA investigating improper visit to Rockets’ team hotel by female coronavirus staffer with Houston F Danuel House Jr. as the focus:
Latest Inside Pass: OKC offered Billy Donovan a new contract prior to NBA restart, but it was not accepted. More on @TheAthleticNBA:
Celtics-Raptors. Game 7 for Eastern Conference Finals berth. 9 p.m. ET on Friday.
The NBA and NBPA have agreed to push back key dates such as Oct. 16 draft, Oct. 18 free agency and 2020-21 season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. New dates will be determined later.
2019-2020 NBA All-Defensive teams: First team: Giannis Antetokounmpo, Anthony Davis, Rudy Gobert, Marcus Smart, Ben Simmons Second team: Bam Adebayo, Patrick Beverley, Eric Bledsoe, Kawhi Leonard, Brook Lopez
Giannis Antetokounmpo pregame warmup was entirely stationary. Bucks intend to protect him, and as much as the MVP wants to be on the floor, lack of mobility with the ankle makes playing difficult.
Bucks star Giannis Antetokounmpo is out for Game 5 vs. Miami with right ankle sprain, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Story with @sam_amick on @TheAthleticNBA: The Sacramento Kings have requested permission to interview the six current candidates for head of basketball operations.
Denver All-Star Nikola Jokic (wrist) will be active for Game 3 vs. Clippers.
Clippers Patrick Beverley has been fined $25,000 for verbal abuse of referee in Game 2 against Denver.
The NBA sent a memo to teams alerting medical staffs to be aware of increased risk of blood clotting (which can result in venous thromboembolism) associated with COVID-19.
Bucks’ Giannis Antetokounmpo (ankle sprain) is out for remainder of Game 4.
Clippers Montrezl Harrell has won the NBA 2019-20 Sixth Man of the Year award, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Harrell had a breakout season, averaging 18.6 points and seven rebounds.
Grizzlies Ja Morant has won NBA Rookie of the Year.
Sources: The NBPA has partnered with to create an online platform where players can check registration status, register, request mail-in ballot. Players are increasingly aware of need to become registered voters -- and vote.
Boston’s Jayson Tatum talks to @TheAthleticNBA about his All-Star leap, Kyrie Irving’s message on way out, and more: “I had to prove myself to the outside world and to myself and show that I can be one of those top guys.”
Bucks guard Eric Bledsoe (hamstring) will play in Game 2 against Miami, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Mavericks Luka Doncic has been fined $15,000 for throwing the ball off the legs of referee on Sunday.
Clippers forward Marcus Morris has been fined $35,000 for recklessly striking Mavericks guard Luka Doncic above the shoulders on Sunday.
Sources: NBA teams in Orlando will be able to add one staff member on campus — as well as swap someone out — on Sept. 5.
New Orleans’ Brandon Ingram has won the NBA 2019-20 Most Improved Player of the Year award.
Houston's PJ Tucker has been fined $25K by NBA for altercation with Dennis Schroder in Game 5.
Toronto’s Kyle Lowry (ankle) is available to play in Game 1 against Boston.
Family of 18-year NBA vet Cliff Robinson releases statement to @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium, announcing he passed away due to yearlong battle with lymphoma.
18-year NBA veteran Cliff Robinson has died. Robinson, 53, was an All-Star in 1994 and Sixth Man of the Year in 1993 after standout collegiate run at UConn. RIP.
NBA Postseason schedule for Tuesday:
NBA postseason schedule for Monday.
Mavs Kristaps Porzingis has a meniscus tear in his right knee and will miss remainder of series.
LeBron James led small group of players who sought advice of Barack Obama on Wednesday, and the former President offered them guidance to continue playing with plan of action. Full details on @TheAthleticNBA:
NBA playoff schedule for Saturday and Sunday.
Pelicans/Saints owner Gayle Benson has tested positive for coronavirus; statement from spokesperson Greg Bensel:
Sources: LeBron James walked out of Wednesday’s players meeting because he supported Bucks, supported boycott, but there was no plan. For James, actions and outcomes mattered most; otherwise why do this? He became comfortable to play once NBPA mapped out purpose and plans.
Full release from the NBA and NBPA: Social justice coalition being formed; team governors working to convert all arenas into location for 2020 general election; advertisement spots to promote civic engagement and awareness.
The NBA postseason will resume on Saturday.
NBA commissioner Adam Silver pens letter to league employees, obtained by @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium: “I wholeheartedly support NBA and WNBA players and their commitment to shining a light on important issues of social justice.”
Sources: In NBA players/owners meeting: Players challenged owners to be proactive, not reactive, to social justice changes; create actions, not simply financial commitments. And: NBA/NBPA will create a new program to work on player-created initiatives on daily basis.
Orlando's Aaron Gordon has left the NBA bubble due to his hamstring injury and events of past few days on campus, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
NBA statement on hopeful Postseason return on Friday or Saturday.
Sources: Players today discussed the sacrifices all of them have made to reach this point in the postseason, and sense of normalcy returning with families entering Disney Campus. Players who voted not to play on Wednesday night understood.
Sources: NBA players -- and league -- are aiming to restart games Friday.
Sources: NBA players in meeting today agreed to continue playing this postseason — but want to find new and improved ways to make social justice statements. Players expect games to resume this weekend.
Portland's Damian Lillard will leave the NBA campus in Orlando on Thursday and return to Portland for further examination of his injured right knee.
Sources: There was some frustration in meeting toward Bucks blindsiding on walk-out plan. Bucks’ George Hill admitted he first sparked conversation pregame to boycott contest, teammates supported.
Sources: Every team besides Lakers and Clippers voted to continue playing. LeBron James said in meeting he want owners to be more involved/take action.
Sources: Miami's Udonis Haslem spoke and essentially told everyone in room that -- without Lakers and Clippers, how will season continue? LeBron James walked out. Rest of Lakers and Clippers exited behind him.
Sources: The Lakers and Clippers have voted to boycott the NBA season. Most other teams voted to continue. LeBron James has exited the meeting.
Full statement from Milwaukee Bucks players who led NBA boycott tonight.
Reporting from Orlando on @Stadium to discuss the Bucks leading NBA players boycotting games in wake of Jacob Blake shooting.
NBA players have called for a meeting tonight in Orlando to determine next steps, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The NBA has postponed its playoff games today.
The Lakers and Trail Blazers are sitting Game 5 of series, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. All three NBA games will not be played as players sit in wake of Jacob Blake shooting.
Decision made. Thunder and Rockets are boycotting Game 5, sources said.
Rockets-OKC players are planning to boycott Game 5 of their series, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Bucks players are in locker room attempting to reach the attorney general of Wisconsin, Josh Kaul, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Magic players are leaving the arena soon -- not accepting the Bucks forfeit.
Bucks players formalized decision pregame to boycott Game 5 against Orlando, per sources. Magic players wanted to play, but then returned to locker room. @TheAthleticNBA story:
Milwaukee and NBA personnel are standing outside of Bucks locker room -- where players have been adamant about sitting Game 5 in protest, sources tell me and @joevardon.
The Milwaukee Bucks players are in serious conversations about sitting Game 5 of series against Orlando, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
LaMelo Ball closing in on Puma deal, becoming first Ball Brother to sign shoe endorsement with company outside Big Baller Brand.
Projected top NBA pick LaMelo Ball is finalizing an endorsement deal with Puma, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Pacers have fired coach Nate McMillan.
NBA's 2019-20 Defensive Player of the Year: Milwaukee's Giannis Antetokounmpo.
Portland's Damian Lillard has been diagnosed with a right knee sprain and will miss Game 5 against Lakers.
Story on @TheAthleticNBA: Minnesota Timberwolves and Lynx owner Glen Taylor in advanced talks to sell the franchises to group led by former Memphis Grizzlies minority owner Daniel E. Straus, sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski.
Sources: Among early candidates for Philadelphia's next head coach: Clippers assistant Ty Lue, Villanova's Jay Wright, 76ers assistant Ime Udoka.
Raptors star Kyle Lowry has been diagnosed with a left ankle sprain and status will be updated later.
Brooklyn Nets star Kyrie Irving (@KyrieIrving) pens video tribute to Kobe Bryant: "Kobe means to me what it means to plant seeds and watch them grow. To endure pain, trauma and hurt, and go through an array of negative emotions, how you feel about yourself."
Sources: The NBA has set offseason rules for the 22 teams in Orlando once eliminated: - Team facility open for voluntary workouts for players under contract; up to four at a time - One staff member per individual workout - Coronavirus testing is optional; at team's expense
The Los Angeles Lakers will honor Kobe Bryant on 8/24 by wearing the “Black Mamba” jerseys with a special patch for Gigi Bryant.
Inside Pass on @TheAthleticNBA: Sources say the Nets are interested in Spurs icon Gregg Popovich and will explore possibility as head coaching search begins.
Mavs Kristaps Porzingis (right knee soreness) will miss Game 4 against the Clippers.
Update on 76ers’ Tobias Harris: Left eye laceration and being evaluated for concussion.
Bucks Marvin Williams and Magic's James Ennis have each been fined $15,000 for their roles in on-court altercation on Saturday.
Mavericks star Luka Doncic (ankle sprain) will play in Game 4 against the Clippers.
Boston's Gordon Hayward has left the NBA bubble and plans to return when he is close to playing again after Grade 3 ankle sprain.
NBA 2019-2020 Coach of the Year: Toronto's Nick Nurse.
Doncic is out for the remainder of the game.
Mavs' Luka Doncic: Available to play after left ankle sprain.
Initial signs are optimistic for Damian Lillard to play vs. Lakers in Game 3 on Saturday, per sources.
Portland’s Damian Lillard has suffered a dislocated left index finger. X-rays negative.
2020 NBA Draft Top 4: 1. Timberwolves 2. Warriors 3. Hornets 4. Bulls
“I feel like I’m the best player coming out of this class. I should be the No. 1 pick.” Potential top NBA pick Anthony Edwards (@theantman05) sits down on @Stadium: Life lessons, modeling game off Bradley Beal, more.
Nets’ Joe Harris has left the NBA Campus in Orlando due to a non-medical personal matter.
Zero again: No NBA player has tested positive for coronavirus out of 341 tested at Orlando campus since last results were announced Aug. 12.
NBA to teams in memo: "If a player has been diagnosed with a fracture of any type, the team’s public injury report must disclose the injury even if the player is certain to play in the team’s next game."
Sources: The NBA has informed teams that they are no longer allowed to report injuries in general terms such as conditioning, reconditioning, soreness and fatigue; telling them they must use specific reason/body part.
Mavericks’ Kristaps Porzingis (knee) has been upgraded to probable to play in Game 2 against the Clippers, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Meet Killian Hayes, a top international prospect and potential 2020 NBA draft lottery pick: Adjusting to pro life in Germany away from home — father being his best friend and mentor — modeling game after Manu, Harden, D-Lo.
Intel Sharing on @TheAthleticNBA with @sam_amick: - New Kings’ GM will report to ownership — not Joe Dumars - Dumars will not be candidate in search Full details on Sacramento’s search:
The Kings are expected to hire Mike Forde of Sportsology as their national search firm for general manager position, sources tell me and @sam_amick.
The eight non-restart teams are able to bring in up to five G League affiliate players into the program. Limit on 5-on-5 scrimmaging for Phase 2 had been discussed at one hour per day.
NBA and NBPA essentially forming in-market bubbles for the eight non-restart teams, Sept. 14 to Oct. 6, sources say. Phase 1: Sept. 14-20: Testing begins, individual workouts Phase 2: Sept. 21-Oct. 6: Group training in campus setting; private living accommodations for all.
The NBA and NBPA have reached agreement for the eight franchises who were not part of Orlando restart to conduct voluntary group workouts while residing in campus settings, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The New York Knicks are hiring Utah Jazz assistant Johnnie Bryant as associate head coach under Tom Thibodeau, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Significant, Grade 3 ankle sprain for Gordon Hayward. Celtics say he is expected to miss four weeks. His recovery will surely be based on how swelling and pain reduces over few weeks.
Celtics’ Gordon Hayward has a Grade 3 right ankle sprain and will miss four weeks.
Sources: 2020 NBA Draft Lottery tiebreaker winners: New Orleans/Sacramento (28-36): Sacramento Houston/OKC/Utah (44-28): OKC, then Houston, then Utah
Utah Jazz guard Mike Conley left the Orlando bubble this morning and returned to Columbus, Ohio for the birth of his son.
Kings assistant GM Peja Stojakovic is expected to step down from his role, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
NBA’s All-Bubble teams for seeding games: First team: Damian Lillard, Devin Booker, TJ Warren Luka Doncic, James Harden Second team: Giannis Antetokounmpo, Kawhi Leonard, Kristaps Porzingis, Caris LeVert, Michael Porter Jr.
NBA Bubble Awards for seeding games: MVP: Portland’s Damian Lillard Coach: Phoenix’s Monty Williams
Good news after scary collision, stretcher: Heat's Derrick Jones Jr. has been diagnosed with a neck strain and will be re-evaluated over weekend.
Sources: The NBA and NBPA are in serious talks on in-market bubble program in September for the eight franchises that were not part of Orlando restart, with framework: - Daily testing - One week of individual workouts - Two weeks of group practices - One hour of 5-on-5 per day
The Chicago Bulls have fired Jim Boylen.
First ever NBA postseason play-in: Portland vs. Memphis for No 8. Game 1 on Saturday. Damian Lillard: 154 points over last three games.
NBA has informed teams of Finals dates, subject to move up: Game 1: Sept. 30 G2: Oct. 2 G3: Oct. 4 G4: Oct. 6 G5: Oct. 9 G6: Oct. 11 G7: Oct. 13 First round begins Monday; each series played every other day. Later rounds can be moved up based on outcomes.
The NBA will also award a Coach of the Seeding Games.
The Boston Celtics have signed head coach Brad Stevens to a contract extension.
Zero NBA players tested positive for coronavirus out of 342 tested at Orlando campus since last results were announced Aug. 5, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Philadelphia star Joel Embiid (left ankle) will return to 76ers lineup tonight against Toronto, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The NBA has informed its franchises that they will be able to add two team staff members on Disney campus on Aug. 22 ahead of conference semifinals, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The NBA will name a Player of the Seeding Games and an All-Seeding Games Team to honor top performers for games during the 2019-20 season restart at Disney in Florida.
Sources: The Brooklyn Nets will start a full head coaching search at end of season to choose who will lead Kevin Durant, Kyrie Irving and an expected title contender. New details, candidates on @TheAthleticNBA:
The NBA plans to hold the Aug. 20 Draft Lottery virtually, with 14 team representatives appearing via virtual display, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Each NBA team in Orlando is appointing a Team Departure Coordinator who will remain on campus for up to three days and supervise move-out process when a team is eliminated. Each team will play the eight seeding games.
Ayton has been cleared and is en route now to join the Suns for Thunder game, sources said.
Suns’ Deandre Ayton missed his coronavirus test Sunday, was retested Monday morning and can rejoin team when results return, source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Suns face Thunder now.
Warriors star Draymond Green fined $50,000 for public comments about Suns All-Star Devin Booker and for violating the league’s anti-tampering rule.
After consultation with the 76ers medical staff and several specialists, Ben Simmons is leaving the NBA campus to remove a loose body in his left knee.
Philadelphia 76ers star Ben Simmons will undergo surgery on his left knee, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Pelicans’ Zion Williamson will sit out tonight against Washington to rest on second half of back-to-back, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
MRI showed no ligament damage for Simmons, but subluxation of the left knee cap. Both sides are collectively working on treatment options.
Official diagnosis on Ben Simmons: Subluxation of the left patella, listed out and treatment options are currently being considered.
The Nets have been fined $25,000 by the NBA for failing to comply with league policies governing injury reporting.
Tests on Magic forward Aaron Gordon showed no serious damage to his left hamstring and he will be re-evaluated in several days, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
MRI on 76ers star Ben Simmons’ left knee came back clean and he's expected to be day-to-day, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Over next 10 years, the 30 NBA team owners will contribute $30 million annually toward the NBA Foundation, which will work to drive economic empowerment for Black communities through employment and career advancement. Full release from the NBA and NBPA:
The NBA Board of Governors will contribute $300 million in initial funding ($30M per year for next 10 years) to establish the first-ever NBA Foundation dedicated to creating greater economic empowerment in the Black community, in partnership with the NBPA.
No NBA player has tested positive for coronavirus out of 343 tested at Orlando campus since last results were announced July 29.
Sources: There's growing belief among the eight non-restart NBA teams that a second bubble for intrasquad scrimmages will not happen — as well as pessimism about individual in-market minicamps. Details at @TheAthleticNBA with @sam_amick:
Clippers guard Lou Williams has cleared his 10-day quarantine and will make his NBA restart debut today against the Suns, his agent Wallace Prather tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Jamal Crawford will make his Brooklyn Nets debut today against Milwaukee.
76ers' Kyle O'Quinn missed his coronavirus test on Sunday and is not eligible to play today vs. San Antonio, team official confirms to @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. O'Quinn was tested today and will rejoin the team upon negative result.
The NBA G League has decided on a location for its new Pro Pathway team, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium: Walnut Creek, California.
First fine of the NBA restart: Boston’s Marcus Smart has been fined $15,000 by the NBA for comments about officiating Friday night, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Indiana Pacers wore special “Am I Next?” shirts after removing their warmups while kneeling for the national anthem tonight. Pacers veteran Justin Holiday distributed the shirts to his teammates.
Pacers star Victor Oladipo will play in NBA restart beginning Indiana’s opener against the 76ers tonight.
WNBA No. 1 pick Sabrina Ionescu is expected to miss approximately one month with a Grade 3 left ankle sprain and will continue to be re-evaluated, source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
X-rays on New York Liberty star Sabrina Ionescu’s left ankle returned negative and showed no fracture, source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. The No. 1 pick suffered ankle sprain tonight.
Members of the Utah Jazz and New Orleans Pelicans are kneeling for the national anthem as a peaceful protest before opening game in NBA season restart.
The NCAA will allow student-athletes in all sports to wear social justice statements on their uniforms, including replacing last name with words to celebrate or memorialize people, events or other causes.
Former Knicks coach Mike Woodson is expected to join the Knicks organization in a capacity, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Woodson led the Knicks to a 54-28 record in 2012-13, which marks their most recent playoff appearance and highest win total since 1996-97.
The Knicks have hired Tom Thibodeau as their next head coach.
NBA returns: March 11—July 30, and everything in between.
Rockets guard Eric Gordon is expected to miss approximately two weeks with left ankle sprain, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Zero NBA players have tested positive for coronavirus out of 344 tested at Orlando campus since last results were announced July 20. Consecutive testing rounds where no new player has tested positive.
Sources: Princepal Singh — a 6-10 forward from India — has signed a contract in the NBA G League to train and play alongside the pro path team. Singh will be the first NBA Academy India graduate to sign a pro deal and first NBA Academy graduate to sign in G League.
Suns center Aron Baynes has cleared from coronavirus and is traveling today to Orlando to join the team, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Our sitdown on his one-month-plus dealings with the virus:
Nets’ Kyrie Irving has started a $1.5 million fund for WNBA players who choose to sit out the 2020 WNBA season due to personal, professional, health, and/or safety-related reasons.
NWT-Self Isolating can also apply to a player who is needing to quarantine for a given reason, league told teams today.
Sources: The NBA has informed teams of a new box score listing for player who is out due to coronavirus: NWT (Not With Team)-Self Isolating.
Clippers’ Lou Williams will have 10-day quarantine on Orlando campus after picking up food at Magic City on excused absence — sidelining him through first two seeding games — NBA says.
The NBA is investigating Clippers guard Lou Williams’ activities while on excused absence to assess the length of his re-quarantining process, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Pelicans forward Zion Williamson will have a four-day quarantine that began on Friday night, NBA says. He is set to be cleared to rejoin Pelicans ahead of Thursday’s opener against Utah.
Pelicans’ Zion Williamson has returned to Orlando NBA Campus tonight.
Rockets' Austin Rivers expects to return to the Orlando bubble sometime this weekend, sources said.
Rockets guard Austin Rivers has left the Orlando bubble due to an urgent family matter, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: NBA informed teams of updated protocols for player re-entry: - Less than 4 days of quarantine (or none) if approved leaving for local/NBA-designated medical treatment - 30 minutes outside room per day during quarantine under conditions such as 25 ft. social distancing
The NBA has created new position Chief People and Inclusion Officer, naming Oris Stuart to the role, for diversity and inclusion strategies (attract, retain, develop diverse talent) across NBA, WNBA and G League.
Former NBA guard Nate Robinson and YouTube star Jake Paul make it official: They tell me they will be fighting Sept. 12 as an undercard to Mike Tyson vs. Roy Jones Jr. in California.
Phoenix Suns center Aron Baynes (@AronBaynes) tells me on @Stadium that he tested positive for coronavirus and opens up about how virus has impacted life for over a month for him, his wife and kids:
Pelicans' Zion Williamson has been getting tested daily for coronavirus while away from team, continues to produce negative results and remains away indefinitely. Team says Williamson fully intends to rejoin the team.
Sources: The NBA has informed teams that they are installing “Timeout Chairs” during games: - Movable chairs to court so players and coaches can huddle, but players must stand/sit around chairs apart from bench - Chairs cleaned by team staff at end of each timeout
Lateral foot sprain for Bagley. He is expected to be in a boot for at least two weeks, sources said.
Kings forward Marvin Bagley III will be held out of NBA restart in Orlando due to right foot injury, sources tell me and @sam_amick.
For Garnett, this bid is personal because of his stature within the franchise. Garnett wants to purchase the team and keep it in Minnesota, sources said. Glen Taylor told @JonKrawczynski that keeping the franchise in Minny is a requirement.
Kevin Garnett and his group are preparing a bid to submit to Glen Taylor to purchase the Timberwolves, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Owner Glen Taylor told @JonKrawczynski today that several potential ownership groups have expressed interest in purchasing the Timberwolves and that he is seriously considering all options.
NBA/Timberwolves legend Kevin Garnett and a group of investors are seriously interested in and exploring bid for Minnesota T’Wolves from Glen Taylor, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: NBA teams have been informed of new calendar date: 2020 Draft lottery: Aug. 20 — up from previous Aug. 25. 2020 Draft remains Oct. 16.
The NBA's award voting will be conducted July 21-28 before season resumption and awards will be announced during the playoffs.
Sources: NBA G League players have formed their own union with assistance from the NBPA. Approximately 80 percent of G League players signed union authorizations, well above the 50 percent necessary for voluntary recognition.
Lakers Markieff Morris is en route shortly to Orlando to join the team for NBA restart, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Zero NBA players tested positive for coronavirus out of 346 tested at Orlando campus since last results were announced July 13.
Sources: Message options for new NBPA/Russell Westbrook lifestyle shirts: Systemic Racism, Police Reform, I Can’t Breathe, No Justice No Peace, Break the Cycle, Strange Fruit, By Any Means, Power to the People, Equality, Am I Next?
Sources: The NBPA is partnering with Russell Westbrook’s clothing line to design social justice shirts for all NBA players to incorporate some messages that were not approved for jerseys.
The Brooklyn Nets are signing G/F Justin Anderson and he will join the team after signing later today, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: NBA has informed teams: "The decision to exclude seeding games from awards voting ensures a fair process in which players and coaches from all 30 teams will have the same opportunity to be honored..." League will soon announce voting process and plan to announce winners.
NBA's annual awards are based upon games up to March 11 — but season stat leaders will include the eight seeding games in NBA restart, sources said.
The NBA’s annual performance awards (MVP, Rookie of Year, Sixth Man, Defensive Player, Coach of Year, etc.) will be based upon regular season through March 11, when the season suspended, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Montrezl Harrell plans to return to the NBA restart at a later date, sources said. He left Disney campus to tend to an urgent family situation.
Clippers Montrezl Harrell has departed from the Orlando bubble for an emergency family matter, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Washington Wizards are signing forward Jarrod Uthoff to a contract for the NBA restart, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Raptors guard Fred VanVleet (@FredVanVleet) sits down on @Stadium: Leaving family to enter NBA’s restart, team meetings to display Black Lives Matter on bus, motivation to repeat, and more:
Sources: Pelicans' Zion Williamson suffered from leg cramping this week and missed parts of practice before leaving team Thursday to tend to urgent family matter. Full story on @TheAthleticNBA with @joevardon:
Sources: The NBA has sent memo to teams reminding them that interacting with or bringing an unauthorized person on Disney Campus is prohibited. Teams are required to utilize part of next team meeting to brief/discuss health protocols.
Pelicans Zion Williamson has left the Orlando campus to tend to an urgent family medical matter and plans to return for season restart at later date.
Nets forward Michael Beasley will not join the team and the franchise will replace his roster spot, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Beasley tested positive for coronavirus. Justin Anderson remains a signing candidate.
Jonathan Kuminga on decision to bypass NCAA for the NBA G League, almost picking Texas Tech to play with his brother Joel Ntambwe (@Joel__nt), his bond with Kyrie Irving, more. @TheAthleticNBA story:
Top prospect Jonathan Kuminga’s G League deal is expected to be in the $500,000 range, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Kuminga recently graduated from The Patrick high school, and now is a potential No. 1 pick in 2021.
Top high school and 2021 NBA draft prospect @JonathanKuming6: “I know I am the No. 1 player and I’m going to keep working on being the man that I want to be.”
No. 1 2021 prospect Jonathan Kuminga (@JonathanKuming6) has reclassified to the 2020 high school class and will sign in the NBA G League pro pathway program, he tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
I am on Instagram Live now — — and will be joined by top high school prospect @JonathanKuming6 on his college or pro decision.
Pelicans guard Jrue Holiday is donating his remaining game checks for the 2019-20 season — potentially worth $5.3 million — to charities across the U.S. and black-owned businesses.
Nets forward Michael Beasley tested positive for coronavirus, returned home and his roster status is up in the air, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Some players have received warnings from violations, sources said, as league ensures social distancing and mask protocols on campus.
Multiple tips have been placed into the NBA’s anonymous hotline to report protocol violations on campus, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Kings forward Harrison Barnes says he has tested positive for coronavirus, is in quarantine and will join the team in Orlando when he clears.
Oladipo has been fully participating in five-on-five scrimmages in Orlando, and there’s now optimism around his playing status, sources say.
There is growing belief Pacers star Victor Oladipo will attempt to play in the NBA’s restarted season after multiple strong team practices in Orlando, sources inside the bubble tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Full NBA/NBPA release on latest coronavirus testing results.
Two NBA players who have tested positive for coronavirus on Disney campus have since left the site to isolate at home or isolation housing, sources said. Since July 1, 19 new players have tested positive.
Sources: Two NBA players have tested positive out of the 322 tested on NBA campus on July 7.
Kings center Richaun Holmes crossed the the Disney campus line to pick up delivery food and must quarantine for 10 days (eight days remaining).
Rockets guard Russell Westbrook says he has tested positive for coronavirus and is in quarantine.
Lakers guard Rajon Rondo has suffered a fractured right thumb, will undergo surgery and is expected to miss 6-to-8 weeks.
Live DJ sets poolside for players on NBA’s Disney campus for the first weekend, 9 p.m. to 12 a.m.: - DJ Nasty at Gran Destino/Corondao Springs - DJ Jay R at Grand Floridian - DJ ET at Yacht Club
LeBron James says he will wear his name, “James,” on the back of his jersey in NBA restart.
Houston stars James Harden and Russell Westbrook did not travel with Rockets today to Orlando and will join the team in near future, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Crawford reached agreement with the Nets, and Beasley is progressing toward a contract to provide Brooklyn with two accomplished veterans in NBA restart. Beasley also has a strong relationship with Kevin Durant.
Michael Beasley is moving toward a deal with the Brooklyn Nets, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Jamal Crawford has agreed to a deal with the Brooklyn Nets, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Spurs guard Patty Mills says he is donating his remaining NBA salary of $1,017,818.54 in Orlando to Black Lives Matter organizations.
Luc Mbah a Moute has signed his Rockets contract ahead of NBA restart, sources said.
The Nets’ team doctors decided to have guard Spencer Dinwiddie sit the NBA restart out of an abundance of caution, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Wizards star Bradley Beal will not play in restarted NBA season due to shoulder injury.
Lakers center Dwight Howard tells @TheAthletic @Stadium: “My NBA salary and platform, while in the bubble, will be used to ignite a breath of fresh air into the community.” Full statement:
Lakers center Dwight Howard told @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium today he has decided to play in restarted NBA season, join the team on Thursday in Orlando, and will donate his remaining game checks to his non-profit campaign Breathe Again.
Sources: The NBA has informed teams that a player will not be allowed to travel with team to Orlando if he misses coronavirus test on one of two days before travel date (July 7-9). Player would then have to register three consecutive negative tests before traveling.
Clippers guard Landry Shamet has tested positive for coronavirus and is unlikely to travel with the team to Orlando this week, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The NBA’s scrimmage game schedule — with Clippers, Nuggets, Heat and Pelicans all opening play on July 22:
Pacers star Victor Oladipo plans to travel with the team to Orlando despite decision to opt out of NBA resumption, per sources. He is joining the team in Orlando.
Victor Oladipo: “As a competitor and teammate this is tearing me apart  but I truly believe continuing on the course I’m on and getting fully healthy for the 2020-21 season is the right decision for me.” Full @TheAthletic story w/ Pacers' star quotes:
Indiana Pacers star Victor Oladipo has decided to sit out of the resumed NBA season, Oladipo told @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Full story:
Twenty-five positive tests out of 351 players tested since June 23. Out of 884 team staff tested from June 23-29, 10 have tested positive.
Sources: Nine NBA players have tested positive for coronavirus out of 344 players tested between June 24-29; overall 25 players tested positive since testing began June 23.
The Houston Rockets are planning to sign forward Luc Mbah a Moute, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
“We have confidence in the plan that we’ve built. It was designed for this,” NBA deputy commissioner Mark Tatum told players/teams. Details at @TheAthleticNBA from mandatory NBA/NBPA 'campus orientation' calls this week:
Free agent guard Cameron Payne has agreed to a two-year deal with the Phoenix Suns, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Blazers star @Dame_Lillard sits down on @Stadium: Risks/rewards of NBA restart, life inside the Orlando campus, and a July birthday challenge ("I’m not trying to go there and waste a month and a half and go home. I’m going to stay and extend my stay").
NBA 2K21 cover athlete: Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard, @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium has learned.
Spencer Dinwiddie, who tested positive for coronavirus, tells @TheAthleticNBA: “We were supposed to be one of the teams to enter into the Orlando bubble early, but training camp got switched back to New YorkHindsight is 20/20.”
Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie (@SDinwiddie_25) tells @TheAthleticNBA he has tested positive for coronavirus and has symptoms, creating doubt over his status for NBA restart. Full details:
Free agent Jordan Bell has agreed to a two-year deal with the Cleveland Cavaliers, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
NBPA sent players initial details on the plan tonight, stating it is working with the league and Nike. NBA and the players union have been discussing various ways to allow players to express social justice issues in season restart.
The NBA and NBPA are planning to allow players to replace the last name on their jerseys with statement on social justice, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
NBA restart schedule notes: - Maximum seven games per day, tip-offs between 12 p.m. and 9 p.m. - Three total courts, two for national TV
Six NBA games on July 31: Orlando/Nets at 2:30 p.m. ET, Grizzlies/Blazers, Suns/Wizards, Celtics/Bucks, Kings/Spurs, Rockets/Mavericks at 9 p.m. ET
The NBA’s July 30 restart openers: Jazz/Pelicans at 6:30 p.m. ET, Clippers/Lakers at 9 p.m. ET
Sources: Travel dates for 22 NBA teams to Orlando: - July 7: Nets, Nuggets, Magic, Suns, Jazz, Wizards - July 8: Celtics, Mavericks, Clippers, Grizzlies, Heat, Pelicans, Thunder, Kings - July 9: Rockets, Pacers, Lakers, Bucks, 76ers, Trail Blazers, Spurs, Raptors
Sources: The NBA has modified its dress code for 2019-20 restart: - Players not required to wear sport coat on bench - Can wear short/long-sleeve polos for team/league business - Male and female coaches: short/long-sleeve NBA polo shirts
Knicks have claimed two-way guard Jared Harper on free agency waivers and waived two-way guard Kadeem Allen, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent guard Trey Burke has agreed to a deal with the Dallas Mavericks for the rest of the season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Mavericks center Willie Cauley-Stein has decided to sit out the resumed NBA season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Cauley-Stein and his partner are expecting a newborn child in July.
Kings center Alex Len says he has tested positive for coronavirus. Statement from Len, who emerged as key rotation piece for Sacramento prior to NBA hiatus:
Kings guard Buddy Hield has tested positive for coronavirus, sources tell me and @sam_amick.
Kings forward Jabari Parker says he has tested positive for coronavirus and will join the team in Orlando restart.
Tyler Zeller’s deal with the Spurs includes a non-guaranteed second year in 2020-21, sources said.
Indiana Pacers guard Malcolm Brogdon tested positive for coronavirus. “I'm doing well, feeling well and progressing well. I plan to join my teammates in Orlando for the resumption of the NBA season and playoffs."
The Denver Nuggets are signing two-way guard PJ Dozier to a full NBA contract to fill their final roster spot, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Spurs are signing center Tyler Zeller for the remainder of the season.
The Nets are waiving guard Theo Pinson, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Nwaba will earn $900K-plus to finish the season, with team option for 2020-21, sources said. He will remain sidelined during the resumed season due to Achilles rehab.
Free agent David Nwaba has agreed to a two-year deal with the Houston Rockets, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Multiple teams have expressed interest in DeMarcus Cousins but have been told the four-time All-Star will sit out the resumed season and continue rehab for full return in 2020-21.
New player option dates for 2020 NBA free agency: Anthony Davis: Oct. 14 Gordon Hayward: Oct. 17 DeMar DeRozan: Oct. 17 Mike Conley Jr.: Oct. 17 Andre Drummond: Oct. 17
Free agent Corey Brewer plans to sign a deal with the Sacramento Kings during NBA’s transaction window, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Brewer chose the Kings over multiple potential offers.
The New York Knicks are interviewing Warriors associate head coach Mike Brown for their head coaching job, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Potential No. 1 pick Cade Cunningham has decided to stay at Oklahoma State despite postseason ban.
Joakim Noah and the Clippers plan for him to sign a rest of season deal next week, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Current 10-day contracts, including Noah, expire on June 23.
Teams can conduct rest of season contracts, substitute players ($183,115 minimum for two years of service), two-way contracts, and waivers during the window.
The NBA has set the transaction window for its 30 teams: June 23 (12 pm ET) to June 30 (11:59 pm ET), sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Lakers center Dwight Howard: “Leaders sometimes become self serving and forget the people that they are supposed to represent...We support the NBA but in order to do that properly we must support every single one of us that represents that name."
Lakers' Dwight Howard in statement to @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium: "Our main objective is to raise awareness and gain transparency...Many of our fellow players are afraid to voice their concerns and are continuing to follow along with what they believe they have to."
The Knicks plan to interview 76ers assistant coach Ime Udoka for their head coaching job, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Mandatory for everyone to wear in NBA bubble: MagicBands, which function as room key, security check points, coronavirus testing check-ins. Full breakdown/details of NBA’s health and safety protocols on @TheAthleticNBA with @sam_amick:
Per me and @sam_amick: The NBA will create an anonymous hotline to report potential violations of protocols in Orlando.
NBA protocol for positive coronavirus test result: - Enter immediate isolation/separate location — “Isolation Housing” - Retest to confirm positive - Exit isolation after consecutive negative tests and return to activities
Failure to comply with protocols subjects a player to potential discipline such as warning, fine, suspension, and/or removal from the campus.
Per NBA health and safety protocols for return: All players, team staff and guests will be required to certify in writing that they will adhere to all pre-arrival rules and league rules while on campus.
NBA Refs will not be required to wear masks, sources say.
Sources: The NBA will have two rows on the bench: - First row: players and coaches; no mask required, but recommended that coaches wear masks - Second row: other players and coaches; must wear masks at all times (unless active player)
NBA players game day schedule in the Orlando bubble for 2019-20 season resumption, as @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium has obtained:
Sources: NBA has sent teams a visual of court/workout arrangements in Orlando:
In NBA's ORL campus: - Hotel amenities: players-only lounge (NBA 2K, TVs, gaming), pool/trails, barbers, manicurists, pedicurists - 24-hour VIP concierge - Daily entertainment: Movie screenings, DJ sets, video games, ping pong, pool, lawn games - Players can attend other games
Sources: NBA teams have been informed of required positions for 35-person traveling party: athletic trainer; strength/conditioning coach; equipment manager; team security official. Each team can include a player’s private personal trainer, massage therapist, or security.
NBA has informed all 30 teams of this entering 2019-20 resumption: "A central goal of our season restart will be to utilize the NBA's platform to bring attention and sustained action to issues of social injustice..."
Sources: NBA teams Disney hotels based on seeding: -Grand Destino: Bucks, Lakers, Raptors, Clippers, Celtics, Nuggets, Jazz, Heat -Grand Floridian: Thunder, 76ers, Rockets, Pacers, Mavericks, Nets, Grizzlies, Magic -Yacht Club: Blazers, Kings, Pelicans, Spurs, Suns, Wizards
Resumed 2019-20 NBA schedule for preseason: July 22-29: Teams will play three scrimmage games against other NBA teams residing in their same hotel.
Inside the Orlando bubble, NBA players will have the option of wearing a ring that could help with early detection of coronavirus; track temperature, respiratory and heart rate. Full details on @TheAthleticNBA:
Sources: NBA players were informed today that the Toronto Raptors will be the lone NBA team that will travel to Florida for training camp in Phase 1.
Life inside the NBA bubble: @TheAthleticNBA has obtained the six-phase health/safety manual summary for resumed 2019-20 season:
Sources: NBA players have been informed that anyone who leaves the Orlando campus (without prior approval) will be subject to: - 10-14 day self-quarantine - Reduction in compensation for games missed - Enhanced testing (deep nasal swab)
Sources: Two categories of non-participating NBA players who will not have their salary reduced: “Protected Players” and “Excused Players,” whom are believed to be at higher risk for severe illness from COVID-19 from team/experts. June 25 deadline for excused absence.
Sources: NBA players have been notified: "Any player who exercises this right will not be disciplined."
NBA players have been notified that any player who chooses not to play in resumed 2019-20 season must notify his team by June 24, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Compensation would be reduced by 1/92.6 for each game missed.
“This is our moment to show more people stand on the side of love than hate” Stephen Jackson sits down with @Stadium to discuss fighting for social justice after police murder of friend George Floyd, humanity, conversations with LeBron/CP3, more.
Sources: NBA has sent teams a medical history questionnaire for players, coaches, traveling party that physicians will use to determine if members can participate in restart either fully, or restrictions from certain activites, or excused due to pre-existing risk factor(s).
Sources: The NBA is seeking to fund a Yale School of Public Health study that will support validation of saliva-based coronavirus test and could further availability of cost-effective/noninvasive/rapid test to the general population.
The NBA has informed teams that they are now able to conduct coronavirus testing of asymptomatic players/staff given increase in testing and revised CDC guidelines, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Dr. Anthony Fauci told @Stadium he is supportive of the NBA’s restart plan: “It’s quite creative.. I think they might very well be quite successful with it... They really wanted to make sure that the safety of the players was paramount.”
Second player to speak on tonight's call, behind Kyrie Irving: Lakers guard Avery Bradley, sources said. Bradley had a passionate message to players, spoke of playing "chess, not checkers." Every tier of NBA player received a forum tonight.
Sources: Carmelo Anthony spoke about wanting young guard of the NBA to lead the way — and Donovan Mitchell expressed “big (injury) risk” entering resumed season having not played competitively.
Full details on @TheAthleticNBA: Kyrie Irving leads call discussing a stand for social injustice by sitting out — with powerful moments from Carmelo Anthony, Dwight Howard:
Kyrie Irving on players call Friday, per sources: “I’m willing to give up everything I have (for social reform)."
Kyrie Irving told NBA players on call Friday, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium: "I don’t support going into Orlando. I’m not with the systematic racism and the bullshit. Something smells a little fishy."
Donovan Mitchell, Carmelo Anthony, Dwight Howard among others spoke out about possibly sitting out due to social/COVID-19 issues, per sources. NBPA leadership, Paul/Garrett Temple, provided insight too. Every player had a voice — wants to find purpose, whether they play or not.
Sources: Kyrie Irving led a call of 80-plus NBA players, including Chris Paul/Kevin Durant/Carmelo Anthony/Donovan Mitchell, and Irving and several players spoke up about not supporting resumed season due to nationwide unrest from social injustice/racism.
Sources: Protocols for Disney staff working NBA return site: - Always wearing facemasks/gloves - Strict physical distancing, never within 6 feet of NBA participant - Temperature/symptom checks - Housekeeping staff will never be in the room at same time as NBA participants
Health and safety: The NBA's required coronavirus testing window for teams: June 23-30, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The NBA has informed teams that starting today, up to two coaches/development personnel can work out a player. Beginning June 23, a team’s head coach can supervise a player’s workout.
Sources: NBA's expected restart dates: - July 30-Aug. 14: Seeding games - Aug.15-16: Play-in tournaments - Aug. 17: Playoffs begin - Aug. 30: Family/guests of teams arrive - Aug. 31-Sept. 13: Conf. Semifinals - Sept. 15-Sept. 28: Conf. Finals - Sept. 30-Oct. 13: NBA Finals
Players who have signed an NBA/G League deal this year or a previous year are expected to be available to sign in restarted season -- making Jamal Crawford or JR Smith eligible, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The NBA is planning to allow teams to bring up to 17 players per roster (including two-ways) into the resumed season. Previous estimate was 15-player limit.
Tentative NBA postseason dates: Aug. 16-17: Play-in tourney Aug. 18: First round Sept. 1: Second round Sept. 15: Conference Finals Sept. 30: Finals Game 1
Spurs star LaMarcus Aldridge underwent arthroscopic procedure and rotator cuff debridement on his right shoulder and will miss the remainder of the 2019-20 season.
Sources: Expected protocol if an NBA player leaves the Orlando bubble: Quarantined for no less than 10 days and must have two negative coronavirus tests.
Sources: The NBA and NBPA have agreed to conduct performance-enhancing drug testing during resumed 2019-20 season in Orlando — but tests for recreational drugs will remain suspended.
Sources: Family limit for NBA players in Orlando: Three people, with some exceptions.
Sources: Practice set up in Orlando, as NBPA described to players today: Inside a convention center -- with two courts and weight rooms. Three-hour window for each team.
Sources: NBPA leadership stressed to players that it is mandatory to stay on the Disney World campus in Orlando during play. There won't be tracking devices on players. But goal is to keep everyone in safe environment.
The NBPA told players on call today that the 2020-21 season starting on Dec. 1 is “unlikely” and plans to negotiate the date:
2-3 preseason games. 1,600 maximum capacity in Orlando. No plan for anti-drug blood testing. Potential crowd noise via NBA 2K sounds. Details at @TheAthleticNBA on the NBPA’s call with its Board and Player Reps:
Sources: The NBPA informed players today that NBA/NBPA will conduct coronavirus testing every night during resumed season -- likely mouth swabs/light nasal swabs and not full invasive nasal swab. Minimum seven days quarantine for a player if positive.
Sources: All 28 player reps on the call approved the NBPA's vote.
The NBPA has approved the 22-team return format for the NBA, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Players and league have approved new format.
The NBA G League paid out all of its players through the season (17 canceled days) and extended their health benefits, per sources.
The NBA G League is canceling the remainder of its season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The NCAA says draft prospects have until 10 days after the NBA draft combine or Aug. 3, whichever comes first, to withdraw from the postponed 2020 draft.
NBA commissioner Adam Silver statement on league approval of 22-team format to resume 2019-20 season:
Sources: Additional dates NBA informed on Board of Governors call: - June 15, players located internationally return to market - June 21, all players report - June 22, coronavirus testing begins
Sources: The NBA informed the Board of Governors of scheduled dates: - Training camp: June 30, July 7 travel to Orlando - 2019-20 season: July 31 - Free agency: Oct. 18 - 2020-21 targets: Nov. 10 training camp, Dec. 1 opening night (can remain fluid)
Sources: Portland was the lone team that voted against the 22-team format.
The NBA's Board of Governors have approved the 22-team format to resume 2019-20 season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Play-in tournament in NBA's 22-team format would only be for 8th seed, per sources: - If 9th seed is 4 or more games back, 8th seed earns spot - If 9th seed is 4 or fewer games behind, play-in: Single-elimination for 9th seed, double-elimination for 8th.
For full clarity, this is the NBA's proposal as a whole -- based on feedback, collaborative discussions and input from constitutes around the league.
Sources: NBA commissioner Adam Silver is planning to propose a 22-team format to resume the 2019-20 season Story on @TheAthleticNBA with full details of the play-in tournament for 8th seed:
Brian Shaw has agreed to become the head coach of the new NBA G League elite pro team headlined by Jalen Green, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Memphis Grizzlies have created a new Paid Time Off (PTO) category for members of organization to use in order to vote during national and local elections.
NBA commissioner Adam Silver and the league office informed Board of Governors that July 31 is a target date for return of season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Hornets owner Michael Jordan advocated on the call for player safety, and not simply having players return for meaningless games, sources said. Given the NBA is prioritizing health and safety first and foremost, 30 team return is unlikely.
Sources: The NBA discussed four competition scenarios for restart with Board of Governors today: - 16 teams: Directly to playoffs - 20: Group/stage play - 22: Games to determine seeding, play-in tournament for final seed(s) - 30: 72-game regular season, with play-in tourney
Additional results from NBA's GM survey, per sources: - Most GMs want season to end no later than Oct. 1 - GMs want larger roster/more flexibility to manage their roster - 53 percent voted to maintain traditional playoff seeding; 47 percent for reseeding
Sources: NBA has sent GMs the results from GM survey: - 53% of GMs chose advancing directly to playoffs; 27% for resuming abbreviated season with play-in - 60% voted for 72-game season - "Playoffs Plus": 83% voted 20 or more teams - Non-playoff teams split on resuming season
19-year NBA veteran and former Wildcat Jason Terry has accepted assistant coaching job at Arizona, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Terry departs Mavs, where he's been assistant GM of Texas Legends. Announcement expected Thursday.
Sources: NBA players/staff who are currently outside the United States are now allowed to re-enter the U.S. via new U.S. Department of Homeland Security issue. Prior travel restrictions existed due to coronavirus pandemic.
Sources: The NBA is working on multi-phase medical/safety protocols toward restart of play. Current projections have in-market training camps in July, then camps/scrimmages in Orlando, then resume play late July/early August.
Story with @MikeVorkunov: Knicks soon embarking on head coaching search process, with Tom Thibodeau atop the list, sources tell The Athletic. Full details, including timetable at @TheAthleticNBA:
NBA surveyed GMs on several formats to restart the season: - 16 teams directly to playoffs - “Playoffs Plus” (play-in or group stage) - All 30 teams — or all 30 teams with play-in tournament Full story on @TheAthleticNBA:
The NBA sent a survey to its 30 GMs regarding options to restart the 2019-20 season, polling them on potential “Playoffs Plus” format, 72 or 76 regular season games, and more. Read on @TheAthleticNBA:
Georgetown coach Patrick Ewing is under care at a hospital and isolated, the school says.
Former Knicks legend Patrick Ewing says he has tested positive for coronavirus.
NBA shoring up its testing protocols, informing teams that it is engaged in conversations with BioReference Laboratories, LabCorp, Quest Diagnostics and Vault Health/RUCDR Infinite Biologics at Rutgers, sources said. Teams asked to create account with each company.
Sources: The NBA has informed its teams that it has engaged in discussions with several national coronavirus testing providers, which "will be a central component of any subsequent plan to restart the 2019-20 season."
The NBA has Orlando/Disney World as a clear frontrunner for return-to-play site for resuming 2019-20 season, sources tell me and @sam_amick. Orlando has gained significant seriousness among other cites such as Las Vegas.
Sources: Pittsburgh Steelers coach Mike Tomlin will speak at a virtual development session in front of NBA coaches on May 27 for an equality initiative.
Sources: The Knicks are finalizing hiring Jazz VP of Player Personnel Walt Perrin as assistant general manager as they reshuffle front office under Leon Rose. Perrin is a well-respected executive who has worked in Jazz organization for 19 years.
Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie (@SDinwiddie_25) says he will sign a one-year deal with the NBA team fans decide if they reach Bitcoin target of roughly $24,632,630 on a GoFundMe. Dinwiddie’s statement:
Kai Sotto has officially signed his G League contract and becomes the first international player in the pathway program.
The NCAA and NBA are indefinitely postponing the NBA’s June 3 early entry withdrawal date for draft prospects.
NBA and Adam Silver targeting a season decision in 2-to-4 weeks comes after Silver told players Friday it can go into June. Now -- for first time since the coronavirus stoppage started on March 11 -- a specific timeframe.
NBA commissioner Adam Silver told Board of Governors today that he is aiming for a 2-to-4 week timetable on the decision about whether to resume season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The NBPA has sent a memo to agents stating sense is players and NBA both want to finish the 2019-20 season -- and informed reps of the players listed below serving on new committee working with the league on potential plans.
Sources: The NBA and NBPA are forming a working group and have a call Tuesday to discuss return-to-play strategies; will include NBPA president Chris Paul and players Russell Westbrook, Jayson Tatum, Kyle Lowry, Dwight Powell.
The National Basketball Players Association has released a statement to @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium: “The NBPA is not engaging in and has not authorized any formal poll of its players.”
Sources: The NBA has canceled its 2020 G League Elite Camp, which has previously served as a scouting event and had five participants drafted in 2019.
Sources: The NBA has sent teams the ballots to vote on the prospects for the 2020 Draft Combine, which has been postponed indefinitely. League office is evaluating possible dates for Combine and potential virtual version.
Sotto, who turns 18 today, is joining the new G League team in Southern California alongside Jalen Green, Isaiah Todd and Daishen Nix. NBA’s enhanced pro development program gaining international talent.
Kai Sotto — a 7-foot-2 center from the Philippines — has decided to skip college and will be the first international draft prospect to sign a deal in the NBA G League pro program, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Heartfelt moment from Adam Silver on his call with all NBA players today, per sources: A shoutout to Timberwolves star Karl-Anthony Towns and condolences for loss of his mother, Jacqueline.
Adam Silver tells players that the NBA projects a one-year timetable for a coronavirus vaccine and "until there is a vaccine  we are going to be dealing with it.” Inside Friday’s call and the ultimate question: How much risk is worth it?
Sources: On the ever-elusive question -- What if a player tests positive upon return -- Adam Silver told players the NBA would hope for daily testing at that point and no stoppage of play, having the player(s) isolated in quarantine.
If/when it is able for NBA to return, Adam Silver told players it’s safer in 1-to-2 locations — such as Disney World Orlando/Las Vegas — than flying around to cities and facilities, sources said.
Sources: Commissioner Adam Silver told NBA players on call Friday: - If season resumes, no fans expected - 40% of league revenue comes from fans - Season decision can go into June - Until coronavirus vaccine, there is risk; will be living with the virus for foreseeable future
Sources: As part of protocols for reopening facilities, the NBA has informed teams that a person whose temperature is greater than or equal to 99.1F is not permitted that day.
Sources: NBA has informed its 30 teams that practice facilities can open May 8 if market is no longer subject to restrictions. Update: Total of six assistant coaches/player development personnel now able to supervise individual's workout; no more than four at one time.
Lakers are hopeful to open facility then — and will continue working with the appropriate government and health officials to ensure safety for players and staff during the fluid coronavirus situation.
Date the Lakers are targeting as of now to reopen practice facility under NBA's protocols: May 16, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The NBA and its players are supporting a Mayo Clinic study for antibodies using serology testing (blood draw) to better understand prevalence of coronavirus among players and staff and promote long-term efforts to develop vaccine.
On the NBA, MLB and NHL pursuits to return from coronavirus pandemic — @TheAthletic roundtable with @Ken_Rosenthal and @PierreVLeBrun:
Beginning Monday, NBA teams are advising fans of their ticket refund and credit policies due to the suspended regular season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The NBA has indefinitely postponed its NBA Draft Lottery and Draft Combine in May in Chicago due to coronavirus pandemic, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The NBA G League is improving some conditions for players starting in 2020-21, informing teams they must secure separate hotel rooms for players on road and elevate the per diem by $15. Players have shared rooms up until now.
One possible playing ground for NBA if finishing season becomes safe for league and players: Walt Disney World Resort property in Orlando, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. League has kept different scenarios in mind.
Sources: The Knicks will retain Scott Perry as general manager on a one-year deal.
The NCAA says it is expected to adopt new name, image and likeness rules for athletes starting 2021-22, allowing them to receive compensation for third-party endorsements and opportunities such as social media, businesses and personal appearances.
Sources: Potential top pick LaMelo Ball has declared for the 2020 NBA Draft. Ball was under “professional” category of early-entry candidates distributed to teams Tuesday night. Virtual pre-draft process can now begin with teams.
G League deal for Daishen Nix — arguably the best point guard in the 2021 NBA draft — is expected to be in the $300,000 range, sources said.
Nix is a potential lottery pick in the 2021 NBA draft and has given the G League a commitment, joining top prospects Jalen Green and Isaiah Todd on new team in Southern California.
Five-star prospect Daishen Nix has decommitted from UCLA and plans to sign in the NBA G League, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The NBA also informed franchises that players must conduct a resting ECG and troponin test before they resume engaging in activities at facility.
Sources: The NBA has informed each team to assign one senior executive to this position -- Facility Hygiene Officer.
Sources: When NBA’s facilities open as soon as May 8, players must wear facemasks at all times, except when in physical activity; staffers working with players must wear gloves; physical distancing of at least 12 feet.
NBA has informed its teams of this reality in a memo, per sources: “It is not possible or appropriate in the current public health context to regularly test all players and staff for COVID-19.” These protocols may be modified.
Teams were also informed today that players are not allowed to use any practice/training facility for workouts other than his NBA team.
Sources: If an NBA team facility’s city is no longer subject to stay-at-home order, it may make facility open potentially starting May 8: - Individual workouts; no more than four players permitted at facility at one time - Max of one team staffer in person
The NBA has informed its franchises that it is targeting no earlier than May 8 for any use of team's practice facility, sources tell @TheAthletic @Stadium. The NBA will continue to monitor coronavirus pandemic with its timings.
Philly steps up: Eagles drafting Oklahoma QB Jalen Hurts at No. 53 in the NFL draft, per sources.
Quarantined activities -- 49ers drafting South Carolina’s Javon Kinlaw with the No. 14 pick in the NFL Draft, per sources.
Bored in the house, in the house bored  New York Jets drafting Louisville’s Mekhi Becton with the No. 11 pick in the NFL Draft, per sources.
NBA boredom: Miami is drafting Alabama’s Tua Tagovailoa with the No. 5 pick in the NFL Draft, sources say.
Knicks owner James Dolan has recovered from coronavirus and donated his blood plasma to research for potential treatments, team spokesperson says.
Alabama sophomore Kira Lewis, a projected first-round pick, has decided to stay in the 2020 NBA draft and hire an agent, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Nuggets are planning to promote assistant general manager/10-year NBA vet Calvin Booth to general manager under Tim Connelly, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Nets Spencer Dinwiddie is acquiring a Nigerian passport to play for the Nigeria national team. Dinwiddie didn’t receive Team USA Olympic invite; now joins Nigeria roster under Mike Bown that includes Al-Farouq Aminu, Josh Okogie, Chimezie Metu, Ekpe Udoh.
NBA commissioner Adam Silver says Board of Governors are in agreement that safety is paramount: “We are not in any position to make any decisions and it’s unclear when we will be.”
Jrue, Justin and Aaron Holiday sit-down on @Stadium: Aspiring to play together ("It’s possible, I think it can happen  we’d be good, too"), competition growing up, becoming first trio of siblings to play in same NBA game, and more.
North Carolina freshman Cole Anthony, a projected lottery pick, has declared for the 2020 NBA draft.
Isaiah Todd (@zaytodd) has spoken to @JalenGreen about teaming up on @nbagleague team in Cali: “We’re both excited to get to work. Players can look at us and use this as an alternative routeeven motivation for them.”
Story on @TheAthleticNBA: Five-star prospect Isaiah Todd (@zaytodd) tells me he has signed NBA G League contract, explains landmark pro jump with Jalen Green.
Five-star prospect Isaiah Todd, who decommitted from Michigan, is expected to sign an NBA G League deal and join the new Southern California team featuring Jalen Green, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Jalen Green will headline a new G League team in Los Angeles and focus on development and preparation for NBA.
The NBA G League is working to launch a team in Southern California that will be headlined by five-star prospect Jalen Green, sources said.
Jalen Green’s NBA G League deal is expected to be in range of $500,000 and an ability to reach more with endorsements, appearances and education, sources told @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Jalen Green, potential No. 1 pick in 2021 NBA draft, says he is bypassing college and signing in the NBA G League.
Sources: President Donald Trump is scheduled to hold a call Wednesday with his committee focused on reopening America, which includes major-league commissioners, Mavericks owner Mark Cuban, Patriots owner Robert Kraft and Cowboys owner Jerry Jones.
Karl-Anthony Towns' mother, Jacqueline Towns, has passed away due to coronavirus, the Timberwolves say.
After 22 years in the Chicago Bulls organization, GM Gar Forman has been fired.
A video assistant on the Portland Trail Blazers, Zach Cooper, has died unexpectedly. Quotes from Portland President Neil Olshey and head coach Terry Stotts.
The Bulls are hiring Pelicans executive JJ Polk as assistant general manager under head of basketball operations Arturas Karnisovas, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Karnisovas makes first hiring decision.
The NBA and NBPA have agreed to extend the moratorium on transactions (agreements, trades, player/team options) indefinitely, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Business remains paused.
Behind the scenes with the Utah Jazz and everyone involved during the days — before, during and after — that changed the NBA and country due to coronavirus pandemic. On @TheAthleticNBA with @Tjonesonthenba/@sam_amick:
The NBA and its teams will send full paychecks to players on next payment date, April 15, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Bulls interviewed former 76ers president Bryan Colangelo for top basketball operations position, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Colangelo also has been lead executive in Toronto and Phoenix.
Hall of Famer Kevin Garnett unfiltered on Timberwolves owner Glen Taylor and much more — in @TheAthleticNBA:
In being fiscally responsible during coronavirus pandemic, the Lakers are planning to ask a small group of senior level staff to voluntarily defer 20 percent of their salary, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Kevin Garnett on @HoopHall induction with Kobe Bryant/Tim Duncan, Minnesota/Boston years, unleashing his truths about Glen Taylor, the most difficult challenge of his basketball career, and more. On @TheAthleticNBA:
Until further notice, NBA teams will receive up to four hours per prospect in virtual meeting during predraft, sources said. Teams are prohibited from conducting more than two hours of virtual meetings with a player in a week.
Sources: The NBA has given its franchises guidelines for the pre-Draft process during coronavirus pandemic, stating teams are allowed to conduct virtual meetings with prospects but prohibited from in-person workouts or requesting/watching live video.
The Bulls will continue to do homework on candidates and put together group of people with diverse skillsets that now include Toronto’s Bobby Webster, Miami’s Adam Simon, Denver’s Arturas Karnisovas.
Sources: Pacers GM Chad Buchanan has decided to stay in Indiana and decline interview for Chicago’s top basketball operations position. Buchanan expressed appreciation and positivity about Bulls, but he and his family have been treated well in Indianapolis and opted to remain.
The @Hoophall makes it official. Kobe, Duncan, KG: First ballot Hall of Famers in Class of 2020 that chairman Jerry Colangelo described as "arguably the most epic class ever."
Kobe Bryant, Tim Duncan and Kevin Garnett will be inducted into the Naismith Basketball @Hoophall Class of 2020, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Formal announcements will be made on Saturday.
Sources: The NBA is proposing to the NBPA that players take a 50 percent paycheck reduction beginning April 15. The NBPA has counter-proposed a 25 percent reduction of paychecks starting in mid-May.
76ers’ Al Horford (@Al_Horford) has donated $500,000 to aid coronavirus pandemic in his home country of the Dominican Republic, as well as each U.S. region in which he has played basketball (Michigan/Gainesville, FL./Atlanta/Boston/Philadelphia).
Smart has been one of the NBA’s strongest player voices on coronavirus since announcing his positive diagnosis two weeks ago. The NBA is supporting the plasma research project.
Boston Celtics guard Marcus Smart plans to donate his blood plasma to National COVID-19 Convalescent Plasma Project for research on the blood of those recovered from coronavirus, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The NCAA has decided not to grant athletes from winter sports (including basketball) an extra year of eligibility due to coronavirus pandemic. Spring sport athletes were granted extra year.
Celtics’ Marcus Smart says he has been cleared from coronavirus as of Friday.
Sources: The NBA’s “NBA Together” program is supporting National COVID-19 Convalescent Plasma Project of top specialists on plasma as potential treatment for coronavirus — and has asked for team individuals who have recovered to consider donating plasma.
Knicks say James Dolan has been self-isolated, is experiencing "little to no symptoms," and continues to oversee business operations.
New York Knicks owner James Dolan has tested positive for coronavirus.
DePaul junior Paul Reed has declared for the 2020 NBA draft, Reed told @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Reed is a projected first-round pick.
Jazz All-Stars Rudy Gobert and Donovan Mitchell have been cleared from coronavirus, source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Wood is the first known NBA player to clear from coronavirus — after testing positive nearly two weeks ago.
Pistons’ Christian Wood has been cleared from coronavirus, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Wood registered negative test results late Wednesday night.
For Joel Embiid, the $500,000 donation will go toward health and medical relief. The amount toward 76ers employees is to be determined based upon who is affected.
76ers star Joel Embiid says he is donating $500,000 to coronavirus relief and helping team workers who are temporarily reducing their salary during pandemic.
Nets' Kyrie Irving says he is donating $323,000 to Feeding America amid the coronavirus pandemic impacting food resources, and helping distribute 250,000 meals in the New York area.
Celtics guard Marcus Smart announces he has tested positive for coronavirus.
A Boston Celtic player has tested positive for coronavirus. The player is not exhibiting symptoms.
Two Lakers players have tested positive for coronavirus, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. The team may test the remaining players who did not take tests Wednesday morning.
Three members of the 76ers organization have received positive tests for coronavirus.
Teams were informed today in a memo about facilities closing --with players being encouraged to take aggressive measures to continue to avoid contact with others and remain home as much as possible.
The NBA is shutting down all team training facilities to staff and players starting Friday to mitigate coronavirus situation, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Dr. Vivek Murthy, former US Surgeon general, told NBA owners today about coronavirus: If the United States had not hardened its stance across country, millions were at risk to die — and cases will likely only increase, like they did in Italy, over the next 2-to-3 months.
Dr. Vivek Murthy, the former Surgeon General of the United States, spoke on the NBA’s Board of Governors call today and provided facts and sobering details about the coronavirus pandemic, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Durant has not had symptoms and was among four positive test results on the Nets. The two-time NBA Finals MVP's message is one for everyone to heed: Stay quarantined.
Kevin Durant tested positive for coronavirus, Durant tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Durant says he is feeling fine: "Everyone be careful, take care of yourself and quarantine. We're going to get through this."
Sources: Players who travel out of team's market during NBA season hiatus must: Provide whereabouts; remain home, do social distancing. Team permitted to pay for certain travel. Teams also encouraged to establish daily health/basketball check-ins (such as via FaceTime, Skype).
The NBA has informed its 30 teams that, effective Monday, players are able to travel out of market with consultation from their respective teams, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
This marks the third positive test for coronavirus in the NBA — and the first franchise besides Gobert’s and Donovan Mitchell’s in Utah. Wood has had a career season and is in line for a strong free-agent contract.
Detroit Pistons Christian Wood has tested positive for coronavirus, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Wood had 30 and 11 rebounds against Rudy Gobert on Saturday night before a career-high 32 on Wednesday. Sources say Wood has shown no symptoms and is doing well.
The NBPA has not had discussions on potential adjustments and stated they do not expect to until further scheduling decisions are made, per memo. Many factors still in play.
Sources: The National Basketball Players Association has sent a memo to player agents stating that they “fully expect that players will continue to receive salary on their designated paydays” during NBA’s suspended season.
Rudy Gobert, who tested positive for coronavirus Wednesday: “I know there are countless ways that people have been impacted. These donations are a small token that reflect my appreciation and support for all those impacted and are the first of many steps I will take..."
Utah Jazz All-Star Rudy Gobert has donated $500,000 for arena employees and relief in Utah, Oklahoma City and France.
Toronto’s Serge Ibaka has tested negative for coronavirus, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Ibaka defended Rudy Gobert throughout Jazz-Raptors game Monday, leading to testing of Toronto players Wednesday night.
The Golden State Warriors ownership, players and coaches will donate $1 million to disaster relief fund for their arena employees.
Sources: One of the NBA Draft's best scouting events -- the Portsmouth Invitational in April -- has been canceled due to coronavirus outbreak. PIT has been showcase event for top seniors over the last 67 years; such as John Stockton, Dennis Rodman, Scottie Pippen, Jimmy Butler.
New Orleans' Zion Williamson says he is pledging to cover the salaries for all of the Pelicans arena staff workers for the next 30 days.
Bucks star Giannis Antetokounmpo says he will donate $100,000 to the Bucks' staff at Fiserv Forum. Kevin Love made the same commitment for Cavaliers' arena staff on Thursday.
NBA and players union's moratorium period is planned to be effective March 12 (yesterday) to April 10, then reassess. Players will be paid in full on next check on March 15.
NBA and players union are planning to enter agreement for a moratorium period during league hiatus from coronavirus situation, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. It would freeze all business such as trades, signings, player/team options, 10-days.
NBA has informed franchises that "each team is encouraged" to conduct educational meeting by Monday for players/staff with physicians to discuss coronavirus situation -- either in person (appropriate spacing) or remotely. Several teams had such meetings before suspended season.
The NBA has informed all 30 teams on policies effective immediately and through March 16, including: - All players must remain in market of team - Players remain home as long as possible - NO group workouts, practices - Team physicians/trainers speak to each player once a day
Kevin Love has donated $100,000 to Cavs' arena and support staff affected by the NBA season suspension.
The NCAA has canceled the men’s and women’s basketball tournaments and March Madness.
Sources: Donovan Mitchell was the only Jazz player/personnel to test positive for coronavirus out of 58 tests administered on Wednesday night. Remaining tests came back negative.
Raptors players were also given precautionary tests for coronavirus tonight, sources said.
Sources: The Raptors have informed their players to self-quarantine for the next 14 days due to coronavirus situation. Toronto faced Utah and Rudy Gobert on Monday.
The NBA G League has suspended its season after NBA's indefinite suspension.
Following Rudy Gobert's positive COVID-19 test, the NBA is in an indefinite suspension.
The NBA has suspended its season.
Utah Jazz All-Star Rudy Gobert has tested positive for coronavirus, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Sources say Gobert is feeling good, strong and stable — and was feeling strong enough to play tonight.
The NCAA's men's and women's tournaments will be held without fans -- and only essential staff and limited family attendance.
NBA spokesman Mike Bass statement with latest on coronavirus situation.
76ers star Ben Simmons is progressing in rehab with lower back nerve impingement and will be re-evaluated in three weeks.
Inside all the events that led to the stunning departure of Kenny Atkinson as Brooklyn Nets coach — and a seminal team meeting days prior. On @TheAthleticNBA:
Bucks star Giannis Antetokounmpo has minor joint capsule sprain of left knee and status will be updated during next week.
Lance Stephenson is in strong talks on a potential deal with Indiana, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. No agreement or decision is finalized. Stephenson would also need clearance from his Chinese team and FIBA.
NBA has informed teams that all should have guidelines for coronavirus in place by March 10, such as: - Arrangement with infectious disease specialist - Facility that could conduct testing - Plan to limit team and arena staff Teams also encouraged to limit traveling party.
The NBA is discussing limiting locker room access only to players and team personnel due to coronavirus situation, with media handled via other settings to protect everyone, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
LiAngelo Ball is signing with the NBA G League’s Oklahoma City Blue via waiver claim, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Jacque Vaughn will serve as the interim coach for the Nets. Kenny Atkinson is out.
The Nets are parting ways with head coach Kenny Atkinson.
NBA has been sending several informational memos to teams in order to prepare for whatever develops from coronavirus situation. A reminder of existing rules regarding postponement or cancellations of games was provided Friday night.
Sources: The NBA has sent a memo to its franchises explaining that, due to coronavirus outbreak, teams should be preparing to play games without fans in attendance and identifying “essential staff” present for these games -- should it be necessary.
Source: Free agent Joakim Noah’s deal with the Clippers will start as a 10-day contract.
The NBA players union has begun its search for new executive director to succeed to Michele Roberts. “For the past six years, I have greatly enjoyed and continue to enjoy leading the NBPA and am proud of all we have been able to accomplish,” Roberts says
Sources: Waiters, his agent Rich Paul and the Lakers had several conversations, they have been positive, and it's been made clear among all: This must work out for him -- otherwise, Lakers reserve the option to release him.
Free agent Dion Waiters has agreed on a deal with the Los Angeles Lakers for the remainder of the season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Warriors make it official: Stephen Curry will return on Thursday against the Raptors.
The Basketball Africa League — a new 12-team league formed by NBA and FIBA — was set to tip off on March 13 in Dakar, Senegal and now will be pushed back to later date.
The NBA/FIBA’s Basketball Africa League is postponing its inaugural season — behind Senegalese government’s recommendation — due to escalating health concerns regarding coronavirus outbreak, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Tim Duncan will serve as Spurs head coach tonight against Charlotte with Gregg Popovich missing contest due to personal business.
LiAngelo Ball has been sent a contract from the NBA G League and is expected to sign soon, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Ball has been practicing with Oklahoma City's G League affiliate.
The Grizzlies have waived former Warriors/Timberwolves forward Jordan Bell, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent Anthony Tolliver has agreed to a 10-day contract with the Memphis Grizzlies, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Multiple teams made offers as well; Grizzlies have need with injuries in frontcourt.
Lakers have completed workout with free agent Dion Waiters and he had an impressive showing, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Next portion of Waiters' visit to the Lakers: Meeting with Frank Vogel, Rob Pelinka and Kurt Rambis.
Free agent guard J.R. Smith will work out for the Los Angeles Lakers early this week, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Minnesota Timberwolves have waived guard Allen Crabbe, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Crabbe will now be playoff-eligible for another team.
Sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium: Kings and forward Anthony Tolliver are finalizing a contract buyout that allows Tolliver to pursue opportunities with playoff contenders. March 1 is deadline for players to be released and playoff-eligible.
Curry remains on-schedule for a return to play at some point in March, Warriors say. He will practice with Santa Cruz on Monday.
Stephen Curry has been determined and preparing to play on March 1, but sides determined Friday that he will not return Sunday vs. Wizards. Warriors want Curry to have more practice time and target return is uncertain, sources say.
Source: Testing showed there was no significant structural damage in Embiid’s left shoulder. Embiid’s progress will be symptom-based — with expected re-evaluation in approximately one week.
Source: 76ers star Joel Embiid has left shoulder sprain and will be re-evaluated in one week.
The Timberwolves have been fined $25,000 for violating the league’s player resting policy when team rested D’Angelo Russell -- a healthy player -- during a road game on Feb. 23.
The Grizzlies are signing forward Jarrod Uthoff to a 10-day contract out of G League’s Memphis Hustle, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
“I want to be Defensive Player of the Year againI feel I’m as good as I’ve ever been.” Jazz All-Star @rudygobert27 sits down on @Stadium: On leadership role with @spidadmitchell, his evolving offensive game, "underdog" mentality competing alongside LA teams.
Charlotte's Malik Monk has been suspended for violating anti-drug program and will continue until he is determined to be in compliance.
76ers center Joel Embiid has been fined $25,000 for making an obscene gesture on playing court at Hawks' Kevin Huerter and using profane language in on-court interview.
The Warriors are signing guard Mychal Mulder of G League Sioux Falls to a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Simmons sustained the injury on the play prior to exiting Saturday night in Milwaukee. He will undergo daily treatment and rehab after he consulted with several specialists internally and externally.
Tests on 76ers star Ben Simmons revealed he suffered nerve impingement in lower back and he will be re-evaluated in approximately two weeks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Indiana’s Jeremy Lamb has suffered a torn ACL, torn meniscus and fracture in his left knee.
Minnesota’s Karl Anthony-Towns has a fractured left wrist and will be out at least two weeks.
Morris has been sold on a backup power forward role with the Lakers -- with more minutes for Kyle Kuzma at the three now. Sets up Markieff vs. Marcus Morris in Los Angeles.
Markieff Morris plans to sign with Lakers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The postponed Lakers/Clippers game this season has been rescheduled for April 9.
The Los Angeles Lakers have emerged as a frontrunner to sign Markieff Morris, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Toronto has also expressed interest in Morris.
Pistons forward Markieff Morris has agreed to a contract buyout, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Nets make official that Kyrie Irving will undergo season-ending surgery on shoulder.
Nets star Kyrie Irving is likely to undergo procedure on his right shoulder and miss extended period of time, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Pistons plan to sign guard Derrick Walton Jr. to a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Cavaliers are re-assigning John Beilein to a different role in the organization.
Cavaliers make it official: John Beilein resigns as head coach.
Inside the failed John Beilein-Cavaliers experiment and a franchise culture issue -- Full story with @ByJasonLloyd/@joevardon on @TheAthleticNBA:
Sources: Cavaliers, John Beilein in advanced talks about parting ways by Wednesday — and Beilein walking away from remainder of his contract. Story with @ByJasonLloyd on @TheAthleticNBA:
Forward DeMarre Carroll intends to sign with the Houston Rockets after he clears waivers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Updated story with @ByJasonLloyd/@kelseyyrusso: Per sources, Cavs John Beilein speaking to owner Dan Gilbert Monday, and whether it is this week or at end of season, Beilein is expected to be on way out as head coach.
Next up is formal approval at G League level. Players union held voting in meeting today.
Players have voted to support the formation of a union for G-League players in NBPA meeting today, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Story with @ByJasonLloyd/@kelseyyrusso: Cavaliers coach John Beilein is not expected to remain in position beyond this season — with momentum increasing toward his departure, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA.
NBA commissioner Adam Silver says the All-Star Game MVP will now be the Kobe Bryant MVP award.
The Boston Celtics will retire Kevin Garnett’s No. 5 jersey next season.
NBA Rising Stars roster update: New Orleans Nicolo Melli is replacing Suns No. 1 pick Deandre Ayton on the World team.
Booker will also replace Lillard (groin) in the NBA's three-point shootout on Saturday night.
Phoenix’s Devin Booker has been selected to replace Damian Lillard in the 2020 NBA All-Star Game.
The Phoenix Suns are signing former 76ers forward/center Jonah Bolden to a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Inside the Kings: Frustrated ownership, injury woes, group text chats and Luka Doncic what ifs — with @sam_amick and @mr_jasonjones on @TheAthleticNBA:
NBA Rising Stars roster update: Cleveland’s Collin Sexton is replacing Miami’s Tyler Herro on the U.S. team.
The Atlanta Hawks and two-way guard Brandon Goodwin have agreed to a two-year NBA contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Forward Michael Kidd-Gilchrist has agreed to sign with the Dallas Mavericks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Houston Rockets are planning to fully guarantee PJ Tucker’s fourth season of contract in 2020-21, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Grizzlies have waived guard Dion Waiters, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Waiters will receive his pay for the remainder of this season and $12.6M in 2020-21.
The Clippers have waived guard Isaiah Thomas, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Marvin Williams — a tremendous veteran shooter — headed to join Giannis Antetokounmpo and the team with the NBA’s best record.
Forward Marvin Williams is planning to sign with the Milwaukee Bucks after contract buyout from Charlotte, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Warriors are signing guard Jeremy Pargo of G-League affiliate Santa Cruz to a 10-day deal, league source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Nets are signing Timothe Luwawu-Cabarrot to a multi-year deal, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Warriors and two-way guard Ky Bowman have agreed to a multi-year NBA deal, league source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Dame D.O.L.L.A. on the mic, All-Star Saturday night.
Unique wrinkle for NBA All-Star Weekend: Portland's Damian Lillard will perform musically during Saturday night events in Chicago, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Philadelphia is waiving guard Trey Burke.
Meanwhile, the Knicks have acquired several assets for a player in Morris who was set to be a free agent. Knicks set to have seven-plus first-rounders in next four years in their rebuilding process.
Source: Knicks' Marcus Morris has been informed he is a Clipper. Kawhi Leonard, Paul George and L.A. add one of the best players available.
NBA trade deadline show started on @Stadium.
Sources: Knicks have agreement in principle to trade Marcus Morris to the Clippers.
Pistons trading Andre Drummond to Cavaliers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Morris and Harkless both expect for deal to close and end up with Clippers and Knicks, respectively, league sources said. Knicks and Clippers working finer details of the deal.
Knicks are finalizing a deal to send Marcus Morris to the Clippers for Moe Harkless and other assets, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Sides still working on exact additional players/picks.
Knicks are in significant talks to move Marcus Morris to the Clippers for Moe Harkless and other assets, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Lakers have informed Knicks that Kyle Kuzma has been removed from discussions, sources said.
Clippers and Knicks are seriously engaged in talks that would send Marcus Morris to the Clippers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Two young players potentially involved to New York: Clippers' Mfiondu Kabengele and Terrence Mann.
Stay tuned to my @Stadium NBA trade deadline show today, 2:30 to 3:30 p.m. ET.
Miami has traded Dion Waiters to Memphis, league source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Memphis has also sent Solomon Hill to Miami, league source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Memphis has traded forward Jae Crowder to Miami as part of Andre Iguodala deal, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Knicks have begun finalizing plans to bring Rose and William Wesley into potential basketball ops. structure, sources say.
Knicks and player agent Leon Rose of CAA are nearing deal to make him new head of basketball ops., league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
76ers have fortified their bench with two veteran scorers and shooters -- Alec Burks and Glenn Robinson III. Three second-rounders (Dallas 2020, Denver 2021, Toronto 2022) sent to Warriors.
Sources: 76ers sending three second-round picks to Golden State for Burks and Robinson.
Warriors are trading Alec Burks and Glenn Robinson III to Philadelphia, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Source: Andre Iguodala and Miami's two-year, $30M extension has team option in second season (2021-22).
Memphis is finalizing sending Andre Iguodala to Miami, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Iguodala is believed to be prepared to play for the Heat.
Miami and Memphis are in advanced discussions for Andre Iguodala to land with the Heat, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Pistons guard Derrick Rose plans to drop out of the Skills Challenge at NBA All-Star weekend in hometown of Chicago, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The New York Knicks continue to pursue Warriors' star D'Angelo Russell, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. So far, Knicks haven't offered packages that would close gap on Golden State's price point.
Sources: Minnesota trading Shabazz Napier to Denver. Nuggets sending Jarred Vanderbilt to Timberwolves.
Sources: Houston is also receiving Jordan Bell and a second-round draft pick.
Sources: Minnesota, Atlanta, Houston and Denver are close to agreement: Robert Covington to Rockets; Clint Capela to the Hawks; Malik Beasley, Juancho Hernangomez, Evan Turner and draft compensation to Timberwolves; expiring contracts and first-rounder to Denver.
Sources: Minnesota, Atlanta, Houston are in serious discussions on a deal that would send Robert Covington to Rockets and Clint Capela to the Hawks. Evan Turner and draft compensation involved in current talks to Timberwolves. Potential fourth team too.
Golden State is moving on from D’Angelo Russell conversations with Minnesota at this juncture, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Warriors have been clear with Minnesota on price point — and Timberwolves, to this point, are not willing to meet it.
Celtics All-Star Jayson Tatum has accepted invite to defend title in Skills Challenge at NBA All-Star weekend in Chicago, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Several contenders expressing interest in Knicks' Marcus Morris.
Knicks have had exploratory conversations on Lakers forward Kyle Kuzma, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Hornets guard Devonte' Graham will participate in the NBA three-point shootout at All-Star weekend in Chicago, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Knicks and James Dolan have begun interviewing for President of Basketball Operations position, league source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Scott Perry has taken over basketball operations in New York for fired Steve Mills, league source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Knicks are firing Steve Mills, source says.
Bulls guard Zach LaVine will participate in the NBA three-point contest at All-Star Weekend in Chicago, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Knicks registering interest in Warriors star D’Angelo Russell -- More on @TheAthleticNBA:
Story with @JonKrawczynski: Golden State, Minnesota remain engaged on D’Angelo Russell trade conversations. Inside how talks there and around league are forming into deadline week:
Milwaukee’s Pat Connaughton has committed to invite to the NBA Slam Dunk contest at All-Star weekend in Chicago, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Aaron Gordon, Dwight Howard, Derrick Jones Jr., Connaughton so far set.
Nets' Kyrie Irving has medial ligament sprain in right knee and will be re-evaluated in one week.
The Los Angeles Lakers' new jersey patch to honor the late Kobe Bryant.
The 2020 NBA All-Star Game will tribute Kobe and Gianna Bryant: Team LeBron (James) wearing the No. 2 and Team Giannis (Antetokounmpo) wearing the No. 24.
Team LeBron and Team Giannis will also wear jersey patches displaying nine stars, representing those who lost their lives in the crash. Rising Star players Friday will wear jersey patches featuring the Nos. 2 and 24 in the center surrounded by nine stars.
MRI on Dallas Mavericks star Luka Doncic's right ankle revealed a moderate sprain. "Manageable," one source said.
Luka Doncic, Zion Williamson and Trae Young headline NBA Rising Stars Game at All-Star Weekend in Chicago. Rosters here:
Phoenix Suns GM James Jones has released a statement: “I’ve played with and against multiple All-Stars in this league and Devin Booker is undoubtedly an NBA All Star.”
From New York/Memphis: Knicks' Elfrid Payton and Memphis' Jaren Jackson Jr. and Marko Guduric each suspended one game. Marcus Morris fined $35,000; Jae Crowder fined $25,000.
Sources: 2020 NBA All-Star reserves: East: Jimmy Butler, Kyle Lowry, Ben Simmons, Khris Middleton, Jayson Tatum, Bam Adebayo, Domas Sabonis West: Damian Lillard, Donovan Mitchell, Nikola Jokic, Rudy Gobert, Brandon Ingram, Russell Westbrook, Chris Paul
Orlando Magic forward Aaron Gordon has committed to the NBA Slam Dunk contest at All-Star weekend in Chicago, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Gordon joins Dwight Howard and Derrick Jones Jr. as commitments so far.
Sources: Utah Jazz rookie Miye Oni -- a Los Angeles native -- is changing his uniform number from No. 24 to No. 81 in honor of the late Kobe Bryant, representing Bryant's historic 81-point game in 2006 and LA area code 818.
More tributes to Kobe Bryant's jersey number(s): Denver's Mason Plumlee from No. 24 to No. 7 -- New Orleans' Jahlil Okafor from No. 8 to No. 9, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent swingman Gary Clark has agreed to a second 10-day contract with the Orlando Magic, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Lakers guard Quinn Cook tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium: “No. 2 is Gianna’s number. I feel it should be retired. It’s hers.”
Lakers guard Quinn Cook is changing his number from No. 2 to No. 28 to honor Gianna Bryant, combining Gigi's No. 2 and Kobe's No. 8, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Los Angeles Clippers forward Moe Harkless has changed his No. 8 jersey to No. 11 in honor of the late Kobe Bryant, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Orlando’s Terrence Ross has changed his jersey number from No. 8 to No. 31 in honor of the late Kobe Bryant, who wore Nos. 8 and 24. League evaluating this case-by-case.
Sources: Multiple NBA players have begun informally retiring Kobe Bryant’s jersey number(s) as a tribute — with Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie among them, changing from No. 8 to No. 26.
One final conversation: LeBron James and Kobe Bryant had phone call late Saturday night after James passed Bryant on the NBA scoring charts, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Several Lakers players listened into call -- in what would be their final memory of Bryant's voice.
Lakers organization is much more than its stars, its coaches and team officials. It makes up hundreds. All deeply grieving and using this time to mourn.
Sources: After tragic death of Kobe Bryant, NBA and the Lakers/Clippers consulted all day, with grief counselors on sight with Lakers organization. Ultimately, the decision was made to postpone Tuesday's game and allow entire Lakers franchise to continue to grieve, mourn, heal.
Lakers players, coaches and officials and entire organization have been deeply grieving loss of Kobe Bryant. “These guys are not ready to play basketball right now,” one source close to Lakers and Clippers players said today.
In aftermath of Kobe Bryant passing away, Lakers/Clippers game Tuesday has been postponed.
My Video Essay on Kobe Bryant and his impact on life.
Bryant will be part of standard Hall of Fame screening process on Wednesday, with finalists in February at All-Star break and formal inductees at the Final 4 in April.
Kobe Bryant will be a first-ballot enshrinement into the Naismith Basketball Hall of Fame class of 2020. "Expected to be arguably the most epic class ever with Kobe, Tim Duncan and Kevin Garnett," HOF chairman Jerry Colangelo says. "Kobe will be honored the way he should be."
Dallas Mavericks owner Mark Cuban: "Our organization has decided that the number 24 will never again be worn by a Dallas Maverick.”
Kobe Bryant.
Michael Jordan on death of Kobe Bryant: “Words can’t describe the pain I’m feeling. I loved Kobe — he was like a little brother to me.”
NBA commissioner Adam Silver statement on sudden death of Kobe Bryant.
Nets' Kyrie Irving will miss Sunday's game against New York due to personal reasons. Irving and Kobe Bryant shared a close friendship.
RIP to Kobe Bryant, his daughter Gianna and those involved in helicopter accident. Tragic.
The NBA has sent email to its employees confirming the tragic deaths of Kobe Bryant and his daughter Gianna, @TheAthletic @Stadium has been told.
LeBron James has passed Lakers legend Kobe Bryant for third on the NBA’s all-time scoring list.
Sources: Dallas is sending a Utah 2020 second-round pick to Golden State for Willie Cauley-Stein.
Source: Dallas has acquired center Willie Cauley-Stein from the Warriors.
Dallas is trading forward Isaiah Roby to Oklahoma City for Justin Patton and cash consideration, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Bulls' Lauri Markkanen will miss 4-to-6 weeks with stress reaction of his right pelvis.
2020 West All-Star starters: Dallas’ Luka Doncic Houston’s James Harden Lakers’ LeBron James (captain) Clippers’ Kawhi Leonard Lakers’ Anthony Davis
2020 East All-Star starters: Atlanta’s Trae Young Boston’s Kemba Walker Toronto's Pascal Siakam Milwaukee’s Giannis Antetokounmpo (captain) Philadlephia’s Joel Embiid
Redemption year continues: Dwight Howard will make his first Los Angeles Lakers start of the season tonight in Brooklyn in place of JaVale McGee (sick), sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
MRI on 76ers guard Josh Richardson showed slight strain of left hamstring and he’s expected to be re-evaluated in two-to-three weeks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Heat forward Derrick Jones Jr. has accepted an invitation to the NBA Slam Dunk contest at All-Star weekend in Chicago, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Jones — a key rotation player for Miami — joins Lakers' Dwight Howard as dunk contest commitments.
The Pistons have been granted a $9.2M disabled player exception for the projected season-ending injury to Blake Griffin, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Mavericks’ Dwight Powell is expected to have suffered a season-ending torn right Achilles tendon, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Devastating blow for Dallas.
On @TheAthleticNBA: NBPA has provided extensive financial support to Delonte West. Danny Ainge gave West a scouting job in recent years. Friends and family want to help the distressed former NBA guard beyond monetary measures — before too late.
Support for Delonte West has come from NBPA, confidants, former teammates and coaches. Details on troubling scene Monday in Maryland and how loved ones want West to accept help and get right — on @TheAthleticNBA:
Portland is trading Kent Bazemore to Sacramento, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Story with @JonKrawczynski: Minnesota is intensifying its pursuit of Warriors star D’Angelo Russell. Where those talks stand and more on @TheAthleticNBA:
Sitdown with Bulls guard @ZachLaVine: Leadership using lessons from Kevin Garnett, Jamal Crawford and his father — 49-point Charlotte game — young Minnesota days to being No. 1 option — potential All-Star weekend plans.
Bulls rookie Daniel Gafford is expected to miss 2-to-4 weeks with dislocated right thumb, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Gafford has been starting center in place of Wendell Carter Jr.
The Charlotte Hornets are signing forward Ray Spalding to a two-way NBA contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
From one-on-one with @VicOladipo on @Stadium: The two-time All-Star on his career trajectory following Indiana/OKC trade in 2017.
The Golden State Warriors have signed swingman Damion Lee to a three-year contract, with partial guarantee in 2020-21, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Pelicans No. 1 pick Zion Williamson is expected to make his season debut on Jan. 22 against San Antonio, David Griffin says.
Sitdown with Pacers star Victor Oladipo (@VicOladipo): Mother “challenged me right then and there to come back better” — full-throttle return on Jan. 29 — blessings of life slowing down after injury — obsession to win an NBA title.
Pistons guard Derrick Rose has been fined $25,000 for throwing a pen into stands on Monday night.
Landmark day in the WNBA: New collective bargaining agreement that has raised average salaries to six figures for first time ($130,000, up to $500,000 for top players), improved travel and marketing opportunities, and fully paid salary on maternity leave among other changes.
Knicks are waiving forward Ivan Rabb and planning to sign forward Kenny Wooten of G League Westchester to a two-way NBA deal, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Lakers star LeBron James will miss tonight's game in Oklahoma City due to a cold, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Lakers have promoted Rob Pelinka to Vice President of Basketball Operations and General Manager.
Detroit has applied for a $9.2M disabled player exception for the potential season-ending loss of All-Star Blake Griffin, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Lakers star Anthony Davis (back) will sit tonight in Dallas and Kyle Kuzma will join starting lineup against the Mavericks.
Miami’s Jimmy Butler ($35,000) and Indiana’s TJ Warren ($25,000) have been fined for their roles in altercation on Wednesday night.
After months of discussions with NBA and making great changes to proposal, Nets’ Spencer Dinwiddie is launching his unprecedented contract investment vehicle on Monday. Details on @TheAthleticNBA:
The Orlando Magic have applied for two Disabled Player Exceptions — for Jonathan Isaac and Al-Farouq Aminu — with the NBA that would project season-ending losses, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
76ers star Joel Embiid has a torn ligament in left hand and is evaluating his treatment options.
MRI on Bulls center Wendell Carter Jr. revealed a high right ankle sprain and likely to miss multiple weeks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Bulls will evaluate Carter on daily basis.
Knicks' Bobby Portis has been fined $25,000 for "recklessly making contact" above shoulders of Kentavious Caldwell-Pope on Tuesday night.
Pacers star Victor Oladipo tells @Stadium he plans to make season debut on Jan. 29 against Chicago and discusses emotions returning from yearlong absence after torn quad tendon in knee. Stay tuned for my full sitdown.
After scary fall Tuesday night in Los Angeles, Davis underwent MRI that showed lower back injury is a bruise, league sources said. Positive news for Davis and the Lakers.
MRI results on Lakers star Anthony Davis’ lower back injury returned clean and he plans to travel with team on two-game road trip (Dallas, OKC), league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Rockets are waiving swingman Gary Clark, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Miami Heat will retire Dwyane Wade's No. 3 jersey during a three-day ceremony, Feb. 21-23.
Pistons star Blake Griffin underwent surgery on his left knee and will undergo extended rehab.
Pistons guard Derrick Rose plans to return to Chicago for NBA All-Star Weekend in February, accepting invitation to the Skills Competition Saturday night, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Cavaliers plan to waive swingman Alfonzo McKinnie, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Cleveland will explore possibilities of re-signing McKinnie if he clears waivers.
Superman is back: Lakers center Dwight Howard will participate in the NBA Slam Dunk contest at All-Star Weekend in Chicago, per sources. Story on @TheAthleticNBA:
X-rays returned negative on Lakers guard Avery Bradley’s right ankle sprain, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Cavaliers Kevin Love is expected to sit Sunday night against Minnesota due to the second night of a back to back, per league sources. @TheAthleticNBA story on Saturday’s events involving Love:
The Atlanta Hawks are signing G/F Paul Watson of G League’s Raptors 905 to a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Latest on Kevin Love’s emotional outburst toward Cavs GM on Saturday, following $1,000 team fine for bench incident in Toronto. Link on @TheAthleticNBA:
Story at @TheAthleticNBA: Cavaliers' Kevin Love had an emotional outburst directed toward GM Koby Altman on Saturday expressing displeasure and disgust with the organization -- after team issued fine for bench tantrum.
Wizards guard Isaiah Thomas has been fined $25,000 for making inappropriate contact with a game official on Friday.
The Nets plan to sign G League swingman Justin Anderson of Raptors 905 to 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Nets are waiving G/F David Nwaba, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Nwaba will miss the remainder of the season with a torn Achilles tendon.
The NBA and its 30 teams will honor David Stern with commemorative black bands on player jerseys for the remainder of 2019-20 season. Referees will also wear the special bands on their uniform.
The NBA has fined Kings center Dewayne Dedmon $50,000 for publicizing trade request.
Leaders in fan voting for first return of NBA All-Star voting: Dallas' Luka Doni and Milwaukee's Giannis Antetokounmpo.
NBA legend and Hornets owner Michael Jordan’s statement to @TheAthletic @Stadium on death of iconic NBA commissioner David Stern:
NBA commissioner Adam Silver in statement on passing of David Stern: "Because of David, the NBA is a truly global brand  making him not only one of the greatest sports commissioners of all time but also one of the most influential business leaders of his generation."
Former NBA commissioner David Stern has passed away this afternoon at age 77 after suffering brain hemorrhage three weeks ago, league says.
Warriors' Marquese Chriss has been fined $35,000 by NBA for shoving Mavs star Luka Doncic to the floor on Dec. 28.
The Rockets are signing forward William Howard of G League’s Salt Lake City to a two-way NBA deal, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Kings center Dewayne Dedmon wants out of Sacramento, per league sources. More context and info on @TheAthleticNBA’s Inside Pass:
Good news for the Lakers: LeBron James (groin) is expected to travel with team to Portland and on track to play Saturday, per league sources. More on Inside Pass at @TheAthleticNBA:
The Houston Rockets and two-way guard Chris Clemons have agreed to a three-year NBA deal, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Clemons ran out of two-way days and is now signing a full contract.
Thanks to @Forbes and @SprungOnSports for taking the time to sit down for this feature. @TheAthletic @Stadium
Utah is waiving forward Jeff Green, league sources tell me and @Tjonesonthenba.
NBA statement: “NBA rules state that any player who deliberately enters the spectator stands during a game will be automatically ejected and subject to a fine and/or suspension.” 76ers have banned the fans involved from their arena for one year.
Wizards guard Isaiah Thomas has been suspended two games for entering crowd during verbal confrontation with fans Saturday night in Philadelphia.
G League guard Gary Payton II is close to a contract with the Washington Wizards, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Payton didn’t play in Showcase game today in Las Vegas.
Dallas Mavericks star Luka Doncic is closing in on a lucrative multi-year endorsement deal with Jordan Brand, sources tell me and @tim_cato.
Sources: NBA's in-season tournament format proposal: All 30 teams involved from late Nov. to mid-Dec.: - Divisional games (4 home, 4 away) for group stage - 6 divisional stage winners, plus 2 wildcards for knockout - Quarterfinals at home market; semifinals/Finals at neutral site
Sources: NBA has sent teams the proposal for 2021-22 season changes: - 78-game regular season - In-season tournament ($1M per player, $1.5M coaches pool for champion) - Play-in tourneys for 7-8 playoff seeds - Final 4 reseed in playoffs based on regular season records
Nets G/F David Nwaba has suffered a torn right Achilles tendon, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Nwaba has been emerging in Nets rotation before sudden injury tonight.
James Wiseman began informing Memphis coaches in recent days about decision to leave school and sign with an agent. Penny Hardaway pushed hard and attempted to keep his star recruit. After 12-game suspension and $11,500 charity fee discipline, Wiseman is gone from NCAA.
Potential No. 1 pick James Wiseman of Memphis has left the university, will sign with an agent and begin preparing for 2020 NBA draft.
Sit-down with Clippers' @teamlou23 and @MONSTATREZZ on @Stadium: Their bond pre/post-CP3 trade — Sixth Men Extraordinaire at different career points — Lou Will seeing "superstar" legacy for Harrell, who relishes Sixth Man role — and more.
Jazz guard Mike Conley Jr. is expected to miss multiple games with his reaggravated left hamstring and could miss multiple weeks, league sources tell me and @Tjonesonthenba.
David Blatt has retired from coaching after 26 professional seasons to take Knicks front-office position. He has strong relationships with Knicks executives Steve Mills and Craig Robinson.
The Knicks have hired former Cavaliers coach David Blatt as a basketball operations consultant.
NBA G League president Shareef Abdur-Rahim on G League players seriously discussing union: "We support the players’ right to unionize." Story:
Story on @TheAthleticNBA: In first step toward potential collective bargaining, the NBA G League’s players and NBPA are in serious talks about unionizing.
Bucks guard Eric Bledsoe will be sidelined for two weeks with a right fibula evulsion fracture.
The Portland Trail Blazers have applied for a disabled player exception worth $2.85M for the season-ending loss of Rodney Hood, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
NBA commissioner Adam Silver: “NBA Commissioner Emeritus David Stern suffered a sudden brain hemorrhage earlier today for which he underwent emergency surgery. Our thoughts and prayers are with David and his family.”
Miami’s Dion Waiters has been suspended for six games for failure to adhere to team policies, violation of team rules and continued insubordination. Waiters third team suspension this season.
The NBA will launch a G League team in Mexico starting the 2020-21 season. Commissioner Adam Silver is announcing the news in his press conference shortly.
The Brooklyn Nets are waiving guard Iman Shumpert, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Nets were 9-4 with Shumpert and reluctantly released him due to full roster guarantees.
The Lakers are waiving guard Zach Norvell Jr. and signing forward Devontae Cacok to a two-way contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Bucks' Giannis Antetokounmpo is out tonight against New Orleans due to right quad tendon soreness.
The NBA has disciplined the three referees from the Rockets/Spurs Dec. 3 game for misapplying the coach’s challenge, and will work with the Competition Committee to develop additional procedures to help prevent the situation.
NBA statement on Rockets protest denied from Spurs loss on Dec. 3: “Commissioner Silver determined that the Rockets had sufficient time to overcome the error” when James Harden’s dunk, with 7:50 remaining and 102-89 lead, did not count.
The NBA has denied the Houston Rockets of their protest of loss to the San Antonio Spurs.
The Memphis Grizzlies say former No. 4 overall pick Josh Jackson will not play in G League game today due to violation of team rules.
Portland’s Rodney Hood has suffered a torn left Achilles tendon.
The Knicks are promoting former NBA veteran Keith Bogans from the G League coaching staff to NBA head coaching staff under interim Mike Miller, per sources.
The Knicks are naming assistant Mike Miller as the interim head coach, per league sources.
Warriors’ Stephen Curry has undergone a second surgery on his broken left hand to remove pins from first procedure, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Curry is still on track to be re-evaluated in February.
Story with @JoeVardon: Cleveland Cavaliers players bristling over first-year coach Jon Beilein running team like college program. Details on @TheAthleticNBA:
On @TheAthleticNBA: How Kristaps Porzingis has changed his game for the rising Mavericks. “It’s not easy. But when we’re winning.. it’s fun and that’s all that matters. Most nights, we give Luka the ball and let him f------ go.”
Grizzlies rookie Ja Morant will be listed week-to-week due to aggravated back spasms, with a period of "short-term off-loading" needed.
Nets' Kyrie Irving will miss Friday's game against Boston in Brooklyn.
The NBA has removed center Timofey Mozgov’s $16.7M salary from Orlando’s salary books via career-ending injury/illness application, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. The Magic stretched-and-waived Mozgov in July.
“Sometimes guys will take nights off. I’m taking their lunch that day, f'sho.” Meet Heat's Kendrick Nunn (@nunnbetter_): HS ball under Jabari Parker spotlight, rise into ROY candidate, starting for Heat after developing as Lou Will-type in Warriors G League system, more.
The NCAA has upheld its 12-game suspension and $11,500 donation discipline for Memphis' James Wiseman after the school appealed. He will cleared to play on Jan. 12.
Celtics star Kemba Walker (neck) is probable to return against the Nets on Wednesday.
Carmelo Anthony on @TheAthletic: Wanting to play more seasons, validation, journey to Portland, why he refused to ask friends such as LeBron/Wade for a job, more.
Anthony Davis on his New Orleans return Wednesday and one thing he’d redo in final days as a Pelican: “That’s a game of the year for me. New Orleans is a part of me.” From my sit-down with the Lakers star on @Stadium.
NBA's Players of the Week for week five: Brooklyn's Spencer Dinwiddie and Dallas' Luka Doncic.
Celtics star Kemba Walker is listed doubtful to play against Sacramento on Monday with a neck sprain. Walker was diagnosed with concussion-like symptoms after scary injury in Denver.
Zach LaVine's response to being called out by his coach on Friday: 49 points, 13 three-pointers and improbable win in Charlotte. Message from LaVine around Bulls on Saturday was: No drama. Let's ball. He did.
Lakers guard Rajon Rondo has been fined $35,000 for making “unsportsmanlike” physical contact with OKC’s Dennis Schroder, verbal abuse of referee and failing to leave court in timely manner Friday night.
Clippers guard Patrick Beverley has been fined $5,000 by the NBA for violating the anti-flopping rules for the second time this season.
Tests on Kemba Walker so far have had clean results, Brad Stevens told reporters in Denver.
Kemba Walker has been transported to a hospital for further evaluation. Scary injury for Walker that the Celtics are calling concussion-like symptoms.
Celtics star Kemba Walker has been diagnosed with concussion-like symptoms.
Sources: 76ers G/F Josh Richardson will miss tonight's game against the Spurs and is expected to be a game-time decision on Saturday in his first game vs. the Heat since being traded for Jimmy Butler.
Orlando Magic All-Star center Nikola Vucevic will miss a minimum of four weeks with right ankle injury, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
NCAA also says Wiseman "must donate $11,500 to a charity of his choice." Wiseman will be cleared to play on Jan. 12 at South Florida.
The NCAA has suspended potential No. 1 pick James Wiseman of Memphis for 12 total games and will clear him on Jan. 12.
NBA hired legal counsel in dealing with Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie’s model to convert $34.4M deal into investment vehicle — with Dinwiddie's plans to move forward subject to discipline. Full story on @TheAthleticNBA:
Carmelo Anthony will wear No. 00 in Portland.
Sources: After passing his physical exam, Carmelo Anthony signed his one-year, non-guaranteed deal with Portland today. It will be worth $2.15M should he remain on roster past guarantee date in January.
Evaluations on Clippers star Kawhi Leonard did not show any further seriousness to left knee contusion, and he is day-to-day in return, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Kings Buddy Hield has been fined $25,000 for kicking ball into stands after win over Boston.
Nets star Kyrie Irving will miss his second straight game tonight against Indiana with right shoulder injury.
The Houston Rockets are waiving forward Ryan Anderson, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Tim Duncan took over as Spurs acting head coach after Gregg Popovich’s ejection, Popovich says. Duncan led huddles along with Becky Hammon and Will Hardy, and helped draw plays and defensive switches.
Lakers guard Avery Bradley has suffered a hairline fracture in his right leg and will be re-evaluated in 1-to-2 weeks.
Nets Caris LeVert has undergone surgery to repair ligament damage in his right thumb. He’s expected to miss several weeks.
Lawyers for potential No. 1 pick James Wiseman have issued the following statement on withdrawing lawsuit against the NCAA and Memphis.
Memphis’ James Wiseman — a potential No. 1 overall NBA pick — has withdrawn his lawsuit against Memphis and NCAA and is awaiting an NCAA resolution, his attorneys told @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Lakers star Anthony Davis (@AntDavis23) sits down for @Stadium video interview: Lessons from LeBron — love toward NOLA and emotional return game Nov. 27 — his biggest regret with Pelicans exit — when he almost quit basketball — Chicago legacy and more.
Anthony Davis on believing he would split Lakers option No. 1 duties 50-50 — before LeBron James delivered a message to him. Full @AntDavis23 sit-down for @Stadium coming up.
The Brooklyn Nets fear guard Caris LeVert has ligament damage in his right thumb and he is visiting specialists for further evaluation, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Timetable expected for Eric Gordon's absence from Rockets lineup: Up to six weeks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Houston fears guard Eric Gordon needs surgery on his knee that would sideline him at least one month, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Gordon gathering more information today for final decision, but leaning toward clean-up procedure, per sources.
The Pacers have assigned All-Star guard Victor Oladipo to G League affiliate Fort Wayne as Oladipo continues to make good progress from knee injury, per league sources. Allows Oladipo to get practice run today. No return timetable.
After less than two months, the Nets and new CEO David Levy have mutually parted ways.
For clarity: Fox’s re-evaluation will come in 3-to-4 weeks. It is a Grade 3 sprain for Fox, as @TheAthleticNBA’s @mr_jasonjones reports. Kings will be cautious with Fox’s recovery and return.
Kings rising star De’Aaron Fox will miss approximately 3-to-4 weeks with a sprained left ankle.
Celtics Gordon Hayward will miss six weeks after undergoing surgery on his broken left hand.
Khris Middleton will miss 3-to-4 weeks with a left thigh contusion, per league sources.
Bucks All-Star forward Khris Middleton is expected to miss several weeks with a left leg injury, but no serious damage in the leg, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Heat believe Waiters was given the “gummy” by a teammate, but Waiters has been reluctant and has decided not to say who provided it, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Waiters has had a tumultuous series of events with Miami this season.
Miami has levied a 10-game suspension on Waiters for “conduct detrimental to the team” off heels of incident where he had taken one gummy prior to boarding team plane, per sources.
Miami’s Dion Waiters has been suspended 10 games without pay, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Boston Celtics guard Gordon Hayward has suffered a fractured left hand.
Potential No. 1 NBA pick James Wiseman is now eligible to play for Memphis, pending further legal proceedings, attorney Leslie Ballin tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
NBA statement on Kawhi Leonard and the Clippers, in part: "The team has reasonably determined that Leonard is suffering from an ongoing injury to the patella tendon in his left knee and has been placed by the team at this time on an injury protocol for back-to-back games."
The Los Angeles Clippers have been fined $50,000 for statements that were inconsistent with Kawhi Leonard's health status
Detroit Pistons' Blake Griffin has been cleared for all basketball activities and will be listed day-to-day.
76ers star Ben Simmons has minor sprain of AC joint in right shoulder, re-evaluation coming Thursday in Denver.
Raptors guard/forward Pat McCaw will undergo surgery on his left knee and miss several weeks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Portland F/C Zach Collins will be sidelined at least four months after undergoing shoulder surgery.
On @TheAthleticNBA: Detroit star Blake Griffin feels “very close” on return to Pistons lineup — reflects about excitement to play again, his regimen and having no regrets over playing with torn meniscus in playoffs.
NBA's East and West players of the week for Oct. 28-Nov. 3: Bucks' Giannis Antetokounmpo and Lakers' Anthony Davis.
Sources: NBA teams received memo on Saturday that the fan who assaulted Pelicans assistant coach Joe Boylan on the court in Houston on Oct. 26 has been banned from all NBA, WNBA, G League and 2K League events. An NBA spokesperson confirmed the ban.
Detroit Pistons guard Reggie Jackson has a stress reaction in his lower back and will be out for at least four weeks.
Golden State Warriors star Stephen Curry will be re-evaluated in three months after surgery on his broken left hand, team says.
NBA officially suspends All-Stars Joel Embiid and Karl-Anthony Towns for on-court altercation -- plus for "their continued escalation following the incident." Embiid and Towns exchanged posts on social media, hours after the game.
All parties viewed Simmons as a peacemaker in scuffle. Simmons was seen on top of Towns, calming him down with with his arms.
NBA suspensions from 76ers/Timberwolves scuffle, per sources: Joel Embiid, 2 games; Karl-Anthony Towns, 2 games. No fine for Ben Simmons.
Pacers center Myles Turner has been listed week-to-week with a sprained right ankle.
The Golden State Warriors are picking up guard Jacob Evans’ third-year team option for next season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Stephen Curry has suffered a broken left hand, Warriors say. Brutal loss for Golden State.
Pacers’ Myles Turner has been diagnosed with a sprained right ankle — and he’s not likely to return tonight against Nets, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Lakers forward Kyle Kuzma will make his season debut on Friday against the Mavericks in Dallas, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Positive sign, as Kuzma will be eased back into Lakers rotation.
Hawks Trae Young will miss Thursday’s game against Miami and return to the court next week, league sources say. Best case scenario for Young and the Hawks.
Jazz rising star Donovan Mitchell wondered last year: “Was I just a one-year hit and out?” Mitchell on @TheAthleticNBA: Lessons/stardom early in career, teammates having his back, choosing the type of leader he wants to be, more.
Hawks’ Trae Young faces missing possible two weeks with right ankle sprain, with MRI coming Wednesday, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Atlanta is expected to be cautious with its rising young star.
The NCAA says it is now modernizing its rules toward likeness opportunities for athletes and will start to make new changes immediately, but no later than January 2021.
The NCAA says it has started process to give student-athletes the opportunity to benefit from their name, image and likeness. “We must embrace change” NCAA says in release.
NBA's East and West Players of the Week for the first week of the season: Atlanta's Trae Young and Minnesota's Karl-Anthony Towns.
Northern Arizona, the Phoenix Suns G League affiliate, is selecting Anthony Lawrence with the No. 1 overall pick in the G League draft, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Wizards had applied for a $9.2M DPE due to loss of John Wall, who has been expected to miss the season rehabbing from a torn Achillies.
The NBA has denied the Washington Wizards request for a Disabled Player Exception for injured All-Star John Wall, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Kings Marvin Bagley III will miss four-to-six weeks with a fractured right thumb.
The Milwaukee Bucks are picking up 2018 first-rounder Donte DiVincenzo’s third-year team option worth $3M, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Charlotte Hornets forward Nicolas Batum has suffered a broken middle finger in his hand, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Clippers guard Pat Beverley has been fined $25,000 by NBA for throwing ball into the crowd Tuesday night against the Lakers.
Rabb will sign a two-way deal, reuniting with his former coach in Memphis, David Fizdale, and with a potential opportunity in Knicks frontcourt.
Forward Ivan Rabb is finalizing a two-way NBA contract with the New York Knicks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Detroit Pistons' Blake Griffin (hamstring, knee) will be sidelined through the first week of November.
Moment Zion Williamson and the Pelicans decided to receive MRI on right knee: Zion reported tightness in knee Wednesday — three days after 20-10 game and one day after full practice day. More in @TheAthleticNBA on Williamson’s current state and future:
Inside the moment that led Zion Williamson and Pelicans to get a precautionary MRI resulting in torn meniscus — and New Orleans’ mindset on the prized rookie’s unique frame. Story on @TheAthletic:
Spurs guard Dejounte Murray has signed a multi-million dollar shoe endorsement deal with New Balance, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. His Spurs deal also can reach $70M with incentives ($64M guaranteed).
Sources: Denver's Malik Beasley and Juancho Hernangomez are not expected to reach agreements by 6 p.m. ET deadline. All sides showed effort in talks, and Nuggets were aggressive in making offers to find deals. Both talented young players are headed for RFA.
Sources: The Sacramento Kings have claimed DaQuan Jeffries off free agency waivers. The undrafted F out of Tulsa was waived by Orlando on Saturday.
The Cleveland Cavaliers are claiming former Warriors forward Alfonzo McKinnie off free agency waivers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Pelicans rookie star Zion Williamson underwent arthroscopic surgery for torn meniscus in right knee and will be out 6-to-8 weeks.
Spurs have viewed Dejounte Murray as a cornerstone, and sides lock in long-term deal that banks on the point guard's development after he missed last season with torn ACL and averaged 8pts/5.7rebs/2.85asts in 2017-18.
San Antonio Spurs guard Dejounte Murray has agreed to a four-year, $64M fully guaranteed contract extension, agent Rich Paul tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Pacers are making Sabonis the full-time starter this season alongside Myles Turner, and have been excited about re-signing the F/C to maintain core that includes Victor Oladipo, Malcolm Brogdon and Turner.
Clarification: Domas Sabonis-Pacers deal is $74.9M. Pacers made it a priority to keep Sabonis -- and got it done.
Indiana Pacers center Domas Sabonis has agreed to a four-year, $79.4M contract extension, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Minnesota has waived guard Ty Wallace, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The New York Knicks are picking up former No. 8 overall pick Frank Ntilikina’s 2020-21 option worth $6.3 million, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Jalen McDaniels, the 52nd overall pick in June’s NBA draft, has agreed to a partially guaranteed multiyear deal with the Hornets to finalize their 15-man roster. The 6-foot-10 F McDaniels’ length and upside intrigues Charlotte.
The Rockets are signing guard Michael Fraizer to a two-way NBA contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Undrafted rookie Caleb Martin has agreed to a partially guaranteed three-year deal with the Charlotte Hornets, meaning Twin brothers Cody and Caleb will now be together on Hornets regular-season roster, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Raptors star Pascal Siakam's four-year, $130M maximum deal with Toronto does not include any player or team options.
The Memphis Grizzlies are waiving forward Ivan Rabb and center Miles Plumlee, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The Golden State Warriors are waiving forward Alfonzo McKinnie, clearing way for Marquese Chriss to make regular-season roster. McKinnie will be one of the top available players on market.
The Los Angeles Lakers have exercised forward Kyle Kuzma's 2020-21 team option.
Luol Deng has retired from basketball after 15 NBA seasons and signed a contract to retire as a Chicago Bull. The two-time All-Star spent his first nine-plus seasons in Chicago and then played for Miami, Lakers and Minnesota.
Former No. 2 pick Hasheem Thabeet has signed a contract in the NBA G League, source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Rockets fear that Gerald Green's broken foot is worse than initially expected and fear he'll miss the season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Oregon projected NBA lottery pick N'Faly Dante has been informed he will be ineligible to start season because the NCAA missed his clearance date, @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium has learned. Dante, a 6’11 big man out of Mali, says he will now reenroll at Oregon on Dec. 14.
The Boston Celtics have exercised forward Jayson Tatum's $9.9M fourth-year team option, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Critical third season coming for Tatum.
Reporting on @TheAthletic: Inside the chaotic week for Lakers, Nets and NBA amid China conflict — including spirited dialogue between Adam Silver and the players, and a LeBron James-led players-only meeting among both teams.
Houston Rockets guard Gerald Green is believed to have suffered a broken left foot and could be sidelined a few months, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Green will have more opinions on his foot this week and be out indefinitely.
The Boston Celtics are signing two-way guard Max Strus to a two-year NBA deal, with a partial guarantee this season of nearly half of rookie minimum, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Initial exams on Lakers star Anthony Davis' right thumb showed no ligament damage, believed to be a Grade 1 sprain, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Davis will undergo an MRI on Sunday.
Lonzo Ball on @TheAthleticNBA: "No. 2 pick, you're supposed to do a job. You're supposed to turn the franchise around. I don't think I did it to the best of my abilities." Ball on his Lakers seasons, new opportunity and jump shot, LaMelo, more:
The Suns have picked up third-year options on 2018 No. 1 overall pick Deandre Ayton and forward Mikal Bridges, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Phoenix has raved about Ayton throughout summer as he enters sophomore season.
Bucks guard Eric Bledsoe has suffered a small fracture of his rib and will miss up to two-to-three weeks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Rockets have claimed forward Ray Spalding off free agency waivers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Second transaction this week for Houston, after waiving former No. 1 pick Anthony Bennett.
The Indiana Pacers have exercised guard Aaron Holiday's third-year team option, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Holiday was Indiana's first-round pick in 2018 and Pacers believe in his potential as he assumes backup PG duties this season.
As of now, all indications are that the Lakers/Nets game in China on Thursday will go on as scheduled, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Houston Rockets have waived former No. 1 overall pick Anthony Bennett, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Adam Silver has released statement on league’s relationship status with China, reading in part: “The NBA will not put itself in a position of regulating what players, employees and team owners say or will not say on these issues. We simply could not operate that way.”
NBA teams have been informed that they are permitted to scout practices with first-round prospect RJ Hampton of NBL New Zealand in Memphis this week, clearing way to do same for LaMelo Ball later too, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: In response to social media events over weekend, China (Chinese Basketball Association) has canceled NBA G League’s planned exhibition games between Rockets affiliate (Rio Grande Valley) and Dallas Mavericks affiliate (Texas) scheduled later this month in China.
NBA is not disciplining Rockets GM Daryl Morey for his social media post, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Morey also issued apology tonight.
NBA spokesman Mike Bass releases statement from league on Rockets GM Daryl Morey’s situation.
Candid Joel Embiid/Ben Simmons in @Stadium sit-down. Embiid on Game 7 loss to TOR, importance of title: “Me personally, I know I didn’t show up. I can’t blame that I wasn’t feeling well. I know I didn't do what I could do..."
The Lakers have signed guard David Stockton, son of Hall of Famer John Stockton.
The Denver Nuggets are signing 3-year NBA vet Elijah Millsap -- brother of Nuggets' forward Paul Millsap -- to a training camp deal, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Video sit-down with 76ers stars Joel Embiid and Ben Simmons: Getting over Game 7 loss — motivation/maturing/pressure as foundation of franchise — their relationship (“On court, we want to win. Off court, Jo does his thing, I do my thing”) — and more.
Among more within Inside Pass on @TheAthletic: After meeting with NBA, Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie plans to move forward with using his contract for first-ever, pro athlete digital investment vehicle.
Sources on Inside Pass in @TheAthletic: Spurs and DeMar DeRozan discussing contract extension as DeRozan focuses on season; Raptors rising star Pascal Siakam seeks max deal in extension talks. More here:
Lakers forward Kyle Kuzma (@kylekuzma) has signed a five-year endorsement deal with Puma, becoming a face of the company, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie and NBA have scheduled a meeting this week to discuss his plan to convert his NBA contract into an investment vehicle, which the league has objected to. Last week, Dinwiddie explained his plan to @TheAthletic:
Sources with @Rockets_Insider, @KellyIkoNBA: Rockets star Russell Westbrook is expected to sit first two preseason games and make his Houston debut when team plays Toronto Oct. 8 and 10 in Japan.
So, yes, the NBA is creating a new tampering hotline in its fresh guidelines, @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium has learned. The league will also not look to take phones or computers in its investigatory audits.
Additional key points in NBA’s official tampering guidelines sent to teams in memo on Friday: - League will not confiscate phone/computer during its five random audits. - New hotline created to allow teams and others with information to anonymously report potential violations.
The NBA has sent memo to teams with official tampering guidelines; some key points: - Conduct from player inducing another player to demand trade will be violative of tampering. - Isolated comments by team official praising another player will no longer be regarded as violation.
Sources: The Memphis Grizzlies and former No. 4 pick Josh Jackson have agreed for him not to join the team in training camp, and start the season in the NBA G League.
Sit-down @Stadium interview with @DwightHoward: On believing he would never be a Laker again, battling LeBron for years and now teammates, playing center next to Anthony Davis (or even being the water boy) and much more.
What exactly is Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie (@SDinwiddie_25) doing by turning his $34M contract into a public, digital investment platform ($SD8)? He explains in @TheAthleticNBA:
Free agent forward Ryan Anderson has agreed to a significantly partially guaranteed deal with the Houston Rockets, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Anderson returns to Houston.
Former Clippers/T’Wolves forward CJ Williams has agreed to a non-guaranteed deal with the Nets, and Brooklyn is progressing on deal to sign ex-Knicks F Lance Thomas too, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Brookyn’s Kyrie Irving has been diagnosed with a left side facial fracture and will be day-to-day.
Free agent Jaron Blossomgame has agreed to a training camp deal with the Houston Rockets, agent Andy Shiffman tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Fine is in response to Bucks GM Jon Horst recently saying Giannis Antetokounmpo will be offered the five-year, nearly $250M supermax next summer when he is eligible for extension.
The Milwaukee Bucks have been fined $50,000 by the NBA for violating league rules governing timing of player contract comments, when team spoke publicly about offering Giannis Antetokounmpo the super max.
The NBA has awarded the Pelicans the $3.625M Disabled Player Exception for loss of Darius Miller, league sources say.
Story with @JoshuaBRobbins on @TheAthleticNBA: Orlando and No. 16 pick Chuma Okeke agree to draft-and-stash plan that will have him sign a G League contract this season and sign rookie deal during 2020 offseason.
Former Nets guard and Loyola Rambler Milton Doyle has agreed to a partially guaranteed deal with the Chicago Bulls, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Former NBA player Andre Emmett, who played two seasons with the Nets and Grizzlies, was murdered this morning in Dallas. Emmett recently became a father. He played at Texas Tech and was No. 36 pick in 2004 draft. RIP.
Redshirt year for Okeke includes signing his four-year rookie deal in 2020 offseason.
Sources: The Orlando Magic plan to redshirt No. 16 overall pick Chuma Okeke this season. Creative move by both sides allows Okeke to focus on ACL rehab while still being in team's long-term plans and receiving salary of 16th pick.
Rockets are no longer able to use Nene’s full $10M salary as trade chip, per league and union agreement. Houston signed Nene, discussed similar proposal for Iman Shumpert, potentially to move for someone like Andre Iguodala. Nene still has opportunity to earn $7.4M in bonuses.
The NBA and Players Association has made ruling on Nene’s two-year, $20M deal to return to Rockets: Contract will keep its $2.6M base but will exclude the “likely” bonuses of more than $7M per year as a salary in a trade, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Lakers have been granted a disabled player exception worth $1.75M from the NBA for the expected season-ending ACL injury to DeMarcus Cousins, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. It expires on March 10, 2020.
Washington Wizards guard Isaiah Thomas underwent surgery to repair a ligament in his left thumb and will be sidelined 6-to-8 weeks.
The New Orleans Pelicans have applied for a $3.625M disabled player exception from the NBA for the projected season-ending loss of Darius Miller, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
After months of discussions, free agent Iman Shumpert has decided to decline the Rockets' contract offer, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Shumpert will not attend team minicamp this week in Las Vegas.
NBA informed teams of a $125M salary cap in summer of 2021 -- when LeBron James, Kawhi Leonard, Giannis Antetokounmpo and Paul George are potential free agents.
The NBA has informed teams of currently projected salary cap and tax level in 2020-21 ($116M/$141M) and 2021-22 ($125M/$151M), sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. It is $1M lower for '20-21 and unchanged for '21-22 based on previous projections.
As part of potential new guidelines, NBA owners must personally certify that every contract complies with all rules, per sources. Teams would be required to report, within 24 hours, of a player/agent soliciting unauthorized benefits or contact regarding contract matters.
The NBA Board of Governors will vote on Sept. 20 to pass new action items that have been advised across the board, from committees and league office.
Further proposed rules as NBA works to crack down on tampering: increased enforcement of existing rule prohibiting player-to-player tampering; require team governor to certify no unauthorized benefits were offered/provided; investigatory audits of 5 teams annually, at random.
Proposed increases in NBA’s maximum fine penalties for tampering and cap circumvention, @TheAthletic @Stadium has learned: - Tampering with player/team personnel: $10M, up from $5M. - Unauthorized agreements: $6M for team; $250K for player.
In an effort to prevent tampering, NBA sent memo to teams about improving compliance, @TheAthletic @Stadium has learned. Memo proposes that a lead team ops member certify annually that it didn’t engage in impermissible free agency talks; max fine amounts raised significantly.
In a first for a pro athlete, Brooklyn Nets' Spencer Dinwiddie (@SDinwiddie_25) is turning his NBA contract into a digital investment vehicle, @TheAthleticNBA has learned. More on this here:
Joe Johnson, a seven-time All-Star, is the first player to land an NBA deal out of Ice Cube’s BIG3 league. Johnson is a reigning BIG3 championship and MVP award-winner.
Joe Johnson has agreed to a partially guaranteed one-year deal with the Detroit Pistons, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Marcus Smart underwent X-rays on a left knuckle injury this week that came back negative, but soreness in the hand along with quad/calf soreness led to the decision to shut him down.
Celtics guard Marcus Smart has been shut down for Team USA’s remaining games, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Smart wanted to play in final two USA games, but is nursing minor injuries and decision was made to avoid further injury.
Iguodala is VP of NBPA, one of league’s most respected and desires a contender at this stage. Young, rebuilding Grizzlies received a valuable 2024 1st from Golden State in Iguodala trade, and after Dwight Howard buyout, were expected to eventually have same talks with Iguodala.
Sources: Memphis wants three-time champion Andre Iguodala to report to training camp and is refusing right now to engage in buyout, which would prevent Iguodala from finishing a Hall of Fame career on his terms because this may be his final NBA season.
The Los Angeles Lakers have applied for a $1.75M disabled player exception from the NBA for their projected season-ending injury to DeMarcus Cousins, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Antonio Blakeney and the Bulls reached agreement on a contract buyout today, sources said, allowing him to be a free agent after clearing waivers.
The Chicago Bulls and guard Antonio Blakeney are parting ways, with the team planning to release him, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
In August, the NCAA reversed its requirement for player agents to have bachelor's degree -- six hours after an op-ed in @TheAthletic. Now, agents -- both top and small firms -- are preparing not to participate in NCAA's in-person exam on Nov. 6 in Indianapolis.
Sources: There are NBA representation agencies -- from major firms to others -- planning to boycott the NCAA’s new mandatory agent testing in Indianapolis. NCAA sent memo to agents today about Sept. 30 deadline to apply but there are top agencies not planning to participate.
The Boston Celtics are signing former Xavier forward Kaiser Gates to a training camp contract to compete for the 15th roster spot along with Tacko Fall and others, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Denver Nuggets No. 44 pick Bol Bol has signed his rookie contract, a two-way NBA deal, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent guard Kobi Simmons has agreed to a one-year deal with the Charlotte Hornets, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Simmons will compete for a reserve PG spot in camp.
Houston Rockets guard Eric Gordon has agreed to a four-year, $76M maximum contract extension, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The Chinese Basketball Association is implementing new guideline barring a player under a drug- or violence-related ban/suspension in another league from signing in the CBA. The rule would impact a free agent such as 10-year NBA veteran Tyreke Evans.
The Dallas Mavericks have claimed undrafted Mississippi State center Aric Holman off free agency waivers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. The Lakers waived Holman to create roster space to sign Dwight Howard.
NBA spokesman Mike Bass statement on DeMarcus Cousins situation: “We are aware of the report regarding DeMarcus Cousins and are investigating the allegations.”
Sources: Dwight Howard has cleared waivers and is signing his new Los Angeles Lakers contract now. Howard plans to wear No. 39 as a Laker next season.
Dwight Howard met Lakers officials and three key players when he visited facility on Thursday: AD, JaVale and Rondo. They wanted to know if they could trust him. They left convinced of the new Howard. @TheAthleticNBA story inside Howard’s return to LA:
Impromptu meetings with Jason Kidd. Surprise visit to Lakers facility the day before his scheduled workout. How Dwight Howard convinced the Lakers — and himself — on the eight-time All-Star’s reunion in Los Angeles, on @TheAthleticNBA:
Dwight Howard’s agent, Charles Briscoe of Briscoe Sports Group, has completed buyout with Grizzlies officials, and Howard will sign with the Lakers once he clears waivers, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Dwight Howard is on his way back to the Los Angeles Lakers, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Dwight Howard is finalizing contract buyout with Memphis and plans to sign with the Los Angeles Lakers as free agent, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The NBA and Sacramento Kings have closed investigation of head coach Luke Walton regarding improper behavior, determining that there was not sufficient basis to support the allegations made against Walton.
After he and the Lakers could not agree to terms on a head coaching contract in May, Ty Lue — the 2016 Cavaliers title-winning coach — reunites with Doc Rivers in L.A.
Former Cavaliers championship coach Ty Lue has agreed on deal to join the Los Angeles Clippers as the top assistant coach on Doc Rivers’ staff, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Grizzlies are granting the Los Angeles Lakers permission to speak with Dwight Howard, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Lakers have been patient in approach since Cousins' injury, and another accomplished veteran center on the market is Joakim Noah. Howard is expected to be eventually released by Memphis.
The Lakers are expected to request permission soon to speak to Dwight Howard and there's mutual interest between the eight-time All-Star and L.A. in wake of DeMarcus Cousins' torn ACL, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The San Antonio Spurs will retire Tony Parker's No. 9 jersey on Nov. 11.
Houston’s PJ Tucker is withdrawing from USA Basketball ahead of FIBA World Cup because of an ankle injury, and will prepare for Rockets training camp, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
DeMarcus Cousins -- a four-time NBA All-Star -- will undergo final tests that are expected to confirm the torn ACL diagnosis, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Los Angeles Lakers center DeMarcus Cousins has suffered a torn ACL in his knee, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Other NBA schedule facts: Back-to-backs are at a historic low — for fifth straight season (teams will average 12.4 this season, down from 13.3 last season.) Five games in seven nights also have been reduced 9.5 percent.
Sources: The NBA has reduced number of LA Lakers games with 10:30 pm ET start time from 19 to 10. The Warriors were reduced from 18 to 11.
After eight seasons and three All-Star games with the Hornets, new Celtics star Kemba Walker will make first return to Charlotte on Nov. 7, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Six hours after agent Rich Paul’s piece in @TheAthletic, the NCAA has amended its criteria and no longer requires a bachelor’s degree for NCAA agents. Here is link to today’s piece:
The NCAA has amended the agent certification requirement for those who want to represent college players — allowing a waiver for bachelor’s degree, and being in good standing with the NBPA.
Sources: Marquee slate of NBA games on Martin Luther King Jr. Day, Jan. 20, for the 2019-20 season schedule most notably include: Golden State vs. Portland, Lakers vs. Boston, Houston vs. Oklahoma City.
Agent Rich Paul authors powerful piece in @TheAthletic on so-called “Rich Paul Rules” — NCAA’s new certification requirement for agents to hold a bachelor’s degree.
EXCLUSIVELY on @TheAthletic and unlocked for everyone today: Agent Rich Paul of Klutch Sports authors op-ed regarding the NCAA’s new agent certification requirements that were dubbed “The Rich Paul Rule.”
Undrafted Mississippi State guard Lamar Peters has agreed to a non-guaranteed contract with the New York Knicks, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
After 5-game suspension from NBA on Thursday for failed drug test from last fall, Michael Beasley plans to sign deal that gives him legitimate opportunity to make Pistons roster, sources said. Beasley joins Derrick Rose (No. 1) on Detroit as top two picks in 2008 draft.
Free agent Michael Beasley has agreed to a one-year deal with the Detroit Pistons, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Lakers' @kylekuzma tells @TheAthleticNBA: "Playing with LeBron, with AD, I got high dreams for myself to do some pretty special things in my career. So that's motivation in itself. It’s a testament to my work ethic."
Hibbert, 32, has transitioned into coaching and gets his start on 76ers' development staff. Hibbert was the anchor of the Pacers' defense during four consecutive playoff seasons from 2011-14 -- including back-to-back Eastern Conference Finals berths.
The Philadelphia 76ers have hired nine-year NBA center Roy Hibbert — a two-time All-Star with Indiana — to a player development coaching role, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Source: Michael Beasley’s failed drug test was not recent — it was from October/November 2018 during sabbatical with the Lakers, when his mom was dying with cancer.
As Lakers search for chemistry, which could form at LeBron’s players-only camp ahead of the regular season, Kyle Kuzma tells @TheAthleticNBA: “Bench, whatever, I’m still going to get my game off regardless.” Link to full sitdown:
Beasley, the former No. 2 overall pick in 2008 NBA Draft, has gone unsigned since being traded by the Lakers and waived at trade deadline. If Beasley were to sign an NBA contract, his suspension would commence during that season.
Free agent Michael Beasley has been suspended five games by the NBA for violating anti-drug policy.
The Toronto Raptors are expected to receive their championship rings on opening night, Oct. 22, hosting New Orleans and No. 1 pick Zion Williamson. Some other notable games, per sources:
The NBA will release its 2019-20 schedule on Monday at 3 p.m. ET.
Sources: 2019 NBA G League rookie of the year Angel Delgado has signed a one-year, $4.3M deal with the Beijing Royal Fighters of the Chinese Basketball Association. Delgado was on a two-way deal with the Clippers last season.
Details on Lakers’ LeBron James organizing team minicamp in September ahead of LAL training camp.
“Tough days, f—ing tough days” — new Celtics star Kemba Walker. Story on @TheAthleticNBA on Walker’s process leaving Charlotte, turning down Hornets offer (specific numbers), relishing joining Cs roster that lost Kyrie Irving and more.
Forward Udonis Haslem is signing a one-year deal to return to the Miami Heat for a 17th NBA season.
Golden State's Draymond Green has become first Warriors star in dynasty to receive player option on a long-term deal, with ability to opt out of four-year, $100M extension in 2023, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Clippers free agent Sindarius Thornwell has agreed to a one-year deal with the Cleveland Cavaliers, per agent Andy Shiffman (@PriorityBkball) of Priority Sports.
Expected opening night of 2019-20 NBA season: Oct. 22, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Planned games for opening night: Los Angeles Lakers/LA Clippers and Toronto Raptors/New Orleans Pelicans.
Sources: Utah Jazz guard Mike Conley Jr. — the former Grizzlies franchise star — will return to Memphis to face his former team on Nov. 15.
Sources: Dallas Mavericks All-Star Kristaps Porzingis makes his return to New York on Nov. 14 to play the Knicks at Madison Square Garden. Porzingis signed a new five-year, $158M maximum deal with Dallas this summer.
Sources: Notable superstar return games on 2019-20 NBA schedule: Clippers’ Kawhi Leonard at Toronto: Dec. 11 Lakers Anthony Davis at New Orleans: Nov. 27 Nets Kyrie Irving at Boston: Nov. 27 Rockets’ Russell Westbrook at Oklahoma City: Jan. 9.
Warriors free agent Marcus Derrickson has agreed to a deal (Exhibit 10) with the Atlanta Hawks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Barrett will join Canada for training camp and team activities in Toronto. He's had a decorated young national team career — being one of youngest players to represent Canada, participating in competition the last four summers and helping the program qualify for World Cup.
New York Knicks No. 3 pick RJ Barrett will not play for Canada in the FIBA World Cup due to management of a mild calf strain sustained during Las Vegas summer league, sources told @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Memphis Grizzlies forward Jaren Jackson Jr. has been added to USA Basketball's Select Team for FIBA World Cup training camp.
If New York had landed two major free agents this summer, the franchise had planned to consider bringing back Carmelo Anthony, league sources say. More on @TheAthleticNBA:
On @TheAthleticNBA: Examining 10-time NBA All-Star Carmelo Anthony's basketball future — and although there was some dialogue, per sources, it won't include a return to Team USA.
Sources: Twins Cody and Caleb Martin of Nevada have agreed to rookie contracts with the Charlotte Hornets and will enter NBA together. Cody Martin, the No. 36 pick in June NBA draft, will sign a three-year deal; Caleb Martin will get a partially guaranteed deal.
After working through hiring process, Minnesota is set to officially announce Pistons assistant GM Sachin Gupta as its new Executive Vice President of Basketball Operations. Gupta has also worked for Houston and Philadelphia, becoming well-versed in advanced metrics.
Guard Damion Lee has agreed to a two-way NBA contract to return to the Golden State Warriors, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Pelicans guard JJ Redick had tremendous desire to participate in Team USA training camp for World Cup -- but will not be able to attend, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Redick and his family are transitioning to New Orleans before NBA camp.
Free agent guard Trey Burke has agreed to a one-year deal with the Philadelphia 76ers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Clippers center/forward Montrezl Harrell is appreciative of invitation for USA Basketball's World Cup training camp -- but he is unlikely to attend due to scheduling and upcoming NBA season.
Los Angeles Clippers’ Montrezl Harrell and Denver Nuggets’ Mason Plumlee have been added onto USA Basketball’s training camp roster for World Cup.
Free agent JaKarr Sampson has agreed to a one-year, veteran’s minimum deal with the Indiana Pacers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Team USA still has strong blend of youthful players and veterans; this summer's training camp will provide platform for emerging young players such as Donovan Mitchell, De'Aaron Fox, Jayson Tatum, Kyle Kuzma and Myles Turner, with gritty vets like Lowry, PJ Tucker and Thad Young.
Sources: Cleveland Cavaliers star Kevin Love is expected to withdraw from Team USA's training camp for World Cup. Toronto Raptors All-Star Kyle Lowry remains committed on USA roster and is expected to be recovered from thumb surgery and return midway through camp in L.A.
Undrafted Boston College guard Ky Bowman has signed a two-way NBA contract with the Golden State Warriors, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Guard Brandon Goodwin has agreed to a two-way NBA deal with the Atlanta Hawks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Goodwin played in 16 games for the Nuggets last season.
Pelicans No. 1 overall pick Zion Williamson says he has signed with Jordan Brand.
Sources: San Antonio Spurs DeMar DeRozan was added onto the original USA Basketball roster for World Cup one month ago, but the four-time All-Star has withdrawn from Team USA play this summer to focus on upcoming NBA season.
Trail Blazers All-NBA star Damian Lillard has withdrawn from Team USA’s training camp and FIBA World Cup play this summer, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Boston’s Jaylen Brown and New York’s Julius Randle have been added onto USA Basketball’s training camp roster for World Cup, league sources told @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Team USA assembling young, talented squad comparable to 2010 gold medal team.
Free agent Ben McLemore has agreed to a partially guaranteed two-year deal with the Houston Rockets, league source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
New Knicks F @MookMorris2 opens up on @TheAthleticNBA about free agency process and more: “I have so much respect for Pop, RC, Brian Wright. There was no shade. There’s no disrespect. I had great conversations afterward.”
Chicago Bulls forward Thaddeus Young has been invited to participate on Team USA's training camp roster for World Cup, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Boston Celtics guard Marcus Smart has been added onto USA Basketball’s training camp roster for FIBA World Cup, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Spurs legend Tim Duncan has joined Gregg Popovich's coaching staff as an assistant coach.
In first comments since Spurs-to-Knicks switch, Marcus Morris tells @TheAthleticNBA: “As long as I feel that I’m clear with (Spurs) and gave them my truth, I feel good about moving forward.” Morris on free agency process and mutually parting with agent:
Philadelphia 76ers forward Tobias Harris has withdrawn from USA Basketball’s training camp and FIBA World Cup play to continue focus on preparing for upcoming NBA season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Boston’s Marcus Smart and Jaylen Brown are on Team USA’s short list of potential replacement additions.
Williamson and the Pelicans are focused on having the top pick fully integrated into the franchise and its new additions this offseason -- as quickly as possible. USA has available pool of names to choose from even as players withdraw.
New Orleans Pelicans No. 1 overall pick Zion Williamson has withdrawn from USA Basketball's Select Team for FIBA World Cup training, Team USA director Jerry Colangelo told @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Kostas Antetokounmpo — the younger brother of NBA MVP Giannis Antetokounmpo — heads to the Lakers on a two-way deal.
The Los Angeles Lakers have claimed Kostas Antetokounmpo off free agency waivers, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Guard Frank Mason III has agreed to a two-way NBA contract with the Milwaukee Bucks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Houston Rockets guard Eric Gordon has withdrawn from Team USA training camp and FIBA World Cup this summer, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The Dallas Mavericks have waived forward Kostas Antetokounmpo, who’s on a two-way NBA deal.
Justin Holiday will unite with his brother, Aaron, on Indiana and receive strong opportunity on the Pacers' wing. Aaron Holiday is also expected to make a leap with an elevated role next season.
Free agent Justin Holiday has agreed to a one-year, $4.8M deal with the Indiana Pacers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Guard Josh Gray has agreed to a two-way NBA contract with the New Orleans Pelicans, agent EJ Kusnyer of @beyond_am tells The Athletic and Stadium.
Free agent forward Amile Jefferson has agreed to a one-year deal to return to the Orlando Magic, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Cleveland Cavaliers center Tristan Thompson will not play for the Canadian national team in this summer's FIBA World Cup, agent Rich Paul tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Thompson was named on Canada's training camp roster this week.
JR Smith will have a free-agent meeting with the Bucks today in Milwaukee, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Bucks are searching for a wing shooter and both sides will have opportunity to sit down.
On @TheAthleticNBA: Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie: “If we want a chance at being a team that can go to three Finals in three years when KD comes back, then we’re going to have to start that process now. That starts right now.” Full Podcast link:
Guard Shaquille Harrison is signing a one-year deal to return to the Bulls, league source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Luke Kornet's deal with Chicago: Fully guaranteed two years for $4.5M.
The Detroit Pistons have claimed forward Christian Wood off free agency waivers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
My debut on The Athletic Podcasts, with Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie. Inside his relationship with Kyrie Irving, when their initial dialogue began, how Brooklyn appealed to free agents, 'silver lining' of 2019-20 without Kevin Durant, more.
After a strong summer league, the former OKC Thunder lottery pick receives partial guarantees in first season and an opportunity to compete for reserve PG spot in Toronto.
Guard Cameron Payne has agreed to a two-year deal with the Toronto Raptors, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Marcus Morris has also signed his one-year, $15M contract with the Knicks.
Free agent Reggie Bullock has signed a new two-year deal with the New York Knicks, agent David Bauman tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Bullock and the Knicks reworked his agreement over the last week after unanticipated health issues.
Sources: New Orleans has waived forward Christian Wood.
Smith will now receive $4.4M-plus and become a free agent after nearly five seasons with the Cavs and being part of 2016 title team.
Sources: The Cleveland Cavaliers have waived JR Smith, making him a free agent. Cavs had been attempting to move Smith all the way up until the 5 p.m. ET waiver deadline today.
Philadelphia 76ers star Ben Simmons has agreed to a five-year, $170 million maximum contract extension, agent Rich Paul tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent guard David Nwaba has agreed to a two-year deal with the Brooklyn Nets, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Toronto Raptors and No. 59 overall pick Dewan Hernandez of Miami have agreed to a partially guaranteed three-year rookie deal, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Washington Wizards No. 42 overall pick Admiral Schofield has agreed to a three-year rookie deal, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Former No. 1 pick Anthony Bennett has agreed to a non-guaranteed deal with the Houston Rockets, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Dallas Mavericks star Kristaps Porzingis five-year, $158M maximum contract gives him a player option in the final season in 2023.
Sources: Pick protections in Thunder/Rockets, Russell Westbrook/Chris Paul trade: 2024 first round pick, protected 1-4 2026 first round pick, protected 1-4 2025 swap, 1-20 protected 2021 swap, protected 1-4 -- OKC can swap Clippers pick or Heat pick.
Forward Marcus Morris tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium on reopening his free agency and signing with the Knicks on a one-year, $15M deal: “I had to make this decision based on the best situation for me and my family. This is no knock on the Spurs. I have respect for them.”
Forward Marcus Morris plans to sign a one-year, $15M deal with the New York Knicks, after reopening his agreement with the San Antonio Spurs, source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Free agent Trey Lyles is signing a two-year deal with the Spurs. San Antonio loses Marcus Morris after his week of talks with the Knicks, and signs another top free agent on the market.
Forward Marcus Morris plans to sign a one-year, $15M deal with the New York Knicks, after reopening his agreement with the San Antonio Spurs, tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Leonard has signed a two-plus-one and aligned his contract with Paul George -- with both players having the ability via player option to enter 2021 free agency.
Kawhi Leonard has signed his Los Angeles Clippers contract — a three-year, $103M maximum contract with a player option in the third season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Center Willie Cauley-Stein’s contract with the Golden State Warriors: Two years and $4.4M, with a player option in the second season.
Sources: Head coach’s challenge won’t be a physical flag thrown on the field of play like the NFL — it will be a signal from the coach.
Sources: The NBA Board of Governors have passed the implementation of in-game challenge flags for head coaches for the 2019-20 season.
Sources: The Milwaukee Bucks have waived forward Jon Leuer.
Dwight Howard (@DwightHoward): “I used to really hate how Draymond (Green) plays, but what I noticed watching him during these playoffs was that he does everything for the team. I want to be that person.”
Sources: The Minnesota Timberwolves have claimed former LA Clippers guard Tyrone Wallace off free agency waivers.
Sources: Minnesota No. 6 overall pick Jarrett Culver is not expected to play in NBA summer league as he fully integrates himself into Timberwolves system ahead of his rookie season.
Eight-time NBA All-Star Dwight Howard: “I don’t have an ego — it’s dead. I’ve grown up.” Howard opens on @TheAthleticNBA about his rejuvenated body and mind, the cloud that surrounded his 15th NBA season, career ups and downs, and more.
Golden State is sending Damian Jones and a second-round pick to the Hawks for Spellman, league sources said.
Sources: Atlanta is trading C/F Omari Spellman to the Golden State Warriors.
Guard Alec Burks has agreed to a one-year deal with the Golden State Warriors, agent JR Hensley tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. “Alec was extremely appreciative about how the Thunder handled the situation and he’s looking forward to his new opportunity,” Hensley said.
Sources: After Paul George trade, Oklahoma City remained committed to its two veteran deals in Mike Muscala and Alec Burks and allowed both to re-evaluate their situations given the unanticipated change. Muscala will remain with the Thunder.
This is based upon relationships on all sides — Russell Westbrook, agent Thad Foucher and GM Sam Presti — and collaborating together and examining alternative solutions. Trade timing is challenging this late in the summer due to salaries frozen across NBA from free-agent deals.
Based on conversations among player, agent and team, Oklahoma City for the first time is receptive toward trade calls on franchise star Russell Westbrook, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Jabari Parker is signing a two-year, $13M deal with the Hawks, with a player option in year two.
Free agent forward Jabari Parker has agreed to a two-year deal with the Atlanta Hawks, league source tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Green, one of the top players remaining in free agency, turned down more lucrative deals elsewhere to pursue a championship with the Clippers. He gives LA another versatile forward alongside Kawhi Leonard and Paul George.
Free agent forward JaMychal Green is finalizing a two-year, $10M deal to return to the Los Angeles Clippers, with a second-year player option, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA.
Sources: Denver is rescinding the qualifying offer on forward Trey Lyles, making him an unrestricted free agent. Move allows Lyles to focus on new home with a better opportunity given the depth of forwards on the Nuggets now.
Sources: Undrafted Ole Miss guard Terence Davis has agreed to a two-year deal with the Toronto Raptors, with full guarantee in Year One. Davis turned down two-way deals during the June NBA Draft; now signing full contract.
Tyus Jones offer sheet with Memphis: Three years, $24M, league sources said.
Timberwolves RFA Tyus Jones has agreed to a contract offer sheet with the Memphis Grizzlies, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Kevin Durant says he will now wear No. 7 as he begins his Brooklyn Nets career, switching from No. 35.
Free agent forward Rondae Hollis-Jefferson has agreed to a one-year deal with the Toronto Raptors, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Hollis-Jefferson gets fresh opportunity in Raptors development system and sets himself up for 2020 free agency.
Sources: Thanasis Antetokounmpo is signing a fully guaranteed two-year, $3M veteran's minumum deal with the Bucks. Milwaukee reunites the Antetokounmpo brothers.
Chicago Bulls No. 38 overall selection Daniel Gafford has agreed to a four-year, $6.1M rookie deal, with two guaranteed seasons, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Golden State Warriors Joe Lacob says the franchise intends to retire Andre Iguodala’s No. 9 jersey, in statement thanking Iguodala.
Sources: As part of the Andre Iguodala trade, the Memphis Grizzlies sent guard Julian Washburn (two-way contract) to the Golden State Warriors and received cash considerations ($2M) along with a first-round draft pick.
The Milwaukee Bucks and Thanasis Antetokounmpo -- the older brother of the NBA MVP, Giannis -- have agreed to a two-year contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent forward Marcus Morris has agreed to a two-year, $20M deal with the San Antonio Spurs, with a second-year player option, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Pelicans No. 1 overall pick Zion Williamson will miss the remainder of NBA summer league with a bruised left knee.
Johnson, 23, will have a fresh start and an excellent opportunity to develop in the Raptors system. He has become a strong defender in his NBA career so far.
Free agent Stanley Johnson has agreed to a two-year, $7.5M deal with the Toronto Raptors, with a player option in the second season, agent Nima Namakian of BDA Sports tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent Danny Green plans to sign with the Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. The Dallas Mavericks were also pursuing Green.
Rival NBA teams have been aware of the discontent of OKC's two stars: Paul George -- and Russell Westbrook, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Leonard pushed the Clippers in recent days to deliver him a second star, and they did.
Kawhi Leonard has agreed to a deal with the Los Angeles Clippers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Memphis Grizzlies are planning to waive eight-time All-Star Dwight Howard, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Washington has traded Dwight Howard to Memphis.
Free agent guard Raul Neto is signing a one-year, guaranteed veteran's minimum deal with the Philadelphia 76ers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent Markieff Morris has agreed to a deal with the Detroit Pistons, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Boban Marjanovic is signing a two-year, $7M deal with the Dallas Mavericks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Free agent Boban Marjanovic has agreed to a deal with the Dallas Mavericks.
The Golden State Warriors have rescinded guard Quinn Cook’s qualifying offer, making him an unrestricted free agent, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent center Luke Kornet has agreed to a two-year deal with the Chicago Bulls, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent Glenn Robinson has agreed to a two-year deal with the Golden State Warriors, with a second-year player option, agent Jelani Floyd of @beyond_am tells The Athletic and Stadium.
Bulls restricted free agent Ryan Arcidiacono has agreed to a three-year, $9M deal to return to Chicago, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent James Ennis has agreed to a two-year, $4.1M deal to return to Philadelphia, with second-year player option, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Ennis turned down more salary from multiple teams to return to a championship contender.
Free agent Dorian Finney-Smith has agreed to a three-year, $12M deal to re-sign with the Dallas Mavericks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Boston Celtics and French center Vincent Poirier have agreed to a two-year deal, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Poirier is a 6-foot-11 center who will provide additional front court depth in Boston.
The Charlotte Hornets have waived retired guard Tony Parker.
Teams don't typically fully guarantee a season's salary this early. For Williams and the Clippers, it is a win. Williams now has his $2M partial for 2020-21 become fully guaranteed at $8M. He has made clear his happiness in L.A. and is coming off another strong season.
In a rare gesture rewarding Lou Williams' play and leadership, the Los Angeles Clippers and Sixth Man of the Year have agreed to completely guarantee his $8M salary for 2020-21 a full season ahead, agent Wallace Prather told @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent forward Anthony Tolliver has agreed to a one-year, $2.6M deal with the Portland Trail Blazers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Tolliver will provide a high-level shooting rotation big.
The Warriors met with Looney over the weekend in Los Angeles and reached agreement with him and his agent, Todd Ramasar, on Monday. Looney has been indispensable on the court in his Golden State career. He returns for $15M.
Sources: Free agent Kevon Looney has agreed to a three-year, $15M deal to return to Golden State.
EuroLeague guard Matt Thomas has agreed to a three-year, $4.2M deal with the Toronto Raptors, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Warriors' Joe Lacob says the franchise will retire Kevin Durant's No. 35 jersey, in statement thanking Durant.
Free agent center/forward Richaun Holmes has agreed to a two-year, $10M deal with the Sacramento Kings, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent guard JJ Barea has agreed to a one-year, veteran’s minimum deal to return to the Dallas Mavericks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Enes Kanter is signing a two-year, $10M deal with the Celtics, with a second-year player option, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Free agent center Enes Kanter has agreed to a deal with the Boston Celtics.
Free agent guard Elfrid Payton has agreed to a two-year, $16M deal with the New York Knicks, agents Ty Sullivan and Aaron Mintz of CAA Sports tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent Troy Daniels has agreed to a one-year, $2.1M with the Lakers, agent Mark Bartelstein of Priority Sports tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Daniels gives the Lakers an elite shooter to pair with LeBron James and Anthony Davis and does not affect the team’s cap space.
The Utah Jazz are planning to waive guard Raul Neto in order to create space to complete the Mike Conley Jr. trade, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Neto will become a strong option as a reserve point guard on the market.
Free agent guard Ish Smith has agreed to a two-year, $12M deal with the Washington Wizards, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent Reggie Bullock has agreed to two-year, $21M deal to sign with the New York Knicks, agent David Bauman of ISE Basketball tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Murray and All-Star Nikola Jokic have become rising superstars with the Nuggets, who now quickly reached new extensions with their cornerstones in consecutive summers. Denver was the No. 2 seed last season and appears poised to have a strong foundation for years to come.
Denver Nuggets rising star Jamal Murray has agreed to a five-year, $170M maximum contract extension, agent Mike George of OneLegacy tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Warriors are on verge of acquiring Russell, Treveon Graham and Shabazz Napier from Brooklyn, league sources said.
Sources: Golden State and Brooklyn are close to a D'Angelo Russell sign-and-trade deal to the Warriors.
Sources: Nets restricted free agent D'Angelo Russell is a player of strong interest for the Warriors in a potential sign-and-trade. Golden State has searched for avenues on Russell, and is still evaluating next moves.
Sources: The Bucks are expressing strong interest in free-agent center Robin Lopez to join his brother Brook in Milwaukee.
Sources: Jimmy Butler is signing a four-year, $142M maximum contract with the Miami Heat.
Sources: Philadelphia has signed-and-traded Jimmy Butler to Miami, with Heat sending Josh Richardson to the 76ers.
Free agent guard George Hill has agreed to a three-year, $29M deal to return to Milwaukee, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Carroll is signing a two-year, $13M deal with the Spurs, league sources said.
Sources: Free agent DeMarre Carroll has agreed to a deal with the San Antonio Spurs.
Sources: Free agent Mike Scott has agreed to a two-year, $9.8M deal to return to the Philadelphia 76ers.
Free agent Tobias Harris plans to sign a five-year, $180M deal to return to Philadelphia, his agent and father of Torrel Harris of Unique Sports Management International tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Denver star Jamal Murray's agent, Mike George of One Legacy Sports, and the Nuggets have started discussions on a contract extension, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent Jeremy Lamb agreed to a three-year, $31.5M deal with Indiana, agent Jeff Schwartz of Excel Sports Management says.
Free agent Ricky Rubio agreed three-year, $51 million deal with the Phoenix Suns, agent Jeff Schwartz of Excel Sports Management says.
Sources: Restricted free agent Malcolm Brogdon has agreed to a deal with Indiana.
Free agent Jeremy Lamb has agreed to a three-year, $31.5M deal with the Indiana Pacers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent Ricky Rubio has agreed three-year, $51 million deal with the Phoenix Suns, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent Terry Rozier reached agreement on a fully guaranteed three-year, $58M deal with the Charlotte Hornets, agent Aaron Turner of Verus Basketball tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent Trevor Ariza has agreed to a two-year, $25M deal with the Sacramento Kings, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Kyrie Irving has agreed to a four-year, $142M deal with Brooklyn. Fourth-year player option.
Kevin Durant says he will sign with the Brooklyn Nets.
Restricted free agent Kristaps Porzingis reached agreement on a five-year, $158M maximum contract with the Dallas Mavericks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Tune into for Free Agency live show with Toronto Raptors champion @FredVanVleet and former Sacramento Kings executive Brandon Williams.
Free agent center Dewayne Dedmon has agreed to a three-year, $41M deal with the Sacramento Kings, agents Mike Silverman and Brandon Grier tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
All three years and $58M will be fully guaranteed for Terry Rozier in Charlotte, league sources said.
Free agent Rudy Gay plans to sign a two-year, $32M deal to return to the San Antonio Spurs, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Free agent guard Terry Rozier plans to agree to a three-year, $58M contract with the Charlotte Hornets via sign-and-trade, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Kyrie Irving will soon meet to finalize a four-year deal with the Brooklyn Nets, with a fourth-year player option, league sources told @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie is expected to be part of the franchise’s pitch meeting for Irving tonight, sources said.
Damian Lillard's Portland extension: Total of six years and $258M, an annual salary of $43M.
Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard is working toward agreement on a four-year, $196 million super maximum contract extension, league sources told @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Vucevic helped lead the Magic to the postseason last season, an All-Star campaign in which he averaged 20.8 points and 12 rebounds per game. He’s been a core part of Orlando’s franchise over the past seven years, and now Magic retain him.
Orlando free agent All-Star Nikola Vucevic plans to commit to a four-year, $100 million deal to return to the Magic, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The NBA has set salary cap for 2019-20 season, effective for July free agency: $109,140,000, with tax line of $132,627,000.
Sources: Jimmy Butler plans to meet with the 76ers soon and has interest from other teams with maximum salary space, including the Lakers and Nets, and sign-and-trade possibilities elsewhere.
Kemba Walker plans to commit to a four-year, $141M maximum contract with the Boston Celtics after free agency opens on Sunday, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The New York Knicks have waived forward Lance Thomas, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Boston has extended a qualifying offer to guard Terry Rozier, making him a restricted free agent, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
From @TheAthleticNBA's @ThompsonScribe: Warriors' Stephen Curry is planning to join GM Bob Myers in visit to Kevin Durant in New York.
NBA free agent Nikola Mirotic has decided to sign with Euroleague club Barcelona, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Mirotic was in the market for $45-50M total in contract in the NBA.
The Warriors always planned to give Thompson the type of contract he wanted and the franchise made this a priority entering June 30 free agency. Splash Brothers stay in the Bay.
Sources: Klay Thompson and the Golden State Warriors plan to reach agreement on a five-year, $190M maximum contract, with the Warriors sending a front-office contingent to Los Angeles to visit Thompson within the next day.
The Golden State Warriors have extended a qualifying offer to forward Jordan Bell, making him a restricted free agent, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Brooklyn has extended a qualifying offer to All-Star free agent D’Angelo Russell, making him a restricted free agent.
Sources: The Los Angeles Clippers have extended a qualifying offer to center Ivica Zubac, making him a restricted free agent.
Milwaukee guard George Hill will be waived and become a free agent, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Hill had a terrific finish to the season and will be a sought-after combo guard on the market. Bucks are working to find space to re-sign Hill, too.
Sources: Lakers are sending their 2022 second-round pick to Washington in trade to move Moe Wagner, Jemerrio Jones and Isaac Bonga to the Wizards.
Thunder center Nerlens Noel will not pick up his $1.9M player option for 2019-20 season and will be a free agent, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Noel and Thunder will discuss potential reunion, but several other teams are expected to express interest.
All-Star Kemba Walker and the Charlotte Hornets have sizable gaps and stalemate in talks so far, opening pathway for competitors in Boston, New York and Dallas, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The Pelicans have declined to extend a qualifying offer to forward Stanley Johnson, making him an unrestricted free agent. Johnson, 23, is a strong defender and will receive interest from several teams. Allows Pelicans to now have upwards of $28M in open space.
Updated Inside Pass on @TheAthleticNBA with the latest on Utah Jazz forward/center Derrick Favors.
Memphis extended the qualifying offer tender to guard Delon Wright, who will now be a restricted free agent, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Wright had a strong finish for the Grizzlies last season.
The NBA has removed Omer Asik's deal from the Chicago Bulls' salary books via career-ending injury/illness, freeing up an additional $3M in space, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Chicago now has upwards of $23M in salary space for free agency.
Restricted free agent Kristaps Porzingis and the Dallas Mavericks will meet when free agency opens on June 30 and the franchise plans to offer Porzingis a full five-year, $158 million maximum contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
2018-19 NBA MVP: Milwaukee's Giannis Antetokounmpo.
Another one of the Harris brothers finds a home: Tyler Harris, who played in Japan this season, has agreed to play with the Denver Nuggets in NBA summer league. Next up: Tobias Harris.
The Phoenix Suns will decline guard Jimmer Fredette’s team option for the 2019-20 season, clearing way for him to play for the Golden State Warriors in NBA Summer League, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Knicks have been fined $50,000 by the NBA for violating the league's rules regarding equal access for media.
Undrafted Oregon forward Louis King has agreed to a two-way NBA contract with the Detroit Pistons, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
“He talks a lot of sh--” — Dallas Mavericks young star @luka7doncic on franchise icon @swish41: “I know he’s going to stick around ... Dallas is going to give him some job so he can stick around and help us get back where he was.”
Mavericks Rookie of the Year favorite @luka7doncic on ROY battle with Trae Young: “I’m confident, but even if I think I am, I’m never going to say it ... I’m going to keep it to myself. It’s just different characters.”
Brotherly Love: Free agent Tobias Harris' younger brother, Terry Harris of North Carolina A&amp;T, will play NBA Summer League with the Philadelphia 76ers, league sources say.
Sources: The Charlotte Hornets and undrafted Washington State forward Robert Franks have agreed to a two-way NBA deal.
Sources: Louisville’s VJ King has agreed to an undrafted free-agent deal with the New York Knicks.
Sources: Undrafted Wofford sharpshooter Fletcher Magee has agreed to play NBA summer league with the Milwaukee Bucks.
Undrafted Gonzaga guard Zach Norvell has agreed to a two-way NBA contract with the Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Division II Shaw University’s Amir Hinton has agreed to an undrafted free-agent deal with the New York Knicks.
Sources: Saint Louis Javon Bess has agreed to an undrafted free-agent deal with the New Orleans Pelicans.
Villanova undrafted guard Phil Booth has agreed to play NBA Summer League with the Cleveland Cavaliers, agent Jordan Gertler tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Tulsa’s DaQuan Jeffries has agreed to an undrafted free-agent deal with the Orlando Magic.
2019 NBA draft @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium
Undrafted LSU center Naz Reid has agreed to a two-way NBA contract with the Minnesota Timberwolves, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Brewster Academy’s Jalen Lecque has agreed to a four-year, undrafted free-agent deal with the Phoenix Suns, with two years guaranteed, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Undrafted Virginia Tech guard Justin Robinson has agreed to a multiyear deal with the Washington Wizards, with substantial guarantee.
Sources: Charlotte selected Jalen McDaniels at No. 52.
Sources: Spurs are selecting Quinndary Weatherspoon at No. 49 in the 2019 NBA Draft.
Sacramento sent this No. 47 pick to the Knicks, received New York's No. 55, sources said.
Sources: Knicks picking Michigan's Ignas Brazdeikis at No. 47.
Sources: Lakers selecting Talen Horton-Tucker at No. 46 in NBA Draft.
Sources: Dallas has selected Isaiah Roby at No. 45.
Denver is acquiring Bol Bol from Miami, league sources say.
Sources: Miami is selecting Bol Bol at No. 44 in Draft.
Sources: Minnesota has picked Jaylen Nowell at No. 43 in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: The Warriors are selecting Eric Paschall at No. 41 in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: The Los Angeles Lakers have acquired the No. 46 overall pick in the NBA draft from Orlando. Magic receive future pick and money.
Sources: New Orleans is selecting Alen Smailagic at No. 39 2019 NBA draft -- and traded to Golden State.
Sources: Chicago is selecting Arkansas' Daniel Gafford at No. 38 in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: New Orleans is selecting Marcos Louzada Silva at No. 35 in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: Philadelphia traded No. 34 to Atlanta for two future second-rounders and No. 57.
Miami is taking KZ Okpala at No. 32, sources say.
Sources: Brooklyn is selecting Nicolas Claxton at No. 31 in the 2019 NBA draft.
76ers receive additional cap flexibility entering July free agency.
Sources: The 76ers are trading swingman Jonathon Simmons and No. 42 pick to the Wizards.
Sources: Cavs sent four second-round picks and cash to Detroit for pick No. 30.
Sources: Spurs are selecting Keldon Johnson at No. 29 in the 2019 NBA draft.
Cavaliers pivoted from Keldon Johnson and went with Dylan Windler.
Sources: Cleveland selected Dylan Windler -- not Keldon Johnson.
Sources: Boston has traded center Aron Baynes to Phoenix.
Sources: Cleveland is targeting Kentucky’s Keldon Johnson at No. 26 in the 2019 NBA draft.
Bazley emerged throughout predraft process as a first-rounder, impressed teams in interviews. He went from Syracuse commit to NBA G League-bound -- to using year to train and learn off the floor. Now lands in Oklahoma City.
Sources: Oklahoma City is picking Darius Bazley at No. 23 in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: Boston is picking Grant Williams at No. 22 in the 2019 NBA draft.
Mempis selecting at No. 21 now. OKC is No. 23.
Sources: Oklahoma City is trading back to Memphis' No. 23.
Sources: San Antonio has selected Luka Samanic with the No. 19 overall pick in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: New Orleans has selected Nickeil Alexander-Walker with the No. 17 overall pick in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: Detroit selected Sekou Doumbouya at No. 15.
Sources: Boston is selecting Indiana's Romeo Langford with the No. 14 overall pick in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: Charlotte is selecting Kentucky’s PJ Washington with the No. 12 overall pick in the 2019 NBA draft.
UNC's Cameron Johnson impressed teams with his shooting in workouts -- and now goes a stunning No. 11 overall.
Sources: Phoenix is selecting Cam Johnson with the No. 11 overall pick in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: Atlanta selected Cam Reddish with the No. 10 overall pick in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: Washington is selecting Rui Hachimura with the No. 9 overall pick in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: New Orleans is selecting Jaxson Hayes with the No. 8 overall pick in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: Bulls plan to select UNC’s Coby White with the No. 7 pick in NBA draft.
Sources: Minnesota has selected Jarrett Culver with the No. 6 overall pick in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: Cavs have selected Darius Garland with the No. 5 overall pick in the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: Atlanta selecting DeAndre Hunter with the No. 4 overall pick in the 2019 NBA draft.
Atlanta has targeted two wing players at No. 4 — DeAndre Hunter and Cam Reddish — and is leaning toward selecting Hunter, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Top three picks in 2019 NBA draft are set, per sources: 1. Zion Williamson, Pelicans 2. Ja Morant, Grizzlies 3. RJ Barrett, Knicks Pelicans hold cards at No. 4.
Tune into @Stadium Draft Show starting at 7 p.m. ET with info, analysis, breakdowns from me, Vanderbilt’s Jerry Stackhouse (@jerrystackhouse), former Kings assistant GM Brandon Williams, @GoodmanHoops, Ohio State’s Chris Holtmann, Hawks Kevin Huerter.
Sources: Miami sent Atlanta $1.88M in cash for the No. 44 overall pick in the Draft, which could set the market for picks in that range.
Sources: Space Jam 2, starring LeBron James, is expected to feature key roles for Damian Lillard, Anthony Davis and Klay Thompson and WNBA stars Diana Taurasi and Nneka Ogwumike. Several more NBA and WNBA players, including Chiney Ogwumike, are expected to play roles in film.
Atlanta has traded the No. 44 overall pick in Thursday's draft to Miami for a future conditional second-round pick.
Texas Tech’s Jarrett Culver — a potential top-5 pick in Thursday’s NBA Draft — has signed a multi-year endorsement deal with Adidas, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Utah acquires the top-tier point guard in Mike Conley Jr. it has pursued for a year to pair with rising star Donovan Mitchell.
Utah is sending Grayson Allen, Kyle Korver, Jae Crowder and draft compensation to Memphis for Mike Conley Jr., league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Utah sending a package of players including forwards Jae Crowder and Kyle Korver, along with draft picks, to Memphis, league sources said.
Memphis is trading franchise star Mike Conley Jr. to Utah, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Charlotte Hornets forward Michael Kidd-Gilchrist has opted into his $13M player option for the 2019-20 season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Irving has been communicative and forthright with top Celtics officials since the season ended, with private and public signals that he will leave the organization in free agency — likely for the Brooklyn Nets, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Boston Celtics are preparing for strong scenario that All-Stars Kyrie Irving and Al Horford will leave as free agents, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Pelicans Julius Randle is not picking up his $9M player option for next season and will enter unrestricted free agency, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Randle is coming off his best NBA season (21.4 PPG, 8.7 RPG, 34.4 percent from 3-point range on 195 attempts).
The New York Knicks have exercised guard Allonzo Trier's $3.5M team option for the 2019-20 season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Miami Heat guard Goran Dragic has picked up his $19.2M player option for the 2019-20 season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Houston Rockets have claimed third-year center Deyonta Davis off free agency waivers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Durant posts on Instagram: "Surgery was today and it was a success, EASY MONEY... Basketball is my biggest love and I wanted to be out there that night because that's what I do."
Warriors All-Star Kevin Durant has underwent surgery to repair a ruptured Achilles tendon.
Baynes has been a critical rotation player and leader for Boston, and the Celtics have loved his presence on the roster.
Boston Celtics center Aron Baynes has exercised his $5.9M player option for the 2019-20 season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Boston has expected this ahead of Irving’s option date on Thursday. For Irving, it is an opt-in so no paperwork necessary to enter free agency.
Celtics' Kyrie Irving is not opting into his $21.3 million deal for next season and will become a free agent eligible to sign a new contract with Boston or elsewhere, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Golden State’s Kevin Durant is traveling to New York for doctor evaluations on his injured right Achilles tendon, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Spurs assistant coach Ettore Messina has agreed on a deal to run basketball operations and become the new head coach of Olimpia Milano, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Messina has been a lead assistant on Gregg Popovich’s staff since 2014.
Kevin Durant has an Achilles injury.
Sources: Anthony Davis has focused on the Lakers and Knicks as the two desired long-term destinations. @TheAthleticNBA story on that and more:
Draymond Green: “I’ve proved people wrong my entire career...They’ve been saying I’m done since 2012 when I stepped in the league. They didn’t give me a fighter’s chance.” Green on @TheAthleticNBA to talk rejuvenating his game, KD incident in Nov., more.
Projected No. 1 overall pick Zion Williamson will visit New Orleans and meet with the Pelicans this week, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Kevin Durant (calf) has been listed as questionable for Game 5 of NBA Finals on Monday night.
Murray State’s Ja Morant — the projected No. 2 pick in the NBA Draft — is visiting the Grizzlies in Memphis for meetings today, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Suns officials have traveled to Lubbock, Texas, for a private visit and workout with high draft lottery prospect Jarrett Culver, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Udoka will take Monty Williams spot on Brett Brown’s staff, a major hire by the 76ers. Udoka is a highly-regarded assistant coach who has had strong head coaching interviews over the past two years.
The Philadelphia 76ers are hiring San Antonio Spurs assistant Ime Udoka as an assistant coach on Brett Brown’s staff, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Ban includes Warriors team activities, through 2019-20 season.
The NBA and Warriors have banned Warriors investor Mark Stevens from NBA games for one year and fined him $500,000 for altercation with Raptors All-Star Kyle Lowry.
Kevin Durant (calf) has been ruled out of Game 4 of NBA Finals.
NBA's Mike Bass statement: “...The conduct of Golden State Warriors investor Mark Stevens last night was beyond unacceptable and has no place in our league. As the review of this matter continues, Mr. Stevens will not be permitted to attend NBA games.”
The Warriors say minority investor Mark Stevens will not attend remaining NBA Finals games after shove on Kyle Lowry in Game 3 Wednesday night.
Sources: Klay Thompson (hamstring) will not play in Game 3 of NBA Finals.
Warriors' Kevin Durant (calf) is out for Game 3 of NBA Finals.
As teams continue placing calls on Anthony Davis, Pelicans and executive VP David Griffin have begun listening to teams, league sources told @TheAthleticNBA. Inside Pass on Davis and more from around the league:
MRI on Golden State Warriors All-Star Klay Thompson confirmed a hamstring strain and he will likely be questionable for Game 3, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Thompson will test body over next two days with hope to play Wednesday night.
Sources: Golden State’s Kevon Looney has suffered a sprained collar bone and will miss remainder of Game 2.
Sources: Cam Reddish will undergo a minor procedure for a core muscle injury. There is a six-week timetable that will have Reddish fully healthy. The core injury nagged him during the Duke season and will now fully heal.
The Los Angeles Clippers have been fined $50,000 by NBA for violating the league’s anti-tampering rule when Doc Rivers publicly commented on Kawhi Leonard.
Warriors' DeMarcus Cousins will be active to play for Game 1 of the NBA Finals after suffering a torn quad in the first round.
Davis, Paul and Griffin met today in Los Angeles and had a respectful, productive sitdown.
While New Orleans Pelicans executive Vice President David Griffin and All-Star Anthony Davis agent Rich Paul will continue discussions, it’s highly unlikely Davis stance changes on trade, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
New Orleans star Anthony Davis will meet with new Pelicans executive Vice President David Griffin today, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Minnesota Timberwolves are finalizing hiring Detroit Pistons assistant GM Sachin Gupta as Executive Vice President of Basketball Operations, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Gupta and Gersson Rosas worked together in Houston.
On @TheAthleticNBA: Houston among two Western Conference teams that have pursued former Cleveland championship coach Ty Lue — as lead assistant — but Lue’s focus remains on head coaching.
Sitdown with @camreddish: Being motivated to play after watching his father in 30-and-over leagues, lessons at Duke alongside Zion and RJ, and more. “There was a lot of pressure (at Duke) ... definitely preparation for what’s to come.”
Murray State’s Ja Morant — a projected top-2 NBA Draft pick — has signed a multiyear endorsement deal with Nike, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Brooklyn Nets have hired Atlanta Hawks executive Jeff Peterson as assistant general manager.
The Houston Rockets have let go of player development assistant coach Irv Roland, who worked very closely with James Harden as well as Chris Paul and PJ Tucker, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Kevin Durant (calf strain) is unlikely to return for start of the NBA Finals, but the Golden State Warriors are hopeful that he returns at some point during.
Damian Lillard and Kemba Walker are now eligible for the NBA's super maximum contract extension this summer. Klay Thompson and Bradley Beal were left off All-NBA teams.
NBA All-NBA: First team: Stephen Curry, James Harden, Giannis Antetokounmpo, Nikola Jokic, Paul George. Second team: Damian Lillard, Kevin Durant, Joel Embiid, Kawhi Leonard, Kyrie Irving. Third team: Russell Westbrook, Blake Griffin, LeBron James, Rudy Gobert, Kemba Walker.
On @TheAthleticNBA: How the Rockets balance of styles and stars will mark summer in Houston.
2018-19 NBA All-Defensive: First team: Rudy Gobert, Paul George, Giannis Antetokounmpo, Marcus Smart, Eric Bledsoe. Second team: Jrue Holiday, Klay Thompson, Joel Embiid, Draymond Green, Kawhi Leonard.
Portland Trail Blazers head coach Terry Stotts has signed a contract extension.
Some context on Zion Williamson/Anthony Davis/John Wall autograph story being rehashed: Williamson has never met Davis or Wall, per source close to him. Neither snubbed him. Williamson was providing analogy using athletes he looked up to in high school, on why he signs for kids.
Sitdown with top NBA Draft prospect @jarrettc08: Values from his father who is a pastor, growing up in church, competitiveness and continuing to stay aggressive even on off nights. “I still keep shooting because I know I put in the work.”
Ennis was a critical rotation player for Philadelphia and is expected to command a new multiyear deal in July.
Philadelphia 76ers swingman James Ennis (@JamesDa_Truth) will decline his $1.8M player option for next season and become a free agent, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Ryan Saunders has reached agreement on a multiyear deal to become the new head coach of the Minnesota Timberwolves, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
New Orleans has agreed on deal with Brooklyn assistant general manager Trajan Langdon to make him the new GM working alongside David Griffin, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Injury occurred in Game 2. The Warriors have clearly also done a tremendous job with their defensive schemes on the Blazers All-Star guard.
Portland Trail Blazers All-NBA star Damian Lillard has separated ribs and is playing through the injury, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Lillard shot 5-of-18 in Game 3 loss to Warriors.
Evans is eligible to apply for reinstatement to the NBA in two years. As per NBA anti-drug policy, this discipline is for drug of abuse.
Sources with @davidaldridgedc @fredkatz: The Washington Wizards are offering their head front-office job to Denver Nuggets president Tim Connelly. Connelly toured Wizards' practice facility today in meeting.
Pacers free agent Tyreke Evans has been dismissed and disqualified from the league for violating the terms of the NBA/NBPA Anti-Drug Program.
Projected high lottery pick Coby White of UNC has left the NBA Draft Combine, interviewing for some teams before departing, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Tennessee star junior Grant Williams is staying in the 2019 NBA Draft, as he announces in exclusive @Stadium sit-down:
Sit-down with Duke’s @RjBarrett6: Basketball motivations, touching a basketball for first time in France, improving his shot, Zion and Cam. “Zion taught me how to have more fun. His passion is unmatched. Cam taught me how to be smooth.”
Sources: Zion Williamson met in Chicago with the New Orleans Pelicans and Memphis Grizzlies, the top two teams in the Draft lottery. Williamson had a positive meeting with New Orleans and prior to lottery, he cited Pelicans as a targeted team to start career.
Top prospect Darius Garland has left the NBA Draft Combine, fueling belief among some teams that he could have a promise in lottery, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
New York Knicks guard Damyean Dotson underwent surgery today to repair a torn labrum on his right shoulder and is expected to be ready for start of training camp, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
West had an expiring contract, but has been in discussions with Clippers owner Steve Ballmer on a new deal to remain with the franchise heading into critical summer. Along with West, Ballmer has retained executives Michael Winger and Trent Redden, too.
Clippers special consultant Jerry West has agreed to a new contract to stay with the franchise, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Check out at 10 pm ET for NBA Draft lottery special show — with latest on impact of New Orleans winning No. 1 pick and Anthony Davis, and snippets of one-one-ones with top prospects RJ Barrett, Darius Garland, Cam Reddish, Darius Bazley and Daniel Gafford.
The New Orleans Pelicans are now set up to be Zion Williamson’s franchise to lift, and No. 1 pick could ease potential trade of Anthony Davis. His stance on a trade has not changed, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Top 4 picks in the 2019 NBA draft: 1. Pelicans 2. Grizzlies 3. Knicks 4. Lakers. New Orleans has opportunity to draft Zion Williamson.
MRI on Portland's Rodney Hood injured left knee returned clean and he will be day-to-day toward a return, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Mavericks are investigating All-Star Kristaps Porzingis’ altercation in Europe over weekend and current understanding is he was jumped at a club, assaulted and hit by objects, @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium has learned.
Oklahoma City Thunder forward Patrick Patterson has exercised his $5.7M player option for the 2019-20 season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Bucks center Pau Gasol underwent surgery to repair a navicular stress fracture in his left foot and will miss the remainder of the playoffs.
Kevin Durant has suffered a right calf strain.
Full @TheAthleticNBA story on the Lakers ending talks with Ty Lue and moving on with head coaching search -- including three new veteran head coaches.
The Los Angeles Lakers are adding these former NBA coaches to their coaching search: Lionel Hollins, Frank Vogel and Mike Woodson, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: The Lakers and Ty Lue have ended talks on a deal, with Los Angeles moving on to next head coaching candidates.
Boston Celtics guard Marcus Smart has been cleared to play in Game 4 against Milwaukee.
Inside a well-needed’ midseason conversation between Toronto Raptors All-Star Kyle Lowry and president Masai Ujiri, what it’s led to, and Lowry’s mindset on criticism. On @TheAthleticNBA:
Pascal Siakam will play in Game 4 against the Philadelphia 76ers.
Philadelphia All-Star Ben Simmons has been fined $20,000 and given flagrant one foul for making contact to groin of Kyle Lowry in Game 3.
Philadelphia assistant Monty Williams has agreed to a five-year deal to become the new head coach of the Phoenix Suns, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Ainge is expected to return home this evening and is active, walking around today and feeling much better, sources say. Thoughts and wishes with him.
Boston Celtics GM Danny Ainge suffered a mild heart attack in Milwaukee on Tuesday night. He received immediate medical attention, is expected to make a full recovery.
No suspension for Chris Paul for making contact with referee late in Game 1 on Sunday; $35,000 fine by the NBA.
The NBA’s last two-minute report verdict on James Harden’s 3-point shot with 10.1 seconds left in Game 1 against Golden State: No foul. Stephen Curry incident with Eric Gordon with 5.2 seconds: Incorrect non-call.
Former NBA champion Tayshaun Prince has been promoted to VP of Basketball Affairs of the Memphis Grizzlies.
On @TheAthleticNBA: The 'East Core 4,' two epic Eastern Conference semifinal series and what's on the line for their future.
The Chicago Bulls have requested the NBA to have Omer Asik's contract removed from team salary via career-ending injury/illness, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. It would free up $3M in space for the summer. Asik was waived by the Bulls in October.
Detroit Pistons star Blake Griffin underwent arthroscopic surgery on his left knee today. Injury had impacted him during the final weeks of the season.
The Los Angeles Lakers will meet with 76ers assistant Monty Williams on Thursday for a second interview, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Suns cleaned house of Igor Kokoskov’s coaching/player development staff today to allow the next head coach to hire own staff, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
First two coaches whom the Phoenix Suns will request permission to interview for head coach opening: Philadelphia assistant Monty Williams and Portland assistant David Vanterpool, league sources tell @TheAthletic @Stadium.
Nets owner Joe Tsai has been fined $35,000 for making public comments “detrimental to the NBA.”
Spurs' DeMar DeRozan has been fined $25,000 by NBA for throwing ball toward official on Saturday night.
Nets GM Sean Marks has been suspended one game and fined $25,000 by NBA for entering officiating staff’s locker room after Saturday’s game.
Chauncey Billups and the Minnesota Timberwolves will meet in near future to discuss the franchise's President of Basketball Operations role, league sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski.
76ers star Joel Embiid (knee) is out for Game 3 against the Nets in Brooklyn.
Latest on Warriors center DeMarcus Cousins: Torn quad, no surgery expected as of now.
This is probably season-ending for Cousins, but he and the team will see how he responds within the first two weeks of rehab that is not expected to require surgery, sources said.
Warriors All-Star DeMarcus Cousins has been diagnosed with a torn left quad, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Devastating for Cousins, who had MRI early this morning.
Charlotte Hornets center Bismack Biyombo has exercised his $17M player option for 2019-20 season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Center Ed Davis — who’s been important to Nets success this season and had 12 points and 16 rebounds in Game 1 — will play in Game 2, sources said.
Sources: Nets forward Jared Dudley (calf) will miss tonight’s Game 2 in Philadelphia. Dudley played a critical role for Brooklyn in Game 1.
Projected No. 1 overall pick Zion Williamson of Duke has declared for the 2019 NBA Draft.
76ers' Amir Johnson said in statement released by team: "I take full responsibility and will accept the consequences of my actions. I also apologize to my teammates, the 76ers organization and the fans for the distraction this has caused."
The 76ers have fined Amir Johnson for conduct detrimental to the team for cell phone usage on bench during Game 1 against Brooklyn.
Sources: 76ers star Joel Embiid (knee) will be available to play in Game 1 against the Nets.
Luke Walton is no longer head coach of the Lakers. The sides mutually parted.
The Lakers and Luke Walton have parted ways.
Sources: Within final two months of Magic Johnson's presidency of Lakers, the team prevented Lonzo Ball from undergoing surgery unauthorized by the organization. How that occurred and more, in @TheAthleticNBA column on Magic's still-sudden resignation:
Minnesota Timberwolves point guard Jeff Teague has opted into his $19M player option for the 2019-20 season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Raptors' OG Anunoby is expected to be sidelined at least two weeks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Blow to Toronto's lineup.
Toronto's OG Anunoby underwent emergency appendectomy after being diagnosed with acute appendicitis.
Duke freshman Cam Reddish has declared for the 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: The Cavaliers and head coach Larry Drew have mutually parted ways.
Sources: J.B. Bickerstaff conducted exit meetings with Grizzlies players today, discussing ways to improve the team and summer expectations — and then went to his own exit meeting with ownership.
Sources: The Memphis Grizzlies are firing coach J.B. Bickerstaff.
The Phoenix Suns have named James Jones as the general manager. Jones has been the interim GM.
Part of my sitdown with 2011 MVP Derrick Rose. On continuing to play: “For my sanity, I can’t be the guy out there not affecting the game in some way. The day that happens ... it will be my way of letting me know that I got to let go of the ropes.”
The Timberwolves will begin search for new president of basketball operations who will help decide futures of GM Scott Layden and head coach Ryan Saunders, sources tell @JonKrawczynski and me. Minnesota has been preparing statement for Wednesday.
Teammates know Nowitzki wants to remain around the Mavericks upon retirement, and the franchise has been planning a “unique role” for him.
Dirk Nowitzki says he is indeed retiring. Twenty-one seasons with the Dallas Mavericks. Future Hall of Famer. What a career.
Magic Johnson has stepped down from President of Basketball Ops of the Lakers.
The Clippers have claimed former Heat forward Rodney McGruder off waivers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Miami Heat have waived forward Rodney McGruder, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The NBA has informed its teams of updated projected salary cap and tax level that is unchanged in 2019-20 ($109M/$132M) — and $2M lower in 2020-21 ($116M/$141M), sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Vanderbilt AD Malcolm Turner — the former president of the NBA G League — is hiring an emerging coach in Jerry Stackhouse, who was the 2017 G League coach of the year and interviewed for NBA head coaching vacancies last offseason.
Memphis Grizzlies assistant coach Jerry Stackhouse has agreed to become the new head coach of Vanderbilt University, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Pelicans Anthony Davis has been fined $15,000 by NBA for showing middle finger to fan in New Orleans on Wednesday night.
Iowa State sophomore Lindell Wigginton tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium he is entering the NBA draft and planning to hire agent. Full letter from one of the nation’s best guards, who was hampered by injury early in season and is now recovered for predraft.
Suns guard Devin Booker has been shut down for remaining three games of season with his ankle sprain, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Booker closed season scoring 59, 50 and 48 points in three of final five games.
X-Rays returned negative on Suns guard Devin Booker’s left ankle sprain, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Philadelphia is signing veteran center Greg Monroe to a rest-of-season contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Murray State star sophomore Ja Morant -- the projected top-2 pick -- will declare for the 2019 NBA draft during a press conference today, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The NBA has fined three Golden State Warriors: Draymond Green, $35,000 for social media comments on officiating; Stephen Curry, $25,000 for statements on officiating; and Kevin Durant, $15,000 for criticism of officiating.
The Washington Wizards have made Tommy Sheppard the interim GM, with a search now underway, league sources said.
The Washington Wizards have fired GM Ernie Grunfeld, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Surgery on Tuesday for Okeke, sources said. Auburn faces Kentucky in the Elite 8 on Sunday.
Sources: Auburn’s Chuma Okeke has a torn ACL in left knee, surgery scheduled for upcoming week. Absolutely devastating for Auburn and an emerging player.
The Los Angeles Lakers will sign G League forward Jemerrio Jones to a two-year deal, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Lakers use final roster spot on Jones to close season, with team option in 2019-20.
Lakers guard Josh Hart underwent a procedure on his right knee patellar tendon and will return to full activities in 12 weeks.
With half of roster dealing with injuries, the Bulls are signing G League guard Walter Lemon Jr. to a deal for the remainder of the season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Bulls are shutting down forward Lauri Markkanen for remainder of season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Markkanen dealt with fatigue in Tuesday's game in Toronto.
Golden State Warriors forward Jordan Bell has been suspended one game for conduct detrimental to the team.
Portland’s Jusuf Nurkic underwent season-ending surgery today on compound fractures, and some positive news: No nerve or muscle damage in his leg, league sources said. He is out indefinitely.
Sources: The Oklahoma City Thunder have claimed guard Jawun Evans off waivers. Evans is on a two-way contract.
Free agent guard Jodie Meeks has agreed to a deal with the Toronto Raptors for the rest of the season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Dwyane Wade supports former championship teammate LeBron James first Lakers season: “Having a year out there in the Western Conference, it is tough. You can’t miss time, you can’t miss games like he missed.”
Dwyane Wade: "I can play another two, three years, definitely. I wanted to walk away the way I’m walking away now." @TheAthleticNBA sit-down on his final season, extending career after considering retiring, LeBron, Heat Big 3 seasons and more.
Minnesota Timberwolves guard Derrick Rose underwent surgery to remove bone chips from his right elbow and is sidelined indefinitely.
Free agent center Greg Monroe has agreed to a 10-day contract with the Boston Celtics, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Minnesota has shut down Derrick Rose (chip fracture in right elbow), Robert Covington (right knee) and Jeff Teague (left foot) for the remainder of the season.
Guard Jimmer Fredette has agreed to a two-year deal with the Phoenix Suns, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Team option on second season for Fredette, who is returning to NBA once he receives his clearance from China.
Bucks forward Nikola Mirotic has suffered a slight fracture of his left thumb and will miss at least two-to-four weeks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Atlanta Hawks are signing center Deyonta Davis of G League’s Santa Cruz Warriors to a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Davis, 22, has been one of the top big men in the G League this season.
Thunder star Russell Westbrook has been suspended one game for his 16th technical foul. He’ll serve the suspension on Monday.
Bucks' Malcolm Brogdon has suffered a minor plantar fascia tear in his right foot and will be out indefinitely.
Brandon Ingram had his blood clot removed earlier in the week, and today's surgery was done to ensure blood flow, league sources said. The structural issue in his arm was addressed for full recovery and no recurring issues.
Lakers Brandon Ingram underwent thoracic outlet decompression surgery on his right arm and is expected to make full recovery for next season.
Utah Jazz guard Dante Exum has suffered a partially torn patellar tendon in his right knee and is sidelined indefinitely.
The Miami Heat have signed guard Charles Cooke of G League Sioux Falls to a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Cooke spent last season with New Orleans.
The Minnesota Timberwolves and forward Cam Reynolds have agreed to terms on a multiyear contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Reynolds second 10-day was set to expire next week.
Lakers LeBron James will sit tonight against Detroit due to load management.
In wake of Russell Westbrook/Utah fan incident, the NBA has sent a memo to its 30 teams asking them to create PSA or league-developed spot to stress “importance of respect and civility in NBA arenas.”
Duke’s Zion Williamson, the potential No. 1 NBA pick, has been cleared to return from sprained knee tonight against Syracuse.
On @TheAthleticNBA: Lakers' Lonzo Ball opens up for first time since January and recent shutdown: "I'm very, very motivated  It's been frustrating. This is going to be a new summer, most definitely."
Thunder’s Russell Westbrook has been fined $25,000 by NBA for incident with Utah fan Monday night.
The Houston Rockets are converting Danuel House’s two-way contract, signing him to a deal that covers the remainder of the season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA. Conversion for rest of season.
Jazz say the fan directed “excessive and derogatory verbal abuse” toward Russell Westbrook, violating the NBA Code of Conduct.
The Jazz say they have permanently banned the fan who engaged in inappropriate interaction with Thunder star Russell Westbrook.
Sources: Toronto’s Serge Ibaka has been suspended three games by NBA for altercation with Cleveland’s Marquese Chriss. Chriss was suspended one game.
Oubre will be a targeted restricted free agent in July.
The Los Angeles Lakers are signing 33-year-old Andre Ingram from South Bay to a 10-day contract and he has joined the team in Chicago, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
“I see myself as the connector” — Q&amp;A with 76ers forward Tobias Harris on @TheAthleticNBA. The trade. His role alongside Embiid, Simmons, Butler. Whether he viewed Philadelphia as a potential destination even before deal. And more.
The Oklahoma City Thunder and two-way forward Deonte Burton have agreed to a multi-year deal, converting him to a full NBA contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Lakers record since Lonzo Ball went down on Jan. 19: 5-13. Ball had been playing his best basketball when he suffered the Grade 3 ankle sprain against Houston.
For Ball, this will be an opportunity to regain complete health and come into the offseason ready for on-court and body training. Ball has not had a full summer to work on his game, being limited from a knee injury last offseason.
Lakers point guard Lonzo Ball has been shut down for the remainder of the season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Ball had his left ankle re-evaluated by doctors today and sides agreed on course of action.
Lakers Brandon Ingram will miss the remainder of the season with his arm injury.
LeBron James has passed Michael Jordan for fourth on the NBA’s all-time scoring list.
For @TheAthleticNBA: On the Los Angeles Lakers and why responsibility for a likely non-playoff season is multi-faceted.
Bogut and the Warriors will now work to finalize a one-year, minimum contract. The NBL’s MVP is expected to hold a formal press conference soon with the Sydney Kings to announce his move.
Andrew Bogut has agreed to return to the Golden State Warriors, and has received his letter of clearance from Australia and the NBA, agent David Bauman of ISE tells @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
MRI on Lakers forward Kyle Kuzma’s right ankle returned clean and he will be day-to-day toward a return to action, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Eric Bledsoe’s $70M contract extension with the Bucks has a $3.9M partial guarantee (June 30, 2022 trigger date) out of $19.375M in final season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: MRI on Warriors Kevon Looney’s pelvic injury revealed a strain and he will be day-to-day, with return based on strengthening and rehab.
Thompson is expected to be day-to-day with a return based on how quickly he regains range of motion in his knee, league sources said.
MRI on Golden State Warriors All-Star Klay Thompson's right knee returned clean, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
The Golden State Warriors have emerged as the frontrunners for Andrew Bogut, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Bogut’s representatives are working this week through letter of clearance process from Australia’s Sydney Kings.
Multiple contenders, including Golden State and Philadelphia, are expected to express interest in upcoming free agent Andrew Bogut. His season has ended in playoffs of Australia’s NBL, where Bogut was league MVP and DPOY, and he will take some time to decide on next team.
The Phoenix Suns are signing forward Ray Spalding to a two-year deal, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Deal is for the rest of the season, with a partial guarantee for next season.
Sources: Pau Gasol gave back $2.5M in his contract buyout with the Spurs to join Milwaukee, lowering San Antonio’s salary cap hit for this season and 2019-20.
Lakers guard Lonzo Ball (sprained ankle) will be re-evaluated again in one week.
Corey Brewer signed a $2M deal with the Kings for the rest of the season, league sources said.
Kings rookie Marvin Bagley III has a sprained left knee and will be re-evaluated in 1-to-2 weeks. Sigh of relief after a scary injury for Bagley.
Free agent Corey Brewer has agreed to sign with the Kings for the remainder of the season, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium. Sacramento had competition to keep the veteran forward today.
New Orleans and Euroleague guard Dairis Bertans have agreed to a two-year deal, with team option for 2019-20 season, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
76ers center Boban Marjanovic has a bone bruise and mild sprain in his right knee and will be re-evaluated in 5-to-7 days.
The Minnesota Timberwolves are signing forward Cam Reynolds of G League’s Stockton Kings to a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
“I know I’m going to be an All-Star. It wasn’t this year, so it will be next year.” — On Jayson Tatum, the Celtics and their unique position this year.
Rockets star James Harden has been fined $25,000 for public comments directed toward officiating after loss to Lakers.
Pelicans star Anthony Davis will sit tonight’s back to back against the Los Angeles Lakers due to rest.
Duke star Zion Williamson has a Grade 1 right knee sprain and will be day-to-day. Sigh of relief for the possible No. 1 overall pick.
MRI revealed no structural damage on Embiid’s knee, team says.
76ers All-Star Joel Embiid will be re-evaluated in one week, experiencing left knee soreness. He will undergo treatment involving physical therapy and load management.
Second season includes a trigger date for guarantee, sources said, as Knicks maintain flexibility.
The New York Knicks and guard John Jenkins have agreed to a two-year deal, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium: Wizards center Dwight Howard will return to Washington D.C. on Wednesday to start on-court work. Howard has rehabilitated in Atlanta since undergoing spine surgery in late November.
Forward Henry Ellenson plans to sign a 10-day contract with the New York Knicks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Warriors head coach Steve Kerr has been fined $25,000 by NBA for verbally abusing and confronting a game official Wednesday night in Portland.
The Thunder (37-19, third place in the West) represent what Morris believes is his best fit right now, and he’s slated to play significant role in frontcourt. Morris and his agent, Rich Paul, sorted through offers this week and had positive dialogue with teams.
Markieff Morris had an aggressive market over the past week — with pursuits from the Thunder, Rockets, Nets, Raptors and several others. OKC received the commitment from Morris on Thursday.
Free agent Markieff Morris has agreed to sign with Oklahoma City, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
76ers star Joel Embiid has been fined $25,000 for publicly criticizing officials Tuesday night.
Toronto Raptors guard Fred VanVleet will undergo surgery for ligament damage in his left thumb and miss approximately five weeks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
NBA statement on finding no tampering violation between Magic Johnson/Ben Simmons: “The 76ers initiated the contact with the Lakers by requesting a meeting between Johnson and Simmons. Both organizations ultimately concluded that such a meeting did not make sense at this time”
NBA says it found no tampering violation between Lakers and Ben Simmons.
The Thunder plan to sign G League forward Richard Solomon on a 10-day contract, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Wizards star John Wall underwent successful surgery on his ruptured Achilles tendon. He will be out for 12 months.
The NBA is looking into whether any contact took place between Ben Simmons and the Los Angeles Lakers that violated NBA rules, league spokesperson Mike Bass tells @TheAthleticNBA.
Sources: The Pacers are signing two-way guard Edmond Sumner to two-year NBA contract, with a team option for next season.
The Charlotte Hornets have claimed guard Shelvin Mack off waivers after his release from Atlanta, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium: The Raptors and forward Chris Boucher have agreed to a multiyear NBA contract, converting Boucher to a full deal from his two-way.
The Knicks are signing guard John Jenkins to a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
Sources: Alex Abrines gave back almost all of his remaining $1.8M salary in release from OKC. Abrines and the Thunder parted ways amicably and the organization has supported Abrines.
Sources: The Oklahoma City Thunder have waived guard Alex Abrines.
After no deadline trade, Grizzlies and Chandler Parsons have agreed on plan for Parsons to rejoin the team after the All-Star break and return to the lineup, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @Stadium.
In next step toward imminent return, Denver Nuggets' Isaiah Thomas has been assigned to the NBA G League for rehab assignment, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources: The Toronto Raptors plan to sign forward Malcolm Miller of G League affiliate 905 to a 10-day contract.
Sources: The New Orleans Pelicans are releasing forward Markieff Morris, who is currently dealing with an injury.
Sources: The Dallas Mavericks will waive 18-year veteran Zach Randolph.
Sources: The New York Knicks will release center Enes Kanter as early as today.
Wesley Matthews will be released by the New York Knicks today and plans to sign with the Indiana Pacers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium. Major wing addition for the Pacers.
Sources: Toronto is trading Greg Monroe and a second-round pick to Brooklyn.
The Hawks are waiving former Celtics draft pick Jabari Bird, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
New Orleans confirms it has kept Anthony Davis past the trade deadline, pushing talks into the offseason.
Wesley Matthews will agree to a contract buyout with the New York Knicks, and the Indiana Pacers are frontrunners to sign Matthews, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Orlando is sending Jonathon Simmons, OKC first-round pick, and Cleveland second-round pick for Fultz.
Sources: Orlando is sending Jonathon Simmons to the 76ers for Markelle Fultz.
The Clippers are waiving center Marcin Gortat, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Rockets traded James Ennis for swap rights to a 2021 second-round pick, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources: Houston is trading James Ennis to Philadelphia.
Sources: The Wizards have moved off Otto Porter and Markieff Morris tonight to go under luxury tax threshold --- but have no plans to move All-Star Bradley Beal before the deadlne.
Wesley Johnson is heading to Washington for Markeff Morris.
The Wizards are trading Markieff Morris to the Pelicans, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
The Dallas Mavericks are finalizing a deal to trade Harrison Barnes to the Sacramento Kings, league sources tell @@TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources: In Sacramento/Cleveland/Houston three-way deal, Sacramento is trading Iman Shumpert to Houston, Cavs sending Alec Burks and second round pick to Kings, and Brandon Knight and a pick to Cleveland.
The Washington Wizards are sending Otto Porter to the Chicago Bulls for Bobby Portis and Jabari Parker, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources: As active discussions continue between Grizzlies and Hornets, Marc Gasol did not travel with Memphis on their trip to Oklahoma City.
The Phoenix Suns will likely waive veteran guard Wayne Ellington, which would allow him to enter free agency, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Here's a strong rotation trade candidate who is part of Miami/Phoenix trade: Heat guard Wayne Ellington is being sent to the Suns, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Tobias Harris is officially a 76er. Major addition for Philadelphia adding a near All-Star forward.
The Clippers are sending Tobias Harris to the 76ers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources: The Los Angeles Clippers and Philadelphia 76ers have reached agreement on a trade.
Sources: The Lakers are trading guard Sviatoslav Mykhailiuk and a draft pick to Detroit for guard Reggie Bullock. Deal is expected to be completed Wednesday.
The Pelicans will re-evaluate their position on sitting Davis if and when the deadline passes with no deal, league sources said.
Sources: Anthony Davis has been medically cleared to play from his left index finger fracture, but the New Orleans Pelicans do not intend to play him before Thursday's trade deadline. Davis is expected to be inactive against the Bulls on Wednesday night.
Memphis will sit Marc Gasol out tonight. The Grizzlies and Hornets are still discussing framework of deal, including matching the salary necessary to meet Gasol's $24.1M contract, sources said.
Memphis is in strong talks to move franchise star Marc Gasol to Charlotte, league sources tell @TheAthletic @WatchStadium.
Wall will undergo the procedure in Green Bay, Wi.
Wall suffered the torn Achilles tendon after slipping and falling in his home, team says.
Wizards star John Wall underwent surgery for a ruptured left Achilles tendon and will be out 12 months.
The Miami Heat will retire Chris Bosh's No. 1 jersey on March 26.
Sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium it's four-team list for Davis -- with inclusion of the Clippers and Bucks along with previous teams (Lakers, Knicks). The Knicks are unlikely, however, after moving Kristaps Porzingis to Dallas.
Anthony Davis’ representatives have informed the Pelicans that he would sign long-term with the Lakers, Knicks, Bucks and Clippers if he is traded, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA.
The veteran players raised their voice on topics of Walton’s playing time distribution and rotations, sources said. Hope afterward among players and coaches was that this helped cleanse issues within the team.
In postgame locker room, Luke Walton preached to players on playing unselfishly, sources said, when several veteran players snapped back. As one source described it, “Heated scene.”
As uncertainty surrounds Lakers into deadline week, several veterans -- including Michael Beasley -- had an emotionally-charged verbal exchange with head coach Luke Walton postgame tonight, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium. It stopped short of turning physical.
Philadelphia starter Wilson Chandler will miss 2-to-3 weeks with a right quadriceps strain, likely to return after the All-Star break, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources with The Athletic's Pelicans reporter @WillGuillory: One player the Lakers have not placed in discussions with Pelicans for Anthony Davis (besides LeBron James): Kentavious Caldwell-Pope.
Sources: The Lakers have yet to place all of their assets on the table as the Pelicans listen on offers for Anthony Davis. "Lowball," one source said. Davis hasn't been cleared from his fractured left finger, but is close to a return to action.
Sources: The Lakers have offered the Pelicans two of their talented young players -- among Lonzo Ball, Brandon Ingram, Kyle Kuzma, Ivica Zubac, Josh Hart -- with Rondo or Stephenson as core parts of a deal. For Pelicans, these have not been remotely serious offers.
Sources: In pursuit of All-NBA star Anthony Davis, the Lakers' offers to the Pelicans have not been worth countering or responding for Pelicans. Lakers' deals have included Rajon Rondo or Lance Stephenson as core parts of proposals -- along with a couple of key young players.
Brooklyn's D'Angelo Russell has been selected as Victor Oladipo's replacement as an East reserve in the NBA All-Star game, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources: Chicago is finalizing a trade to acquire Oklahoma City's Timothe Luwawu-Cabarrot and cash considerations.
The NBA has added future Hall of Famers, Dirk Nowitzki and Dwyane Wade, as special roster additions to the 2019 NBA All-Star game.
Anthony Davis is focused on the Lakers as his top preferred destination, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium. The Knicks are also as a preferred landing spot, and made push to New Orleans with offer around Kristaps Porzingis before the Dallas deal.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Boston Celtics aren't a preferred destination long-term for New Orleans star Anthony Davis, and in Davis’ mind, remain a rental option.
2019 West All-Star reserves: Russell Westbrook, Damian Lillard, Klay Thompson, Anthony Davis, Nikola Jokic, LaMarcus Aldridge, Karl-Anthony Towns. No Tobias Harris.
2019 East All-Star reserves: Kyle Lowry, Victor Oladipo, Blake Griffin, Nikola Vucevic, Khris Middleton, Ben Simmons, Bradley Beal.
Kristaps Porzingis is officially a Maverick. Dennis Smith Jr. is officially a Knick.
Sources: Dallas' draft compensation to New York in Kristaps Porzingis deal: Two future first-round picks.
Porzingis is incredibly fond of Dirk Nowitzki and Luka Doncic -- and the Mavericks have confidence they will be able to keep Porzingis, league sources said. Knicks/Mavericks talks started picking up steam Wednesday night.
Sources: All-Star Kristaps Porzingis is planning to inform the Dallas Mavericks his intent is to sign the qualifying offer in restricted free agency this summer.
Sources: Full players involved in Knicks/Mavericks deal: Kristaps Porzingis, Tim Hardaway Jr., Courtney Lee, Trey Burke to Dallas. Dennis Smith Jr., Wes Matthews, DeAndre Jordan and likely first-round draft pick compensation to New York.
Sources: New York and Dallas have agreed in principle on a trade sending package around Kristaps Porzingis for Dennis Smith Jr. Wes Matthews, other contracts, and picks going to New York, and Tim Hardaway Jr., Trey Burke among players going to Dallas. Sides finishing final terms.
New York and Dallas are in deep discussions on a trade that would send Kristaps Porzingis to the Mavericks and Dennis Smith Jr. to the Knicks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
The Washington Wizards and guard John Jenkins of G League Westchester are finalizing a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Pelicans star Anthony Davis has been fined $50,000 for his representative, Rich Paul, going on the record for trade request, violating CBA.
Sources: The NBA has fined Anthony Davis $50,000.
Minnesota is planning to sign guard Isaiah Canaan to a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources: Should Lakers/Pelicans trade talks pick up, point guard Lonzo Ball's camp prefers Ball to be moved to a third team that doesn't have an established point guard.
All-Star Anthony Davis agent, Rich Paul, notified the New Orleans Pelicans on Friday that Davis will not sign a contract extension and has requested a trade, Paul says. Davis also had conversations with teammates prior to his decision.
Sacramento's Buddy Hield will participate in the 3-point shootout at All-Star weekend in Charlotte, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Mavericks future Hall of Famer Dirk Nowitzki has committed to the NBA 3-point shootout at All-Star weekend. So Dallas will have Nowitzki in 3-point shootout, Dennis Smith Jr. in Dunk Contest and Luka Doncic in Skills Competition.
Dallas Mavericks rookie star Luka Doncic plans to participate in the Skills Competition at All-Star weekend in Charlotte, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Dallas Mavericks point guard Dennis Smith Jr. has committed to the NBA All-Star Slam Dunk Contest in Charlotte.
Denver Nuggets star Nikola Jokic has been suspended one game without pay by the NBA for leaving bench during altercation Wednesday night in Utah.
Butler will be with the 76ers in Denver and is doubtful for Saturday's game against the Nuggets, league sources said. Both sides are optimistic he will play during 76ers' four-game road trip.
76ers star Jimmy Butler will see a specialist for his sprained right wrist today in Los Angeles, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The NBA issued a memo to all 30 teams today reminding players are prohibited from throwing/kicking items such as a basketball into the crowd. The league informed teams there have been increased number of such incidents this season.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: New Orleans Pelicans forward Nikola Mirotic has 1-to-2 week timetable with his right calf strain and will be re-evaluated in one week.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The NBA has granted the Washington Wizards an $8.6M Disabled Player Exception for loss of star guard John Wall. Washington has a March 11 deadline to use the exception.
2019 East All-Star starters: Boston’s Kyrie Irving Charlotte’s Kemba Walker Milwaukee’s Giannis Antetokounmpo (captain) Toronto’s Kawhi Leonard Philadelphia’s Joel Embiid
2019 West All-Star starters: Golden State’s Stephen Curry Houston’s James Harden Lakers’ LeBron James (captain) Golden State’s Kevin Durant Oklahoma City’s Paul George
Dinwiddie has had a spectacular season for Brooklyn, averaging 17.2 points and five assists in a Sixth Man role and helping push the Nets into the sixth seed in the East.
Brooklyn Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie has torn ligaments on his right thumb and is evaluating need for surgery, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Suns' Devin Booker has been fined $25,000 by NBA for escalating an on-court altercation with Timberwolves' Gorgui Dieng.
Oladipo will undergo surgery and miss the season.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: 76ers rookie Zhaire Smith has started his return process to the team after broken foot and allergy issue, being assigned to G League Delaware for non-contact elements of practice. He’ll ramp up activities as weeks progress.
Victor Oladipo has a "serious" right knee injury and will have an MRI, Pacers say.
New Orleans Pelicans star Anthony Davis will see a hand specialist with fear of a volar plate avulsion fracture in his left index finger, agent Rich Paul tells @TheAthleticNBA. If confirmed, Davis will likely miss 2-to-4 weeks.
Sources: Rockets and Bulls have completed trade: Carmelo Anthony, draft rights to Jon Diebler and $1.56 million to Chicago for draft rights to Tadija Dragicevoc.
Mavericks rookie star Luka Doncic has been fined $10,000 by NBA for kicking ball into crowd on Saturday night.
DeMarcus Cousins tells @TheAthleticNBA on getting separated from Pelicans star Anthony Davis: “I think about our pairing all the time. Me and AD talk about it. It’s fucked up.” More:
DeMarcus Cousins watched highlights of himself on the darkest days of his Achilles rehab. He still thinks about his partnership with Anthony Davis. Inside Boogie’s rehab, mind, big-picture vision, and his truths on free agency.
Coming shortly on @TheAthleticNBA: Inside DeMarcus Cousins’ return for the Warriors.
The Houston Rockets are waiving guard James Nunnally to create roster space for Kenneth Faried, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Boston Celtics guard Marcus Smart has been fined $35,000 for physical altercation and failure to leave court in timely matter on Saturday night.
Sources tell @TheAthletic @WatchStadium: Mavericks head coach Rick Carlisle apologized to Dennis Smith Jr. in phone conversation, expressing remorse over situation. The Mavericks have made clear Smith has been positive presence for them.
Lakers point guard Lonzo Ball will miss 4-to-6 weeks with a Grade 3 left ankle sprain.
Sources: After Dallas head coach Rick Calisle and guard Dennis Smith Jr. spoke on a call, Smith will report to the Mavericks on Tuesday and play against the Clippers. Carlisle and Smith had productive conversations.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Indiana Pacers are signing guard Stephan Hicks from G League affiliate Fort Wayne on a 10-day contract.
Bulls rookie Wendell Carter Jr. plans to undergo surgery on his left thumb on Monday, sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium. He will be sidelined up to three months.
Anthony Davis will re-evaluate the injury in 3-to-4 days and decide whether he needs to see a hand specialist, agent Rich Paul tells @TheAthleticNBA.
New Orleans Pelicans star Anthony Davis is expected to miss 1-to-2 weeks with a left finger sprain.
Sources: Faried plans to sign a one-year, veteran’s minimum deal with the Houston Rockets when he clears waivers from Nets buyout.
Brooklyn forward Kenneth Faried is in advanced discussions on a contract buyout to enter free agency, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Chicago Bulls rookie Wendell Carter Jr. is expected to undergo surgery on his left thumb and miss 8-to-12 weeks.
The NBA will hold the 2019 Las Vegas summer league on July 5-15.
Story on @TheAthleticNBA: As Memphis approaches a crossroads, franchise stars, owner Robert Pera meet over state of franchise.
Sources: Dallas Dennis Smith Jr. and top team officials have talked in past several days and had positive communication. Mavericks maintain Smith has been positive teammate and competitor. Smith hasn’t made trade request.
The NBA will televise its All-Star Game draft on Feb. 7.
Forward Quincy Acy is signing a second 10-day contract with the Suns, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
LeBron James has been cleared to return to Lakers practice next week and progress toward playing after that.
There’s hope Nunnally and Gordon can play tonight for Houston against Brooklyn, league sources said. Gordon has missed the last eight games.
With Chris Paul, Clint Capela and Eric Gordon sidelined and Danuel House back to G League, the Rockets plan to sign guard James Nunnally to a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources: Lakers also planning on starting Kentavious Caldwell-Pope for Josh Hart. So KCP and Chandler in, McGee and Hart to the bench.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: After seven losses in 10 games, likely starting lineup change for the Los Angeles Lakers and coach Luke Walton: Tyson Chandler starting for JaVale McGee.
Free agent forward Corey Brewer has signed a 10-day contract with the Philadelphia 76ers, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Memphis Grizzlies are planning to sign G League Austin's Julian Washburn to a two-way NBA deal.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Guard Isaiah Whitehead has agreed to a two-way NBA contract with the Detroit Pistons. Whitehead was Brooklyn’s second-round pick in 2016 and had played overseas this season.
The Minnesota Timberwolves are finalizing a deal to hire veteran assistant coach Jerry Sichting to head coach Ryan Saunders' staff, league sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Cleveland Cavaliers are signing Deng Adel of G League's Raptors 905 to a two-way NBA contract.
The NBA found no violation of the league’s Collective Bargaining Agreement in Cavaliers' signing of Pat McCaw.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Dallas Mavericks have applied for a Disabled Player Exception from the NBA for season-ending loss of J.J. Barea.
Latest on LeBron James and a groin strain that had a minimum three-week recovery. Tuesday marks three weeks, with a re-evaluation on Wednesday.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Knicks are signing G League Westchester guard Kadeem Allen to a two-way NBA deal.
Sources: Chicago Bulls head coach Jim Boylen has agreed to a new deal with the franchise, increasing the salary on the remaining two seasons of his contract (this year and 2019-20).
The Oklahoma City Thunder are retiring Nick Collison and his No. 4 jersey on March 20.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: MRI revealed Mavericks guard J.J. Barea has a torn right Achilles tendon.
Sitdown with Clippers star Tobias Harris (@tobias31): On a learning rookie season in Milwaukee, motivation from Blake Griffin trade, growing up “a chubby kid,” All-Star goal and “being part of something you can put your imprint on” in L.A.
Lakers' LeBron James is increasing on-court basketball and will have return update on Jan. 16.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Washington Wizards have applied to the NBA for an $8.6M disabled player exception for loss of All-Star John Wall.
Sources: Pat McCaw plans to sign one-year, $786K veteran's minimum deal with the Toronto Raptors. McCaw has cleared free agency waivers.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Memphis’ Dillon Brooks is likely to miss the remainder of the season with right toe injury. Brooks will undergo a procedure, but is expected to fully recover and have full summer of workouts.
Positive news for Noel and the Thunder. Noel exited the game in a stretcher and knocked unconscious, but was alert in the aftermath of his fall last night. He'll continue to have evaluations. Noel has been a valued rotation player for OKC this season.
After scary fall last night, Oklahoma City Thunder center Nerlens Noel has been diagnosed with a concussion — and tests showed he avoided any fractures, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources: All-Star DeMarcus Cousins' expected season debut for the Golden State Warriors: Jan. 18 against the Clippers in Los Angeles.
Sources with @Tjonesonthenba: Utah's Ricky Rubio and Thabo Sefolosha both had clean MRI results today on injured hamstrings -- with Rubio expected to miss approximately two weeks and Sefolosha out 10-12 days.
The Suns have made this official, signing Quincy Acy -- who's known as a good veteran and positive locker room addition.
Anthony Davis talks to @TheAthleticNBA, making clear his number one priority this season and beyond: Winning.
Increased fan apathy in Minnesota -- with critical season tickets renewal period approaching, sources say -- was undeniable factor in Tom Thibodeau's inevitable firing. On Thibodeau and the business of basketball:
The Timberwolves are waiving guard James Nunnally ahead of guarantee date on Monday, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
President and coach Tom Thibodeau has been fired by Minnesota.
Sources with @JonKrawczynski: Minnesota has fired coach Tom Thibodeau.
The Cleveland Cavaliers are planning to sign free agent guard Cameron Payne to a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium. Cleveland is releasing Pat McCaw, opening roster spot.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Philadelphia 76ers are releasing guard Demetrius Jackson, who is on a two-way NBA deal and is accepting a deal in China.
Cleveland, along with several playoff contenders, are expected to express interest in signing McCaw (unrestricted free agent) if he clears waivers. Guarantee deadline for McCaw (two years, $6M) -- and other players on non-guaranteed deals around NBA -- is Monday.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Cleveland Cavaliers are planning to waive Pat McCaw. McCaw signed a non-guaranteed two-year offer sheet with Cleveland to leave Golden State.
The Phoenix Suns are planning to sign veteran forward Quincy Acy to a 10-day contract, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Lakers' LeBron James (groin) will be re-evaluated in one week.
Sources: The Bulls and MarShon Brooks agent, Wallace Prather, plan to work on resolution for new destination for Brooks. Chicago doesn’t plan to have Brooks report to team, or waive him immediately, after Memphis trade.
Full statement from Oregon freshman Bol Bol’s lawyer, prominent Hollywood sports and entertainment attorney Bryan J. Freedman:
Chicago is receiving two second-round draft picks for Justin Holiday, who's headed to Memphis. Several teams had begun pursuing Holiday -- a 3-and-D wing -- in recent weeks.
The Bulls are trading Justin Holiday to Memphis for draft picks, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Bol's lawyer, Bryan J. Freedman: "At surgery, two screws were inserted into the navicular bone and bone graft from his pelvis was added to speed up the healing, which will expedite his return to play."
From top NBA draft prospect Bol Bol's lawyer, Bryan J. Freedman: Bol underwent surgery Thursday to repair non-displaced fracture of navicular bone in left foot. Bol begins rehab next week, will use crutches/boot for 8-10 weeks and return to basketball activities in summer.
Oregon’s Bol Bol — a projected top NBA draft pick — says he has a season-ending left foot injury. Bol Bol will begin rehabilitation for the 2019 NBA draft.
NBA Rookies of the Month for December: Dallas' Luka Doncic, for a second time so far -- and New York's Kevin Knox.
Story on @TheAthleticNBA:
The Memphis Grizzlies' emotional team meeting after loss to Detroit tonight turned physical in an altercation between veterans Garrett Temple and Omri Casspi in locker room, league sources tell @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Golden State's Andre Iguodala has been fined $25,000 by NBA for throwing ball into the crowd at halftime in Portland on Saturday night.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Memphis Grizzlies plan to sign forward/center Jarnell Stokes of G League Sioux Falls to a two-way NBA deal.
The Denver Nuggets have waived guard Nick Young.
Wall is leaning toward undergoing the season-ending surgery, which was prescribed by specialist today, league sources said. He will make decision final next week. Surgery route will fully heal the bone spurs that have nagged him for years and allow him to perform at full steam.
Wall has tried to battle through the pain in his injured heel to help Wizards turn around season, but the pain has become too significant. Wall visited a specialist in Wisconsin today.
Sources: Washington Wizards guard John Wall is considering surgery on his injured left heel, which would sideline him six-to-eight months.
Four-week timetable for Rajon Rondo with surgery for Grade 3 finger sprain in right hand. Lakers now down two of their leaders in LeBron James (groin) and Rondo.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Los Angeles Lakers guard Rajon Rondo is expected to undergo surgery on his injured right hand and miss one month.
Golden State Warriors restricted free agent Pat McCaw is signing a two years, $6M offer sheet with the Cleveland Cavaliers, per league sources.
MRI returned clean on the four-time NBA MVP LeBron James, league sources said.
Sources @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Los Angeles Lakers star LeBron James will be day-to-day after MRI on groin strain.
Parsons, who has been out since Oct. 24 with right knee swelling, participated in a full five-on-five team scrimmage on Saturday in Sacramento, sources said.
Sources: Memphis forward Chandler Parsons has been cleared to play by the team's medical staff -- which expected him to make his return this past Friday in Sacramento -- but Grizzlies management has decided to make him a healthy-inactive for foreseeable future.
Bulls waiving Tyler Ulis, signing guard Brandon Sampson to a two-way NBA contract, per league sources. Brandon Sampson, not JaKarr.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The NBA has granted the Milwaukee Bucks relief of Mirza Teletovic’s contract due to career-ending injury, removing $10.5 million on salary books.
New York Knicks Kristaps Porzingis has made good progress from left ACL surgery and will be re-evaluated in mid-February.
Chicago's Bobby Portis will miss 2-to-4 weeks with a right ankle sprain, joining Zach LaVine as out for multiple weeks with ankle sprain.
Baynes has been a critical player for Celtics — filling starting and reserve roles — and serving as a leader and defensive anchor. Tough blow for Boston.
Boston Celtics center Aron Baynes has suffered a broken left hand and will undergo surgery, per league sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium. Baynes is expected to return in a month.
OKC’s Raymond Felton and Dennis Schroder have been suspended one game by the NBA for altercation against the Bulls.
Tough blow for the Miami Heat: Goran Dragic will undergo procedure on his right knee.
Toronto Raptors head coach Nick Nurse has been fined $15,000 by the NBA for publicly criticizing officiating on his star Kawhi Leonard.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Houston Rockets have waived Chinese center Zhou Qi.
Trevor Ariza is officially a Washington Wizard again and Kelly Oubre Jr. and Austin Rivers are Suns.
The value of Trevor Ariza — with Wizards trade scheduled to be made official today.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Denver Nuggets are signing G League Memphis guard Brandon Goodwin to a two-way NBA contract. Goodwin was with the Nuggets prior to team signing Nick Young this week.
Trade call to complete deal with the NBA: Monday.
No picks involved. Deal done. Trevor Ariza is a Wizard; Kelly Oubre and Austin Rivers are Suns.
Sources: Phoenix is trading Trevor Ariza to Washington for Kelly Oubre and Austin Rivers.
Sources: Suns will have Trevor Ariza away from team for Saturday's home game against Minnesota as franchise works on resolution. Suns and Grizzlies had handful of discussions recently involving Dillon Brooks -- never MarShon. For Suns/Wizards, nothing was lost in translation.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Raptors' Pascal Siakam is expected to be day-to-day after hard fall on his back tonight in Portland; no damage found in postgame tests. Siakam has emerged as a valuable player for Toronto.
Video on Bulls and Jabari Parker’s representatives working on trade scenarios.
Coming off 39-point game, Dinwiddie gets three years, $34.5M and player option in extension with Brooklyn. The Nets picked him up off free agency pool in December 2016 and watched him develop into a productive player.
Brooklyn Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie has agreed to a three-year contract extension, per league sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Raptors center Jonas Valanciunas underwent surgery on dislocated left thumb. He will be out at least four weeks.
Strong find for Knicks' front office: From undrafted to a two-way deal on draft night, then an opportunity under David Fizdale and richest conversion (two years, $6.9M) in short history of two-way.
Trier is signing two-year NBA deal using Knicks' bi-annual exception, league sources said. Trier has become part of Knicks' future after going undrafted and agreeing to two-way deal on draft night in June.
The New York Knicks and two-way guard Allonzo Trier have agreed to a two-year deal, per league sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium. The Knicks are expected to release Ron Baker to create roster space, league sources said.
Raptors star Kawhi Leonard will miss tonight’s game against the Warriors with hip injury.
Story on @TheAthleticNBA: Rockets emerge as possible suitor for Lakers’ Kentavious Caldwell-Pope in multi-team scenarios.
Kevin Durant: “I try to get lost in the game to get through a time like that ... I like basketball 100 percent. The other sh— is aight.” On the Warriors early drama, moving past it and a 24/7 indulgence of basketball.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The NBA is naming league office executive and former All-Star, Shareef Abdur-Rahim, as president of the G League, replacing Malcolm Turner.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Denver’s Paul Millsap is expected to be sidelined 4-to-6 weeks with a broken big toe in his right foot.
The return of DeMarcus Cousins has begun: The Golden State Warriors have assigned the All-Star center to G League affiliate Santa Cruz.
The Denver Nuggets have signed guard Nick Young.
Denver Nuggets forward Paul Millsap is feared to have suffered a broken toe in his right foot tonight in Charlotte, per league sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources: Milwaukee is also sending center John Henson and Matthew Dellavedova to Cleveland for Hill.
Sources: Cleveland is trading George Hill to Milwaukee.
The Phoenix Suns have signed point guard Jawun Evans to a two-way contract.
Clark is signing a three-year, $3.7M deal with the Rockets, league sources said. Contract is fully guaranteed this season, half guaranteed in '19-20 with incentives to make it full, and guarantee date in '20-21.
With two-way spot opening from Clark contract, the Rockets are planning to sign swingman Danuel House to a two-way contract, league sources said.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Houston Rockets and two-way player Gary Clark have agreed to a three-year NBA contract. Clark has emerged as a key rotation player for the Rockets.
The Philadelphia 76ers held a free-agent workout this week with veteran guards Arron Afflalo, Brandon Rush and Sean Kilpatrick, along with G League Delaware’s Haywood Highsmith, per league sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Cleveland's Tristan Thompson has been fined $15,000 by NBA for making gesture toward fan in Monday's game in Brooklyn.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: With 76ers support, Markelle Fultz will work with former Lakers' renowned physical therapist Judy Seto. Seto has worked with Kobe Bryant -- as well as 76ers GM Elton Brand -- during their playing careers.
Markelle Fultz has traveled comprehensively for specialist visits and trips in past two weeks, from Philadelphia to New York to St. Louis and back, from home in Maryland to Los Angeles. Bottom line in whatever outcome: The former No. 1 pick needs to get right in body and mind.
Sources: The Houston Rockets have waived forward Danuel House.
Sources: 76ers Markelle Fultz will be out indefinitely with thoracic outlet syndrome, starting physical therapy immediately. Likely weeks.
Clippers Pat Beverley has been fined $25,000 for throwing ball toward a fan in Dallas on Sunday night.
First NBA Players of Month for opening month of the season: Milwaukee's Giannis Antetokounmpo and Clippers' Tobias Harris.
First NBA Rookies of the Month honor of the season: Dallas' Luka Doncic and Atlanta's Trae Young.
Quick video on Bulls firing of Fred Hoiberg. Team finalized decision Sunday, per league sources.
Jim Boylen is the new interim head coach for the Chicago Bulls.
The Chicago Bulls fired head coach Fred Hoiberg.
Golden State Warriors center Damian Jones has suffered a torn left pectoral muscle. He was injured Saturday night in Detroit.
Chicago's Lauri Markkanen is expected to make his season debut tonight in Houston. He is listed "probable" to return to the Bulls lineup against Rockets after suffering a sprained right elbow in training camp.
Noah will travel to Memphis on Sunday and sign his one-year deal with the Grizzlies early next week, league sources said. Memphis (12-8) has targeted Noah as backup center all season.
Joakim Noah has agreed to a one-year, veteran's minimum deal with the Memphis Grizzlies, per league sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Dwight Howard is undergoing surgery on L4/L5 discs in his spine and hopeful of return within eight weeks, league sources said.
Washington Wizards' Dwight Howard will undergo surgery on his back, per league sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Injury news for Rockets, who are 9-11: Guard Brandon Knight will be assigned to the NBA G League and play in rehab assignment tonight for Rio Grande Valley as he nears return from knee surgery, per league sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Boston Celtics have waived guard Walter Lemon Jr., who was on a two-way contract.
The Suns are releasing guard Isaiah Canaan, per league sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium. Canaan started 15 of Phoenix’s 20 games so far this season. Devin Booker has started at point guard in recent games.
Top “City Edition” jersey in NBA’s store since launch this season: The 76ers, per league sources. Philadelphia has Joel Embiid and Ben Simmons in top 10 in individual player jersey sales so far.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Houston Rockets are planning to sign swingman Danuel House of G League affiliate Rio Grande Valley. He traveled to join the team in Washington.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Joakim Noah and the Memphis Grizzlies are expected to meet late next week and come to terms on a deal — in what has been a nearly two month-long courtship.
Positive news for Oklahoma City despite gruesome-looking injury: Rookie Hamidou Diallo has suffered a left ankle sprain, per league sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium. Further tests on Thursday.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA: 76ers' Markelle Fultz will have an apparent wrist issue ailing his shooting examined Monday in New York, could prefer change in scenery. More reporting from @JaredWeissNBA, @DerekBodnerNBA, @sam_amick and
Ahead of Golden State/OKC tonight: On the Warriors moving forward and the All-Star who addressed players postgame Sunday.
The Washington Wizards are planning to sign forward Okaro White to fill open roster spot, per league sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium. White is traveling to Washington today to join team.
76ers' 2017 No. 1 overall pick Markelle Fultz will see a specialist for his shoulder in New York within the next week, as our @TheAthleticNBA's @davidaldridgedc reports.
Along with John Wall fine, recent practice included All-Star Bradley Beal taking aim at Wizards officials, including president Ernie Grunfeld: “I’ve been dealing with this s— for 7 years — it starts top-down.” Jeff Green and Wall, Beal and Austin Rivers had heated altercations.
On the Wizards recent heated practice and what it included:
Teams have these kinds of practices, and tension always reveals itself amid underperformance. Wizards are 5-11 so far this year. Several players had verbal back and forth in this practice, league sources said.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Washington Wizards had a volatile practice within recent days, with verbal altercations among players and an exasperated Bradley Beal saying toward team officials: "I've been dealing with this for seven years."
Heat’s emerging star Josh Richardson has been fined $25,000 for tossing his shoe into the crowd Sunday night in Miami.
Bulls' Denzel Valentine will undergo reconstruction surgery on his left ankle and be sidelined 4-to-6 months.
Pelicans point guard Elfrid Payton will miss six weeks with surgery for fractured left finger.
Franchise icon and Hall of Famer, Allen Iverson, on Philadelphia’s rise from 10 wins to now: “We got through so much, excuse my French, sh— to get to this point.” Full story on @TheAthleticNBA:
“Night and day”: The surging new partnership between Jimmy Butler and the 76ers. From Philadelphia:
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The San Antonio Spurs are signing forward Ben Moore to a two-way NBA contract. Moore started this season with the Indiana Pacers.
As former teammate and good friend Carmelo Anthony contemplates NBA future, Allen Iverson tells @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: “No way Melo should retire. I definitely think he should keep going. He got a lot left in the tank, man. It’s just got to be the right situation.”
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Milwaukee center John Henson's expected timetable is a minimum of 12 weeks with torn ligament in left wrist -- likely post All-Star break. Henson plans to return this season.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard is expected to play tonight against the Lakers in Los Angeles. He’s rehabbed his knee this week. Lillard has led Blazers to a 10-3 start.
On Draymond Green’s message to Kevin Durant — and imploring Durant’s handling of his free agent season. Read @ThompsonScribe on @TheAthleticNBA too:
After the Golden State Warriors reviewed comments made in heated moments last night, Green is expected to sit tonight against the Atlanta Hawks to cool off.
Sources: In midst of verbal exchange on court late in Monday's game, Draymond Green challenged Kevin Durant about Durant's impending free agency. As teammates came at Green about his turnover, he responded. This has been a simmering issue for the Warriors today.
No surgery for LeVert and he is expected to make a return this season. LeVert flew home with the Nets from Minneapolis last night, went to hospital in New York and ran tests that showed no fractures and moderate ligament damage.
Brooklyn’s Caris LeVert has suffered a dislocated right foot. As positive of an outcome given the circumstances.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @watchstadium: The Washington Wizards have waived guard Chasson Randle.
Jimmy Butler is officially a Philadelphia 76er.
Jimmy Butler decided Friday would be his final game indefinitely with the Timberwolves. The final three offers. And much more. @TheAthleticNBA piece with @JonKrawczynski on the play-by-play of unprecedented two-month saga:
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Houston Rockets and Carmelo Anthony are seriously weighing his roster situation. Sides ruled him out tonight in San Antonio due to "illness" — after he practiced fully with team Friday, league sources said.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Minnesota and Philadelphia have trade call with the NBA on Monday to complete the Jimmy Butler trade.
Butler nearly sat Friday night's game -- after intending to play -- as Philadelphia deal took form. Sides finalized agreement before Minnesota flew out of Sacramento.
Sources: Philadelphia's Jerryd Bayless has also been traded to Minnesota as part of Jimmy Butler deal. Covington/Saric/Bayless/2022 2nd for Butler and Patton.
Minnesota has traded Jimmy Butler and Justin Patton to Philadelphia for Robert, Covington, Dario Saric and a 2022 second-round draft pick, league sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski.
Philadelphia package to Minnesota includes Robert Covington, Dario Saric, and likely a draft pick, league sources said. Sides exchanged medicals to complete deal.
Sources with @JonKrawczynski: Philadelphia is finalizing a deal with Minnesota to acquire Jimmy Butler.
Warriors' Stephen Curry has a left adductor strain.
Full one-on-one w/ Kyrie Irving: On challenging himself, embracing being a face of Celtics, at times “very lonely” leadership, parting with the Cavaliers, his future and more -- “It almost scares me in terms of the potential of me at the start of my prime.”
Sitdown with Celtics star Kyrie Irving, on early Boston commitment, leaning on familiar voice from past decisions: “Most importantly, it’s being connected to an incredible, incredible culture that has existed way before me and will exist after me. I wanted to be part of that.”
Sitdown with Celtics' Kyrie Irving, on leadership in Boston and leaving Cleveland. “I didn’t know what to do or where to go, but I knew I needed a change. There was a part of my career that I envisioned myself being in...that challenge was not going to come being where I was."
Celtics' Kyrie Irving has been fined $25,000 by NBA for throwing the basketball into the stands on Monday in Denver.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: LiAngelo Ball has notified NBA G League teams that he is planning to enter player pool to sign a G League contract. Ball went undrafted in June NBA draft after playing in Lithuania last season.
LaMelo Ball will return to the States to play high school basketball at Spire Institute in Ohio, as Ball family announces through Slam. Ball, 17, will return for pro scouts to view — including a January matchup against Oak Hill and top prospect Cole Anthony.
Kawhi Leonard is out tonight for Raptors/Jazz in Utah.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Tyson Chandler gave back $2.1M of his $13.5M deal in contract buyout with the Suns. He will soon join the Lakers and recoup the salary.
Kawhi Leonard will miss tonight’s Raptors/Lakers game in Los Angeles. He tweaked his foot on Friday night.
Minnesota's Jimmy Butler is sitting out again tonight in Portland.
Cleveland’s Kevin Love underwent surgery on his left foot and will be re-evaluated in six weeks.
New Orleans star Anthony Davis is out tonight against Portland.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Denver Nuggets have declined the third-year player option on 2017 No. 24 overall pick Tyler Lydon. He will be an unrestricted free agent in July.
Derrick Rose: 50 points, tears off the court. "The game got a hold on me. I could easily walk away right now. I got a son, a daughter. I want to be able to tell them one day, Shut up, I’m not trying to hear that.’"
MRI on Minnesota Timberwolves guard Tyus Jones' right foot returned negative, with inflammation in his foot, league sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski.
This was Jimmy Butler's decision and league sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski the plan is to travel to the west coast for Friday's game against the Warriors and then re-evaluate on game-by-game basis.
The Minnesota Timberwolves are declining center Justin Patton’s third-year team option, league sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski.
Butler started contemplating not playing tonight on Tuesday, and the final decision was made Wednesday morning, sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski. Timberwolves termed it "general soreness and precautionary rest,” but Butler informed Tom Thibodeau of his decision.
Jimmy Butler is taking next step in six-week-long process aimed at getting the All-Star out of Minnesota by sitting tonight against Utah, and could lead to extended absence for Butler, league sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Wizards center Dwight Howard is planning to make his season debut in Washington on Friday against OKC — allowing the team to view roster with an important starter in lineup.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Boston Celtics have exercised forward Guerschon Yabusele’s third-year team option.
"They just don't know me." — Former NBA MVP Derrick Rose opens up on overcoming injuries and adversity; awkwardness playing with LeBron; leaving Cavs/Knicks; Tom Thibodeau; and why "the game got a hold on me."
Kobe Bryant will be a global ambassador for the 2019 FIBA basketball World Cup in China. Yao Ming will also be an ambassador.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Washington Wizards are planning to sign guard Chasson Randle to a contract. He will be the 14th player on standard roster.
The San Antonio Spurs will retire Manu Ginobili's No. 20 jersey in the rafters on March 28.
Klay Thompson has the NBA’s all-time record for three-pointers made with 14 here in Chicago — passing Steph Curry.
Toronto is resting Kawhi Leonard for tonight's game against the Milwaukee Bucks.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Larry Drew hasn't agreed to take interim head coach title with Cleveland, but will continue as voice of head coach as team could look to assess their options.
The Cavaliers have also parted ways with assistant coach Damon Jones, league sources said.
Ty Lue went 128-83 over three years as Cavaliers head coach, helped guiding team to 2016 championship and three consecutive Finals trips. Cavaliers front office is meeting with assistant Larry Drew now as possible interim coach.
Cavs roster has been informed of firing of Ty Lue, per league sources. Lue has been let go as Cavs head coach after 0-6 start to Cleveland’s season.
The Cleveland Cavaliers are planning to fire head coach Ty Lue, per league sources. @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Lakers have assigned first-round pick Moe Wagner to their South Bay G League affiliate as rehab assignment for Wagner’s return from left knee injury suffered in summer league.
Detroit's Luke Kennard has suffered an AC joint sprain in his right shoulder and will be re-evaluated again in two weeks.
Minnesota is showing no inclination to move on Houston offer of two injured players and four first-rounders for Jimmy Butler, per sources. On @WatchStadium:
Houston Rockets star James Harden has suffered a Grade 1-plus left hamstring strain and will be re-evaluated next week.
Sources on @TheAthletic @WatchStadium: Chicago Bulls forward Bobby Portis has suffered a sprained MCL in his right knee and is expected to miss several weeks.
Lakers' LeBron James has been awarded the NBA's offseason cares community assist award for his efforts to create school and educational resources in Akron, Ohio.
Drummond's technical foul was also rescinded by the NBA, which gave flopping warning to Embiid.
76ers' Joel Embiid received a warning for violating NBA's anti-flopping rule for his incident with Detroit's Andre Drummond on Tuesday night.
Los Angeles Lakers coach Luke Walton has been fined $15,000 for public comments on officiating Monday night.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Brooklyn Nets forward Treveon Graham has suffered a torn left hamstring and is expected to be sidelined for two months.
NBA players of the first week of the regular season: Charlotte's Kemba Walker in the East, Denver's Nikola Jokic in the West.
Sources: Top high school-to-pro prospect Darius Bazley has signed an endorsement deal with New Balance, worth $14M and a guaranteed $1M. Bazley will spend year training ahead of 2019 NBA draft.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @watchstadium: Denver starter Will Barton has suffered a strained groin and his timetable for return is unclear. Barton underwent MRI today after being carted off floor in Saturday's win over Phoenix.
Oklahoma City star Russell Westbrook will make his season debut tonight against Sacramento.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Lakers’ Rajon Rondo is adamant there was no spit toward Rockets’ Chris Paul tonight and is livid over the accusation. Lakers spoke with Rondo and looked over tape in which neither side saw such behavior.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Along with Chris Paul/Rajon Rondo altercation in Lakers-Rockets, one of Rondo’s family members confronted Paul’s wife, Jada. NBA investigating tonight’s on-court altercations ahead of Rockets/Clippers on Sunday.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Initial timetable on New York Knicks rookie Kevin Knox: 2-to-4 weeks. Knox injured his left ankle tonight.
Knicks’ rookie Kevin Knox has suffered a left ankle sprain tonight, and X-rays on his ankle returned negative.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @watchstadium: The Bulls are planning to sign guard Shaquille Harrison to a deal. Harrison arrived to Chicago this weekend, joining NBA team after his release from Phoenix on Monday.
The Timberwolves are resting Jimmy Butler tonight in Dallas.
Boston will rest All-Star Gordon Hayward tonight against the New York Knicks due to left ankle recovery.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @watchstadium: The Utah Jazz’s G League team, Salt Lake City Stars, has selected five-year NBA vet Willie Reed with the No. 1 overall pick in today’s draft.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Spurs Dejounte Murray had successful surgery today to repair torn ACL in his right knee.
From San Antonio: As Jimmy Butler starts season in Minnesota uniform, he tells @TheAthleticNBA of message to teammates: “I can get Thibs to relax a little bit. He needs to do that more: Sit down, take the load off and trust your guys to get a W.”
Jimmy Butler on @TheAthleticNBA: On his message to teammates from last Thursday to now, his mindset as he bides time (“This isn’t changing me up, hell no”) — and where trade scenarios stand.
New Orleans has also waived forward Troy Williams to create space for Tim Frazier, league sources said.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The New Orleans Pelicans have claimed guard Tim Frazier off waivers. Frazier was waived by Milwaukee on Monday.
The Denver Nuggets have signed head coach Michael Malone to a contract extension.
Lakers Kyle Kuzma has signed endorsement with GOAT, in what the company calls the “first athlete partnership with a sneaker reselling platform.” Kuzma will wear rare shoes provided by the company.
Sources on @theathleticnba @watchstadium: The Phoenix Suns have waived 2017 second-rounder Davon Reed, clearing roster spot for Jamal Crawford.
Per Thunder: Russell Westbrook will miss tonight’s season opener against the Golden State Warriors.
Myles Turner is en route to sign his new four-year, $80M contract extension with the Pacers. Here was our one-on-one on his summer transformation.
The San Antonio Spurs have waived the retired Manu Ginobili, finalizing their roster, per league sources. @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium
The Suns have waived guard Shaquille Harrison and forward Darrell Arthur, per league sources. @WatchStadium @TheAthleticNBA
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Indiana Pacers center Myles Turner has agreed to a four-year, $80 million contract extension.
The Clippers have traded Wes Johnson to the Pelicans for Alexis Ajinca, per league sources. @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium
Crawford has agreed to a one-year deal with the Suns, league sources said. Crawford provides Phoenix with much-needed established leadership and production in backcourt.
Free agent Jamal Crawford has reached agreement with the Phoenix Suns, per league sources. @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Bulls are signing guard Tyler Ulis to a two-way NBA contract. Chicago claimed Ulis off waivers today.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Chicago Bulls have claimed guard Tyler Ulis off waivers. Ulis was waived by the Warriors on Friday.
Minnesota's Jimmy Butler practiced again Sunday and is expected to play in season opener in San Antonio on Wednesday. Heat/Timberwolves talks have been dead, for now, league sources said.
After 17 NBA seasons, Richard Jefferson has retired from basketball. An NBA champion with the 2016 Cleveland Cavaliers.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Los Angeles Lakers are waiving forward Johnathan Williams III. Williams had strong preseason for Lakers, including 14 points and 12 rebounds last night against the Warriors.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Heat will hold a team option on Justise Winslow’s three-year rookie extension.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Warriors and forward Alfonzo McKinnie have agreed to a two-year minimum deal, clearing way for him to be 14th spot on regular-season roster.
The Toronto Raptors are signing forward Chris Boucher to a two-way NBA contract, per league sources. Boucher entered camp with Toronto and earned two-way.
Spurs’ guard Derrick White will be out indefinitely with a left plantar fascia tear. San Antonio is now down three guards: White, Dejounte Murray and Lonnie Walker.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Golden State Warriors are signing Jaleel Cousins, the younger brother of DeMarcus Cousins. Cousins signing Exhibit 10, headed for Santa Cruz.
Timberwolves legend Kevin Garnett goes off here.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Golden State Warriors have signed training camp invite Alfonzo McKinnie to a two-way NBA contract. This could be a procedural move for McKinnie to negotiate newer deal.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Several players spoke up in players-only meeting, but Butler led it, made known his issues with management. His message was similar to one he displayed Wednesday: I run this. He's far too competitive to sit real games.
Timberwolves All-Star Jimmy Butler called a players-only meeting today, airing his feelings toward situation and management, per league sources. Butler expressed to players he would compete with them, as signs pointing to him staying with the franchise into the regular season.
On @TheAthleticNBA with @JonKrawczynski: Jimmy Butler had warned Tom Thibodeau on Monday and Glen Taylor for weeks of the conditions under which he would return to the floor for Minnesota. Inside his words turning into action:
Gregg Popovich has selected Warriors’ Steve Kerr, Pacers Nate McMillan and Villanova’s Jay Wright as assistant coaches for USA Basketball staff.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Free agent Jamel Artis is signing a partially guaranteed deal with the Clippers. Artis played for the Magic last season and was in training camp in Sacramento this year.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Phoenix Suns have applied for a disabled player exception with the NBA for Darrell Arthur. Arthur was acquired in trade with Brooklyn.
76ers star Joel Embiid has signed a multiyear endorsement contract with Under Armour, a deal making him highest paid big man on shoe deal, per sources. Embiid had been with Adidas.
Updated @TheAthleticNBA story with @JonKrawczynski on Jimmy Butler/Timberwolves — with Minnesota preparing to start season with Butler on roster, barring change in slow trade market:
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Washington Wizards center Dwight Howard visited a specialist in New York and has piriformis injury, which is a muscle in the buttocks. The injury isn't serious and Howard will continue treatment.
From third overall draft pick to battling for NBA life: On Jahlil Okafor, who opens up on depression/anxiety and the rebuilding of his body and shot.
Jimmy Butler has returned to Minnesota and reiterated his trade desire in a meeting with president/coach Tom Thibodeau on Monday, league sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski.
Spurs say timeline for Murray's return will be set later. Tough blow to the Spurs' cornerstone of the future.
Spurs guard Dejounte Murray has suffered a torn ACL in his right knee.
Boston’s Marcus Smart ($25K) and Cleveland's J.R. Smith ($15K) have been fined for altercation in Saturday’s game.
Suns will now have GM role served by vice president of basketball operations James Jones and assistant GM Trevor Bukstein.
The Phoenix Suns have fired GM Ryan McDonough.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: The Memphis Grizzlies are signing forward D.J. Stephens to a two-way NBA contract. Stephens played in NBA with Milwaukee in 2014, won French league championship last season with Le Mans.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Minnesota and Miami have seriously discussed several frameworks of a potential deal for Jimmy Butler, including ones with Heat's Josh Richardson. Medicals shared both ways. Timberwolves do not appear any closer a deal.
San Antonio Spurs first-round pick Lonnie Walker IV will undergo surgery on Monday to repair a right medial meniscus tear.
Sources: Kyrie Irving has met with Celtics ownership and has been direct with his message to Boston's brass over past few months: He's committed long-term to the franchise.
Sources: As Boston star Kyrie Irving says at Celtics fan event that he plans to re-sign with the team next summer, Irving has also communicated with Boston ownership over past several weeks and verbally committed plans to stay long-term.
Sources: Golden State Warriors All-Star DeMarcus Cousins has signed a multiyear endorsement deal with Puma. Cousins had been endorsed by Nike.
Source on @TheAthleticNBA and @WatchStadium: MRI on New Orleans Pelicans center and former No. 3 overall pick Jahlil Okafor revealed a right ankle sprain and he will miss 1-to-2 weeks.
From sitdown with Warriors' @KlayThompson: Klay takes aim on NBA All-Defensive team. "I’m very confident in saying this: The past few years, there’s been some guys where I’m like, Man, I know I’m a better defender than him.’"
From @watchstadium 1-on-1 with Warriors' Klay Thompson: The 3-time champ on ever envisioning 'your own team', '19 free agency. “I don’t want necessarily to be the focal point at all times. I’ve been to the mountain top...I’ve put so much blood, sweat, tears with this franchise."
As expected, Warriors free agent Pat McCaw declined his one-year qualifying offer ahead of Monday's 11:59 p.m. ET deadline to accept it. He remains a restricted free agent.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Restricted free agent Pat McCaw plans to decline his one-year, $1.7M qualifying offer with the Warriors, barring unforeseen change. It would allow today's deadline to expire and keep him RFA.
Statement from NBA spokesman on J.R. Smith/Supreme tattoo: "NBA rules prohibit players from displaying any commercial logos or corporate insignia on their body or in their hair."
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: NBA informed Cleveland's J.R. Smith he would be fined per game during season for "Supreme" tattoo on his leg, unless it is covered, and Smith plans to have conversations with league about situation.
Chicago's Lauri Markkanen will miss up to two months with a high grade right elbow sprain.
The Los Angeles Lakers have hired Kurt Rambis as senior basketball advisor, reporting to Magic Johnson.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Indiana Pacers center Myles Turner has agreed to a new multiyear endorsement deal with Nike. Turner is an emerging cornerstone for Pacers.
Among many details in story, league sources say Jimmy Butler sought out Minnesota owner Glen Taylor in recent days for reassurances trade talks were proceeding in good faith.
New Orleans star Anthony Davis has signed with agent Rich Paul of Klutch.
Noah has worked diligently this offseason, and several teams are monitoring his upcoming entrance in free agency.
Sources on @TheAthleticNBA @WatchStadium: Joakim Noah and the New York Knicks are near agreement on his waive and stretch. Noah will not report to training camp this week as sides part ways before media day.
Minnesota is aligning its organizational focus on next step of trading All-Star Jimmy Butler, league sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski.
All-Star Jimmy Butler has been granted permission to not participate in Minnesota Timberwolves media day on Monday, league sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski.
Sources: New Phoenix Suns guard De’Anthony Melton — the 46th pick in June’s NBA draft — has signed a guaranteed two-year, $2.3M rookie deal.
In memo, Commissioner Silver also writes to teams: evaluate all executives on efforts to eliminate harassment; conduct anonymous workplace surveys; provide consistent discipline when misconduct is substantiated.
Sources on @watchstadium @theathleticNBA: NBA commissioner Adam Silver has sent new memo to all 30 teams “strongly” encouraging many reforms, including increasing number of women throughout organization/leadership and improving harassment reporting.
On @theathleticnba @watchstadium: Houston's Brandon Knight underwent surgery on his left knee, considered a "clean up," and will miss some time, per league sources.
On Jimmy Butler, moments that led to trade request and what's next. @TheAthleticNBA link:
Unique and significant partnership for Lillard, gaining new endorsement deal with company of logo patch on Trail Blazers jerseys.
Sources: Portland star Damian Lillard has signed a multiyear endorsement deal with Biofreeze -- which also has become the logo patch of the Trail Blazers.
Sources: Along with Mark Cuban agreeing to donate $10M toward funding domestic violence/women leadership programs, NBA requiring Mavericks to: Provide NBA office with quarterly reports, report league of any significant employee misconduct; enhancing training; implement programs.
Less than one week before Timberwolves' training camp begins. After weeks of contemplating future in Minnesota, Butler informed Tom Thibodeau on Tuesday, sources said.
Jimmy Butler has requested a trade from the Minnesota Timberwolves, league sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski. Butler has given Minnesota a list of one-to-three teams with whom he's open to signing extension, in anticipation of trade.
Quoting Nelson Mandela’s famous 'Sport has the power to change lives’ message, Silver and Roberts write to NBA players: “As the new season begins, let’s continue channeling that spirit together.”
Commissioner Adam Silver and NBPA executive director Michelle Roberts tell all players in letter today: "It’s the power to make a difference that’s long been part of the NBA and the Players Association and that matters now more than ever."
For @TheAthleticNBA and @WatchStadium: NBA commissioner Adam Silver and NBPA executive director Michelle Roberts co-authored a preseason letter obtained, encouraging players to utilize increased resources for personal development and newly-enhanced mental wellness programs.
Charlotte Hornets owner Michael Jordan will donate $2 million to organizations aiding in relief and recovery efforts for Hurricane Florence.
From last memo to teams in June, NBA's projections are unchanged for 2019-20 season -- but 1.5 percent ($2M) higher for 2020-21 season due to BRI projections and projected shortfall-based adjustment.
Sources: The NBA has informed its teams of updated projected salary cap and tax level for 2019-20 ($109M, $132M) and 2020-21 ($118M, $143M).
Jack will sign a non-guaranteed deal, allowing him to compete for a reserve point guard spot for Pelicans.
Free agent guard Jarrett Jack has agreed to a one-year deal with the New Orleans Pelicans, per league sources.
The San Antonio Spurs and undrafted Oregon State forward Drew Eubanks have agreed on a two-way NBA deal, per league sources.
Farewell 16th season for @DwyaneWade: “I’ve given this game everything I have and I’m happy about that. And I’m going to give it for one last season, everything else that I have left.”
Dwyane Wade says he is returning to the Miami Heat to play one last season. “One last dance.”
Justin Patton will undergo surgery on fractured right foot early this week, league sources said.
Minnesota’s 2017 first-round draft pick Justin Patton has suffered another broken foot, this time in his right foot, league sources tell me and @JonKrawczynski.
Butler meets with President/head coach Tom Thibodeau and Minnesota officials this week. Uncertainty has surrounded Butler and the team as the All-Star enters contract year.
Sources: Minnesota All-Star Jimmy Butler has begun to seriously contemplate his future with the franchise. Our @JonKrawczynski reports Butler and Thibodeau will meet on Monday.
Sources: The Knicks and center Joakim Noah are expected to part ways before training camp; team has continued to work trade calls, although waiving and stretching Noah's contract looms as a route.
Sources: Guard Kobi Simmons is signing a one-year deal with the Cavaliers. Simmons was recently released from two-way deal with Memphis.
NBA spokesman on allegations surrounding Celtics' Jabari Bird: "The allegations are disturbing and we are conducting a full investigation of the matter. We have been in contact with local authorities since learning of the incident."
Boston’s Jabari Bird says in statement he is stepping away from the Celtics indefinitely as he deals with his legal and medical issues. He adds: “I do not condone violence against women. I am hopeful that in due time and process, I will be able to regain everyone’s trust.”
The Celtics say they are "deeply disturbed" by allegations against guard Jabari Bird and are working with the NBA and local authorities in assisting on investigation.
Sources: Undrafted Louisville forward Deng Adel changed course from Minnesota training camp and instead will sign a partially guaranteed deal with the Raptors.
Thunder star Russell Westbrook underwent arthroscopic surgery on his right knee and will be re-evaluated in four weeks.
Under current Lakers leadership, there's been open door for the franchise's past and present players. Bynum won two titles in LA and was 2012 All-Star. He is scheduling other team workouts, too, in his comeback bid.
Sources: Former Los Angeles Lakers champion center Andrew Bynum worked out in the Lakers' facility this week as he pursues NBA comeback. Not an official Lakers workout, but gave Bynum opportunity for open gym runs.
Suns guard Devin Booker underwent surgery to repair an injury to the fifth metacarpophalangeal joint in his right hand and will miss approximately six weeks.
Monta Ellis continuing to pursue NBA return.
Deng reuniting with Tom Thibodeau and former teammates Jimmy Butler, Derrick Rose and Taj Gibson. He had dinner with Thibodeau and Timberwolves GM Scott Layden Sunday night and taking physical exam now.
Free agent Luol Deng has reached agreement on a one-year, $2.4M deal with Minnesota, pending physical, per league sources.
Cavs' @rodneyhood filed paperwork for 1-year, $3.4M deal to return to Cleveland, tells me: “I’ve been working really hard this summer, improving my body and game. I’m excited to get to work with my teammates, looking forward to having my best year and going back to the playoffs.”
Former Lakers two-time champion and All-Star Andrew Bynum has hired representation in attempts of NBA comeback at age of 30 and scheduling team workouts before training camps.
Restricted free agent Rodney Hood is signing a one-year, $3.4M qualifying offer to re-sign with the Cleveland Cavaliers, per league sources.
David Nwaba signed his agreement with the Cavaliers today -- a one-year deal, league sources said.
Boris Diaw has retired from basketball: 14 NBA seasons, 2014 champion with the Spurs, 2006 Most Improved Player.
The 76ers plan to interview internal front-office executives — former NBA All-Star Elton Brand, Ned Cohen, Marc Eversley and Alex Rucker — next week for general manager search, league sources said. Team is interviewing outside candidates this week.
Sources: Udonis Haslem reached agreement on a one-year, veteran’s minimum deal to return to the Miami Heat for his 16th NBA season.
Sources: Free agent Luol Deng will meet with the Minnesota Timberwolves within the next week as sides discuss potential deal.
New York Knicks rookie Kevin Knox — the No. 9 overall pick in June — has signed a multiyear endorsement deal with Puma, sources say.
"I was so pissed because the game wasn't over with yet." — Hall of Famer Ray Allen opens up to @TheAthleticNBA on his play-by-play of emotions of The Shot in Game 6 of 2013 Finals.
On @TheAthleticNBA: Ahead of entering Hall of Fame, Ray Allen on his 18-year career, two titles, expecting no contact with key members of Boston title team before enshrinement, still being able to play, thoughts about today’s game and more.
Sources: Along with offer sheet on Tyrone Wallace, New Orleans is signing four-year NBA guard Darius Morris to a partially guaranteed two-year deal.
Sources: Clippers restricted free agent Tyrone Wallace has agreed to an offer sheet with the New Orleans Pelicans. Clippers placed a two-way qualifying offer on Wallace and can match deal.
Sides have been working on parting ways on remaining two years and $36.8M on Deng’s contract and reached agreement, allowing him to enter free agency.
Sources: The Los Angeles Lakers and forward Luol Deng are finalizing a contract buyout as part of waive-and-stretch provision.
A leader in all facets over 15 NBA seasons with New Orleans, Indiana, San Antonio and Golden State -- David West -- announces he has retired. His full statement:
After 15 NBA seasons, David West has retired from basketball. Two-time NBA All-Star, two-time NBA champion.
Sources: The San Antonio Spurs and second-round pick Chimezie Metu have agreed on a three-year rookie deal. Team is high on the former USC standout.
USA Basketball's junior national team is partnering with the NBA, NCAA and NBPA for expanded programs for more than 80 top U.S. high school players, with camps and focuses on health and wellness and life skills.
Charlotte Hornets rookie Miles Bridges, the No. 12 overall pick in the NBA draft, has signed a four-year endorsement deal with Nike, sources tell The Athletic.
Sources: The Grizzlies have waived guard Kobi Simmons, who was on a two-way contract.
Ginobili’s agents continued: “He understands playing for the collective good of his team and will go down in basketball history as one of the best to ever play the game.”
Statement from Ginobili’s agents Herb Rudoy and Luciano Capicchioni: “It has been our great pleasure to represent Manu. He has not only been an outstanding player, he has also been one of the finest men we have known....”
Ginobili (@manuginobili) on retirement from Hall of Fame, 16-year career: IMMENSE GRATITUDE to everyone (family, friends, teammates, coaches, staff, fans) involved in my life in the last 23 years. It's been a fabulous journey. Way beyond my wildest dreams.
San Antonio Spurs legend Manu Ginobili has retired from the NBA. Hall of Famer.
After decommitting from Syracuse to turn pro in G League, Darius Bazley focuses instead on training regimen this season while planning to take business/financial management courses in L.A. Full Athletic story:
Why and how first top high-schooler-to-G League prospect, Darius Bazley, is now focusing on individual workouts and preparation this season ahead of NBA draft. Video Essay on @WatchStadium:
Story on The Athletic: Top prospect Darius Bazley tells Athletic he’s decided not to play in G League, will use year to train and prepare as professional before 2019 NBA draft.
Sources: Free agent forward Thomas Robinson is signing a non-guaranteed deal with the Atlanta Hawks.
Being present is always worth it. At @TheAthleticNBA:
Link on potential rule changes coming in NBA beginning this upcoming season, including shot clock resetting to 14 seconds after offensive rebound:
Sources: NBA Board of Governors will vote on Sept. 20-21 on 3 potential rule changes beginning in 2018-19: Shot clock re-sets to 14 seconds (instead of 24) after offensive rebound; simplification of clear path foul rule; expanded definition of “hostile act” for instant replay.
Sources: The Raptors are hiring Spurs assistant video coordinator Jeremy Castleberry as a player development coach. Castleberry earned degree at SDSU, worked his way up in Spurs system from video room.
Sources: The Houston Rockets have waived former Celtics first-round pick R.J. Hunter, who was on a two-way deal.
Sources: Forward Christian Wood has agreed to a deal with the Milwaukee Bucks. Wood played for Bucks in Las Vegas summer league, where he was part of all-first team.
Sources: The Utah Jazz have waived guard David Stockton, son of Hall of Famer John Stockton.
I am excited to announce I am joining The Athletic (@theathletic) and Stadium (@watchstadium) as the lead senior NBA Insider/Writer and Analyst later this month...
Free agent Shabazz Muhammad has agreed to a deal with the Milwaukee Bucks, league sources tell Yahoo.
Guard Briante Weber has agreed to a partially guaranteed deal to return to the Miami Heat, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Oklahoma City is signing undrafted Texas A&amp;M center Tyler Davis to a two-way NBA contract.
Sources: Undrafted Georgetown forward Marcus Derrickson has agreed to sign with the Warriors on an Exhibit 10 contract. He averaged 13 points/five rebounds in eight summer league games for Golden State.
Notable tidbits on 2018-19 NBA schedule: No four-games-in-five nights again; back-to-backs are at historic lows (average of 13.3 per team this season, it was 19.3 in '14-15 and 14.4 last season) -- and elimination of eight games in 12 nights for first time.
DeMar DeRozan’s return to Toronto as a San Antonio Spur: Feb. 22.
Sources: Kawhi Leonard’s return to San Antonio next season as a Toronto Raptor: Jan. 3.
The Cleveland Cavaliers and guard Isaiah Taylor have agreed to a one-year deal, league sources tell Yahoo. The Cavs have looked to add another point guard over past week.
USA Basketball statement on NCAA rule changes: “USA Basketball has been working with the NBA, NBPA and NCAA since April to make sure we do all the right things for our young basketball athletes. We look forward to continuing our discussions..to improve and create opportunities.."
Kawhi Leonard releases first statements since trade to Toronto, saying goodbye to San Antonio and the Spurs:
These new NCAA rules come on the heels of the FBI busts for several "rules" -- now changed -- and top high school prospect Darius Bazley decommitting from Syracuse to turn pro.
If Uniform Athlete Agents Act and state laws change, NCAA says agents can now pay for meals/transportation for players/families if expenses related the agent selection process — with meals/lodging/etc. paid by an agent if meeting associated with the agent or pro organization.
Players are eligible to hire agent after "any basketball season" as long as they request an evaluation from the NBA undergraduate advisory committee.
NCAA says an "elite" prospect, as identified by USA Basketball, can hire agent beginning July 1 before their senior year in high school -- if/when the NBA and NCAA allow high schoolers to enter draft. College players are eligible after each season.
NCAA basketball says it will now allow "elite" high school and college prospects to be represented by an agent. NCAA will also permit players to return to school if unselected in NBA draft.
Video Essay on Carmelo Anthony’s verbal agreement with Houston today, and the opportunity awaiting both sides.
Story on 10-time All-Star Carmelo Anthony verbally agreeing to sign with Houston:
Anthony cleared free agency waivers last week and has informed Houston of decision to sign upon return from Africa, league sources said. Anthony also unveiled refurbished basketball court in South Africa last week.
Carmelo Anthony has verbally agreed to sign with the Houston Rockets, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
The Detroit Pistons have hired former Rockets and 76ers executive Sachin Gupta as an assistant general manager.
Story on 76ers rookie and 16th overall pick Zhaire Smith suffering fractured left foot:
Smith had MRI/imaging in Philadelphia today revealing a Jones fracture -- with surgery scheduled for later this week, league sources said. He also will see another specialist in Philadelphia.
Sources: Philadelphia 76ers rookie Zhaire Smith has suffered a fractured left foot. Smith, the No. 16 pick in the Draft, hurt his foot on Monday in Las Vegas during a developmental camp for NBA players.
Euroleague standout James Nunnally has agreed to a two-year deal with the Minnesota Timberwolves, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Story on Greg Monroe reaching agreement with the Raptors:
Monroe is signing a one-year, $2.2M deal with Toronto, league sources said. The veteran center is joining a contender in the Eastern Conference.
Free agent Greg Monroe has agreed to a deal with the Toronto Raptors, league sources tell Yahoo.
Washington's Markieff Morris and Boston's Marcus Morris have signed with agent Rich Paul of Klutch Sports Group. Both will enter free agency next summer.
Statement starts: “We could not be more proud to have LeBron James as part of our Lakers family.” Finishes: “Those efforts should be celebrated by all.”
Lakers owner Jeanie Buss statement on LeBron James being referenced Friday by Trump: “(LeBron) is an incredibly thoughtful and intelligent leader and clearly appreciates the power that sports has to unite communities and inspire the world to be a better place.”
Charlotte Hornets owner Michael Jordan’s official statement, via spokesperson, in wake of Donald Trump tweet referencing him and LeBron James: “I support LJ. He’s doing an amazing job for his community.”
Sources: 11-year NBA veteran Nate Robinson has signed a one-year deal with Homenetmen Beirut in Lebanon. The three-time Slam Dunk champion is currently playing in the Big 3 league.
Sources: The Mavericks will waive center Chinanu Onuaku, acquired in trade with the Rockets, and complete signing of guard Devin Harris.
Sources: For Final Four @RamblersMBB nation: Loyola Chicago guard Donte Ingram is signing with the Dallas Mavericks on an Exhibit 10 contract.
Former NBA MVP Derrick Rose has started a scholarship, The Rose Scholars, awarding over $400K in tuition money through the program. "I am proud to continue to help children pursue higher education as a means to better themselves and their communities."
The Milwaukee Bucks have waived guard Brandon Jennings, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Carmelo Anthony has cleared waivers, setting up the 10-time All-Star to sign free-agent deal with the Houston Rockets.
Story on free agent David Nwaba and the Cavaliers reaching agreement:
Cavaliers were in touch with Nwaba from day one of free agency, recruited the former Bulls/Lakers guard and met with him last week. Nwaba is high-energy, gritty player for Cleveland team aiming to compete in East playoff race.
Free agent David Nwaba has come to terms with the Cleveland Cavaliers, league sources tell Yahoo. Both sides are still working on final details of deal.
The NBA has partnered with MGM Resorts for multiyear agreement on sports gaming/betting.
Sources: The Timberwolves and swingman C.J. Williams are finalizing a two-way NBA contract. Williams emerged as a rotation wing on a two-way deal with the Clippers last season.
Sources: The Celtics have waived guard Rodney Purvis, who was acquired last week in trade sending Abdel Nader to Oklahoma City.
The Atlanta Hawks are expected to waive Carmelo Anthony today, with player physicals completed over the weekend from 3-team trade, league sources tell Yahoo. Clears way for Anthony to become free agent, potentially join Houston.
Guard Ryan Arcidiacono will sign a partially guaranteed one-year deal to re-sign with the Bulls, league sources tell Yahoo.
Free agent forward Amile Jefferson has agreed to a two-way NBA contract with the Orlando Magic, league sources tell Yahoo. The former Duke standout finished last season on two-way with the Timberwolves.
Sources: Clint Capela’s deal to return to the Rockets is five years, $80M guaranteed — with $10M in incentives.
The Philadelphia 76ers have re-signed guard Demetrius Jackson on a two-way NBA contract, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: The Los Angeles Clippers have waived forward C.J. Williams.
Sources: Pat Connaughton is signing a two-year deal with the Bucks worth slightly more than his minimum salary in both seasons -- with the first year guaranteed. He will provide wing depth for Milwaukee.
Free agent forward Pat Connaughton has agreed to a deal with the Milwaukee Bucks, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
"I should shut the f--- up, right? Man, get out the way. I done did the work, I done showed you what I do ... let this s--- roll." Kevin Durant sit-down from Las Vegas:
Guard Devin Harris has reached agreement on a one-year, veteran’s minimum deal to return to the Mavericks, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Butler elected to undergo the surgery on his right hand Tuesday, and is not attending USA Basketball minicamp.
Minnesota All-Star Jimmy Butler underwent a procedure on his right hand and has returned to offseason activities.
Sources: The Celtics and 2017 second-rounder Jabari Bird are finalizing a multiyear deal. Bird spent his rookie season on a two-way contract, had a strong summer league.
Free agent guard Devin Harris is in strong talks on one-year deal with the Dallas Mavericks, league sources tell Yahoo. Sides hopeful to finalize deal in next day.
Free agent forward Troy Williams has agreed to a deal with the New Orleans Pelicans, league sources tell Yahoo. Williams played 17 games for the Knicks last season.
Sources: Vince Carter’s deal with the Atlanta Hawks: one-year, $2.4M veteran minimum.
The Golden State Warriors are signing forward Danuel House to a one-year deal, league sources tell Yahoo. House played 23 games for the Suns last season.
Sources: Boston sending cash considerations along with Abdel Nader to OKC.
The Celtics are finalizing trade to send Abdel Nader to the Oklahoma City Thunder for Rodney Purvis, league sources tell Yahoo. Boston decided to part ways with Nader over weekend, worked trade to OKC.
Sources: The Chicago Bulls have claimed former Atlanta Hawks guard Antonius Cleveland off waivers. Cleveland, 6-foot-6, is on a multiyear deal.
In what could be his final NBA campaign, Dirk Nowitzki has signed his one-year, $5M deal to return for a 21st season with the Dallas Mavericks.
Sources: Undrafted Arizona guard Rawle Alkins has agreed to a two-way NBA contract with the Chicago Bulls.
Story on Alex Len, Hawks reaching agreement on two-year deal:
Alex Len's new deal with the Atlanta Hawks will be for two years, $8.5M, league sources said.
Free agent center Alex Len is finalizing a deal with the Atlanta Hawks, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Nader was the Celtics 58th overall pick in the 2016 NBA draft and spent a season with G League affiliate in Maine before signing his rookie NBA deal. He had contract guarantee date on Aug. 1.
Story on Nemanja Bjelica and the Kings reaching agreement on a three-year deal, with full quotes from Bjelica on decision:
Forward Nemanja Bjelica has agreed to a three-year, $20.5M deal with the Sacramento Kings, league sources tell Yahoo. Third year will be non-guaranteed.
Story on the Kings and Yogi Ferrell agreeing to terms, with quote from Ferrell on decision:
Story on Michael Beasley joining the Los Angeles Lakers:
Free agent Michael Beasley has agreed to a deal with the Lakers, league sources tell Yahoo.
OKC sheds Johnson's guaranteed $1.4M salary, with Purvis on non-guaranteed minimum for next season. Cash considerations is expected to go to Orlando too.
The Magic will send Rodney Purvis to the Thunder for Johnson, league sources said.
Oklahoma City is trading Dakari Johnson to the Orlando Magic, league sources tell Yahoo.
Yogi Ferrell’s new Kings contract will be for two years and $6.2M, league sources said.
Yogi Ferrell and the Sacramento Kings have come to terms on a deal, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Forward Chris Boucher has agreed on a training camp deal with the Raptors, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. Boucher, who was a two-way contract player for the Warriors last season, played well for Toronto in summer league this month.
Story on 76ers trading forward Richaun Holmes to the Suns, reaching deal with 2017 second-round pick Jonah Bolden:
Phoenix will send cash considerations to Philadelphia for Holmes, league sources said.
Sixers 2017 second-rounder Jonah Bolden has agreed to a four-year, $7M rookie deal with Philadelphia, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. Deal includes team options.
New free agent Yogi Ferrell is fielding interest from several teams, including Cleveland and New Orleans, and plans to decide within the next day, league sources tell Yahoo.
The 76ers are trading forward Richaun Holmes to the Phoenix Suns, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Guard Yogi Ferrell has changed course on Dallas Mavericks deal in order to reenter free agency. “We felt uncomfortable and will weigh our options,” agent Cervando Tejeda said.
Sources: The Dallas Mavericks and No. 56 overall pick Ray Spalding have agreed to a four-year rookie deal.
Sources: Nuggets guard Monte Morris has agreed to a three-year, $4.8M deal with the team. First two seasons guaranteed. Denver converts Morris, the No. 51 pick in 2017, from a two-way contract to a standard deal.
Sources: As part of multi-team Carmelo Anthony/Dennis Schrder deal, Atlanta's Mike Muscala will go to Philadelphia, 76ers' Timoth Luwawu-Cabarrot will be traded to Oklahoma City and 76ers' Justin Anderson to Atlanta.
Denver Nuggets rookie Michael Porter Jr. underwent surgery of the lumbar spine. No timetable for his return to basketball participation.
Mavericks, future Hall-of-Famer Dirk Nowitzki plan to finalize one-year deal.
Sources: Dirk Nowitzki and the Mavericks plan to finalize a one-year, $5 million deal. Neither side appears in rush to sign the contract. Nowitzki is a Maverick for life, of course.
Sources: Free agent Yogi Ferrell has agreed to a two-year, $5.3M deal to re-sign with the Dallas Mavericks. Ferrell was promised the backup shooting guard position to start next season.
Story on Marcus Smart and the Boston Celtics reaching agreement on four-year, $52M deal:
Restricted free agent Marcus Smart has agreed to a four-year, $52M deal to return to the Boston Celtics, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sources: Restricted free agent Marcus Smart and his agent, Happy Walters, will meet with Celtics officials in Boston today in hopes of finalizing a deal.
Latest on the Kings/Nemanja Bjelica:
Sources: Kings GM Vlade Divac reached out to Nemanja Bjelica today to explain his value in staying in the NBA versus leaving for Europe.
Forward Nemanja Bjelica and the Kings plan to begin discussing potential deal, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. Bjelica represents a shooter on the wing/frontcourt, and a long-term fit makes sense.
Sources: The Chicago Bulls are signing guard Antonio Blakeney to a guaranteed two-year, minimum contract. Blakeney was on a two-way contract last season.
Kawhi Leonard has been informed he has been traded to the Raptors, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. Spurs receive package centered on DeMar DeRozan from Toronto.
Full story posted 2:44 a.m. CT on Leonard/DeRozan trade: Only final snags in discussion between Spurs and Raptors could prevent completion.
Spurs, Raptors engaged in serious discussions on trade centered around All-Stars Kawhi Leonard and DeMar DeRozan. Story:
San Antonio and Toronto are engaged in serious talks on a trade centered on Kawhi Leonard and DeMar DeRozan, league sources tell Yahoo.
Free agent forward Treveon Graham has agreed to a two-year deal with the Brooklyn Nets, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. Graham, a 6-foot-5 wing, will have a full guarantee on the first season of new deal.
Guard Lorenzo Brown is finalizing a one-year deal with the Raptors, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. Brown was on a two-way contract with Toronto last season and won G League MVP for Raptors 905.
2018 NBA Summer League MVP in Las Vegas: Los Angeles Lakers Josh Hart. Last season, Lakers’ Lonzo Ball was awarded MVP in Las Vegas.
Sources: The Toronto Raptors plan to waive forward Alfonzo McKinnie ahead of $1.4M guarantee date on Wednesday. McKinnie signed a multiyear deal with Toronto last offseason.
Sources: The Dallas Mavericks are signing 33rd overall pick Jalen Brunson of Villanova to a four-year rookie deal, with three years guaranteed.
Sources: Undrafted USC guard Elijah Stewart has agreed to a one-year, Exhibit 10 deal with the Indiana Pacers.
Free agent Dante Cunningham is finalizing a one-year deal with the San Antonio Spurs, league sources tell Yahoo.
How Trae Young's early Atlanta Hawks experiences are shaping his game and vision as a face of a franchise.
The Boston Celtics and guard Walt Lemon Jr. have agreed a two-way NBA contract, league sources tell Yahoo. Lemon played five games for the New Orleans Pelicans last season.
Sources: Guard Naz Mitrou-Long has agreed to a two-way NBA contract with the Utah Jazz.
Story on Cleveland re-signing Channing Frye, who was part of 2016 championship team:
Free agent Channing Frye has agreed to a one-year, $2.4M deal with the Cleveland Cavaliers, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: The Dallas Mavericks have rescinded the qualifying offer on guard Yogi Ferrell, making him an unrestricted free agent.
Forward Georges Niang has agreed to a multiyear deal with the Utah Jazz, league sources tell Yahoo.
Lonzo Ball will undergo arthroscopic surgery on his left knee on Tuesday, Lakers say.
Sources: The Mavericks have waived guard Jalen Jones, who was on a two-way NBA contract.
The Houston Rockets have emerged as strong frontrunners to acquire Carmelo Anthony once he is free from Oklahoma City, league sources tell Yahoo. Anthony also has considered Miami.
Sources: The Chicago Bulls have rescinded the qualifying offer on guard David Nwaba, making him an unrestricted free agent.
Undrafted Xavier forward Trevon Bluiett has agreed to a two-way NBA contract with the New Orleans Pelicans, agent Cervando Tejeda tells Yahoo.
Story on Houston reaching agreement with free agent swingman James Ennis:
Free agent James Ennis has agreed to a two-year deal with the Houston Rockets, league sources tell Yahoo. Deal includes player option in second season.
Stories on Spurs' agreements with Davis Bertans and Bryn Forbes Lakers signing rookie Svi Mykhailiuk
Spurs restricted free agent Davis Bertans has agreed to a two-year, $14.5M deal to re-sign with San Antonio, agent Arturs Kalnitis told Yahoo.
Forbes will re-sign with Spurs on a two-year deal, league sources said.
Spurs restricted free agent Bryn Forbes is finalizing an agreement to return to San Antonio, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: The Los Angeles Lakers and No. 47 overall pick Svi Mykhailiuk are finalizing a three-year, $4.6M rookie deal. Deal includes team option.
The Denver Nuggets are signing forward/guard Torrey Craig to a guaranteed two-year, $4M deal, agent Johnny Foster tells Yahoo.
Warriors free agent Zaza Pachulia has agreed to a one-year, $2.4M deal with the Detroit Pistons, league sources tell Yahoo.
Chicago has matched LaVine’s offer sheet. He remains with the Bulls.
Sources: Devin Booker has signed a 5-year, $158M maximum contract extension with the Phoenix Suns.
Sources: Chicago is trading guard Jerian Grant to Orlando as part of a 3-team deal.
Restricted free agent Jusuf Nurkic has agreed to a four-year, $53M deal with Portland, league sources tell Yahoo.
Bulls restricted free agent Zach LaVine agrees to four-year offer sheet with Sacramento, giving Chicago 48 hours on matching decision:
In one of tightest free agencies in recent NBA markets, LaVine’s $80M offer sheet gives him richest guaranteed non-max deal for summer of 2018 so far.
RFA Zach LaVine has agreed to a four-year, $80M offer sheet with the Sacramento Kings, league sources tell Yahoo. The Chicago Bulls have 48 hours to match.
Sources: The Mavericks have released guard Kyle Collinsworth, who signed multiyear deal with team last season and will play in summer league for Dallas this month.
After iconic San Antonio run, Tony Parker agrees to sign with the Charlotte Hornets.
Spurs franchise icon Tony Parker joins his former assistant coach James Borrego with the Hornets.
Tony Parker has agreed to sign with Charlotte, league sources tell Yahoo.
Free agent guard Ian Clark has agreed to a one-year deal to return to the New Orleans Pelicans, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Portland has signed No. 37 overall pick Gary Trent Jr. of Duke to a guaranteed 3-year rookie deal.
Free agent Kyle O'Quinn has agreed to a one-year, $4.5M deal with the Indiana Pacers, league sources tell Yahoo.
Guard Ryan Broekhoff has agreed to a two-year deal with the Dallas Mavericks, league sources tell Yahoo. Guaranteed in first season.
Houston has waived guard Aaron Jackson, who is expected to pursue new deal in China.
Sources: RFA Raul Neto is signing a two-year, $4.4M deal to return to the Utah Jazz.
Philadelphia acquiring forward Wilson Chandler in trade with Denver. Link:
The 76ers have the salary cap space to absorb Wilson Chandler, a starting-caliber SF, from Denver.
The Philadelphia 76ers are in close discussions on deal to acquire Denver Nuggets forward Wilson Chandler, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Free agent Tyreke Evans is signing a 1-year, $12M deal with the Indiana Pacers.
Sources: Free agent Jeff Green has agreed to a one-year, $2.5M deal with the Washington Wizards.
From last night: Avery Bradley, Clippers agree on two-year deal.
Sources: Free agent Avery Bradley has agreed to a 2 year, $25M deal with the Clippers.
The Warriors also partly didn't believe in Cousins' mutual interest at first. Agreement developed fairly quickly Monday -- after a few phone conversations -- with the reigning champions.
Updated with recruitment of All-Star DeMarcus Cousins, from Draymond Green in Greece to phone conversations with Bob Myers and Steve Kerr.
DeMarcus Cousins to the Golden State Warriors. Story:
Steph, Klay, KD, Draymond add Boogie Cousins.
Free agent DeMarcus Cousins has agreed to a deal with the Golden State Warriors, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Rajon Rondo is signing a one-year, $9M deal with Lakers.
The Indiana Pacers have released veteran center Al Jefferson, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: The Washington Wizards have claimed former Lakers forward Thomas Bryant off waivers.
Story on Derrick Favors, Utah agreeing to two-year, $36M-plus deal:
After aggressive pitch from Oklahoma City, Nerlens Noel reaches agreement with Thunder. Story:
Sources: Tolliver's one-year deal will be in $5-to-$6M range to sign with Minnesota.
Free agent forward Anthony Tolliver is nearing a one-year deal with the Minnesota Timberwolves, league sources tell Yahoo.
Free agent Derrick Favors has agreed to a two-year, $36M-plus deal with the Utah Jazz, agent Wallace Prather tells Yahoo.
Sources: Nerlens Noel will sign a two-year deal with Oklahoma City, including a player option in Year 2.
Free agent Nerlens Noel has agreed to a deal with the Oklahoma City Thunder, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Lakers restricted free agent Julius Randle hasn’t yet received an offer from L.A., but has excitement for arrival of LeBron James. Randle’s representatives and the Lakers are expected to speak Monday, hopeful of potential offer to retain him.
Lance Stephenson has agreed to a deal with the Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell Yahoo.
Orlando RFA Aaron Gordon has agreed to a four-year, $84 million deal to re-sign with the Magic, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Free agent center Nerlens Noel has narrowed decision on signing to these teams: The Wizards, Lakers, Thunder --- with interest from the Pelicans.
Sources: Kentavious Caldwell-Pope agreed to a one-year, $12M deal with the Lakers.
LeBron James' new 4-year, $154M agreement with the Los Angeles Lakers includes an opt out in the fourth year, league sources tell Yahoo.
LeBron James has agreed to a four-year, $154M deal with the Lakers.
Sources: Top brass from the Los Angeles Clippers have flown to Dallas to meet with free agent forward Anthony Tolliver in his home.
Stories from today's agreements: Sixth Man of Year candidate Fred VanVleet/Toronto and Glenn Robinson III/Detroit
The Dallas Mavericks will likely utilize remaining $5M in salary cap space to re-sign franchise cornerstone Dirk Nowitzki, league sources tell Yahoo. Nowitzki's $5M team option was declined before start of free agency to give Dallas flexibility.
Sources: Robinson will sign a two-year, $8.3M deal with the Pistons, including team option. Robinson has financial security and Detroit gets talented wing.
Free agent Glenn Robinson III is finalizing a deal with the Detroit Pistons, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: As he becomes eligible for five-year maximum rookie extension, Phoenix Suns' Devin Booker is upset with the front office over release of best friend Tyler Ulis, who started 43 games last season.
Restricted free agent Fred VanVleet has agreed to a two-year, $18 million deal to return to Toronto, league sources tell Yahoo.
Free agent Gerald Green has agreed to a one-year, $2.4M deal to return to Houston, league source tells Yahoo.
Sources: Derrick Rose has agreed to a one-year, $2.1M deal to re-sign with Minnesota.
Houston free agent Trevor Ariza has agreed to a one-year, $15M deal with the Phoenix Suns, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Aron Baynes also receives a player option on the second season in new contract to return to Boston.
Free agent center Aron Baynes has agreed to a two-year, $11M deal to return to the Boston Celtics, league sources tell Yahoo.
Kevin Durant has committed to a two-year, $61.5M deal to return to the Golden State Warriors, league sources tell Yahoo.
Denver Nuggets star Nikola Jokic has committed to a five-year, $146.5M maximum contract with the Denver Nuggets, league sources tell Yahoo. Denver has retained its two core free agents.
Free agent guard Will Barton has committed to a four-year, $54 million re-sign with the Denver Nuggets, league sources tell Yahoo. Barton will also have a player option on Year 4.
Free agent forward Rudy Gay has committed on a one-year, $10 million deal to re-sign with the San Antonio Spurs, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: The NBA has set salary cap for 2018-19 season, effective for July free agency: $101,869,000, with tax line of $123,733,000.
Story from earlier on Lakers guaranteeing center Ivica Zubac's $1.5M deal for next season:
The Lakers have released forward Thomas Bryant.
The Lakers are planning to guarantee center Ivica Zubac's contract for the 2018-19 season, league sources tell Yahoo. Zubac had contract guarantee date today.
Sources: Portland will not extend a qualifying offer to guard Shabazz Napier, allowing him to enter July 1 as an unrestricted free agent. Napier had a strong season as a reserve guard for the Trail Blazers.
Story on Lakers guard Lonzo Ball's knee injury, expected to be healthy for training camp:
Los Angeles Lakers guard Lonzo Ball has a torn meniscus in his left knee, league sources tell Yahoo. Ball is expected to be ready for training camp next season.
The Indiana Pacers are guaranteeing forward Bojan Bogdanovic’s $10.5M deal for the 2018-19 season, league sources tell Yahoo. Bogdanovic played critical role for the Pacers last season.
Sources: Cleveland Cavaliers star LeBron James has declined his $35.6M player option for 2018-19 and will enter free agency.
New York Knicks center Enes Kanter plans to exercise his $18.6M player option today to return to the team next season, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sources: The Hornets won't tender a qualifying offer to forward Treveon Graham, making him an unrestricted free agent in July.
Sources: The Houston Rockets have exercised team option on guard Aaron Jackson’s contract for next season. Houston would need to guarantee Jackson’s $1.4M salary in order to involve him in a potential trade.
Los Angeles Lakers guard Tyler Ennis has been released.
Sources: As Dallas remains engaged on DeAndre Jordan talks with the Clippers, Mavericks have rescinded qualifying offer tender on Salah Mejri.
Sources: Chicago has extended the qualifying offer to guard David Nwaba, making him a restricted free agent.
Sources: Houston free agent Trevor Ariza, one of the top wings on the market, plans to schedule meetings with interested teams after free agency opens July 1. No truth on Ariza demanding $50-60M.
NBA Commissioner Adam Silver has signed a contract extension through the 2023-24 NBA season.
Sources: Atlanta Hawks executive Malik Rose has agreed to a deal to become assistant general manager of the Detroit Pistons.
Euroleague's Axel Toupane is starting private workouts for NBA teams this week, pursuing free-agent deal in July. Toupane, a 6-foot-7 shooting/defending wing with prior NBA experience, helped lead Zalgiris to Euroleague Final Four.
Story on Indiana declining team option on Lance Stephenson, making him free agent:
The Pacers will now maintain as much financial flexibiliy as possible entering July 1 free agency. Stephenson enters market, too.
The Indiana Pacers are declining Lance Stephenson’s $4.3M team option and he’ll be a free agent, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
The Toronto Raptors are hiring Oklahoma City Thunder assistant coach Adrian Griffin as a lead assistant on Nick Nurse's staff, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Franchise star Nikola Jokic expected to agree on five-year, $146.5M max deal with the Nuggets after team option is declined.
Denver Nuggets star Nikola Jokic will have his team option declined for next season to become RFA, and sides plan to reach agreement on a five-year, $146.5M maximum contract, league sources told Yahoo.
Sources: The Grizzlies have released forward Omari Johnson. Johnson signed a multiyear deal with Memphis late in the season.
Stories on Milos Teodosic opting in with the Clippers and Suns, 31st overall pick Elie Okobo agreeing to rookie deal
The Phoenix Suns and No. 31 overall pick Elie Okobo of France have agreed on a four-year, $6M rookie deal, league sources tell Yahoo. Okobo's deal will be guaranteed in first two seasons, with team options on Years 3 and 4.
Los Angeles Clippers guard Milos Teodosic has exercised his $6.3M player option for the 2018-19 season, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Billy Preston, a former five-star recruit of Kansas, has agreed to join the Cleveland Cavaliers after going undrafted on Thursday night.
Story on 10-time All-Star Carmelo Anthony staying with Oklahoma City, opting in on $27.9M deal:
Sources: Carmelo Anthony has informed the Oklahoma City Thunder that he has opted into $27.9M deal for 2018-19 by not exercising his early termination option.
Sources: The Golden State Warriors are waiving forward Chris Boucher, who signed a two-way NBA deal after the 2017 NBA draft. Boucher will be an unrestricted free agent.
Sources: Undrafted Georgetown forward Marcus Derrickson has agreed to join the Golden State Warriors for summer league.
Sources: Undrafted Duke guard Trevon Duval has agreed to join the Houston Rockets for summer league.
Undrafted UNLV center Brandon McCoy has agreed to join the Milwaukee Bucks, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Undrafted Loyola Chicago forward Donte Ingram has committed to summer league with the Chicago Bulls.
North Carolina’s Joel Berry II has agreed to an undrafted free-agent deal with the Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell Yahoo. Berry was four-year standout at UNC and part of national championship team in 2017.
Two more undrafted commitments: Oregon State’s Drew Eubanks joining the San Antonio Spurs summer league team; Tulane’s Cameron Reynolds signing free-agent deal with the Sacramento Kings.
Sources: Undrafted Kansas guard Malik Newman has agreed to a two-way contract with the Los Angeles Lakers.
Sources: Undrafted Arizona forward Allonzo Trier has agreed to a two-way contract with the New York Knicks.
Sources: Undrafted Seton Hall center Angel Delgado has agreed to a two-way contract with the Los Angeles Clippers.
Sources: Dallas is selecting Kostas Antetokounmpo — Giannis brother — with No. 60 pick.
Sources: OKC's No. 57 pick: Kevin Hervey.
Sources: Charlotte's No. 55 pick: Arnoldas Kulboka of Lithuania.
Sources: The 76ers, via Mavericks, will select Shake Milton with the No. 54 pick in NBA draft.
Sources: OKC is selecting Devon Hall with the No. 53 pick.
Sources: Dallas has traded their No. 54 overall pick for Philadelphia's Nos. 56 and 60.
Sources: Pacers plan to select Alize Johnson with No. 50 pick.
Sources: Orlando will trade No. 41 overall pick Jarred Vanderbilt to Denver.
Philadelphia’s No. 38 overall pick Khyri Thomas will be traded to Detroit, league sources say.
Sacramento is trading No. 37 pick Gary Trent to Portland, league sources say.
Sources: The Knicks are selecting Mitchell Robinson with the No. 36 pick in the NBA Draft.
Sources: Orlando is selecting Melvin Frazier with the No. 35 pick in NBA draft.
Sources: Charlotte is selecting Devonte Graham with the No. 34 pick in NBA draft.
Sources: Dallas is selecting Jalen Brunson with the No. 33 pick in NBA draft.
Sources: Atlanta has traded the No. 34 pick in NBA draft to Charlotte.
Sources: The Suns are selecting Elie Okobo with the No. 31 pick in the NBA draft.
Sources: The Hawks are selecting Omari Spellman with the No. 30 pick in the NBA draft.
Sources: Portland has informed Anfernee Simons that they are selecting him with the No. 24 pick in the NBA draft.
UCLA's Aaron Holiday goes to Indiana at 23rd pick.
Sources: The Indiana Pacers are focusing on Aaron Holiday with the No. 23 pick in the NBA draft.
Source: The Chicago Bulls have picked Chandler Hutchison with the No. 22 pick in the NBA draft.
Sources: The Minnesota Timberwolves are selecting Josh Okogie with the No. 20 pick in the NBA draft.
Sources: The San Antonio Spurs are selecting Lonnie Walker with the No. 18 pick in the NBA draft.
Sources: The Milwaukee Bucks have selected Donte DiVincenzo with the No. 17 pick in the NBA draft.
Sources: Suns have traded Zhaire Smith and 2021 Miami first-rounder to 76ers for Mikal Bridges.
Sources: Philadelphia is trading Mikal Bridges to Phoenix for Zhaire Smith.
Sources: The Phoenix Suns are selecting Zhaire Smith with the No. 16 pick in the NBA draft.
Sources: The Washington Wizards have selected Troy Brown with the No. 15 pick in the NBA draft.
Sources: The Denver Nuggets have selected Michael Porter Jr. with the No. 14 pick in the NBA draft. Strongly considered Zhaire Smith here.
Sources: The Los Angeles Clippers are selecting Jerome Robinson with the No. 13 pick in the NBA draft.
Sources: The Clippers will select Miles Bridges with No. 12 pick and trade him to Charlotte for Shai Gilgeous-Alexander.
11th pick here.
Sources: Charlotte is selecting Shai Gilgeous-Alexander with the No. 10 overall pick in the NBA draft.
Sources: New York is selecting Kevin Knox with the No. 9 pick in NBA draft.
Sources: Cleveland has selected Collin Sexton at No. 8 in the NBA Draft.
Sources: Orlando has selected Mo Bamba with the No. 6 pick in NBA draft.
Dallas has selected Trae Young at No. 5, sending him to the Hawks, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Protection on Dallas' 2019 first-round pick to Atlanta in Luka Doncic/No. 3 deal: 1-5.
Memphis is selecting Jaren Jackson Jr. with the No. 4 pick, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Dallas is sending 2019 protected first-round pick in deal to acquire Luka Doncic at No. 3 from Atlanta, for No. 5.
Joining our Yahoo NBA Draft Live show at 7 p.m ET to talk the latest on San Antonio Spurs star Kawhi Leonard and two of draft’s most fascinating prospects, Trae Young and Michael Porter Jr. Link:
Sources: Phoenix (Arizona’s DeAndre Ayton) and Sacramento (Duke’s Marvin Bagley III) have locked in on the NBA Draft’s Nos. 1 and 2 picks.
Sources: Lakers contact the Spurs to express interest in star forward Kawhi Leonard. Story:
The Los Angeles Lakers have reached out to the San Antonio Spurs to express interest in All-Star Kawhi Leonard, league sources tell Yahoo. No proposals have been discussed.
Dwight Howard is expected to finalize a buyout with the Brooklyn Nets and enter free agency once trade is complete on July 6, league sources tell Yahoo.
Story on Atlanta Hawks center Dewayne Dedmon picking up $7.2M player option:
Hawks center Dewayne Dedmon has exercised his $7.2M player option for next season, league sources tell Yahoo.
The Detroit Pistons have offered a front office role to Atlanta Hawks executive Malik Rose and sides are in conversations toward deal, league sources tell Yahoo. Rose was awarded G League Executive of Year this season with Erie.
Sources: Charlotte traded Dwight Howard to Brooklyn for Timofey Mozgov, two second-rounders and cash considerations.
Days after desiring trade, Spurs star Kawhi Leonard, Gregg Popovich meet Tuesday in San Diego. Story:
Spurs' Kawhi Leonard and Gregg Popovich met on Tuesday in San Diego, league sources tell Yahoo.
Luka Doncic completes European season with Euroleague and Spanish ACB titles. He has set travel to New York for the NBA draft on Thursday, league sources said. My feature on Doncic:
Minnesota's Jamal Crawford has declined his $4.5M player option for 2018-19 season, league sources tell Yahoo. Crawford averaged 10.3 points in 20.7 minutes for T'Wolves last season.
Three days away from being one of top NBA Draft picks, Luka Doncic on his playmaking, adamant desire to play point guard, being accomplished pro, draft range, similarities to a two-time MVP:
Euro wunderkind Luka Doncic nears his destiny in the NBA: “For one second, I’m playing for the first team of Real Madrid, with players 15 years older than me. And now I’m making this jump.”
As new element to the Draft on Thursday, NBA plans to introduce the 20 green room invites on stage prior to first pick and each will walk across main stage with two family members. For projected first-rounder Aaron Holiday, brothers Jrue and Justin will walk him into NBA.
Video Essay on Kawhi Leonard's past year with the San Antonio Spurs culminating in his desire for trade.
Story: Spurs star and 2014 Finals MVP Kawhi Leonard wants trade out of San Antonio:
Leonard has grown uncomfortable with the Spurs and is ready for move, league sources tell Yahoo.
Kawhi Leonard wants out from the San Antonio Spurs, league sources tell Yahoo.
Denver Nuggets forward Darrell Arthur has exercised his $7.4M player option for the 2018-19 season, league sources tell Yahoo.
Teams traveling to Chicago have understood Friday's workout purpose: medical/physical evaluation. Porter is a go for key day ahead of next Thursday.
Michael Porter Jr. has been cleared for second pro day evaluation Friday in Chicago for NBA draft lottery teams, his agency informed teams.
Sources: Draft lottery prospect Michael Porter Jr. undergoes MRI on injured hip, results return clean. Link:
Teams have been informed that Michael Porter Jr. is feeling better and MRI returned clean, with "positive review," league sources told Yahoo. Workout assessment could be rescheduled on Friday, sources said, but decision likely comes later today.
Sources: NBA Draft lottery teams were informed Wednesday that Missouri’s Michael Porter Jr., a projected high-lottery draft pick, canceled second Pro Day workout Friday because of hip spasms and would undergo tests.
Sources: The Cleveland Cavaliers have waived guard London Perrantes, who is on a two-way contract.
As free agency approaches, Bulls' David Nwaba has signed with agent Charles Briscoe. Nwaba is expected to be a potential RFA target for teams after strong season in Chicago.
Isaac Bonga of Germany, 18, has also remained in the June draft, sources said.
Sources: Latvia’s Rodions Kurucs will remain in the 2018 NBA draft. The 6-foot-10 forward keeps name in draft after testing and withdrawing a year ago.
Column from Cleveland: Stephen Curry and Legacy.
Sacramento Kings guard Iman Shumpert has opted into his $11M player option for the 2018-19 season, league sources tell Yahoo.
In statement following resignation as 76ers president, Bryan Colangelo says: "I vigorously dispute the allegation that my conduct was in any way reckless. At no point did I ever purposefully or directly share any sensitive, non-public, club-related information with her.
“He wasn’t supposed to play” — Inside Klay Thompson treating a typically weeks-long injury within days for a Game 2 performance.
Warriors’ Klay Thompson will play in Game 2 of Finals with high ankle sprain.
Story on status of Golden State Warriors star Klay Thompson ahead of Finals Game 2:
Sources: Warriors star Klay Thompson is dealing with high left ankle sprain and significant bruising, receiving treatment around clock with plan to play in Game 2 of Finals.
Cavaliers' Tristan Thompson has been fined $25,000 for role in altercation near end of Game 1 of the NBA Finals.
Klay Thompson has left lateral leg contusion and is hopeful to return to Game 1.
New York Knicks guard Ron Baker has exercised his $4.5M player option for next season, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: San Diego State freshman Jalen McDaniels will withdraw from NBA Draft and return to school. McDaniels had extensive predraft experience ahead of deadline today, and NBA executives believe another collegiate year solidifies potential first-round place for 2019.
Celtics Gordon Hayward underwent surgery to remove the plate and screws following procedure on broken fibula. He’s expected to be healthy for training camp.
Story on Pistons plans to interview analyst and former Rockets champion Kenny Smith for head coach opening, along with assistants from San Antonio and Miami:
The Detroit Pistons plan to interview TNT analyst and former NBA champion Kenny Smith for the franchise’s head coaching job, league sources tell Yahoo.
The Philadelphia 76ers have launched an investigation for the “serious” allegations on president Bryan Colangelo, who was linked to multiple Twitter accounts.
In speaking to 76ers president Bryan Colangelo tonight in Los Angeles, Colangelo says he stands by his statement: No knowledge of “motives or origin.”
Villanova sophomore Donte DiVincenzo — the Final Four most outstanding player — decides to stay in the June NBA Draft. Story link:
Villanova sophomore Donte DiVincenzo will remain in the 2018 NBA Draft and forgo his remaining collegiate eligibility, sources told Yahoo. The Final Four Most Outstanding Player had strong Combine, has performed well in team workouts.
Sources: Wake Forest junior guard Bryant Crawford will remain in the NBA draft and has signed with an agent.
Houston Rockets star Chris Paul will miss Game 7 of the West Finals with strained hamstring.
Sources: LiAngelo Ball, who will work out for the Lakers on Tuesday, has a workout scheduled with the Golden State Warriors on June 10.
Heat forward James Johnson underwent surgery for sports hernia, league sources told Yahoo. Johnson had procedure recently, following Miami's first-round series loss.
Nearly two months after scary fall in Sacramento, Warriors Pat McCaw returns to the active roster for Game 6 of the West Finals. Story:
The Golden State Warriors are planning to activate Pat McCaw for Game 6 tonight against Houston, league sources tell Yahoo. McCaw is expected to be in uniform for first time since scary injury on March 31.
Sources: Cleveland All-Star Kevin Love will miss Game 7 against Boston in East Finals on Sunday and is in the NBA’s concussion protocol.
Dooling has been NBPA wellness counselor since January, and will work closely with appointed director for the new program. Dooling: “I’m thrilled to be a part of this new program within the NBPA.”
The National Basketball Players Association has launched a mental health and wellness program for all players, with former NBA veteran Keyon Dooling serving as director.
After leading Rockets to 3-2 series lead in West Finals, Chris Paul is out for Game 6 with hamstring strain. Story link:
Rockets star Chris Paul will miss Game 6 of West Finals with a hamstring strain.
Ahead of Lakers workout Tuesday, LiAngelo Ball on establishing pro career, lessons from past year and season in Lithuania, team-first attitude, more.
All-NBA teams: First: LeBron James, James Harden, Anthony Davis, Damian Lillard, Kevin Durant. Second: Giannis Antetokounmpo, Russell Westbrook, Joel Embiid, LaMarcus Aldridge, DeMar DeRozan. Third: Stephen Curry, Victor Oladipo, Karl-Anthony Towns, Jimmy Butler, Paul George.
2018 NBA All-Defensive teams: First team: Rudy Gobert, Anthony Davis, Victor Oladipo, Jrue Holiday, Robert Covington. Second team: Joel Embiid, Draymond Green, Al Horford, Dejounte Murray, Jimmy Butler.
Major loss for Golden State in Game 4: Andre Iguodala is out.
NBA All-Rookie teams: First team: Ben Simmons, Donovan Mitchell, Jayson Tatum, Kyle Kuzma, Lauri Markkanen. Second team: Dennis Smith Jr., Lonzo Ball, John Collins, Bogdan Bogdanovic, Josh Jackson.
Sources: X-ray on Golden State Warriors forward Andre Iguodala's left leg contusion returned clean. Iguodala is day-to-day, listed as doubtful ahead of Game 4 against Houston.
The Toronto Raptors interviewed Jerry Stackhouse, head coach of G League affiliate Raptors 905, last week in Chicago for the team's head coach opening, league sources tell Yahoo.
Column from Oakland: The re-establishing of Steph Curry and the Warriors as most feared standing in these playoffs.
Sources: Along with Mitchell Robinson, Boise State’s Chandler Hutchison has withdrawn from the NBA draft combine this week in Chicago.
Top-3 order for the 2018 NBA draft: 1. Phoenix 2. Sacramento 3. Atlanta.
Sources: Another late addition to NBA Draft Combine this week: Louisville's Ray Spalding.
Sources: Progress continues for Warriors’ Pat McCaw: After consecutive days of non-contact drills at practice, McCaw is expected to have his first on-court pregame workout tonight since scary fall on March 31. On track for potential return this postseason.
Late addition to the NBA Draft Combine in Chicago, league sources say: North Carolina's Theo Pinson. The 6-foot-6 guard has ability to play and defend multiple positions and had standout career at UNC that included 2017 NCAA title.
Yahoo Story: Cincinnati junior Jacob Evans makes decision on whether he'll remain in 2018 NBA draft.
The Miami Heat have declined forward Jordan Mickey's $1.6 million team option for next season, league sources tell Yahoo. Mickey will be a free agent.
Thunder All-Star Paul George underwent scope procedure on his left knee and will be sidelined 6-to-8 weeks.
Sources: Utah guard Dante Exum will be day-to-day with a strained left hamstring after MRI and further evaluation Monday. He suffered the injury in Game 4.
Toronto Raptors president Masai Ujiri has been fined $25,000 by the NBA for walking on court in Game 3 at halftime to "verbally confront game officials."
Link to full 69-player list for the NBA Draft combine this month.
Story: The full 2018 NBA Draft Combine list, with potential No. 1 pick DeAndre Ayton and Texas A&amp;M's Robert Williams as top American prospects skipping.
The Grizzlies are finalizing deal to hire Orlando’s Chad Forcier as a lead assistant on head coach J.B. Bickerstaff’s staff, league sources say. Forcier has also had assistant stints in Detroit, Indiana and San Antonio.
Story on David Fizdale gaining traction as frontrunner in Knicks head coaching search:
Cleveland forward Kevin Love's elbow on Toronto star DeMar DeRozan in Tuesday's Game 1 has been upgraded to a Flagrant 1.
David Fizdale has gained serious traction in New York Knicks' search for next head coach, league sources told Yahoo.
Los Angeles Clippers forward Wesley Johnson will exercise his $6.1M player option for next season, league sources tell Yahoo. Johnson enters the final season of a three-year, $18M deal.
Two-time NBA MVP Stephen Curry is back for the Warriors tonight in Game 2 against New Orleans -- and will come off the bench in his return, with Andre Iguodala starting at point guard again.
Story on Wesley Matthews opting into $18.6M deal with Dallas for 2018-19:
Dallas Mavericks Wesley Matthews has exercised his $18.6M player option for the 2018-19 season, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
From Game 7 in Cleveland: Pushed to the threshold against Indiana, how much more do LeBron James and the Cavaliers have in their postseason ceiling?
Sources: Boston College junior Jerome Robinson has decided to stay in the 2018 NBA draft, signing with CAA Sports. Robinson, a 6-foot-6 scorer, averaged 24 points in ACC this past season.
From Milwaukee: Giannis Antetokounmpo rises to occasion for the Bucks — and to his first Game 7 moment. “I’m good. No pressure ... me and my team are going to come and play hard.”
Story on Memphis, interim coach J.B. Bickerstaff in serious talks on deal to make Bickerstaff the next head coach:
The Memphis Grizzlies and interim coach J.B. Bickerstaff are working on a framework of deal to make Bickerstaff the new head coach, league sources tell Yahoo.
Oklahoma City’s Russell Westbrook has been fined $10,000 by NBA and issued technical foul for incident with Utah’s Rudy Gobert in Game 4 last night.
Meek Mill is expected to arrive to Game 5 in time to ring 76ers’ ceremonial bell before game. Potential closeout game for Philadelphia.
Meek Mill -- who received release from jail Tuesday -- has plans to attend 76ers-Heat Game 5 tonight in Philadelphia, working to make the game, 76ers co-owner Michael Rubin's spokesperson Ron Berkowitz tells Yahoo.
From Game 4 in Indianapolis: The calm of LeBron James.
Sources: MRI on Cavaliers guard George Hill's back revealed nothing major. Hill is expected to receive treatment for back spasms and listed as questionable for Game 4 on Sunday.
Sources: Miami guard Josh Richardson has suffered a sprained AC joint in his left shoulder, but plans to play in Game 5 on Tuesday. Richardson has been one of NBA's top defensive players.
Story on European star Luka Doncic, a potential top pick, declaring for the 2018 NBA draft:
Potential top pick Luka Doncic of Real Madrid has submitted paperwork to enter the 2018 NBA Draft, sources told Yahoo. Doncic, 19, is currently playing in the EuroLeague postseason.
Down 2-1 in round one for the first time in his career, LeBron James’ most unlikely postseason place. Column:
Miami’s Justise Winslow has been fined $15,000 by NBA for intentionally stepping on Joel Embiid’s mask on Thursday night.
76ers star Joel Embiid has been fully cleared to play — and start — in Game 3. Embiid is back.
76ers star Joel Embiid is expected to play in Game 3 against the Heat tonight, barring setback -- likely with mask and goggles.
Spurs assistant Ettore Messina will coach Game 3 of San Antonio-Golden State tonight in place of Gregg Popovich, whose wife Erin passed away Wednesday.
The NBA G League has increased player salaries to $7,000 per month -- $35,000 for the season -- starting in 2018-19, according to memo sent across league.
Video Essay on Kawhi Leonard and why the San Antonio Spurs star remains sidelined:
Sources: Charlotte and Orlando plan to interview Jerry Stackhouse, coach of Raptors’ G League team, for their head coach openings. Stackhouse also has interview with the Knicks this week.
Sources: X-rays on Utah star Donovan Mitchell's left pinky toe returned negative. Mitchell is fighting through injury in OKC.
Yahoo Sports story: Spurs star Kawhi Leonard expected to miss remainder of postseason, committed toward rehab toward full health. Details:
Story: Pelicans guard Jordan Crawford in talks on partnership deal with Big Baller Brand.
Sources: OKC starter Corey Brewer (sprained right knee) remains on track to play in Game 1 today against the Jazz.
Strategic adjustment for defending-champion Warriors in Game 1 of playoffs: 2015 Finals MVP Andre Iguodala starting at point guard.
Warriors star Stephen Curry (sprained MCL) is targeting expected return at some point in the Western Conference semifinals, league sources told Yahoo. Curry has three-week evaluation on Saturday.
Sources: Oklahoma City guard Corey Brewer will receive treatment on sprained knee over next few days and plans to play in Game 1 of the playoffs against Utah on Sunday.
Story on Ty Lawson signing with the Washington Wizards ahead of NBA playoffs:
Sources: Lawson received letter of clearance after his playoff run in China and signed for the rest of the season with the Wizards in time for NBA postseason.
Ty Lawson has signed with the Washington Wizards, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sources: The Rockets are releasing guard Tim Quarterman to create roster space to sign Jackson.
The Houston Rockets are planning to sign guard Aaron Jackson — who has starred in China and Europe — for the remainder of the season, league sources tell Yahoo.
The Toronto Raptors plan to sign two-way guard Lorenzo Brown for rest of the season, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. Brown was awarded the G League MVP, leading affiliate 905 to the Finals.
Texas A&amp;M sophomore Robert Williams — a projected NBA lottery draft pick in June — has signed with agents Mike Silverman and Brandon Grier of AMG, forgoing final two years of eligibility.
Sources: Warriors guard Quinn Cook has signed his new two-year, fully guaranteed deal. Cook earns full NBA deal after joining Golden State on two-way contract.
Sources: Celtics guard Marcus Smart had reevaluation on torn right UCL Monday in New York and is expected to receive clearance to return to game action at six-week mark of surgery (April 27). Smart has been cleared to start light non-contact shooting.
Louisville junior forward Deng Adel will remain in the 2018 NBA draft and has hired an agent, Adel tells Yahoo.
UCLA junior Aaron Holiday hires agent, formally forgoing final year of eligibility. Story:
Sources: The Clippers and forward C.J. Williams are finalizing a three-year deal, elevating Williams from a two-way deal. Williams has served as a reliable starter and reserve for L.A. this season.
Story on guard Quinn Cook, Warriors plans to sign new multiyear deal this week:
Sources: The Warriors and guard Quinn Cook have agreed on a multiyear deal that Cook is expected to sign by Tuesday. Golden State released Omri Casspi on Saturday to create roster space.
Sources: Trail Blazers All-Star Damian Lillard returning from ankle injury on Saturday against Spurs after one-game absence. Story:
Sources: The Jazz plan to sign guard David Stockton, son of Hall of Famer John Stockton, for the remainder of the season. His second 10-day contract ended Thursday.
Guard MarShon Brooks, Grizzlies agree to guaranteed two-year deal. Story:
Sources: Grizzlies guard MarShon Brooks has agreed to a guaranteed two-year deal with Memphis. Brooks has scored 70 points over three games in his first 10-day contract.
In wake of Kyrie Irving's second knee surgery, Celtics signing guard Jonathan Gibson. Story:
Raptors guard Fred VanVleet: "Growing up, the internet rankings and hype machine ... it's some bull----." On the journey of an unlikely complementary piece to Toronto's All-Star guards:
Sources: The Boston Celtics are signing guard Jonathan Gibson for the remainder of the season. Gibson averaged 33.7 points in China this season.
Celtics All-Star Kyrie Irving will undergo surgery on Saturday and miss four-to-five months.
Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard is day-to-day with left ankle injury and is expected to miss Thursday's game in Houston, league sources tell Yahoo.
O.J. Mayo, the third pick in the 2008 NBA Draft, signs deal in Puerto Rico ahead of being able to apply for reinstatement into NBA this summer. Story:
Sources: The Warriors and guard Quinn Cook are nearing agreement on a multiyear contract. Cook has earned spot on Golden State’s postseason roster.
Sources: Former No. 3 overall pick O.J. Mayo has signed a contract with San German in Puerto Rico. Mayo, 30, will report to Puerto Rico this month and is eligible to sign in NBA this summer from his suspension.
Sources: Former first-round pick Marquis Teague is signing for the rest of the season with the Grizzlies. Teague's first 10-day deal ended Monday.
Dallas' Nerlens Noel and Utah's Thabo Sefolosha have both been suspended five games each by NBA for violating anti-drug program.
Sources: Nets guard Isaiah Whitehead will undergo surgery to repair a ligament injury in his right wrist. Whitehead has shown promise as a rotation guard for Brooklyn.
Brooklyn's Quincy Acy ($25K) and Detroit's Andre Drummond ($15K) have been fined by NBA for their altercation on Sunday.
Story on MRI results returning structurally sound on Warriors Patrick McCaw, with hope of being discharged from hospital Sunday:
Sources: MRI on Warriors Pat McCaw returned structurally sound, and hope is for McCaw to be discharged from hospital Sunday. No return timetable yet.
What a ride for the Ramblers. Report on Loyola coach Porter Moser and program’s future coming on TeamCast of Loyola/Michigan on TruTV...
Excited to be Turner’s sideline reporter tonight for Loyola’s team stream broadcast of the Final Four, with alum Jeff Hagedorn and 1963 champion Jerry Harkness
Sources: Brandon Jennings is signing a deal with the Milwaukee Bucks for the rest of the season. His second 10-day contract expired on Friday night.
Bulls center Robin Lopez was fined $25,000 by the NBA for verbally abusing officials Thursday night in Miami.
The Houston Rockets have signed guard Tim Quarterman to a two-year deal, with team option on next season, league sources tell Yahoo.
Philadelphia star Joel Embiid will undergo surgery to repair an orbital fracture of his left eye, be out indefinitely.
Lakers guard Isaiah Thomas will miss rest of season after surgery on his hip, with expected recovery time of four months.
Link on potential floodgates opening from top high school prospect Darius Bazley (@BazleyDarius) turning pro in the NBA G League:
Story link to the first top high school-to-G League prospect, Darius Bazley:
Column on Darius Bazley (@BazleyDarius), projected top-10 pick in 2019 NBA draft, making unprecedented move, leaving Syracuse commitment to turn pro in G League: “Someone has to start the fire — and I believe I’m going to do that.”
Yahoo Sports story: McDonald’s All-American Darius Bazley decommits at Syracuse, becomes first top high school prospect to choose turning professional in the NBA G League.
Sources: After birth of his son Thursday morning, Portland star Damian Lillard will return to the Trail Blazers for Friday’s home game against the Clippers. He missed Blazers’ road loss in Memphis on Wednesday.
Lakers guard Isaiah Thomas will undergo arthroscopic surgery on his right hip Thursday, team says.
Sources: The Magic are signing guard Rodney Purvis to a two-year deal, with next season non-guaranteed. Purvis' second 10-day contract ended today.
Free agent Andrew Bogut had interest from several NBA teams, but plans to care for his wife, who's in high-risk pregnancy with their pending second child. He's expected to be ready for July 1 free agency.
Guard MarShon Brooks plans to sign a 10-day contract with the Memphis Grizzlies, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. Brooks, a former first-round pick, has starred in China for past three seasons with Jiangsu.
Yahoo Sports story: LiAngelo Ball enters the 2018 NBA draft.
Missouri freshman Michael Porter Jr. has declared for the 2018 NBA draft. Porter will sign with an agent and be a high-lottery selection.
Sources: The 76ers have released former first-round pick James Young, who was signed to a two-way contract in January.
Story on Washington State's Robert Franks -- Pac-12 Most Improved Player -- forgoing senior season for NBA Draft:
Sources: Washington State junior Robert Franks has declared for the 2018 NBA draft and intends to sign with an agent. Franks, a 6-foot-8 shooter, was 2018 Pac-12 most improved player, averaging 17.4 points.
Story on Bulls signing guard Sean Kilpatrick to a three-year deal:
Sources: The Chicago Bulls have signed guard Sean Kilpatrick to a three-year, $6.2M deal, with team options on next two seasons. As part of salary maneuvering, Bulls signed Kilpatrick as part of mid level exception.
Sources: Utah is signing guard David Stockton, son of Jazz Hall of Famer John Stockton, to a second 10-day contract.
Celtics timetable for All-Star Kyrie Irving’s return to basketball activities after knee procedure today: 3-to-6 weeks.
Two-time NBA MVP Stephen Curry suffers MCL injury, with MRI coming to determine severity of sprain:
Warriors star Stephen Curry has initial diagnosis of an MCL injury to his left knee, league sources tell Yahoo. MRI on Saturday for degree of severity.
Sources: The Grizzlies are signing former first-round pick Marquis Teague of G League Memphis to a 10-day contract on Saturday.
Sources: Atlanta is signing guard Damion Lee to a second 10-day contract ahead of game against the Golden State Warriors tonight.
Link on Boston Celtics All-Star Kyrie Irving set to undergo minor procedure to alleviate left knee:
Minor procedure for Kyrie Irving to "alleviate irritation in his left knee," Celtics say.
Celtics star Kyrie Irving will undergo a procedure on his ailing left knee on Saturday.
Story on Lakers, forward Travis Wear agreeing on deal for the rest of the season:
The Lakers are signing forward Travis Wear to a deal for the remainder of the season, league sources tell Yahoo. Wear's second 10-day deal expired tonight.
Sources: Notre Dame senior standout Bonzie Colson refractures foot, expected to be healthy for predraft workouts. Story:
With lack of progress on his ailing left knee, Celtics All-Star Kyrie Irving plans to travel for a second opinion later this week, league sources tell Yahoo.
Rockets' Gerald Green has been fined $25,000 by NBA for shoving Minnesota's Gorgui Dieng on Sunday.
Sources: San Diego State freshman Jalen McDaniels will declare for the 2018 NBA Draft, without an agent for now. McDaniels, a 6-foot-10 forward, emerged for SDSU late in season in front of NBA execs, in run to the NCAA tournament.
Cleveland Cavaliers' Tyronn Lue has taken leave of absence as head coach because of health issues.
The NBA also fined Pistons coach Stan Van Gundy $15,000 for public criticism of officiating after Saturday night's loss in Portland.
NBA has fined Pelicans coach Alvin Gentry for $15,000 for his public criticism of the officiating after Saturday night's loss against Houston.
The Cleveland Cavaliers are signing free agent forward Okaro White to a 10-day contract, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sources: MRI on Warriors forward Omri Casspi's right ankle showed a sprain, expected to be sidelined around one week.
The NBA has fined Phoenix forwards Marquese Chriss and Jared Dudley $25,000 each for roles in altercation against Utah on Thursday night, league sources tell Yahoo.
Golden State All-Star Kevin Durant has suffered an incomplete rib cartilage fracture and will be out at least two weeks.
Story on Klay Thompson’s planned return to the Warriors from thumb injury:
Golden State Warriors All-Star Klay Thompson’s right thumb injury will likely sideline him several games, and he’s expected to return before end of the month, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Pelicans plan to sign guard Larry Drew II of G League Sioux Falls to a 10-day contract.
Warriors star Stephen Curry will remain out and be re-evaluated on March 20 as he continues to progress with his tweaked right ankle.
Story on Spurs star Kawhi Leonard expected to remain sidelined through Thursday’s game against New Orleans:
Sources: San Antonio star Kawhi Leonard is expected to remain out through Thursday’s game against New Orleans. He plans to continue evaluating the quadriceps injury for a hopeful return.
In midst of resurgent Pelicans season, Jrue Holiday opens up on most challenging time of his life. "As a man and as an athlete, you always feel you can handle things by yourself. ... But my wife's situation, it really wasn't in my control."
Sources: The Suns and guard Shaquille Harrison are finalizing a multiyear deal, guaranteeing him for the rest of the season. Harrison’s second 10-day contract expires today and he’s performed well since call up from G League’s Northern Arizona.
Story on the New York Knicks, forward Troy Williams agreeing to a two-year contract:
Sources: Forward Troy Williams has agreed to a two-year deal with the Knicks, with partial guarantees for 2018-19. He's averaged 8.1 points in eight games with New York during his two 10-day deals.
Potentially devastating injury for East-contending Celtics after losing Daniel Theis: Guard Marcus Smart suffers torn tendon in his right thumb. Story:
Story on Dallas Mavericks veteran Wesley Matthews suffering a fracture in his leg, likely out for season:
Boston Celtics guard Marcus Smart has suffered a torn tendon in his right thumb, league sources tell Yahoo. He will have second opinions on his thumb and be out indefinitely.
Sources: Dallas Mavericks guard Wesley Matthews has suffered a stress fracture in his right leg and will likely miss remainder of the season. Matthews underwent further testing today and will rest and rehab the injury.
Story on Celtics losing center Daniel Theis to season-ending surgery to repair a torn meniscus:
Sources: Celtics center Daniel Theis has suffered a torn meniscus in his left knee and will undergo season-ending surgery. Theis emerged as an important reserve for Boston this season.
Story on free agent Derrick Williams planning to sign a 10-day contract with the Los Angeles Lakers:
The Lakers plan to sign forward Derrick Williams to a 10-day contract today, league sources tell Yahoo. Williams, the former No. 2 overall pick, played in China this season.
Pelicans star Anthony Davis had X-rays return negative, diagnosed with rib contusion. He'll attempt to return tonight against the Clippers.
Story on NBA warning Bulls on sitting healthy players, prompting team to resume playing veterans Robin Lopez and Justin Holiday more extensively:
Sources: The NBA issued a warning to the Chicago Bulls this week on resting healthy players, and the team now plans to play veteran starters Robin Lopez and Justin Holiday again more extensively to close the season.
Boston's Marcus Smart has been fined $15,000 by NBA for public criticism of officiating after Celtics' loss in Houston on Saturday night.
Kobe Bryant wins Oscar trophy for his animated short film, "Dear Basketball." Link to our full wide-ranging sitdown from the December day his short film made Oscars shortlist:
Sources: The Grizzlies are signing guard Xavier Rathan-Mayes of G League Westchester to a 10-day contract.
Story on swingman Shabazz Muhammad agreeing to sign with the Milwaukee Bucks following buyout with Minnesota:
Milwaukee had strong interest in Muhammad over the summer, and Muhammad plans to sign with the Bucks as free agent after buyout with Timberwolves tonight.
Shabazz Muhammad plans to commit to the Milwaukee Bucks when he clears waivers, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Corey Brewer signing minimum deal with Thunder for rest of the season. He'll clear waivers on Friday.
Story on Corey Brewer committing to Oklahoma City, reuniting with coach Billy Donovan:
Corey Brewer has committed to sign with the Oklahoma City Thunder, league sources tell Yahoo. He spoke to Billy Donovan and Sam Presti, three Eastern Conference teams before decision.
Story on Los Angeles Lakers rookie Josh Hart suffering a fracture in his left hand, team evaluating treatment options:
Story on forward Trevor Booker planning to sign with the Indiana Pacers once he clears waivers following 76ers release:
Lakers rookie Josh Hart has suffered a small fracture in his left hand and team is evaluating surgical or non-surgical options, league sources tell Yahoo.
Trevor Booker will sign a minimum deal with the Indiana Pacers for the remainder of the season, once he clears waivers, league sources tell Yahoo.
Story on Los Angeles Lakers and Corey Brewer agreeing to buyout:
Sources: Lakers and forward Corey Brewer have agreed to a contract buyout, allowing Brewer to sign with a playoff team as a free agent.
Sources: Ilyasova plans to sign a minimum deal for the rest of the season with the 76ers. He clears waivers on Wednesday.
Story on Ersan Ilyasova finalizing buyout with Atlanta, clearing way for him to join Philadelphia as soon as Wednesday:
Sources: Ersan Ilyasova has agreed to a contract buyout with the Hawks, clearing way for him to sign with the 76ers as a free agent.
Sources: Emeka Okafor is signing with New Orleans for the remainder of the season today. The former No. 2 pick has averaged 6.3 rebounds and two blocks in six games back in NBA since injuries sidelined him in 2013.
Once Hawks buyout is complete, forward Ersan Ilyasova plans to work toward finalizing agreement with the Philadelphia 76ers, league sources tell Yahoo.
Tough blow for Minnesota, but Butler and team are hopeful of a return within that timetable from meniscus surgery. Butler has led Timberwolves to fourth seed in the West so far, with OKC just one game behind.
Jimmy Butler is expected to undergo surgery in coming days and could return within 4-to-6 weeks, league sources tell Yahoo. Final timetable will be set after procedure.
Story on Timberwolves All-Star Jimmy Butler, diagnosed with torn meniscus in right knee:
Minnesota’s Jimmy Butler has a meniscus tear in his right knee and is determining treatment options, league sources tell Yahoo.
Minnesota All-Star Jimmy Butler has suffered meniscal right knee injury.
Sources: X-rays on Jimmy Butler's right knee returned negative tonight, with MRI scheduled tomorrow in Minnesota and some hope around the severity.
All 30 NBA teams have been asked in memo from commissioner Adam Silver to complete review of updated respect in the workplace policy — and assess or adopt other team policies in work place — by March 6.
The Washington Wizards plan to sign guard Ramon Sessions on a 10-day contract, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: The Hawks plan to sign guard Antonius Cleveland to a 10-day contract. Cleveland went to training camp with Golden State and spent time with Dallas in regular season.
On NBA's fine for his "tanking" comments to Julius Erving, Cuban tells me: "Dr. J is my childhood idol. I got caught up fanboying him and said the wrong thing in the wrong way."
Dallas owner Mark Cuban has been fined $600,000 by NBA for public statements detrimental to league. Cuban made the comments on Feb. 18 regarding Mavericks' competitive success.
The NBA announced the Dallas Mavericks’ allegations in SI story “runs counter to the steadfast commitment of the NBA  completely unacceptable” and league plans to “closely monitor” team’s independent investigation.
The New Orleans Pelicans are signing guard Walter Lemon Jr. of G League’s Fort Wayne on a 10-day contract, league sources tell Yahoo.
Free agent Rashad Vaughn is signing a 10-day contract with the Orlando Magic, league sources tell Yahoo.
Free agent Troy Williams is signing a 10-day contract with the New York Knicks, league sources said. Williams decided among several interested teams since release from Houston last week.
Rockets placed Troy Williams on waivers today, league source says, opening roster spot for Joe Johnson signing. Williams enters free agency.
Sacramento rookie De'Aaron Fox has replaced Lakers rookie Lonzo Ball in the Rising Stars game at All-Star Weekend.
Portrait of an NBA All-Star: On Indiana Pacers guard @VicOladipo's rise and what Sunday's game means to him.
Sources: Marco Belinelli signing a veteran minimum deal with the 76ers for the remainder of the season.
Marco Belinelli plans to sign the Philadelphia 76ers once he clears waivers, league sources say.
Sources: The Utah Jazz plan to sign guard Naz Mitrou-Long on a 10-day contract. Long rejoins Jazz from G League's Salt Lake City, after guard Ricky Rubio suffered injury in win last night.
Story on Joe Johnson planning to sign minimum, rest of season deal with the Rockets after finishing Kings buyout:
Sources: Joe Johnson plans to sign with Houston on contract for remainder of the season.
Sources: The Houston Rockets have emerged as leaders to sign Joe Johnson after he completes buyout with Sacramento.
Story on center Brandan Wright planning to sign with Houston after completing Grizzlies buyout:
Sources: After he completes Memphis buyout, Brandan Wright plans on deal with the Houston Rockets for the remainder of the season.
Charlotte's Kemba Walker has replaced Kristaps Porzingis in the 2018 NBA All-Star game.
Sources: The Kings are waiving center Georgios Papagiannis, who was their No. 13 overall selection in the 2016 draft.
Sources: Mavericks signing guard Kyle Collinsworth to a three-year deal, with rest of season guaranteed.
Sources: Boston has made no deals, standing pat at the deadline and keeping guard Marcus Smart. Celtics value Smart tremendously -- showed it in talks with other teams.
Sources: Suns traded second-round pick via Memphis to Orlando for guard Elfrid Payton.
Washington is trading guard Sheldon Mac to Atlanta, league sources tell Yahoo.
New Orleans is trading forward Dante Cunningham to Brooklyn for guard Rashad Vaughn, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Dallas is also acquiring second-round pick from Denver in trade sending Emmanuel Mudiay to New York, Devin Harris to Denver, Doug McDermott to Mavs.
Sources: Utah will release Derrick Rose, allowing him to pursue signing with a playoff team.
Utah will likely release former NBA MVP Derrick Rose, league sources tell Yahoo.
Toronto is finalizing deal to send Bruno Caboclo to Sacramento for Malachi Richardson, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Cleveland also sending its 2018 first-round pick and Channing Frye to the Lakers.
Sources: Cleveland has traded Isaiah Thomas in package deal for Jordan Clarkson and Larry Nance.
Story link on Detroit acquiring veteran guard Jameer Nelson from Chicago:
Sources: As part of Jameer Nelson deal, Bulls and Pistons are swapping their second-round picks in 2022.
Sources: Detroit is sending center Willie Reed to the Bulls for Jameer Nelson, who shores up Pistons' PG rotation.
Chicago is trading guard Jameer Nelson to Detroit, league sources tell Yahoo.
Updated story on Lou Williams three-year, $24M deal with Clippers:
Sources: Clippers’ Lou Williams signed a three-year, $24 million extension, with $1.5M partial guarantee in year three. With this season included: four years, $31M.
Story on Lou Williams and the Clippers reaching agreement on a three-year extension:
Los Angeles Clippers guard Lou Williams has agreed to a three-year contract extension, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: Charlotte is sending its own 2020 and 2021 second-rounders to New York in Hernangomez deal.
Story on Charlotte acquiring second-year Knicks center Willy Hernangomez, who was member of first-team All-Rookie last season:
Sources: Charlotte is sending Johnny O'Bryant and two second-round draft picks to the Knicks for Willy Hernangomez.
New York is finalizing trade to send center Willy Hernangomez to Charlotte, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sources: Knicks All-Star Kristaps Porzingis is scheduling season-ending surgery on torn ACL in his knee, with return timetable after procedure.
New York Knicks All-Star Kristaps Porzingis has suffered a torn ACL in his left knee.
Detroit center Willie Reed has been suspended six games by the NBA for an Aug. 5 domestic violence incident.
Sources: The NBA has granted the Detroit Pistons a $5.24M disabled player exception, which expires on March 12.
Reason for the $50K fine: Lakers president Magic Johnson's recent comments about Giannis Antetokounmpo in recent interview.
The Los Angeles Lakers have been fined $50,000 by NBA for violating the league’s anti-tampering rule regarding the Milwaukee Bucks’ Giannis Antetokounmpo.
Sources: Even as teams wonder about potential of his no-trade right, LeBron James focused on Cavaliers season and won't waive the clause. Story:
Sources: As NBA teams do due diligence on his no-trade clause and potential of him dropping it, LeBron James is determined to see year through in Cleveland, focused on season and will not waive the clause.
Milwaukee is trading guard Rashad Vaughn to Brooklyn for center Tyler Zeller, league sources say.
Indiana guard Darren Collison will undergo left arthroscopic knee surgery and miss two to three weeks.
Sources: Center Willy Hernangomez seeks trade from the New York Knicks before NBA's Thursday deadline. Story:
Story on former No. 2 pick Emeka Okafor making NBA return with New Orleans:
Sources: Former No. 2 overall pick Emeka Okafor is finalizing a 10-day contract with the New Orleans Pelicans. Okafor has played for G League Delaware this season, returns to NBA after injuries sidelined him in 2013.
Sources: New Orleans has changed course on deal with Jones and won’t complete it, and will leave roster spots open for now.
Story: LaMelo, LiAngelo Ball's contract with Lithuanian club Vytautas becoming guaranteed by team this month, committing sides for remainder of season through June.
Miami Heat guard Goran Dragic has replaced Kevin Love in the 2018 NBA All-Star game.
Sources: Chicago plans to release forward Quincy Pondexter to create roster space for the Mirotic trade to New Orleans.
Sources: Chicago has traded forward Nikola Mirotic to New Orleans for Omer Asik, Tony Allen and a first-round draft pick.
Sources: The NBA has granted the Miami Heat a $5.5M disabled player exception for injured guard Dion Waiters.
Sources: Cavaliers All-Star Kevin Love is expected to be ruled out for up to two months with the fracture in his left hand. Need for surgery is still uncertain.
Sources: Boston won't sign sharpshooting swingman Jarell Eddie to a second 10-day contract for now, opting for flexibility entering trade deadline. Celtics have open spot, $8.4M DPE at disposal.
Detroit's Andre Drummond has replaced John Wall in the 2018 NBA All-Star game.
Sources: Clippers, Pistons are finalizing a deal that would send Blake Griffin, Willie Reed for Tobias Harris, Avery Bradley and a draft pick. Multiple players involved have been informed of deal.
Story on Joakim Noah-Knicks situation:
Sources: After heated verbal exchange in practice between Joakim Noah and coach Jeff Hornacek last week, the Knicks are exploring avenues to part with Noah. He has two years remaining on the four-year, $72M deal he signed in 2016.
OKC’s Paul George has replaced DeMarcus Cousins in the 2018 NBA All-Star Game.
Sources: Surgery plan for DeMarcus Cousins, as torn Achilles go: As soon as possible. He had another All-Star season, helped lead Pelicans to 27-21 and sixth seed in West so far.
Sources: MRI on Pelicans All-Star DeMarcus Cousins revealed a full rupture of his left Achilles tendon.
Story on New Orleans star DeMarcus Cousins, awaiting MRI on initial diagnosis of torn left Achilles tendon:
New Orleans All-Star center DeMarcus Cousins has initial diagnosis of a torn left Achilles’ tendon, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. He’s on way now to get MRI to confirm.
Boston's Al Horford has been selected to the NBA Eastern Conference All-Star reserve team, league sources tell Yahoo.
Washington Wizards guard John Wall has been selected to the NBA Eastern Conference All-Star reserve team, league sources tell Yahoo.
Cleveland's Kevin Love has been selected to the Eastern Conference All-Star reserve team, league sources tell Yahoo.
Portland's Damian Lillard has been selected to the NBA Western Conference All-Star reserve team, league sources tell Yahoo.
New York Knicks' Kristaps Porzingis has been selected to the NBA Eastern Conference All-Star reserve team, league sources tell Yahoo.
Dallas Mavericks rookie Dennis Smith Jr. has accepted an invitation to participate in NBA's slam dunk contest at All-Star weekend, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: In effort to bolster backcourt, Cleveland emerges as interested suitor for Sacramento's George Hill. Story:
Sources: The Boston Celtics plan to sign forward Jarell Eddie of G League Windy City to a 10-day contract. Boston filling its open roster spot.
The Los Angeles Lakers are signing forward Nigel Hayes of G League's Westchester to a 10-day contract, league sources tell Yahoo.
Orlando's Arron Afflalo has been suspended two games by the NBA for his altercation with Minnesota's Nemanja Bjelica, league sources tell Yahoo.
Sources: The NBA has granted Brooklyn a $6M disabled player exception for the loss of guard Jeremy Lin.
Sources: The Houston Rockets plan to release guard Briante Weber, who's on a two-way NBA contract, and plan to sign Markel Brown of G League's Oklahoma City on a two-way.
Sources: Philadelphia is signing Rockets free agent guard Demetrius Jackson to a two-way contract, releasing forward James Michael McAdoo.
Sources: Milwaukee is signing center Marshall Plumlee of G League's Agua Caliente to a two-way NBA contract.
Sources: The Minnesota Timberwolves are signing forward Amile Jefferson from G League affiliate Iowa to a two-way NBA contract. He'll also be a free agent this summer.
Sources: The Brooklyn Nets are signing forward James Webb III of G League's Delaware on a two-way contract.
Dallas rookie starter @Dennis1SmithJr on proving wrong his pre-draft perceptions; the Knicks' chase, even one day before the draft in NYC; becoming a young pillar for the Mavericks. Story:
Sources: The Los Angeles Lakers are planning to sign guard Gary Payton II to a two-way NBA contract. Payton is expected to join the team in Memphis.
Sources: The Atlanta Hawks are signing forward Andrew White of G League Maine on a two-way NBA contract.
Utah Jazz forward Thabo Sefolosha is expected to undergo season-ending surgery on an MCL injury in his right knee, league sources say.
Sources: The Detroit Pistons are signing guard Kay Felder to a two-way NBA contract. Felder, a Detroit native, was Cleveland’s second round pick in 2016 and in his second NBA season.
Sources: Free agent guard Mike James is signing a two-way NBA contract with the New Orleans Pelicans. James’ remaining two-way days will take him past the trade deadline and All-Star break with the Pelicans.
Sources: The New York Knicks and guard Trey Burke of G League affiliate Westchester have agreed on a deal for the remainder of the season.
Sources: Memphis is signing forward Myke Henry of G League's Oklahoma City to a two-way NBA contract.
From Toronto, on the state of the Cavaliers. LeBron: "We all have to be held accountable. How hard we play..."
Sources: Miami Heat guard Dion Waiters is expected to undergo season-ending surgery on his injured left ankle. Waiters has received second opinions in Los Angeles to finalize decision, league sources said.
Sources: Lou Williams and the Clippers have recently engaged in contract extension discussions, but no deal's formed as sides evaluate positions. Williams went for 50 points against the Warriors in Oakland tonight. He's eligible for an extension during season.
Sources: The Dallas Mavericks have claimed Pelicans free agent Jalen Jones off waivers, waiving guard Kyle Collinsworth. Both are on two-way NBA contracts.
Golden State's Draymond Green has been fined $25,000 by the NBA for his public criticism of the officiating over the weekend.
Sources: The New York Knicks and Trey Burke of G League Westchester are in serious talks on a deal, with the guard expected to be held out of the showcase and an agreement as soon as the weekend.
Sources: The Bucks are signing guard Sean Kilpatrick to a full NBA deal for rest of season, converting his two-way contract. Milwaukee waived Joel Bolomboy to create open spot.
Move allows Indiana to maintain flexibility and open roster spot over the next several weeks, with contract guarantee date today.
Sources: The Indiana Pacers are waiving forward Damien Wilkins. Wilkins, 37, made Pacers roster this season after being out of the NBA since 2013, and had 11 points as a starter last night.
Sources: Washington Wizards All-Star John Wall has agreed to a five-year endorsement deal with Adidas. Wall returns to the brand after testing shoe free agency over the past couple years.
Sources: Milwaukee is signing guard Xavier Munford of G League's Wisconsin on a two-way NBA contract. Munford has averaged 24 points for Bucks' affiliate.
Sources: The Rockets are planning to re-sign guard Bobby Brown later in season for the rest of the year and playoffs. In meantime, Brown is in talks with teams in China.
Story on Lakers releasing center Andrew Bogut:
Sources: The Los Angeles Lakers are releasing center Andrew Bogut. With Lakers at 11-27, this allows sides to part ways and Bogut to pivot toward signing with a playoff team.
Isaiah Thomas: “I couldn’t sleep last night. ... Once I took that first shot, it felt normal again.” Inside his return from Cleveland:
Sources: Cleveland All-Star Isaiah Thomas and Cavaliers plan on 20-to-22 minute restriction initially upon his return, with flow of his comeback dictating time tonight and beyond.
The Miami Heat plan to sign former Suns forward Derrick Jones Jr. on a two-way NBA contract, league sources say.
Sources: MRI on Clippers guard Austin Rivers' right Achilles tendon strain returned negative today, and he's expected to be day-to-day.
As LaMelo and LiAngelo Ball near pro debuts, Lithuanian club Vytautas Prienai finds exclusive U.S. distributor to sell the brothers' jerseys in America. Story:
Detroit guard Reggie Jackson has suffered a Grade 3 right ankle sprain and will be re-evaluated in 6 to 8 weeks.
The NBA has set the Las Vegas summer league dates: July 6-17 -- open to all 30 teams. With cancellation of Orlando summer league, more teams could join Las Vegas.
After championship, Finals MVP and Christmas Day win, Kevin Durant says: “This is just showing me that my formula works ... now I have to test my ceiling.” Story:
Los Angeles Lakers rookie Lonzo Ball will be reevaluated in one week with a left shoulder sprain, team says. Ball sustained injury last night against Portland.
Sources: Orlando center Nikola Vucevic is expected to undergo surgery on his fractured left hand and be sidelined 6-to-8 weeks. Vucevic is averaging 17.8 points and 9.6 rebounds this season for Magic.
Sources: Suns are signing guard Isaiah Canaan to a minimum deal for the remainder of the season. Canaan has averaged 13 points, 5 assists since joining team on hardship exception.
Story on Suns waiving Mike James after converting his two-way deal into full NBA contract:
Sources: Phoenix is releasing guard Mike James. He joined the Suns on a two-way deal and was signed for remainder of season after making a strong impact, but now has chance to land elsewhere.
Sources: Utah plans to sign guard Naz Long of G League's Salt Lake City on a two-way NBA contract. Jazz opened a spot today, waiving Wolters.
Sources: Utah has waived guard Nate Wolters, who is on a two-way contract.
Story on Cleveland All-Star guard Isaiah Thomas taking another step in his return process:
Sources: Cleveland has assigned Isaiah Thomas to G League affiliate Canton as the All-Star guard continues progress toward return.
Another Part to Kobe Bryant sitdown: Does Kobe still play ball? “Nah, I don’t need to keep my competitive juices flowing. It’s kind of like a myth when you have an athlete who’s done something awesome...”
Sources: The Atlanta Hawks have converted two-way forward Tyler Cavanaugh, signing him to a two-year contract.
Part 3: Kobe Bryant on his mental edge over 20 seasons: "Just studying. Doing your homework. If you find yourself having to psyche yourself up for a game  you're not ready."
Part 2: Kobe Bryant on 2004 and 2008 being his biggest NBA regrets, and an admission on pre-Achilles tear run in 2013. “It almost killed me  It was the strictest on myself that I’ve ever been. It was maniacal.”
Kobe Bryant on Lakers retiring both Nos. 8 and 24 tonight at Staples Center: "I feel truly blessed. What happens is you get caught up in the grind  you just go, go, go, go go  you look back, and you're like, 'Whoa, what?'"
Coming today: Multi-part series of my video sit-down with Kobe Bryant... @ Los Angeles Lakers
Story on current return target for Cavaliers All-Star guard Isaiah Thomas:
Thomas has made significant progress from his hip injury, has confidence he could play now, but plan has been set to ensure he returns for long run this season. Cavaliers face Portland, Boston and Orlando in first week of January.
Cavaliers All-Star guard Isaiah Thomas is targeting the first week of January for his season debut with Cleveland, league sources tell Yahoo.
Story on Utah center Rudy Gobert's expected timetable with knee injury:
Sources: Utah Jazz star Rudy Gobert has been diagnosed with a sprained PCL in his left knee and bone bruise in tibia, expected to be sidelined for one month.
Heat forward Justise Winslow's MRI returned clean on his injured left knee Thursday and hope is he can return within a week, league sources say.
Sources: The Suns plan to sign guard Isaiah Canaan of G League's Northern Arizona under injury hardship exception, with Devin Booker among four players sidelined two weeks or more.
Sources: Boston forward Marcus Morris is expected to miss extended time as he and the team work on solution for nagging left knee.
Lithuanian team Vytautas statement on signing LaMelo and LiAngelo Ball to one-year deals: “Our club is excited for the arrival of LiAngelo and LaMelo Ball. We are committed to their long-term success and development as professional basketball players.”
Sources: LaMelo and LiAngelo Ball have turned pro, signing one-year contracts with first division Lithuanian team Vytautas. They will report to the club in early January.
Sources: The Hawks have waived forward Nicolas Brussino, opening a roster spot. Brussino was claimed off waivers by Atlanta in July.
Sources: The Suns plan to sign guard Danuel House of G League's Rio Grande Valley on a two-way contract.
Sources: Brooklyn will receive the Knicks 2019 second-round pick in deal, and release guard Sean Kilpatrick to create roster space for Okafor and Nik Stauskas.
Philadelphia is nearing deal to send center Jahlil Okafor to Brooklyn in deal that involves forward Trevor Booker, league sources tell Yahoo.
Jones, an athletic wing, could receive strong interest in waiver process in the second season of a 4-year contract. Suns discussed other deal concepts with James, but agreed on remainder of year and he’ll reach RFA in July, sources say.
The Phoenix Suns are waiving Derrick Jones Jr. to create space to sign two-way guard Mike James for rest of season, league sources say.
Memphis' Marc Gasol has been fined $15,000 for postgame television comments on Monday night.
Golden State has listed Stephen Curry as doubtful to play on Wednesday. Curry's ankle is stable, but he could be out a while, sources say.
Sources: Warriors All-Star Stephen Curry's MRI result revealed no structural damage on injured right ankle, but significant swelling and no return timetable.
Sources: The NBA has granted the Clippers a $2.75M disabled player exception for the loss of guard Patrick Beverley for the season.
Sources: Warriors star Stephen Curry will undergo an MRI on his injured right ankle on Tuesday. X-rays were negative tonight, but ankle remains very swollen.
Sources: Both LaMelo and LiAngelo Ball beginning to explore options to sign professionally overseas. Story with details:
NBA has suspended Warriors' Shaun Livingston for one game and removed referee Courtney Kirkland for one week for role in altercation in Sunday's game in Miami.
Sources: Cleveland guard Iman Shumpert underwent surgery for a small meniscus tear in his left knee today, expected to be sidelined for two months.
Sources: Atlanta rookie John Collins has been diagnosed with a sprained AC joint in left shoulder -- no tear -- and is expected to miss 2-to-3 weeks. He suffered injury Thursday night.
Sources: Denver All-Star Paul Millsap underwent successful surgery on his left wrist today and is expected to be sidelined three months.
Story on Denver's Paul Millsap expected to be sidelined 2-to-3 months with surgery on injured wrist:
Denver All-Star forward Paul Millsap will undergo surgery on his left wrist and be sidelined indefinitely, league sources say.
Sources: The Mavericks plan to sign guard Antonius Cleveland of G League’s Santa Cruz, release Gian Clavell. Cleveland will be on two-way deal.
Sources: 76ers forward Robert Covington plans to sign a four-year, $62 million contract renegotiation-and-extension on Friday.
Part 3 of my sitdown with Pelicans' @boogiecousins and @RajonRondo, who returned to lineup this week: Their unique bond, Cousins/Anthony Davis partnership, Cousins' mindset in potential final year of deal.
Sources: Utah Jazz center Rudy Gobert is expected to miss 4-to-6 weeks with a bone bruise in his right knee. Gobert suffered the injury Friday against Miami.
The mindset of Lonzo Ball after becoming NBA's youngest to triple-double: 'I really don’t give a  I’ve played this way my whole life.' Column from Milwaukee:
Sources: Boston’s Kyrie Irving will likely miss Sunday’s game with facial fracture, then play through the injury with a fitted mask for two weeks.
Sources: New Orleans has released veteran forward Josh Smith, who signed Oct. 28 under a hardship exception.
Sources: Chicago will host the NBA All-Star Weekend in 2020, announcement coming on Friday.
From 8-hour drop-offs to the Y, to the Los Angeles Lakers, @kylekuzma says: “I had to do something to make it out. I had no choice.” Column:
There's no plan for Bledsoe to return to team; instead use facility again to stay in game shape and work with staff, sources said.
Sources: As potential trade prolongs, Phoenix's Eric Bledsoe planning to return to Suns' facility, work with staff members, early this week.
Sources: After tests on injured shoulder, Wizards star John Wall has no structural damage, just soreness. Listed as questionable vs. Raptors.
Zach LaVine's endorsement deal with adidas comes as no surprise for NBA execs who view the Chicago guard as one of most explosive guards at 22. LaVine will be RFA in July.
Sources: Cleveland Cavaliers' Tristan Thompson is expected to miss one month with left calf injury he suffered Wednesday night.
Sources: Veteran forward Josh Smith has received letter of clearance and is signing his contract with the Pelicans today.
Sources: The NBA has granted Boston an $8.4M disabled player exception for the loss of Gordon Hayward for the season. The DPE expires March 10.
Sources: Chicago has exercised the fourth-year team option on guard Cameron Payne.
Column from sitdown with Blake Griffin in LA: Unfinished business, embracing new Clippers challenge.
Story on 12-year veteran Josh Smith joining the Pelicans, with All-Star Anthony Davis questionable for Thursday:
Free agent forward Josh Smith plans to sign with New Orleans under an injury hardship exception, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: Pelicans star Anthony Davis has no structural damage in injured left knee. He has swelling in knee, and will be day-to-day.
Pels dreaded waiving of Jordan Crawford to create space for Nelson. Crawford fit role, played well in preseason and last night against Warriors.
Story on Jameer Nelson reaching agreement to join New Orleans:
Free agent guard Jameer Nelson has agreed on a one-year deal with the New Orleans Pelicans, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: NBA G League's Northern Arizona Suns are selecting center Eric Stuteville with the No. 1 overall pick in the Draft.
On challenges born out of Lakers debut, Lonzo Ball tells The Vertical: "I'll be ready. I have to show it in my game.." Column:
Sources: The Knicks are signing former UNC forward Isaiah Hicks to a two-way NBA contract. Hicks went to training camp with Charlotte.
Sources: Memphis starter JaMychal Green’s MRI on left ankle sprain returned clean, no damage, and he will likely be sidelined several weeks.
Boston star Gordon Hayward has been diagnosed with dislocation and fracture of left tibia, will undergo surgery.
Sources: Veteran point guard Jameer Nelson has been released by Denver, clears free agency waivers Friday.
Sources: Cleveland and former Virginia guard London Perrantes are finalizing a two-way NBA contract. Perrantes was a Spurs' cut out of camp.
Sources: The Lakers and guard Vander Blue have agreed on a two-way NBA contract. Blue was released out of camp but staying in L.A.
Boston forward Gordon Hayward has been diagnosed with a fractured left ankle tonight.
Story on altercation between Bulls' Bobby Portis and Nikola Mirotic, leaving Mirotic out for foreseeable future:
Sources: Bulls forwards Bobby Portis and Nikola Mirotic were involved in serious altercation in practice today, leaving Mirotic hospitalized and out indefinitely. Story coming.
Part 2 of sitdown w/ Pelicans All-Star @boogiecousins, @RajonRondo: Cousins on motivation this season, perceptions.
Sources: The Golden State Warriors and guard Quinn Cook have agreed to a two-way NBA contract. Cook played in camp with Atlanta.
For Boston, hurdle in closing gap with Smart extension talks was luxury tax implication, league sources said. Now risk losing Smart in July’s RFA.
Sources: Marcus Smart’s agent and Boston remained fully engaged before extension deadline. No deal, couldn't bridge the gap.
Sources: Bulls waived center Diamond Stone and forward Jarell Eddie to reach 15-man roster with Kay Felder. Felder has two seasons left on his deal.
Milwaukee has claimed guard DeAndre Liggins off waivers, league sources tell The Vertical.
The Chicago Bulls have claimed guard Kay Felder off free agency waivers, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent guard Isaiah Taylor has agreed to a two-year deal with the Atlanta Hawks, league sources tell The Vertical.
LaMarcus Aldridge has agreed to a three-year, $72.3 million contract extension with the San Antonio Spurs, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: After strong preseason, Mavericks rookie Gian Clavell has agreed to a two-way NBA contract with Dallas.
All-Star Jimmy Butler driving the Minnesota Timberwolves -- the only way he knows how. Column:
Sources: Milwaukee has waived guard Gerald Green. The 10-year veteran reenters free agency before season starts this week.
Story link on Cleveland finalizing trade to send Richard Jefferson, Kay Felder to Atlanta, set 15-man roster:
Cleveland is in advanced talks on a deal to send Richard Jefferson and Kay Felder to Atlanta, league sources tell The Vertical.
Story on Portland, center Jusuf Nurkic planning to reach restricted free agency in 2018:
Nurkic, 23, has become a cornerstone part of the Trail Blazers' future, and would be one of the top centers on market next summer.
Sources: Portland's Jusuf Nurkic plans on restricted free agency next summer with Blazers, barring major shift, with no extension offer made.
Miami guard Rodney McGruder will likely undergo surgery on a stress fracture in his leg, miss 3-6 months, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: NBA is naming a new senior VP and head of referee operations: Michelle D. Johnson, a retired U.S. Air Force Lieutenant General.
Part 1: Rajon Rondo and DeMarcus Cousins on Rondo’s leadership impact, desire to be a head coach.
Coming shortly: Part 1 of my extended sitdown with Pelicans' @boogiecousins and @RajonRondo
Andrew Wiggins' Minnesota final extension terms: five-year, $146.5M max deal -- with no player option, league source tells The Vertical.
New Orleans guard Rajon Rondo underwent surgery on his sports hernia injury and will miss 4-to-6 weeks, league sources tell The Vertical.
Full story on extension situation of young member of Celtics core, Marcus Smart, who would enter RFA if no deal:
Marcus Smart has strong desire to remain in Boston, but tells The Vertical he and agent Happy Walters have yet to hear from Celtics front office on possible extension.
Washington guard Sheldon Mac will undergo surgery Tuesday on his torn left Achilles and miss 6-8 months, league sources tell The Vertical.
Details on Hornets losing forward Nicolas Batum with elbow injury:
Charlotte's Nicolas Batum has suffered a torn ligament in his left elbow and will miss 8-to-12 weeks, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: Los Angeles Lakers hiring former NBA All-Star Antawn Jamison in scouting position.
Sources: NBA has informed teams of projected salary cap in next two offseasons: $101M for 2018-19, $108M for 2019-20, subject to change.
Story on restricted free agent JaMychal Green, Memphis finalizing a guaranteed two-year deal:
RFA JaMychal Green is finalizing a two-year, $17M-plus deal to return to the Memphis Grizzlies, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: Cleveland plans to waive rookie JaCorey Williams to clear roster spot and sign Dwyane Wade. Williams plans to find next team soon.
Sources: Dwyane Wade has reached agreement on a one-year, $2.3M deal with the Cleveland Cavaliers.
Sources: Dwyane Wade has been formally placed on NBA waivers by the Bulls, clears waivers on Wednesday.
Story on RFA Nikola Mirotic agreeing to a two-year deal to return to the Chicago Bulls:
Mirotic has right to veto any trade in year one of his new Bulls deal, league sources said.
Restricted free agent Nikola Mirotic has agreed to a two-year, $27M deal to return to Chicago, league sources tell The Vertical.
Phoenix center Alex Len has signed a one-year, $4.2M qualifying offer and will become an UFA next summer, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: Free agent guard Isaiah Canaan has agreed to a non-guaranteed deal with Oklahoma City.
Update: Burke has changed course on deal with OKC and will remain a free agent, league sources say.
Sources: Knicks plan to waive guard Chasson Randle to create roster space for Carmelo Anthony trade.
Oklahoma City acquiring All-Star Carmelo Anthony from New York, expected to be formal Monday:
Sources: Carmelo Anthony is expected to waive his no-trade clause for trade to Oklahoma City, with trade call likely coming Monday.
In trade as finalized, OKC sending Chicago's 2018 second-round draft pick to the Knicks, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: OKC is in advanced talks on a deal that includes Enes Kanter, Doug McDermott and a future draft pick for Carmelo Anthony.
New York is in advanced discussions with Oklahoma City on a Carmelo Anthony trade, league sources tell The Vertical.
So: Phoenix receives Troy Daniels and '18 2nd-round pick from Memphis (middle of MEM/CHA/MIA; sending top-55 protected in '18 to Grizzlies.
Memphis is finalizing deal to send guard Troy Daniels to Phoenix for a future second-rounder pick, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent Gerald Green has agreed on a deal to sign with the Milwaukee Bucks, league sources tell The Vertical.
Story on free agent Kris Humphries planning to sign deal with the Philadelphia 76ers:
Former No. 1 overall pick Anthony Bennett has signed a non-guaranteed deal with the Phoenix Suns, league sources tell The Vertical.
Minnesota’s Andrew Wiggins is progressing toward a five-year, $148M maximum extension, hopeful to sign soon, sources tell The Vertical.
Cunningham has agreed to a one-year, $2.3M deal with New Orleans, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent forward Dante Cunningham has agreed on a deal with the New Orleans Pelicans, league sources tell The Vertical.
Story link on Andrew Bogut reaching agreement with the Los Angeles Lakers:
Free agent center Andrew Bogut has agreed to a one-year deal with the Los Angeles Lakers, agent David Bauman of ISE tells The Vertical.
Sources: Free agent Jason Terry is signing a guaranteed one-year, $2.3M deal to return to Milwaukee.
Free agent guard Anthony Morrow has agreed to a one-year, non-guaranteed deal with Portland, agent Wallace Prather tells The Vertical.
Free agent Tony Allen is finalizing a one-year deal with the New Orleans Pelicans, league sources tell The Vertical.
Ten-year NBA veteran Rodney Stuckey plans to visit several teams post-Labor Day. Stuckey has been fully healthy training this summer.
The Los Angeles Lakers have been fined $500,000 for violating anti-tampering rules.
Bulls guard Cameron Payne will undergo surgery on his right foot and be sidelined until late November, league sources tell The Vertical.
The basketball journey of @RealLamarOdom: UNLV/Rhode Island, the NBA, highs, lows, retiring a Laker. Column:
Sources: Philadelphia plans to hire former NBA All-Star Elton Brand as GM of G League team. Brand has served as a development consultant.
Sources: Cleveland guard Iman Shumpert has made no trade request, but Cavaliers have actively shopped him since start of free agency.
Ginobili, 40, returning to San Antonio on a fully guaranteed two-year deal.
Manu Ginobili has signed a two-year, $5 million deal to return to the San Antonio Spurs, league sources tell The Vertical.
The Los Angeles Clippers are hiring Knicks executive Mark Hughes as assistant general manager, league sources tell The Vertical.
Full story on the Cavaliers-Celtics blockbuster trade of Kyrie Irving for Isaiah Thomas, Jae Crowder package:
Boston has fortified starting 5 of Irving, Hayward, Jaylen Brown, Marcus Morris and Horford, while keeping heralded Marcus Smart/Lakers 1st.
All-Star Kyrie Irving will waive his trade kicker to complete Cleveland's deal to Boston, league source tells The Vertical.
Celtics are sending Thomas, Crowder, Ante Zizic and Brooklyn's 2018 first-round pick for Kyrie Irving, league sources tell The Vertical.
Cleveland and Boston have agreement on deal to send Kyrie Irving to the Celtics for Isaiah Thomas package to Cavs, sources tell The Vertical
Sources: Cleveland, Boston seriously discussing Kyrie Irving-Isaiah Thomas deal, expected to include Jae Crowder.
Cleveland and Boston engaged in active trade discussions centered on Kyrie Irving and Isaiah Thomas, league sources tell The Vertical.
NBA opened investigation on Lakers, upon Pacers' request, league announces. No decision made upon findings at this point, NBA adds.
Free agent guard Quinn Cook has agreed to a partially guaranteed, two-year deal with the Atlanta Hawks, agent Jim Tanner tells The Vertical.
Free agent center Jeff Withey has agreed to a one-year deal with the Dallas Mavericks, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: Former Celtics draft pick Jordan Mickey is finalizing a guaranteed $1.5M minimum deal with the Miami Heat, with '18-19 team option.
Free agent Donald Sloan, a 5-year NBA veteran, has agreed on a one-year deal with the Washington Wizards, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: Charlotte plans to sign guard Julyan Stone to a two-year minimum deal, with second year trigger date, pending FIBA clearance.
Free agent guard Briante Weber has agreed on a partially guaranteed deal with the Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent guard Marcus Georges-Hunt has agreed to a deal with the Minnesota Timberwolves, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: New York Knicks hiring Milwaukee executive Craig Robinson, brother-in-law of Barack Obama.
Former Warrior Ian Clark, one of the top free agents left, reaches agreement with the New Orleans Pelicans. Story:
Free agent Ian Clark has agreed to a one-year deal with the New Orleans Pelicans, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: Indiana has waived center Kevin Seraphin, who had guarantee date on the upcoming season of his deal.
Sources: The Lakers and G League MVP and summer league guard Vander Blue have agreed on a partially guaranteed deal.
Sources: After exploring NBA return, former Grizzlies/Nuggets guard Jamaal Franklin has agreed to a two-year, $4M deal w/ Sichuan in China.
Sessions, Knicks have agreed on a one-year, $2.3M minimum deal, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent guard Ramon Sessions is finalizing a one-year deal with the New York Knicks, league sources tell The Vertical.
Oklahoma City's No. 21 overall pick Terrance Ferguson has agreed to his four-year rookie scale contract, league sources tell The Vertical.
Lakers want to maintain as much flexibility for pursuit in free agency next year, and found an agreement with Bryant.
Sources: Lakers and No. 42 overall pick Thomas Bryant of Indiana have agreed to a guaranteed deal for next season, with '18-19 team option.
My full story on former NBA MVP Derrick Rose committing to sign with the Cavaliers, partner with LeBron James:
Derrick Rose has committed to sign with the Cleveland Cavaliers and completed his physical exam today, league sources tell The Vertical.
Full story on John Wall's $170M super max extension with the Wizards.
Sources: Washington star John Wall has agreed to a four-year, $170M extension with the Wizards, including player option and trade kicker.
Sources: The Memphis Grizzlies have signed No. 45 overall pick Dillon Brooks of Oregon to a three-year rookie deal, w/ two years guaranteed.
The Oklahoma City Thunder are signing 2015 second-rounder Dakari Johnson to a guaranteed two-year deal, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent Udonis Haslem has signed a one-year, minimum deal to return to the Miami Heat, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: Free agent Rajon Rondo has signed his one-year deal with New Orleans for $3.3M.
Los Angeles Lakers' No. 2 overall pick Lonzo Ball has been named NBA Summer League MVP in Las Vegas.
Sources: The Clippers have waived forward Kyle Wiltjer, who was acquired in Chris Paul deal.
Free agent Rajon Rondo has reached agreement on a one-year deal with the New Orleans Pelicans, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent forward Tarik Black has reached agreement to sign with the Houston Rockets, league sources tell The Vertical.
The Chicago Bulls have claimed Lakers free agent David Nwaba off waivers, league sources tell The Vertical.
Spurs free agent Jonathon Simmons has agreed to a three-year deal with the Orlando Magic, league sources tell The Vertical.
Boston and 2016 second-round pick Abdel Nader have agreed in principle on a four-year, $6M rookie deal, league sources tell The Vertical.
Nick Collison is re-signing with Oklahoma City on a 1-year deal to end 15-year career with Thunder franchise, sources tell The Vertical.
Utah has waived forward Boris Diaw ahead of guarantee date, league sources tell The Vertical.
No negotiations w/ Spurs as Simmons looks elsewhere for deal, agent Cervando Tejeda tells The Vertical. Full story:
Sources: The San Antonio Spurs have renounced guard Jonathon Simmons, making him an unrestricted free agent.
Euroleague star center Ekpe Udoh has agreed to a two-year, $6.5M deal with the Utah Jazz, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent Ersan Ilyasova has agreed to a one-year, $6M deal with the Atlanta Hawks, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent Thabo Sefolosha has agreed to a two-year, $10.5M deal with the Utah Jazz, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: Board of Governors voted at meeting Tuesday, and NBA teams were informed today. Trade deadline effectively set before All-Star.
Sources: NBA has approved change to its trade deadline for 2017-18 season to the second Thursday (Feb. 8, 2018) before All-Star weekend.
Spurs free agent Dewayne Dedmon has agreed to a deal with the Atlanta Hawks, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent forward Anthony Tolliver has agreed to a one-year, $3.3M deal with the Detroit Pistons, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent Reggie Bullock has agreed to a two-year, $5M deal to re-sign with the Detroit Pistons, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent center Joffrey Lauvergne has agreed to a deal with the San Antonio Spurs, league sources tell The Vertical.
Restricted free agent Alan Williams has agreed to a three-year, $17M deal to stay with the Phoenix Suns, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent center Aron Baynes has reached agreement on a one-year, $4.3M deal with the Boston Celtics, league sources tell The Vertical.
Toronto and Indiana are discussing sign-and-trade deal of free agent CJ Miles to the Raptors, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: Bulls pulled qualifying offer on forward Joffrey Lauvergne, making him unrestricted free agent. Several teams showing interest.
Sources: Crawford plans to sign with Minnesota on a two-year, $8.9M deal, with second year player option, once he clears waivers.
Jamal Crawford is in serious talks to sign with the Minnesota Timberwolves once he clears waivers, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: New Orleans is signing No. 31 overall pick Frank Jackson of Duke to 3-year deal, with two guaranteed years and third-year partial.
Sources: Atlanta has informed the New York Knicks that it will not match guard Tim Hardaway Jr.'s $71M offer sheet.
Hawks guard Jamal Crawford has finalized his contract buyout, league source tells The Vertical.
Sources: Milwaukee is signing No. 46 overall pick Sterling Brown of SMU to a three-year rookie deal, with two years guaranteed.
Muscala's deal has a player option that will allow the young forward to reenter free agency next summer, sources say.
Free agent forward Mike Muscala has agreed to a two-year, $10M deal to stay with the Atlanta Hawks, league sources tell The Vertical.
Boston also sending a 2019 second-round pick to Detroit, league sources say.
Sources: Detroit sending forward Marcus Morris to Boston for guard Avery Bradley.
Sources: Tyler Dorsey of Oregon -- Atlanta's No. 41 overall draft pick -- has agreed to a fully guaranteed two-year contract.
Knicks' offer sheet to Tim Hardaway Jr. is $71M-plus and has final year salary of nearly $19M. Hawks have 2 days to decide whether to match.
Atlanta RFA Tim Hardaway Jr. has signed a four-year offer sheet with the New York Knicks, league sources tell The Vertical.
Heat plan to send McRoberts and a future second round pick to Dallas for A.J. Hammons, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: As Heat create space to re-sign James Johnson, Miami in advanced discussions to send forward Josh McRoberts to Dallas.
Indiana has waived guard Monta Ellis, league sources tell The Vertical.
RFA Otto Porter has reached agreement on a four-year, $106M max deal with Brooklyn Nets, league sources tell The Vertical.
Hayward receives a player option in the fourth year of his Boston contract, league sources tell The Vertical.
Free agent Gordon Hayward has agreed to a four-year, $128M deal with the Boston Celtics, league source tells The Vertical.
Free agent George Hill has reached agreement on a three-year, $57M deal with the Sacramento Kings, league sources tell The Vertical.
Sources: Clippers, Hawks, Nuggets working on trade of Danillo Gallinari to LA/Millsap to DEN; Jamal Crawford/Diamond Stone/FRP to Atlanta.
No. 2 overall pick Lonzo Ball will sign his four-year rookie contract with the Los Angeles Lakers today, league sources tell The Vertical.
Millsap, Denver reach $90M contract agreement.
The Knicks are on the short list of viable trade destinations for Houston's Russell Westbrook, league sources say If the Knicks prove willing to absorb the $130 million left on Westbrook's contract to make him their centerpiece, there is a trade to be made They have weighed it
Weaver was a finalist for Oklahoma City’s head coaching job that went Mark Daigneault after coaching the Sydney Kings in Australia’s @NBL
The Rockets are hiring Will Weaver as an assistant coach to join Stephen Silas' staff, league sources say
That hurt like I was Scottish ... Freest header ever
The team is super young and has no continuity and ain't quite facing Brazil away ... but you watch the #USMNT and there is true hope on the screen. A welcome sight ...
The Spurs announced that Mitch Johnson will fill the spot on Gregg Popovich's staff vacated by Tim Duncan and have elevated Darius Songaila to assistant coach
Sneak peak at what the Wilson ball will look like starting in 2021-22 ... courtesy of notre envoye special Evan Fournier from the @OrlandoMagic Spalding -- which replaced Wilson as the league's official ball manufacturer in 1983 -- remains the NBA supplier for the coming season
The Spurs' Tim Duncan is stepping away from full-time coaching after spending last season on the bench on Gregg Popovich's staff, @NYTSports has learned
The Nets just announced the addition of Royal Ivey to Steve Nash's coaching staff
Talks are ongoing, sources say, to grant players on two-way contracts more than 45 days in the NBA to make them far more available to their NBA teams With such a short offseason (for some teams) and more of a coronavirus threat, teams naturally want the added roster flexibility
The online edition of this week’s @nytimes On Basketball newsletter digs into what we haven’t discussed enough: A very complicated season for the NBA once we get past the draft, trade and free-agent frenzy that will dominate the  world this Thanksgiving
The Thunder brought Mark Daigneault into their organization when he was 29, had him coach their G League team for five seasons and have now promoted him to head coach with the big club. It's a first in NBA/@nbagleague history
Any team trading for Holiday, of course, has to be cognizant of his contractual situation, with the Pelicans' guard -- regarded as one of the league's foremost two-way players -- expected to decline his $27 million option for 2021-22 and become a free agent after this season
The Hawks have emerged as a potential trade destination for New Orleans' Jrue Holiday in multi-team trade scenarios that would involve Atlanta's No. 6 pick in next week's draft, league sources say
NBA training camps are scheduled to open three weeks from today ... and today's @nytimes On Basketball newsletter is all about how much harder this coming season is going to be outside of a bubble:
The Knicks have closed their practice facility after three unidentified team employees tested posted for the coronavirus
Watch Tommy Heinsohn set up Game 2 Celtics/Bulls in 1986 on CBS ... right before a certain Michael Jordan uncorked 63 points. Great find by @phil_rosenthal ... loved, loved, LOVED the energy of a playoff broadcast in the '80s even with Tommy leaning green:
Tremendous loss of a true Celtics great ... and I can scarcely remember watching a CBS game without Tommy in the 1980s #RIP
All the noise lately has centered around the shortest offseason in NBA history and the tight turnaround for the Lakers and Heat This week’s @nytimes On Basketball newsletter digs into something we haven’t discussed enough: How hard it’s going to be stage a bubble-less season:
The NBA, sources say, has scheduled a Board of Governors call for later today for team owners to approve the agreement reached Monday night on the salary-cap rules to govern the coming season
NBA Calendar ... Nov. 18: NBA Draft Nov. 20: Free agency starts at 6 PM Nov. 22: Free agent signings can begin at 12:01 PM Dec. 1: Training camps open Dec. 22: Opening Night Freeze on trades being lifted is still TBD but remains likely to happen in the Nov. 16 range
The NBA has announced a Nov. 20 start to free agency — 48 hours after the Nov. 18 draft — and has more details here on its Dec. 22 opening night ...
Michigan State coach Tom Izzo announces he has tested positive for the coronavirus ...
The Jimmy Butler song!
I suspect this collectible will be in demand tomorrow at your local supermarket, convenience store and possibly even newsstand ...
Joe Biden is the next president of the United States. @nytimes coverage here ...
The @NYTSports latest on the fast-approaching start of NBA training camps ... just 25 days away now:
The legendary baseball writer Gerry Fraley was one of the best mentors I've ever had and another gem (@KSherringtonDMN) has written a beautiful peace about Gerry's son @iamfrales and the struggles he had overcome to play football at Temple. A read we need:
The Pacers are hiring the former NBA big man and longtime assistant Greg Foster as part of new Indiana coach Nate Bjorkgren's staff, league sources say As @NYTSports reported yesterday, Atlanta is hiring former Pacers coach Nate McMillan to bolster Lloyd Pierce's Hawks staff
NBA team player representatives remain on course to huddle virtually later tonight to vote on the league's proposal to start the 2020-21 season on Dec. 22 ... with training camps opening Dec. 1 Two sources briefed on the latest describe union approval of that plan a "formality"
Back now to @JohnKingCNN ...
Nov. 18: Draft Free agency 48 to 72 hours after that Dec. 1: Training camps open Followill and Stein offseason food tours: Canceled
NBA Voting Update: All the momentum on the player side today indicates that the union, through a vote of team player representatives, is poised to ratify the NBA's plan to open training camps Dec. 1 and start the 2020-21 season Dec. 22 by week's end
The Hawks are nearing a deal to hire former Pacers coach Nate McMillan as an assistant coach on Lloyd Pierce's staff, league sources say
Need a diversion on Election Day II? The online edition of this week's @nytimes On Basketball newsletter is here ... with the latest on James Harden's future in Houston, front-office financial buzz from the Atlantic Division and more:
Election Day, yes, but also a Newsletter Tuesday. So as a brief-but-fun diversion ... Your latest @nytimes On Basketball newsletter on James Harden's future, front-office finances in the Atlantic Division and more NBA chatter has been freshly dispatched to Inboxes worldwide:
Tonight on @KingJames' @HBO special, @BarackObama said @carmeloanthony and @russwest44 joined James and Chris Paul on the phone call @CP3 initiated with Obama to seek advice from the former president in the wee hours of Aug. 26 after the @Bucks walked away from a playoff game
The @nba and @TheNBPA just announced that, for the fourth time this year, they have delayed the deadline to opt out of the league's current labor agreement Next Friday is the new deadline and negotiations between the sides continue on needed changes to next season's calendar
The Hawks have explored adding McMillan to Lloyd Pierce’s staff and, as @Jonathan_Feigen reported earlier this week, Houston has expressed interest in both McMillan and Jeff Hornacek to add head coaching experience to new coach Stephen Silas’ staff with the Rockets
Along with the Houston Rockets, league sources say that the Atlanta Hawks have emerged as a potential landing spot for former Pacers coach Nate McMillan
New @IonaGaelsMBB coach Rick @RealPitino tells @NYTSports that he remains intent on coaching the Greek national team in next June's qualifiers if the event goes ahead (Correct Iona handle this time)
The availability of certain NBA players and coaches, however, understandably remains TBD. If the Milwaukee Bucks or the Toronto Raptors are still playing in late June, to name two examples, Greece and Canada would likely miss out on Giannis Antetokounmpo and Nick Nurse
FIBA has moved its Olympic qualifying tournament for the 16 countries that would be playing for the final four spots in Tokyo -- which affects numerous NBA players -- to June 29-July 4 ... one week later than it would have been this year and as late as the IOC would allow
The Pacers' Malcolm Brogdon, who is on the union's executive committee, told @Rachel__Nichols yesterday he expects today's deadline on talks to be extended for the fourth time this year. But a resolution in the standoff is expected by next week with all sides antsy for clarity.
A 50-game season would reduce player salaries significantly in 2020-21, since NBA pay adheres to a regular-season schedule The NBA's 72-game model calls for teams to play roughly 14 games a month through May, followed by the playoffs through mid-July -- before the Olympics begin
NBA players may only be offered a 50-game season, I'm told, if the union insists on a mid-January start rather than the Dec. 22 proposal, because the league's television partners do not want the 2020-21 season to stray past mid-July ... or clash with the Tokyo Olympics
A game City should have won and crushing to draw but a game I'll never forget ... including your first goal for Newcastle. As they say ... it had everything:
Sticker and an I Voted stylus. Hard to beat that deal ...
Former Wake Forest coach and NBA All-Star Danny Manning has emerged as a candidate for new coach Nate Bjorkgren's staff in Indiana, league sources say
The online version of this week’s @nytimes On Basketball newsletter goes inside the league’s push to start NBA free agency and the 2020-21 season sooner than anyone imagined:
The Lakers are naturally determined to re-sign Rondo, who played a huge role in their playoff run, but the Clippers are eager to upgrade at point guard. Rondo has said he is planning to test the open market, which means declining his 2.7 million option for next season
The Clippers have interest in signing the Lakers' Rajon Rondo, league sources say, and are expected to pursue Rondo when free agency opens in November
What kind of Bubble returns a positive coronavirus test result in the eighth inning of a World Series game? Hoping Cal State Fullerton royalty Justin Turner is OK ... 
The Dodgers' @MagicJohnson ... World Series champion
I'm as guilty as anyone ... but they really should have named this site
The fact that the Dodgers don't hit lefties and weren't hitting that lefty in particular AT ALL don't figure into all this baseball math they talk about?
Maybe #thisleague is NOT the analytics league ...
Dave Roberts would never ...
Last word on the newsletter; If you are not subscribed or were not yet subscribed before tonight’s dispatch, click SEE SAMPLE on the sign-up page and you can get right to it. Signing up, of course, is the best approach:
Reminder: Sign up here for instantaneous delivery of the @nytimes On Basketball newsletter every Tuesday ... DIRECT to your inbox. Gets no easier than a click: Online version drops tomorrow ... but why wait?
League officials are proposing that NBA free agency and the 2020-21 season start sooner than anyone imagined when The Bubble was still operational. The latest @nytimes On Basketball newsletter, freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide, dives into all the reasons for the shift ...
Some teams, I'm told, are preparing for NBA free agency to begin as early as Nov. 20 or Nov. 21 -- 48 to 72 hours after the Nov. 18 NBA Draft -- if the plan to start the 2020-21 season Dec. 22 goes ahead. Further clarity is expected by week's end ...
Dec. 1, I'm told, has emerged as the likely opening day for NBA training camps if the league's plan to set Dec. 22 as opening night of the 2020-21 season is approved by the union
Kyle Korver ... powerful stuff
Fascinating @NYTSports story from my colleagues @RorySmith and @tariqpanja about how criticisms of the Chinese government marked the first strains in Mesut Ozil's increasingly broken relationship with Arsenal:
Tennis reference ...
Here @flasportsbuzz of the Miami Herald confirms Dan Craig is Clipper-bound The expectation in NBA coaching circles is that Kenny Atkinson and Chauncey Billups will also strike deals to join Ty Lue's first Clippers staff along with former Hawks/Bucks/Cavaliers coach Larry Drew
The Clippers have formally interviewed Chauncey Billups for a spot on Ty Lue's coaching staff, league sources say As @NYTSports reported last week, former Nets coach Kenny Atkinson and Miami assistant coach Dan Craig emerged as the Clippers' first two prime targets to join Lue
The Bubble does not want us to forget The Bubble. Just received this ...
Dodgers celebrate bullpen outs like somebody just got posterized at the rim ...
I'd be a lot madder, after the zero @MLB games that I've managed in my career, that he threw a strike in that situation than the part about not backing up home plate ...
Will love Kenley Jansen for eternity for being virtually untoucable for my @StratOMatic team in 2016 ... And you can not blame him one ounce for the hideous fielding that just ensued ... But why such a hittable pitch there to a .196 hitter after Philips just took two strikes?
Cal State Fullerton 1, Tampa Bay 0
Beyond the fact negotiations with the union must be completed to bargain tweaks to the CBA on a salary cap figure and luxury-tax threshold ... time is ticking for the NBA to uphold a pledge to the players that they would get at least eight weeks notice before next season starts
The league had never taken a Christmas Day start off the table, but all signs coming out of the Bubble pointed to next season being pushed into 2021 Christmas is obviously a huge day for the NBA and its broadcast partners ... but MUCH must happen quickly quickly to preserve it
The push for a Christmas Day start to the 2020-21 NBA season, which would naturally please the league's TV partners, is gaining momentum, league sources say
Heat assistant coach Dan Craig, who interviewed for Indiana's head-coaching vacancy, is said to be another top target for Lue's staff with the Clippers, which is also expected to include another former NBA coach head coach in Larry Drew
Former Nets coach Kenny Atkinson has emerged as a strong contender to join new head coach Ty Lue's staff with the Clippers, league sources say
The online edition of this week’s @nytimes On Basketball newsletter ... featuring our @Jpdabrams talking to a slew of top NBA Draft prospects? Yes, please
The one and only @AratonHj on Knicks fandom, Madison Square Garden’s unique courtside ambiance and the uncertainty of it all in the future? Yes, please ...
It's a special @NYTimes On Basketball newsletter ... on two fronts: 1) The great @Jpdabrams, @NYTSports' recent marquee signee, has kindly stepped in for me this week 2) It's an #AbramsAlert NBA Draft extravaganza with Tyrese Haliburton, Obi Toppin, Josh Green and Devin Vassell
He was more ready than me. Clearly ...
Rest of the night hinges on Magic's tweet ...
Tweets You’re Not Supposed To Tweet (but it is Sunday): The #14yearoldGM is having an afternoon ... (Derrick Henry was his first-ever Fantasy first pick)
Sergio De Bruyne
In the running for the most UNfairytale return of all-time: Bale comes on with Spurs 3-nil up ... and West Ham scores three in the final 10 minutes and change ... and Bale had a chance to win at 3-2 ... Circus of a Premier League weekend ...
First free Friday night after the longest season in NBA history could only mean ... first 10 episodes of @CobraKaiSeries #neededit Thank you @WilliamZabka and @ralphmacchio!
Never expected a cagey 1-nil in this one for Saturday brunch but looks like a five-point Saturday in the end ... @edersonmoraes93 MOTM
Update to @NYTSports’ coverage of GM Daryl Morey’s decision today to step down from the Rockets ...
Jeff Van Gundy remains a co-finalist in Houston and was still talking to the Rockets today after their initial interview Wednesday But Lucas, league sources say, has at least three key admirers in the organization: James Harden, Russell Westbrook and new Rockets GM Rafael Stone
John Lucas’ bid to land the Rockets’ job, which @NYTSports reported last week was gaining steam, has gathered even more momentum, league sources say
The Clippers’ hiring of Ty Lue gives the NBA eight active coaches with at least one championship: Lue Lakers’ Frank Vogel Dallas’ Rick Carlisle Golden State’s Steve Kerr Miami’s Erik Spoelstra Philadelphia’s Doc Rivers San Antonio’s Gregg Popovich Toronto’s Nick Nurse
Glorious video from 10/10/1996: @SHAQ debut with the Lakers ... untouchable, inimitable CHICK saying @cedceballos as only he could ... Hawaii's Klum Gym recording the first KO-BE, KO-BE chant in the pros ... and I was fortunate enough to hold the @ladailynews' press-row seat
In his ninth season, reminiscent of Steve Nash's MVP leap in Year 9, Jimmy Butler went toe-to-toe with LeBron in the NBA Finals and enhanced his rep more than anyone in Bubble The online edition of the @nytimes On Basketball newsletter is an ode to Jimmy:
In his ninth season, Steve Nash became an MVP In Jimmy Butler's ninth season he did it his way, emerging as a top-10 player and outdueling LeBron James and Anthony Davis twice on the NBA Finals stage This week's @nytimes On Basketball newsletter: My ode to Mr. Hard To Handle 
The Rockets interviewed Clippers assistant Ty Lue on Monday -- Lue is also being pursued by the Clippers and New Orleans -- and Rockets assistant coach John Lucas is expected to interview for the Houston vacancy after Van Gundy
The Rockets have scheduled an interview Wednesday with ESPN's Jeff Van Gundy for their coaching vacancy, league sources say
Former Sixers coach Brett Brown announced today that he has stepped down as coach of Australia's national team
Training camp 1996 ... man
Among my fave quotes #thisseason came from the Wizards’ Ian Mahinmi, who heard all that would/could/did go wrong with an unprecedented Disney isolation zone and noted: “Whatever you want to say, it’s better to be in the bubble than outside the bubble” In 2020? Who could argue?
Bubble Wrap: Putting a bow on the longest, most tumultuous season in NBA history for @NYTSports with tales from a 380-day slog like no other ... and a look ahead to what’s next 
Working on the last piece of the 2019-20 NBA season ... on Oct. 12 #thisleague #thisbubble #thisyear
Full Finals MVP balloting result ...
LeBron James won NBA Finals MVP by a unanimous vote of 11-0
On Day 380 of the season ... On Day 96 of the NBA Bubble ... The Lakers are holding the Larry O'Brien Trophy
He's never gonna be everyone's GOAT, but ring No. 4 -- with his third different franchise -- takes LeBron James to a new level It's really just Bron and MJ now and that, in itself, is monumental
Miami gonna lose these Finals in six games ... but I still say @JimmyButler won The Bubble as much as any individual force could
Happiest place on Earth this summer and fall? No ... Disney World cannot claim that Safest place in the United States? Quite possibly so
More than three months after teams started arriving on July 7 ... we're heading to the final 12 minutes of NBA Bubble Ball at Walt Disney World
LeBron James is a quarter and change away from being crowned as the first NBA Finals MVP on three different teams ...
If the Lakers can hold a 28-point halftime lead: Dwight Howard will win his first championship ring and Frank Vogel will become the league’s seventh active coach with a title on his resume ...
Bam and Dragic are out there but scarcely resemble their normal selves when a weary Jimmy badly needs 'em The Lakers are playing their fiercest D of the Finals and have four scorers rolling on a closeout night instead of wondering if they'll see a No. 3 Add it up and yup: 64-36
Rajon Rondo's Bubble life began with a suggestion that his hotel room had Motel 6 vibes He's off to a 4-for-4 start for a quick 9 points in Game 6 of the NBA Finals
Update: We're up to Day 380, for those of you scoring at home, since the Lakers held media day on Sept 27, 2019
Jimmy Butler extended these Finals long enough for the Heat to see both Bam Adebayo and Goran Dragic return from injuries ... as pretty much no one expected
As-it-happens coverage of Game 6 of the NBA Finals from @NYTSports is just a click away here:
Injuries ruin sport ...
One more time since my guy @hmfaigen posted such a nice collage ... The link to my @NYTSports piece on @mroctober Reggie Jackson devoting a good bit of his October to watching @KingJames chase his first fall championship:
Tyronn Lue has arrived in Houston, per this video from @MarkBermanFox26 League sources say Lue and the Rockets will formally meet Monday to discuss Houston's coaching vacancy
Danny Green's grace and calm ... on top of playing hurt without EVER talking about it ... why are we like this?
Latest buzz in NBA coaching circles: Golden State's Mike Brown made a strong impression on the Clippers in his interview and is an emerging candidate with LA. Ty Lue, scheduled to meet with Houston early next week, was widely billed as the early favorite to succeed Doc Rivers
Another Bubble gem from my guy @ScottCacciola ... who is apparently just warming up
Look at that look the Lakers ended up with. Seriously ...
Next season might not start until February. Not turning down another game ...
LeBron cashes six 3s in a closeout game, rumbles for 40/13/7, has to stay in the Bubble for at least two more nights #thisleague
Man, Philly ...
Seven players, six score in double figures, Heat win Game 5. Toughest team we've seen in a long time ...
The load Butler has to carry right now ... running Miami's whole show ... And guarding LeBron most possessions ... And it might not be enough because, well, LeBron
The Heat have played seven players and appear to be fading. Struggling to generate an easy look now ... and missing Goran Dragic badly
The enjoyment one suspects Jimmy "Big Face Coffee" Butler would get from extending this series after an all-day Lakers coronation is ... significant But LeBron James has countered Butler's 17 points in the first half of Game 5 with 21. Heat lead down to 50-47 as halftime nears
The Lakers say Anthony Davis is available to return ... and he's checking back in
Game No. 171 of the NBA Bubble is underway ...
You're looking LIVE ... At Day No. 378 of the 2019-20 NBA season ...
"I don't feel tardy" ... Soundtrack of the week in honor of Eddie Van Halen
Because it is a closeout opportunity for LA, @SopanDeb and I will do an @NYTSports Live Briefing all night: But @RealMikeWilbon raised a wise warning when he noted all the Laker talk in the @SportsCenter intro made it already sound like the post-game show
Asked Google the other day and it said the Lakers have won 17 championships when they still have only 16. It apparently still says that Would think this is decent bulletin-board stuff as Miami tries to extend the NBA Finals in a Game 5 that (checks notes) starts in two hours
On @SportsCenter with @stephenasmith, @MagicJohnson pinpoints an ace on LeBron's resume: "Michael (Jordan) didn't have this type of pressure, I didn't have this type of pressure, Larry Bird didn't ..." Magic said only @kaj33 could relate to the expectations Young LeBron faced
The Mavericks' Kristaps Porzingis has undegone surgery to repair a meniscus tear in his right knee, according to the team
Goon, @malika_andrews, @ChrisBHaynes, @BenGolliver, @MarcJSpears and @GwashburnGlobe ... Bubble scribes going wire to wire ... Chapeau!
LeBron James will try to clinch his first-ever October championship tonight. @mroctober Reggie Jackson will be watching. Here is the @NYTSports link to my column on Reggie’s fandom ... and a SportsFriday cover to savor from my fellow 716er @annakhyzy
Interesting find from February by the relentless @netsdaily: Nets owner Joe Tsai donated nearly $4 million to China's COVID relief NBA contributions were among the factors China's state broadcaster CCTV cited in announcing Game 5 would be aired in China after a yearlong NBA ban
Ty Lue is scheduled to interview with the Rockets early next week for Houston's coaching vacancy, league sources say Also expected in Houston in the near future: Interviews for current Rockets staffer John Lucas and ESPN's Jeff Van Gundy (who calls Game 5 of the Finals tonight)
CCTV's refusal to show NBA games in the wake of a tweet on Oct. 4, 2019, by Houston Rockets GM Daryl Morey in support of pro-democracy protesters in Hong Kong lasted one year and one day
China's national broadcaster CCTV announced today that it will show Game 5 of the NBA Finals after a season-long ban on showing NBA games ... citing the league's assistance to China in fighting COVID-19 for lifting the ban
Like all other awards, voting was based on where the NBA was when play was halted March 11 Unlike all others, EOY voting is the only NBA award in which the candidates do their own voting Still a bit stunning to see Rob Pelinka finish seventh after acquiring Anthony Davis ...
Full NBA Executive of the Year balloting ...
The Clippers’ Lawrence Frank gets 10 out of 29 first-place EOY votes from his peers, finishing ahead of Oklahoma City’s Sam Presti and Miami’s Pat Riley
The Clippers' Lawrence Frank has been named NBA Executive of the Year
The former @WNBA star Cappie Pondexter has been reported as a missing person and @TheWNBPA has joined the call for help in trying to find her ...
Lakers switching to their Mamba jerseys for Game 5, says chronicler of all jersey matters @ByTimReynolds
This one even got the @ClutchPointsApp treatment ...
A big part of October 2020 for @mroctober Reggie Jackson is watching LeBron James chase his first-ever championship in October. The online edition of the @nytimes weekly On Basketball newsletter connects with Reggie to discuss his @KingJames fandom:
Pretty dang tough shot on the baseline for a 20-year-old who may or may not be a bucket depending on whom you ask ...
If this looks and feels like Day 375 of the NBA season ... that's only because it is
Asked LeBron yesterday about his gas tank after he initially expressed so much concern about abruptly stopping and restarting a season that has now stretched into October ... He insisted he was in "great shape" ... but only now are we starting to see some zip from him in Game 4
The Kings and Alvin Gentry have an agreement to bring the ex-Pelicans coach to Sacramento, league sources add Philadelphia sought Gentry for the same role on Doc Rivers' staff but the Kings are poised to soon announce Gentry's hiring after he worked with Walton in Golden State
The Kings are closing in on the hiring of former Pelicans coach Alvin Gentry to join Luke Walton's staff in Sacramento as associate head coach, league sources say
Watching Game 4 on mute with Eddie solos on loop ...
True game-changer. #RIP
LeBron James is chasing his first championship in October and can count someone as synonymous with this month as Halloween among his biggest fans: Reggie Jackson The latest @nytimes On Basketball newsletter featues @mroctober and how much he enjoys watching @KingJames play:
Tyronn Lue has completed sitdowns with the Clippers and the Pelicans about their coaching openings ... and Lue's interview for the Rockets' coaching vacancy, league sources say, will now take place this week after it was moved from the weekend
People really aren't supposed to tell their son's fantasy sob stories #onhere ... right?
Miami's Bam Adebayo (neck strain) has been upgraded to questionable for Tuesday night's Game 4 of the NBA Finals The Heat's Goran Dragic (left foot) said earlier today the chances were "low" he will be cleared for Game 4. There will be two days off before Friday's Game 5
Fullerton 2, Astros 0
Goran Dragic (foot) calls it a "low percentage" he will be cleared to play in Tuesday night's Game 4 of the NBA Finals
Lucas served as the Rockets' player development coach on Mike D'Antoni's staff for the past four seasons and has strong working relationships with Rockets star guards James Harden and Russell Westbrook
John Lucas is an emerging candidate in the Rockets' search for a new head coach, league sources say
"Home" teams have improved to 40-40 in The Bubble with that Game 3 Heat win
We have a Finals ...
Man, Philly ...
Jimmy Butler and his triple-double masterpiece bidding to scuttle NBA Finals travel plans like we haven't seen since the Sonics forced a Game 6 from 3-0 down in 1996
Jimmy Buckets wrenched his ankle badly in Game 1, played brilliantly in Game 2 and took it up two or three notches tonight as Miami clings to a 5-point lead heading into the fourth quarter of Game 3 ... with no Bam and no Dragic. I was kidding before. It ain't the coffee
Jimmy had some coffee pregame ...
The Heat announce no Bam Adebayo (neck) and no Goran Dragic (foot) in tonight's Game 3 of the NBA Finals
Was pretty despondent yesterday and now, after Upsidedown Sunday, suddenly grateful for a point at Elland Road against swashbuckling Leeds
Spurs score I’ve seen before so I figured that one was right ...
Something's wrong with Twitter. It says Villa ran up a touchdown on Liverpool ...
The Lakers' 2-0 start in these NBA Finals has hiked the playoff record of "home" teams in the Bubble to 39-40 ...
RAJON Rondo on Anthony Davis: "I expect him to get 50 every night"
Haslem's Heat have cut the deficit to 9 as the fourth quarter draws near
Judging by this response ... UD should be getting a look for some of these coaching jobs
Saving that whole Ted Lasso series for next week ... when we need it
Finals MVP gonna be some vote ...
Lakers missed 16 of their last 18 3s in Game 1 Missed the first five 3s tonight until that LeBron make
Adam Silver on @NBATV: "Nobody's tested positive who lives on this campus, but we've had positive tests in our vicinity ... We still have another week or so to go before we can really say we did it. Every night ... I am sort of (braced) for that call to say, 'We have an issue' "
Del Harris, who took the Houston Rockets to the 1981 NBA Finals after a 40-42 regular season and also coached the Bucks and Lakers, will be named today as the Chuck Daly Lifetime Achievement Award winner by the @NBA_Coaches. See @ESefko below with a look at Harris' storied career
Epic Bubble photo from my former neighbor @MarcJSpears ... used to walk in circles in that garden, day after day after day, trying to unlock Bubble writer's block and dodging heckles from other writers
The Heat say Goran Dragic (left foot) and Bam Adebayo (MRI revealed a neck strain) are doubtful for Friday's Game 2 of the NBA Finals
On the NBA's fast-moving coaching carousel ... The growing belief in league circles is that Doc Rivers has swiftly supplanted Mike D'Antoni as the favorite for the Philadelphia job ... With Ty Lue ranking as the early favorite to replace Rivers with the Clippers
Asked about guarding against a Game 2 letdown, LeBron James tells the story of the Heat losing a fall-from-ahead Game 2 to Dallas in the 2011 Finals: "That shit burns me to this day," Bron says
Goran Dragic's status for the rest of the NBA Finals remains TBD, according to a league source, after he sustained a plantar tear in his left foot. A return in this series has not yet been ruled out
The Lakers missed 16 of their last 18 3-pointers ... but more crucially made 13 of their first 20 in rolling up a 32-point lead All the ups and downs of Game 1 of the NBA Finals are here in @NYTSports' live briefing:
Heat about to slice a 32-point deficit to 12 ... FWIW
HALFTIME report: Dieting was easier in the Bubble (Spelling, too)
Four rounds into these playoffs ... Sentra compromise commercial still feels like a reach
Laker bench having a night AND they've drained 9 of 15 3s ... neither bodes well for the East champs
Silver, though, acknowledged that there have been an undisclosed number of positive tests among the estimated 6,500 workers that have gone in and out of the Bubble to work on the NBA's restricted-access campus
Adam Silver: "We have had zero cases" of Covid-19 among players ...
The next NBA season, Adam Silver says tonight, would start on Christmas at the earliest but "more likely January"
Adam Silver's initial feelings about the NBA Bubble in May: "I resisted it, frankly"
The full lists distributed by the NBA, featuring both individuals and the top 10 teams, to break down jersey and merchandise sales during the league’s restart ...
NBA Bubble jersey sales: 1. LeBron James 2. Luka Doncic 3. Anthony Davis 4. Jayson Tatum 5. Giannis A. 6. Stephen Curry 7. Kevin Durant 8. Damian Lillard 9. Kawhi Leonard 10. Jimmy Butler 11. Kemba Walker 12. Kyrie Irving 13. Russell Westbrook 14. Nikola Jokic 15. Ja Morant
As Game 1 in the NBA Finals draws near, here is your online edition of the @nytimes weekly On Basketball newsletter: Draymond @Money23Green shares his Finals pick and discusses his broadcasting ambitions as well as the @warriors’ long-term outlook:
As the NBA Finals begin, our man @ScottCacciola speaks to Draymond @Money23Green, @JaredDudley619, @realtuffjuice, @TheRealMoBamba and @JeramiGrant to trace the arc and discuss all the various chapters of an NBA season like no other ...
Would NOT want to be writing the deadline gamer off this one ...
Thank you @PompeyOnSixers ... Ty Lue got his Sixers interview today
The youth of today, they say, don't watch live TV Let's hope ...
Do they shake hands at the end of #thisdebate?
Not even NBA Twitter prepares you for a night like this ...
Also in this week’s edition: What do Jamal Murray @BeMore27 and Rod Strickland have in common? We explore ... Nearly half of the 20 teams to exit the NBA Bubble have already made a coaching or front office change. We explore that, too ...
Just in time for the debate ... The online edition of the @nytimes weekly On Basketball newsletter is out early! Draymond @Money23Green shares his NBA Finals pick and discusses his broadcasting ambitions as well as the @warriors’ long-term outlook:
The NBA Finals, for the first time in six years, are starting without the @warriors This week's @nytimes On Basketball newsletter visits with Draymond @Money23Green on the new stage he found this postseason, his broadcasting ambitions and why he says Golden State will be back:
Kevin Durant has launched his own podcast and has an interesting first guest: Nets teammate Kyrie Irving
The Lakers finished 10th in the West last season The Heat finished 10th in the East last season
Mavericks owner Mark Cuban indeed picked up former Maverick Delonte West earlier today and helped reunite West with a family member, league sources say. West had been photographed on his own last week in Dallas as the @TMZ report notes
Rivers' playoff failures can't be overlooked but teams don't typically walk away from leaders like that. They are hard to find and that's why Doc will get another job as soon as he's ready. In the interim: Doc will go down as one of the most enduring spokesman of the NBA Bubble
Doc Rivers publicly invited the blame after the Clippers blew a 3-1 lead to Denver ... but it's still difficult to process that he lost his job 13 days later no matter how much blame he actually deserves The reason: Doc, as a leader of men, is an undisputed upper-echelon coach
Clippers assistant Ty Lue will obviously be a candidate to replace Doc Rivers in LA, remains in the hunt for the Philadelphia job -- although Mike D'Antoni is widely considered the favorite -- and Lue has also received support for the Houston job, league sources say
ESPN's Jeff Van Gundy, about to broadcast the NBA Finals, is suddenly a candidate for two coaching vacancies Van Gundy has admirers with the Clippers (most notably Lawrence Frank) as well as Houston (Daryl Morey wanted JVG in 2016 and Tilman Fertitta is also said to be a fan)
It's official: Jamie @vardy7 is Michael Jordan when he plays @ManCity Also: Can't wait to see who digs up the stat on the last time City conceded three penalties because even in the dark days of the '90s I can't remember sinking to the depths of that kind of hat trick
No left-footer has ever hit a ball with his right foot better than Mahrez just did ...
The Nuggets and Inside The NBA are exiting the playoffs tonight. Won't be the same Bubble without them ...
No one has won Finals MVP with three different franchises. LeBron has that chance now ...
The Los Angeles Lakers , for the first time since 2010, are in the NBA Finals ... One year to the day they held their media day to start the season
To LEAD three different franchises to NBA titles You're all right about Big Shot Robert Horry
LeBron James will soon have the opportunity to be the first NBA player to win championships with three different teams
Don't think they can get to 28 ... but you know what happens every time "the media" says that
Lakers coach Frank Vogel says at his pre-game press briefing that Anthony Davis (ankle) will play in tonight's Game 5 against Denver
The Lakers have officially listed Anthony Davis (sprained left ankle) as questionable for Saturday's Game 5 against Denver
Oh how nice it would have been to get a Party All The Time question on a past show visit. Right in my wheelhouse ...
September 2019: Four Celtics played on a 12-man USA squad that finished seventh at the @FIBAWC ... and @Bam1of1 didn’t even make the team September 2020: They’re all vying for an NBA Finals berth ... with Adebayo starring in Miami’s surge to a 3-1 lead
Wow ... 20 years ago today: @mrvincecarter over F. Weis
LeBron on Jamal Murray: "One of the hottest guys that we have in the Bubble today"
Had to tweet NBA Twitter's favorite series score ...
Had to be a 3-1 series deficit for the Nuggets ...
PS -- Everyone in Buffalo is counting it as a Buffalo playoff berth no matter where the Buffalo Blue Jays' playoff games will actually be played. Trust me ...
Jamal Murray is Canada's new king and the Blue Jays are bringing playoff baseball to Buffalo
Orlando Dwight in the Bubble tonight ...
The story also explores how, one year ago at this time, Adebayo had just been cut from Team USA while four Celtics who did make the team — Kemba Walker, Jayson Tatum, Jaylen Brown and Marcus Smart — landed far short of glory. A redemptive Bubble for all:
For SportsFriday in the @nytimes: How Miami’s @Bam1of1 Adebayo recruited himself to Kentucky and, in the words of @UKCoachCalipari, also “created a position” in his third pro season to help @JimmyButler and the Heat to within one win of the NBA Finals ...
"You know what THAT means?" And, yes, Cal said "funzies"
Said Cal: "Every game we play (at Kentucky) is a Super Bowl. You know what means? Every shot matters. There's no shots for funzies. So guys walk into (the NBA) like they've been there ... like Tyler Herro, 20 years old, getting more minutes than anyone on Miami's team. He's 20!"
Spoke to @UKCoachCalipari tonight BEFORE Game 4 of the Eastern Conference finals and, while he didn't exactly predict 37 points for Miami's @raf_tyler, he did nothing to downplay Herro's readiness for the moment ... (1/2)
Former Rockets coach Mike D'Antoni and Clippers assistant coach Tyronn Lue remain top candidates for Philadelphia's coaching job, league sources say, after a third leading candidate -- former Thunder coach Billy Donovan -- took the Chicago job
The online edition of this week's @nytimes On Basketball newsletter ... featuring our conversation with @nyliberty star @sabrina_i20:
T-shirt worthy from Mike Malone: "For some reason we love The Bubble"
Like it when his teammates call him Yoke instead of Joker ...
The way a zone can suddenly just stone an NBA team is ...
Why did the Nuggets stop playing to read this tweet?
Why are the Nuggets better right after they take an absolute dagger?
The altitude of Orlando has finally kicked in: The Nuggets are up 18 entering the fourth quarter of Game 3 against the Lakers ... as we start to seriously ponder the stunning prospect of THREE straight home wins in this series
The @nytimes On Basketball newsletter, freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide, today realized a long-held ambition: Your newsletter curator, raised Stateside by Romanian parents, chats with the one and only @sabrina_i20 ... who rose to  and  stardom with Romanian parents 
The Bulls have announced Billy Donovan as their new head coach
The NBA’s goal for 2020-21, Silver said, remains playing a “standard season” ... meaning 82 games plus playoffs Silver, though, acknowledged to Costas that it will most likely be a 2021 season with no games played in 2020 after completion of the NBA Bubble schedule in October
NBA commissioner Adam Silver tells Bob Costas on @CNN that his “best guess” is that next season will begin in January at the earliest
Hate playing Wolves ... Traore scary every time he's running at you ... Nuno Espirito Santo ... absolutely top-shelf manager ... Hate playing Wolves
Looks glamorous in September ...
Cal State Fullerton edition ... #needthose
Jokic: "They have two really good, really good, really good players"
AD scored the Lakers’ last 10 points. Jokic had Denver’s last 12
Two big men going at it at the highest level ... #vintage
Nuggets better win this because it's hard to see LeBron having a crunch-time struggle like this again
That dunk (and the reaction it elicited) takes me back to January ... when Alex Caruso shared with @NYTSports that LeBron James has been known to refer to the Lakers’ No. 4 as, simply, GOAT:
Maybe the best thing Hojo has ever done ...
When a Falcons fold affects my son's fantasy team ... NOW it's a problem
It has to be tracked because, even though the conditions are obviously the same for everyone, it's such a telling reminder how different this postseason is compared to every other NBA postseason
"Home" teams in Boston Celtics playoff games: 0 for their last 12
First coaching job AND he gets @GarethBale11 back. Quite a month for @SteveNash ...
An American. 17 years old. Doing it in the Bundesliga ...
AND HODGSON!!!
For those who wish to pore over every single individual vote from NBA Awards Season ... here is your link:
The home team has a double-digit lead in the NBA playoffs #newsflash
Now that, Mr. Back-To-Back, is a most beautiful newspaper ...
Giannis on his future with the Bucks: Provided that “everybody’s on the same page” in the organization in “fighting every single day” for a championship ... “I don’t see why not to be in Milwaukee for the next 15 years”
Full MVP voting results ...
The NBA is announcing the 2019-20 MVP today at 2 PM ET
The Kings officially name Houston's Monte McNair as their new GM ... Joe Dumars, after a stint as interim EVP of basketball operations, is named Sacramento's new chief strategy officer
No one has ever called me cutting edge ... but at least now I can claim one @wirecutter byline Enjoyed reliving some of my Bubble experience by breaking down the essential gadgetry that kept me functional while living in the NBA's village at Disney World:
The strong rumble in the Bubble was that Toronto was closing in on new long-term deals for president of basketball operations Masai Ujiri and GM Bobby Webster as well as coach Nick Nurse ... Nurse's new deal was announced Tuesday ... now we await extensions for Ujiri and Webster
No games tonight, but we are past the midpoint of the NBA playoffs. With no shortage of skeptics initially -- me very much included -- it's more than 70 days of operation and counting for the NBA Bubble
The online edition of this week's @NYTimes On Basketball newsletter features an interview with @TaylorRooks, conducted by our @shauntellowe, on Taylor's coverage of the historic NBA restart:
Full All-NBA Team voting results for 2019-20 ...
All-NBA First Team ...
Man a lot happened tonight ...
Jokic: “Nobody wants us here.” #nottrue
There will be a new NBA Finals MVP: Kawhi Leonard’s Clippers are KO’d in Game 7 by the Denver Nuggets Denver moves to 6-0 in elimination games in The Bubble
Really didn’t get to see Prime Sabonis ... but so grateful we are treated to the nightly passing of Prime Skinny Jokic
The Nuggets are the Team of the Bubble so far ... Two comebacks from 3-1 down and big deficits in Game 5 in both series so far ... just tremendous fight when they had every justification to give in
Lawler’s Law: Denver 100, Clippers 80 #thisbubble
Reminder: After all the Clippers surrendered to acquire Paul George via trade, Kawhi Leonard can return to free agency after next season. Half of the Clippers’ guaranteed window with this group is on the brink of evaporating in the second round with an unraveling for the ages
The Clippers has to start this quarter well with Jokic on the bench. Narrator: They did not
They said this was an Anything Can Happen Bubble ... The Denver Nuggets are showing us
These Playoffs Are Different (CONT'): TENTH straight Celtics game this postseason that the team that listed as the home team lost the game.
The wrath unleashed by Team USA cutting Bam ... man As good a crunch-time block as you'll ever see
This is gonna be some series ...
Kemba. Then Jimmy Scrumptious OT
Tilman Fertitta says on @CNBC today that Daryl Morey's job as Rockets GM is safe and that Morey will pick Houston's next head coach
Shaun Livingston ... officially Golden State's new director of team affairs and player engagement
Also: Signups for the @nytimes On Basketball newsletter, as always, are only a click away ...
On a brief post-Bubble hiatus ... but the weekly @nytimes On Basketball newsletter never rests. Special edition freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide! Our NBA editor @shauntellowe spoke to my Bubble colleague @TaylorRooks about her momentous coverage of the Disney village:
The Raptors announce they have signed coach Nick Nurse to a multi-year contract extension
The Warriors have not just brought back Leandro Barbosa but, according to @ThompsonScribe, are also hiring Shaun Livingston to join their front-office team ...
The Warriors will name Barbosa a “player mentor coach”
Leandro Barbosa says he is retiring as an active player at age 37 to join the Warriors' coaching staff:
Zverev to be able to congratulate his buddy Thiem like that after a loss like THAT ... wow #sport
Worst second serve to save a match point in major history. Agony for whoever loses and maybe even for who wins
Statement from Rockets team owner Tilman Fertitta on Mike D’Antoni’s decision to pursue coaching jobs elsewhere:
Nikola Jokic: "I think the whole pressure is on them"
No altitude in Central Florida but the Nuggets clearly love The Bubble ...
Also think we've settled the debate about whether Skinny Jokic got too skinny. He's getting better the deeper Denver goes ...
Even if the Clippers win this series now, I'm sending this to @OldTakesExposed myself ... I did it in the last round and didn't learn. These Nuggets are un-write-off-able ... The Clippers, meanwhile, we're still waiting on them to play up to their potential -- in mid-September
There have been rumbles in coaching circles for weeks that the Rockets will strongly consider Jeff Van Gundy to replace Mike D’Antoni if they make a coaching change GM Daryl Morey, remember, had interest in rehiring Van Gundy when Houston hired D’Antoni instead in May 2016
The longest season in Rockets history -- literally and maybe figuratively as well -- is finally about to give way to an off-season with no easy (or inexpensive) fixes
Starting to look like an unwise idea to beat the Lakers in Game 1 ...
Haynes ...
There will be a new champion in the NBA this season ... Celtics 4, Raptors 3 Would-be home team wins zero games in this series
The Clippers will win this series, but they'll have to wait at least two more nights to secure the first conference finals berth in franchise history
The 3-1 Down Champions of the Bubble: Denver Nuggets
The league says "House had a guest in his hotel room over multiple hours on Sept. 8 who was not authorized to be on campus" The strict letter of Bubble law, remember, says no one on the NBA's Disney campus is supposed to let anyone in their room -- not teammates, coaches, etc.
Houston's Danuel House is out for the rest of the playoffs and has left the NBA Bubble ...
Sonny Allen was an offensive trendsetter who hatched the numbered fast break and had stints in the NBA, CBA and WNBA on top of all his college successes. #RIP to one of the true gentlemen of the game ...
The Grizzlies announced today that they have hired former MIT women's basketball coach Sonia Raman as an assistant coach for Taylor Jenkins' staff
In a Corner Office interview with our @dgelles, @TheNBPA executive director Michele Roberts says it is unlikely next season can begin in December but she does anticipate "some reopening of some arenas" at reduced capacity later in the season after starting with "division bubbles"
Can't believe those two Vika serves to finish that off ...
The Lakers' Phil Handy (former @McrGiants star) and Alex Caruso (City superfan) ...
The Chuckster just declared that the Rockets are "the Milwaukee Bucks of the West" ... better suited, in other words, to the regular season than the playoffs
Not at my house when this circus of a fourth quarter just had Rondo ooping off the board to LeBron ... and Inside is next ... and the @usopen is happening, too
Bron finds the City fan in the corner to finish it ...
Kevin Love ...
Sports ...
Not enough that he can shoot like he shoots ... @jj_redick gets @KDTrey5 to go deep on why signing with the Nets was so appealing on Redick's @OldManAndThree podcast ...
When P.J. Tucker was drafted, it was a "different" NBA and "being a 'tweener was terrible" Now? "Now I bask in that whole area of the unknown," Tucker tells @NYTSports My SportsThursday piece on the rugged Houston Rocket at the center of microball:
Give these teams two days off before Game 7 ... they deserve it
Best second OT shotmaking ever ... No ... I'm not gonna look it up to make sure that's true
Best September playoff game ... you know the rest
Our @SopanDeb on the @SteveNash introductory news conference with the Nets ...
The Nets will formally introduce Steve Nash as their new coach in an hour. All the ins and outs of the hire via the online edition of the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter are here:
Milwaukee's Giannis Antetokounmpo said it twice tonight to @ChrisBHaynes, forcefully shooting down the notion he would ask for a trade next season in the event the sides don't finalize a contract extension: “It’s not happening," Giannis told Haynes. "That’s not happening."
That time in New Orleans that I asked Rajon Rondo in 2018 about everyone calling him Playoff Rondo ... and Rondo telling @NYTSports: "I hate it."
Who takes a leisurely bath at the height of NBA free agent madness like the guy in the commercial about trading jerseys with a credit card? Been meaning to ask this the whole playoffs every time they say: "It's confirmed. He's packing up and heading to Los Angeles next season"
There are rival teams that believe Milwaukee will explore trading for Chris Paul -- complicated as that would be financially -- if Oklahoma City indeed makes CP3 available via trade. One more thing to track as the Bucks enter perhaps the most crucial offseason in team history ...
These Bucks will likely go down as the social justice champions of the NBA Bubble after the walkout they staged and the protests they sparked across all of sport. Tonight, though, brings a long, rough Disney World stay to a bitter end ... well shy of the NBA title they chased.
The Thunder make it official and announce they have parted ways with Billy Donovan ...
The latest @nytimes NBA newsletter, freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide, gets you ready for Wednesday’s introductory news conference for new Nets coach Steve Nash with a deep look at Brooklyn’s surprise hire ...
The Bucks will tonight play their first playoff game without Giannis Antetokounmpo in seven years ... computed, as always, by Reynolds
The first round of these playoffs had limited drama ... The second round is nightly madness
Would-be home teams are 3-9 in the second round of the NBA playoffs and headed for 3-10 thanks to the Celtics obliterating the Raptors in Game 5 ... in a series where the would-be home team is apparently destined to win zero games
The Yankees play in Buffalo tonight ... 9-year-old me never would have believed it and Old Me really can't, either #716
Crucial @ScottCacciola on a Game 2 win over Houston that the Lakers (and Rajon Rondo) needed ...
Beautiful farewell from Mannix ... Expertly captures what Bubble reporting is like -- especially early when 22 teams were on campus: "With three practice floors in the Coronado and teams shuffling in and out, a six-city trip through the NBA could be had in one afternoon."
Make that 2-9 in the second round of these NBA playoffs for teams in what were supposed to be home games ...
Herro ball all afternoon ...
Shooter's gym ...
The Nuggets say Nikola Jokic (right wrist) is questionable for Monday"s Game 3 against the Clippers
The right decision by the Bucks to hold Giannis Antetokounmpo (right ankle) for the rest of Game 4 ... and yet still stunning
Djokovic defaulted at a major ... Giannis injured ... one after another ... and it's all too much
Small Sample Size and all that, but teams that would have played in front of a home crowd under normal circumstances are 2-8 in second round of the NBA playoffs entering today's play ... This neutral-site Bubble seems to have helped make things "really open" (H/T @JCrossover)
The Bucks say Giannis Antetokounmpo is available for today's Game 4 ...
With 20 hours to tipoff, Giannis Antetokounmpo (ankle) is listed as questionable for Sunday's Game 4 of Bucks-Heat
And Sopan on the NBA's fall to seven non-white coaches in a league that is 80 percent Black ...
Excellent stuff from our guys @ScottCacciola and @SopanDeb. Here's Cacciola on the Bucks' plight ...
Road team is 6-2 in the second round of the NBA playoffs
Captain of the All-Lefty Team had himself a half: 25 points for James Harden
NBA teams that fall behind 3-0 in a best-of-seven playoff series are 0-139 ... That includes 0-3 at The Bubble ... where thoughts OF getting home, as LeBron James explained a week ago, tug at everyone
Friday night news dump: Milwaukee is down 3-0 to Miami in the second round of the playoffs ... with Giannis Antetokounmpo contract extension talks approaching sooner than anyone expected
The latest word as Game 1 nears is that Lakers vs. Rockets -- normally as big as it gets in China for the NBA -- will not be broadcast tonight via the country's official national broadcaster (CCTV) or Tencent. Rockets games, of course, have been banned from Chinese TV all season
Never, ever, ever thought any pictures taken by yours truly, given my serious limitations as a visual journalist, could A) make the @nytimes and B) spotlight my shot of a tiny lizard ... Thanks to my pal @zagatam and the magic of The Bubble ... this happened the morning I left:
Barcelona refuses to let Leo Messi leave even though he wants to ... Not the most surprising development
Got a little jealous of modern technology when my 14-year-old showed me the app that runs his fantasy football league and all the notifications he's getting during school hours ... but then I saw this collection of Tom Seaver highlights set to the "This Week In Baseball" theme
Kyle happy with himself with that "7-12 guy" line ... #thisleague
Home team can't buy a win in this series ...
Full ROY voting: Morant, Kendrick Nunn and Zion third
Memphis' Ja Morant was just named NBA Rookie of the Year
As What Up Beck would say ... #AbramsAlert
Lots in this thread ... turns out millions of people don't seem to mind watching hoop in a Bubble this summer
New Nets coach Steve Nash sounded out his longtime former teammate and close friend Dirk Nowitzki to gauge his interest in coming to Brooklyn as an assistant coach, @NYTSports has learned, but Nowitzki is not looking to return to the game full-time so early in his retirement
Shauntel way too kind here and for those asking why I am departing now: We have called in our ace Los Angeles-based closer, Vermont's own @ScottCacciola, to get the win (too many innings for a save) after he clears quarantine
On Day 54 ... Bubble exit and a conflicted farewell to Casita #4151:
Here is @NYTSports first story on the Nets’ blockbuster hiring of Steve Nash as their new coach:
Interim coach Jacque Vaughn was considered for the post, but league sources say Nets GM Sean Marks led a stealth pursuit of Nash that lured the two-time MVP to full-time coaching at age 46 after others had tried. @wojespn reports that Vaughn will stay on as a Nets assistant
The Nets have hired Hall of Fame point guard Steve Nash as their new head coach, @NYTSports has learned
Beyond how much he undoubtedly wanted to beat the team that traded him away in a Game 7, Chris Paul is obviously as invested in this restart as anyone given his role as NBPA president. Lakers/Rockets is a much-awaited series ... but it's hard to imagine this Bubble without CP3
The Rockets, by two points, just evicted their old friend Chris Paul ... Mayor of The Bubble Also: Houston is the Grand Floridian Resort &amp; Spa champion
Rockets win a Game 7 on a Harden blocked shot ... like we all said
Lu Dort is averaging 30.0 PPG in Game 7s
Olynyk and Herro were crouching nervously at the center circle like Jimmy had to put away a PK for the win ...
On the eve of my Bubble departure, it’s time to go deep on the good, bad and complicated of the past 53 days at Walt Disney World via the online edition of the @nytimes On Basketball newsletter —&gt;
Villanova's Jay Wright makes it clear in this school statement that he is NOT a candidate for the 76ers' coaching vacancy:
It's a $35,000 fine -- after his ejection -- for the Clippers' Marcus Morris for "recklessly striking" Dallas' Luka Doncic above shoulders in Game 6 of the teams' first-round series Doncic gets a $15,000 fine for throwing the ball of a referee's legs in the same game
Best last 10 seconds of a September playoff game in NBA history ...
A Game 7 in September is bound to look funky ...
Not sure Harden or Luka has that Somethingstep Rudy just hit Denver with ...
Gobert hanging one-hander to stay in the Bubble ...
Dame Lillard, remember, scored 61 points in a game in this Bubble We're not used to this ...
Joker ... great feet
I think Kemba enjoys the playoffs ...
For fast and instantaneous newsletter delivery direct to your inbox every Tuesday ... just click here: PS — Where are the good NBA Bubble emojis?
I am somehow down to less than 48 hours of Bubble time before @ScottCacciola takes over. The latest @nytimes On Basketball newsletter, freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide, goes deep on these last 52 days ... and lists all the things predictably sappy me already misses 
The Hall of Famer @AratonHj ... on the one and only John Thompson:
It's September and we're still not out of the first round?
Also on the line in Game 7: The right to be called champions of the Grand Floridian. Houston and OKC are the only two teams left at that property. The series winner, I'm told, has the right to join everyone else in the Gran Destino ... or stay put until the conference finals
Make that two Game 7s in the West: Denver vs. Utah on Tuesday night Houston vs. Oklahoma City on Wednesday night
Man, Philly ...
"This team is built for the Bubble," Udonis Haslem said the other day He was talking about Jimmy Butler as much as any Heater ...
Full ballot breakdown of the Most Improved Player voting won by New Orleans’ Brandon Ingram ...
Brandon Ingram has been named Most Improved Player in the NBA
Gotta feel like winning another championship ...
Statement from Michael Jordan on John Thompson’s passing: “Coach Thompson was a truly great man ... I admired and loved him dearly.”
My fellow Dallasite and former @SportsDayDFW teammate starts the long drive home today. Won’t be the same Bubble without Bubble Brad ...
Less than 15 minutes before Wednesday's tipoff, Giannis Antetokounmpo texted Michael Carter-Williams to tell him the Bucks were staging a one-game walkout. More here in collaboration with a slew of @nytimes colleagues on a week that shook the nation:
Coaching giant is really not enough to describe John Thompson ... Couldn’t take these off in high school because he and Patrick Ewing made Georgetown that important ... Basketball and the world lost again today. As @JCrossover so smartly said last week ... tired of typing RIP
Really want to a see a full-strength Canada someday with this Murray and Nick Nurse coaching ...
Gotta say it again: When Denver went down 15 early in the third quarter of Game 5, I thought that was it. To hear so many top players say since this weekend how much Bubble Life is wearing on them ... it makes the Nuggets' recovery to take this thing seven even more impressive
We will have one Game 7 in this round ... One more round of Murray vs. Mitchell, too
I miss the @usopen beyond words and still don't want to believe I'm not gonna be there somehow ... but luckily this @NYTSports US Open cover, uh, only makes me miss it more
The goodbyes teams are getting from @NBABubbleLife have given the @NBAonTNT Gone Fishin' gang some unexpected competition ...
Honored to join these @nytimes stalwarts for a look back at a week that shook the nation. My contribution: Orlando’s @mcarterwilliams takes us inside the scene and emotions after Giannis Antetokounmpo texted MCW to say the Bucks were staging a walkout:
Just did the math: Day 50 in The Bubble
That unpredictable NBA postseason many forecasted hasn't materialized yet ... The East's true top four teams combined to lose one game in the first round ... and I'm not sure Utah over Denver would be classified as a stunning upset Maybe the surprises start in Round 2
Luka falls just two points shy of his third 40-point game of the series ... but Dallas just didn't have enough against the deeper Clippers. Not with Kawhi in a Terminator zone ...
Official league statement ...
Dennis Schroder and PJ Tucker fined $25,000 each
Flagrant 2 and an ejection for the Clippers' Marcus Morris
Trey Burke (ankle) is also available for Dallas ... while Kristaps Porzingis (knee), as the Mavericks announced Friday, remains out for the rest of the series
Luka Doncic (ankle), Dorian Finney-Smith (hip) and Tim Hardaway Jr. (cervical strain) are officially available for the Mavericks today in Game 6 Patrick Beverley (calf) remains out for the Clippers
The Raptors say Kyle Lowry is available for today’s Game 1 against Boston after suffering a sprained left ankle in Game 4 of the Brooklyn series
CJ McCollum has never been an All-Star. The West is madness ...
The tweet that is saving Portland’s season (along with with lots of CJ McCollum) ...
The Blazers won their last five games at Yacht Club residents ... Without a fourth-quarter comeback -- with no Dame -- Portland drops to 0-4 since being moved into the Grand Floridian Resort &amp; Spa and will head home Sunday
It was a “challenging” return to basketball, to use Giannis Antetokounmpo’s word, for the team whose walkout shook all of sports. For SportsSunday in the @nytimes on the Bucks’ series-clincher over Orlando ... and being back in a familiar locker room:
Both teams on the floor at the AdventHealth Arena ... Magic at Bucks starting soon:
The NBA plans to pay tribute before today’s Milwaukee/Orlando Game 5 to Clifford Robinson, Lute Olson and Chadwick Boseman by observing silences in their honor ...
The Rockets have confirmed that Russell Westbrook is playing in tonight's Game 5 against Oklahoma City
Clifford Robinson was one of the original floor-spacing bigs ... captured in this photo, not surprisingly, by the seen-it-all @ADBPhotoInc
Clifford Robinson, former NBA All-Star and Sixth Man of the Year and a Buffalonian who became the inimitable Uncle Cliffy as a Portland Trail Blazer, gone at 53 #RIP
A statement on behalf of @BarackObama to @NYTSports on the advice he gave to some of the game's biggest names features in this @SopanDeb special on the re-resumption of the @NBA season at the Walt Disney World bubble:
Porzingis said after receiving treatment and playing in Game 2 that he has felt discomfort in the knee since Game 1 of the Mavericks’ first-round series ... full team statement enclosed:
The Mavericks announce that Kristaps Porzingis has been playing with a lateral meniscus tear in his right knee and have ruled him out for the remainder of their first-round series against the Clippers
The NBA’s schedule for playoff games Saturday and Sunday is out and official at last:
Joint statement from the @nba and the @TheNBPA to announce the official return of the NBA playoffs on Saturday ...
The NBA just announced games officially resume tomorrow
On Day 48 in The Bubble, my room was just freshened up with a first on this trip ... just the sort of Disney flourish that had to be documented:
The Bucks, heading to their first practice since refusing to play in a playoff game Wednesday, made the following statement: “As we return to the court today, our team focus will be on our overall performance and well-being. That said, we will not have media availability today”
Sound the #CacciolaAlert: Our man speaks to a Bucks expert -- Detroit's @Johnhenson31 -- for valuable insight on Henson's former team and how it took sports protest to a new level
Charlotte Hornets owner Michael Jordan will be part of this afternoon's discussions "to discuss next steps" about resuming the season in his role as the chairman of the NBA's Labor Relations Committee
The NBA has officially canceled all of today's playoff games and says it is still deciding whether to resume the playoffs Friday or Saturday
"In solidarity with our NBA family," Mavs say
The Mavericks just announced that Game 6 of their first-round series tonight against the Clippers has been officially postponed
Nearly 11 months later as September 2020 approaches -- after a shutdown of more than four months in response to the coronavirus outbreak -- 13 teams are still in a restricted access bubble at Disney World ... all awaiting direction today on the fate of the rest of the playoffs
The NBA season essentially began in October 2019 with the Lakers and Nets in a hotel in Shanghai, unsure if their two exhibition games in China would go ahead after a tweet by Rockets GM Daryl Morey in support of pro-democracy protesters in Hong Kong ...
The Blazers announce that Damian Lillard is leaving the NBA Bubble on Thursday to return to Portland for further examination of his injured right knee
First edition @NYTSports coverage of the Milwaukee Bucks’ extraordinary playoff boycott here tonight at the NBA Bubble ... with more to come as players from the 13 teams still here are scheduled to meet after 8 PM:
The Milwaukee Bucks — three hours and 22 minutes after they were scheduled to play Orlando this afternoon in a first-round playoff game — have left the AdventHealth Arena to return to their team hotel at Walt Disney World
Bucks owners just issued a statement in support of their players:
The NBA just postponed today's three playoff games
Roughly 100 family members and friends of NBA players whose teams are still in the Bubble, I'm told, are currently in quarantine and poised to move onto the NBA campus starting this weekend. There are 13 teams still here ... with Orlando and Portland facing elimination tonight
A needed smile today ...
This week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter in online form ... featuring the Luka Latest, updates on Jamal Crawford’s future, all the fresh chatter from the NBA coaching carousel and the very in-demand Ty Lue, plus Seth Curry vs. Doc Rivers:
Nick Nurse says Kyle Lowry (sprained left ankle) did not practice today on the eve of Thursday's Game 1 against Boston
Raptors coach Nick Nurse says a potential boycott that has been discussed jointly by Toronto and Boston players for Thursday's Game 1 of their second-round series "is on the table" ... but Nurse also acknowledged that the players are discussing other measures as well
Every single first-round series at The Bubble has missed or lost at least one high-profile player due to an injury suffered here in Florida ... and it can't be forgotten that Indiana sustained one of the biggest losses when Domantas Sabonis (plantar fasciitis) went down
Make it four major NBA figures (and counting) who have lost jobs immediately after their team was eliminated from The Bubble: Kings GM Vlade Divac Pelicans coach Alvin Gentry Sixers coach Brett Brown And now Pacers coach Nate McMillan
The Pacers, after extending Nate McMillan's contract, have now fired McMillan after Indiana's first-round sweep inflicted by Miami
I know I'm supposed to be locked into Clippers/Mavs ... but 
Newsletter jinx, two Tuesdays running, is in peak Committee of One midseason form ...
Major props to Denver. When they went down 15 early in the third, some of us (guilty) may have believed that the the lure of a flight out of the Bubble tomorrow would be too strong. Still here after lots of Jamal Murray and a Joker dagger ...
Here are the full DPOY voting results ...
Giannis Antetokounmpo beats out Anthony Davis and Rudy Gobert for the NBA's Defensive Player of the Year award
The Rockets have listed Russell Westbrook (quad strain) as OUT for Wednesday's Game 5 against Oklahoma City
Portland has ruled Damian Lillard OUT of Wednesday's Game 5 against the Lakers with a sprained right knee
Freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide: The Luka Latest ... Jamal Crawford's present and future ... Coaching Carousel chatter ... Seth Curry vs. Doc Rivers ... and of course more Inside The Bubble tales ... All found in the latest edition of the @nytimes NBA newsletter 
Nets guard Jamal Crawford tells @NYTSports he indeed hopes to play again next season at age 41 ... with more from @JCrossover and further chatter from inside the NBA Bubble forthcoming in the latest @nytimes On Basketball newsletter bound for inboxes worldwide later today ...
Kyle Lowry did not practice today, Raptors coach Nick Nurse says Lowry is considered day-to-day with a sprained left ankle as Thursday's Game 1 against Boston in Round 2 approaches
Dallas' Kristaps Porzingis (knee) has been listed as OUT for tonight's Game 5 against the Clippers
To follow The Last Dance, I'm told that the league will soon announce a new 10-part podcast series -- Beyond The Last Dance --- co-hosted by former Bulls beat writer @jadande and Michael Jordan's former teammate @bjarmstrong for NBA Entertainment and @audible_com
Damian Lillard will undergo a second MRI on his injured right knee later today. The @trailblazers announced early this morning that the post-game results of Lillard’s first MRI were inconclusive
The Lakers have re-established their defense in a big way these past three games -- huge boost for their prospects going forward -- but another Dame Lillard injury (now a knee after the dislocated finger) is a depressing turn
The classiest of farewells to Philadelphia from Brett Brown:
The Sixers, after returning to Philadelphia today, have announced the firing of Brett Brown as coach after seven seasons as widely expected
Figueroa Street in downtown Los Angeles, between Olympic and Martin Luther King, is being renamed Kobe Bryant Boulevard according to @HerbJWesson of the LA City Council
The Raptors say Kyle Lowry has a sprained left ankle ... with no specific timetable released yet on his status as Thursday's Game 1 against Boston approaches
The Magic have ruled Aaron Gordon (hamstring) and Michael Carter-Williams (foot) out of today's Game 4 against Milwaukee
More West madness: Players who score 50 are 1-2 in this Utah/Denver series
Lakers lose Game 1 and then Dame Time dislocates a finger Kawhi 2, Luka 2 Utah zooms to a 3-1 lead after getting 57 from Donovan Mitchell in Game 1 and dropping that one in OT Rockets, on the brink of going up 3-0, get hauled back to 2-1 by OKC and their old friend Chris Paul
Every first-round series in the West has been a bit ... wild "I want this s---," Donovan Mitchell just announced after splashing a big wing 3
The Sixers and Nets, for the record, are spending their last night at the NBA Bubble tonight before the teams return to Philly and Brooklyn on Monday after their first-round eliminations
Celtics-Raptors Game 1 is Thursday ... NBA wasting no time to get the second round started
That one really was the best August game in NBA history ....
On one leg ...
Kawhi on Luka ... nine ticks left
The Reggie Jackson-switch-on-Luka-switch ... suboptimal 40 for Doncic ... Clippers down two with 19 seconds left and, based on recent history, Kawhi probably has an answer
Ridiculous game ...
Bubblicious crunch time ... Lotsa Luka ... Peak Kawhi ... both benches chirping incessantly ... Lucky to be in here right now ...
No team in the West was better suited to guard Doncic than the Clips ... and still 77 just does things 21-year-olds aren't supposed to do
Porzingis is a late scratch for the Mavericks after battling right knee soreness since Game 1
The Philadelphia 76ers, without the injured Ben Simmons, are the first team eliminated from the NBA's first-ever Bubble Playoffs
Dallas' Kristaps Porzingis is out for Game 4 with knee soreness
Luka Doncic starts for the Mavs ...
The Mavs say Luka Doncic is playing in today's Game 4
Mavericks coach Rick Carlisle says the decision on Luka Doncic playing in today's Game 4 will be "in the next 30 to 40 minutes"
The Clippers' Patrick Beverley (calf) will miss his third game in a row, Doc Rivers announces
Gonna be a very somber start to Week 8 at the NBA Bubble: Kobe Bryant would have turned 42 today ... And the @Hoophall Class of 2020 -- starring Kobe, Timmy and KG -- was scheduled to be inducted this coming Saturday before ceremonies were postponed by the ongoing pandemic 
Three 3-0 leads in the Eastern Conference first round and the only series favorite that does not have one is ... Milwaukee
Indy, of course, has to extend its series with Miami long enough for Sabonis to get out of quarantine and rejoin the Pacers
Big news for the Pacers: Domantas Sabonis is on his way back to The Bubble ...
For all that’s new and strange here, injury losses remain an unavoidable feature of the NBA playoffs ... On seven season-ending injuries in six weeks at The Bubble — before the hard-luck setbacks for Dame and Luka — for SportsSaturday in the @nytimes:
Nick Nurse was coaching the Manchester Giants (@McrGiants) in England when @iwhittell took me to watch him 20 years ago. Nurse has a ring and a Coach of the Year trophy in his first two seasons as an NBA head coach ... and here's more on his career arc from @NYTSports in April:
Toronto’s Nick Nurse beats out Milwaukee’s Mike Budenholzer and Oklahoma City’s Billy Donovan in media voting for NBA Coach of the Year ...
Nick Nurse was just named NBA Coach of the Year on TNT
Kawhi is just monstrous when he's right. Immense ... How the Raptors did what they did this season after losing a player like that. Immense ...
Mavs make it official and say Luka is done for the evening
Doncic just checked himself out
Luka out to start the fourth quarter ...
Luka Doncic (left ankle sprain) is available to return
Championship Chuck ... That's the tweet
Since the Sixers are on the floor as we speak — with Joel Embiid rolling — allow me to share this anecdote from @NYTSports’ injuries story about crossing paths in The Bubble with Embiid at his best ... before Philly lost Ben Simmons and its Disney stay took such a downbeat turn:
Mannix is a marvel ... bubbling all week ... posting up in the good Bubble spots before I can get there ... and then on Fridays and Saturdays he finds a boxing gear from somewhere
The Clippers' Patrick Beverley out for Game 3 tonight against Dallas, Doc Rivers says
Zach Collins is the fifth player to suffer a season-ending injury in The Bubble ... it's seven in six weeks if Ben Simmons and Domantas Sabonis are done as well For @NYTSports: How fears of increased injury risk at the NBA restart are proving prophetic -&gt;
Jazz could have been up 3-0, America
The ol' Power Rankings jinx might still have some juice left ... Denver has completely unraveled since Tuesday's love Dropping Houston to No. 9 because of the Russ injury only fueled the Rockets Utah got over wasting Donovan Mitchell's 57 points in Game 1 ... emphatically
Congrats to the ace lefty @kurtstreeter ... who loves doubles as much as me and, of far greater consequence, is the new Sports of The Times columnist for @NYTSports ...
Lakers' Game 2 win left four of eight first-round series at 2-0 ... Much curiosity bubbles here surrounding how much fight is forthcoming from the four teams down 2-0 -- Nets, Sixers, Pacers and Thunder -- with no change of scenery and home-court bump to help shift momentum
Greatly enjoyed joining my pals @ByJamesWagner, @christophclarey, @RorySmith and @JohnBranchNYT for this @readercenter Times Insider piece to share some tales about the vantage points and surroundings as we cover our sports in these pandemic times ...
Damian Lillard said tonight that he intends to play in Saturday night's Game 3
Dislocated left index finger for Damian Lillard in a game that the Blazers were already getting routed ... just a dispiriting development after days of fun and success for eighth-seeded Portland
Big week for Wolves President @GerssonRosas: First @BlackBerry announces a new phone for 2021 on Wednesday ... Minnesota wins the NBA Draft Lottery on Thursday
Minnesota wins the NBA Draft Lottery ... Golden State lands at No. 2
Leaning into Eight Is Enough ...
Suns no longer the hottest team in The Bubble ... Knicks (gulp) slide to No. 8 ... two spots ahead of No. 10 Phoenix
Friday: @mikiebarb and The Daily visit the NBA Bubble ...
The Orlando Magic ... they don't go away at their home away FROM home
Don’t think the Lakers are alone in saying that, for teams that always play the late games, there’s a grind attached that isn’t as grindy as traveling but challenging nonetheless ... and ditto for teams that have keep playing early
The Jazz list Mike Conley as PROBABLE for Friday's Game 3 against Denver
Maybe start NBA Free Agency on Christmas if the beginning of next season, as many expect, has to be pushed into January or February ... Fitting, perhaps, for what already ranks as one of the most festive events on the calendar
Playoff Jimmy makes his 3s
Did not foresee the Mavs having to put a playoff game in Trey Burke’s hands when they struck a deal with him in late June ... but it has been one of bargain signings of the season. Took foul trouble, on top of Luka’s foul trouble, to slow him down
From the NBA Bubble in Central Florida, where “anybody could get upset” in the words of Stephen Curry, these were the @NYTSports Bubble Power Rankings entering Tuesday’s play ... before the Bucks and the Lakers got decked by Game 1 haymakers:
Like @Dame_Lillard last night, our @ScottCacciola goes deep with this Game 1 column on Portland’s upset of LeBron and the Lakers, talking to Dame Time’s former college backcourt mate @scottbamforth about the Player of the NBA Bubble so far ...
From February ... My @NYTSports story on how the @Timberwolves couldn't have acquired D'Angelo Russell without president of basketball operations @GerssonRosas' BlackBerry:
Early AM thunderbolt for @BlackBerry devotees ... multiple NBA GMs (and at least one stubborn scribe) among them: After fresh fears of extinction in February, a new licensing deal revealed today means a new 5G phone fueled by the unmatched BB keyboard is coming in 2021!
The hoop madness started like 12 hours ago and is still going if you're watching Inside ...
The eight teams that were not invited to the NBA Bubble will be allowed to hold voluntary workouts in their home markets from Sept. 14 through Oct. 6:
Tonight is the Lakers' first playoff game in seven years ... in mid-August ... in a gym with no fans at a centralized NBA campus Felt like a special occasion. So .... @NYTSports Bubble Power Rankings: Entering Tuesday BEFORE Milwaukee's Game 1 disaster
PS -- I really want to try that coffee
Jimmy Butler's first two 3s since March 2 .... gotta be the coffee
Milwaukee already got dropped to No. 2 after it was noted by the Committee that the Bucks "clearly haven't enjoyed themselves much so far" That was before Orlando gave the playoffs their first jolt despite the absences of Aaron Gordon, Jonathan Isaac and Michael Carter-Williams
Who says there's no home-court advantage at the NBA Bubble? Playing 25 miles away from their home arena, Orlando springs the first upset of the playoffs after all four higher seeds won yesterday ...blowtorching these Entering Tuesday Power Rankings from the Committee (of One)
Freshly blasted to inboxes worldwide: The first August playoffs in history demanded an emergency session for the Committee (of One) and a bonus 1-to-16 Bubble Power Rankings in the latest @nytimes NBA newsletter ... with Milwaukee down to No. 2 even before its own emergency today
The Magic have ruled out Aaron Gordon (hamstring) and Michael Carter-Williams (foot) for today's Game 1 against Milwaukee
Doncic finishes with 42 in his first-ever playoff game after the most nightmarish of starts. Porzingis had 14 (and Dallas led by 5) at the time of an ejection one suspects we will still be discussing tomorrow. Clips hang on in Game 1 with lots of Kawhi, PG ... and Marcus Morris
Another pretty prominent non-fan of that ejection ...
Porzingis getting ejected on an iffy second T that draws the Twitter ire of both Nowitzki and Bron ... it's a playoff debut we won't forget but for reasons no one could have called
At the risk of a stern lecture from @PeterVecsey1 ... please allow me to be more precise: The Warriors have only won the lottery once — Joe. Smith in 1995 — but of course drafted Joe Barry Carroll with the No. 1 overall pick in 1980
An add to last week's catch-up with Stephen Curry ... Curry will be the Warriors' representative when the NBA conducts its first-ever virtual Draft Lottery on Thursday ... Golden State is assured of a top-five pick and has only drafted No. 1 overall one time: Joe Smith in 1995
On Day 37 ... PLAYOFFS
As they make their playoff debuts tonight, @NYTSports spoke to two of the NBA Bubble’s hottest players —@luka7doncic and @kporzee — as well as @swish41 on what awaits the Dallas duo on the postseason stage in the Mavs’ first series without Dirk since 1990:
Playoff debuts loom tonight for the emerging star duo of @luka7doncic and @kporzee when the Mavericks face the Clippers. For SportsMonday in the @nytimes, I spoke to both -- and a certain @swish41 -- about leading Dallas back onto the postseason stage:
Let's ask @ScottCacciola ...
The Jazz announced today that Mike Conley has left the NBA Bubble in Florida to return to his home in Columbus, Ohio, for the birth of his son
Special event for Bubble media tonight ... Brief but delicious glimpse of Yacht Club life ... where the Blazers are the last of six teams left (and just played their way into the Grand Floridian)
NBA coverage for SportsSunday in the @nytimes ... Blazers edge Grizzlies in the NBA’s first-ever playoff play-in game: Pelicans oust Alvin Gentry:
No LeBron vs. Zion, but who would turn down Lakers vs. Blazers after what Dame, CJ, Melo and Nurk just pulled off? For SportsSunday in the @nytimes on Portland’s narrow W over the Grizz and a brilliant @JaMorant in the NBA’s first-ever playoff play-in:
Good thing this bizzare Champions League with knockout games instead of two-legged ties -- and in a short-term Bubble -- is gonna have an  attached ... or else sleeping would be tough tonight
The @GreenhillSchool dad has to put rivalries aside to hat-tip the @SMTXathletics kid: Taylor Jenkins did a crazy good job with this Grizzlies team from which nothing close to this level was expected. Not sure why Jenkins never even gets a mention in Coach of the Year chatter
Oh my heart's in the basement ... My weekend's at an all-time low ... (See other game)
The NBA has announced the results of award voting from seeding games as follows: Lillard is Bubble MVP Phoenix's Monty Williams won Coach of the Bubble after going 8-0 First Team All-Bubble: Lillard, Devin Booker, Luka Doncic, James Harden and T.J. Warren
Damian Lillard has been named Bubble MVP
That makes two active coaching vacancies in the NBA: Chicago and New Orleans Brooklyn is also poised to start a formal search when its season ends ... although current coach Jacque Vaughn has been assured of consideration for the Nets’ full-time post
Pelicans make it official and announce the dismissal of Coach Alvin Gentry ...
As covered here Friday, it was widely believed in coaching circles that David Griffin decided to make a change before the Pels had even left the Bubble. With network execs dreaming of LeBron vs. Zion in Round 1, New Orleans finished 21st out of 22 teams:
Clippers assistant coach Ty Lue and Lakers assistant coach Jason Kidd are expected to be prime candidates for the Pelicans' coaching vacancy, league sources say, with Lue and Kidd also both on the Nets' list of prospective candidates when Brooklyn's search starts in earnest soon
The @Hoophall Class of 2020 ceremonies that were previously scheduled for the end of this month -- Springfield inductions for Tim Duncan, Kevin Garnett and Kobe Bryant -- have been rescheduled for May 2021
The Heat just announced that Derrick Jones Jr. has been diagnosed with a neck strain after his hard collision tonight with Indiana’s Goga Bitadze ... "After an MRI, CT scan and concussion test,” Miami says, “Jones, Jr. will be re-evaluated again over the weekend”
But Divac could not survive selecting Marvin Bagley at No. 2 overall in 2018 ... with Luka Doncic still on the board .. The Kings were surging when the season was suspended by the coronavirus outbreak but started 0-3 in the Bubble and never came close to restoring that momentum
Divac traded DeMarcus Cousins to New Orleans in February 2017, vowed to step down if the Kings weren't in a better place within two years and by April 2019 had sufficiently convinced ownership that the team was headed in the right direction to earn a multiyear contract extension
The Kings make it official and announce that GM Vlade Divac is the first Bubble casualty, stepping down from his post after Sacramento extended its playoff drought to 14 seasons and counting. Kings adviser Joe Dumars takes over the front office on an interim basis
What looms as a potentially active summer on the coaching carousel is picking up speed: Chicago has fired Jim Boylen
On an eventful last night in the NBA Bubble for five teams, Gregg Popovich greeted the end of the Spurs' epic playoff streak with a surprise imitation of President Trump ... and a strong suggestion he will back on the bench next season. @NYTSports column:
Gregg Popovich on coaching next year: "Why wouldn't I?"
First-round playoff schedules from the NBA ...
Only a Portland loss can get them to the Western Conference play-in round ... but the Phoenix Suns went 8-0 here and will start next season with the privilege of telling people how they haven't lost a basketball game since March 10, 2020
It'll be official in mere minutes: The first sub-.500 season for Gregg Popovich since 1996-97 is also the Spurs' first non-playoff season since (you guessed it) 1996-97
Phoenix gets 13 first-half points from their recent signee out of the @nbagleague @campayne ... who made NBA history just by playing in the NBA Bubble as explained in the enclosed link 
Happy International Left-Handers Day to all who celebrate! Enclosed is my annual All-Lefty Team for @NYTSports via the @nytimes.weekly NBA newsletter in its online form ... headlined of course by @JHarden13:
Russell Westbrook's first playoff series as a Rocket, should his quad injury heal, comes against OKC and CP3 ... And as @NYTSports reported earlier this week, Portland, Phoenix or San Antonio moves from the Yacht Club into the Grand Floridian IF one can finish No. 8 in the West
As if Rockets/Thunder in Round 1 didn't have enough subplots ... I'm told James Harden's team and Chris Paul's team not only share a hotel but also share the same building at the Grand Floridian Resort &amp; Spa
A much-needed boost for Memphis (and former Bucks assistant Taylor Jenkins) that Antetokounmpo is now suspended for the Grizzlies' final seeding game Top-seeded Milwaukee has nothing to play for and the Grizz, of course, face a must-win to extend their season
Milwaukee's Giannis Antetokounmpo has been suspended for one game for headbutting Washington's Moe Wagner, sources tell @NYTSports, but will serve it this week before the playoffs begin
Houston's Russell Westbrook is out for Friday's game against Philadelphia with a strained quadriceps muscle in his right leg after he underwent an MRI in Orlando
It's Contract Extension Wednesday for NBA head coaches: Boston just extended Brad Stevens' deal after Indiana gave Nate McMillan a one-year extension this morning
One for the Empty Gym Chronicles ... gonna miss this arena when it gets deleted from the NBA Bubble rotation this weekend ... 
The NBA announces zero positive confirmed coronavirus tests of the 342 players being tested daily in Florida since results were last announced Aug. 5
Thursday is International Left-Handers Day! Today we share the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter in online form featuring my annual All-Lefty Team ... led, of course, by @JHarden13 (but with surprises) Plus the Suns' @campayne and NBA history for lefties:
Don Nelson would have broken Twitter with this one in the 1969 NBA Finals ... if they had Twitter back then Dame doing it from three times as far away in 2020 ... sounds about right
61 and takes the potential game-sealing charge? Decent
Lillard now has 61 after a fortuitous bounce for which there are no other words ...
Best August game in NBA history ...
Two straight 50-point games for Damian Lillard ... So, uh, maybe it's a two-man Bubble MVP race ...
I don't think those two free throws threw Dame Time off ...
Might have turned in my All-Lefty Team too soon ...
The story of the Suns' @campayne making NBA history by becoming the 50th lefty to play in the league this season per my pals at @bball_ref AND ... My 2020 All-Lefty Team as we celebrate International Left-Handers Day on Thursday ... all via the latest @nytimes NBA newsletter:
0.0012 ... Analytics!
I am just an observer and not a voter ... but I have to think @DevinBook wins Bubble MVP even if the Suns finish 7-1. They've been the story of Bubble Ball so far -- with or without a play-in spot
Let's run this back on the Yacht Club Six ... with Portland, San Antonio and UNBEATEN Phoenix putting all kinds of heat on Memphis in the race for No. 8 in the West ...
Suns are 7-0, y'all
Major League Baseball in the #716 tonight ... can feel the bigness of the moment all the way out here in the NBA Bubble!
The NBA just announced that it will conduct media voting to name an All-Bubble Team for the 88 seeding games as well as an MVP
My @NYTSports visit with @StephenCurry30 on his "major FOMO" watching the NBA Bubble, rooting on his brother @sdotcurry, his bucket-list afternoon at the @PGAChampionship, Golden State's future and why he is "proud of every single one of these players" --&gt;
Playoff clinching and elimination scenarios in the NBA today ...
In a radio interview this morning with @claytravis, President Trump was highly critical of the NBA, saying its widespread protests during the national anthem since the season restarted July 30 have put the league in "big trouble" "Bigger trouble than they understand," Trump said
This won't help me get a table at @stelmo ... which I miss badly The reality for Warren: Passive starts both times I caught him in person and both times he was slow to get going after being shadowed by an elite defender (Bridges/Butler) The other four games ... flamethrower
Miami has hiked its lead to 14 entering the fourth quarter. Butler got to the rim repeatedly after a dreadful first half offensively to break it open ... and Warren, much like in his reunion game against the Suns and Mikal Bridges' disruptive D, has found clean looks scarce
According to accounting from the peerless (and tireless) @ByTimReynolds: T.J. Warren was guarded by Jimmy Butler on 16 possessions in the first half ... with the layup on the aforementioned backdoor cut Warren's only score
TJ Warren lost Butler on a nice backdoor cut for a layup and has shaken loose for a couple 3s this quarter. But Butler took him out of the flow early and Warren has just 12 at the half -- his two quiet games in the Bubble are the two I've attended
And, no, no pregame interaction between them
Jimmy on Warren from the jump
Full on Miami pregame ViceWave scene and acoustics in effect ... even though the gym maybe has 50 people in it as we speak Don’t care, though: I’m 10 feet from the sideline at my beloved VISA Center and READY Heat vs. Pacers, Game of the Bubble so far, tips off in a half-hour
How the networks didn't flex to this game ...
Pacers coach Nate McMillan just announced that T.J. Warren, listed as questionable, is indeed playing against Jimmy Butler's Miami Heat
The Heat just announced that Jimmy Butler and Goran Dragic are both confirmed as active players tonight against T.J. Warren and the Indiana Pacers ... in about 90 minutes
For @NYTSports: @StephenCurry30 and I visit about his "major FOMO" watching the NBA Bubble, his summer plans as @sdotcurry Fan Club president, Golden State's title window and, of course, his bucket-list PGA Championship ride following @collin_morikawa:
Sixers say Ben Simmons will have a post-surgery evaluation in approximately two weeks after today's procedure on his left knee
The Cinderella Suns are 6-0 ... Portland (1/2 GB), San Antonio (1) and Phoenix (1) are all within one game of No. 8 Memphis in the West ... And all the good Bubble Ball drama so far is still coming from the Yacht Club Six ... who are covered extensively in the link below:
The Sixers have ruled Joel Embiid (left ankle) out for Tuesday's game against Phoenix
Two Pelicans news bulletins: Zion Williamson will be held out Tuesday vs. Sacramento Alvin Gentry on his level of concern regarding his job security: "I told you guys, I don't ever worry about anything like that. I'm the coach until I'm not the coach and I act accordingly."
Not what the no-margin-for-error Suns needed ... but perhaps Ayton can atone in the second half. Major letdown for Phoenix after such an uplifting ride to this point ...
An essay from @DanBarryNYT ... on sports in pandemic times ... from the front page of SportsMonday in the @nytimes ... right here:
After all the jokes and hotel envy at the NBA Bubble, it has all gotten very serious in the Yacht Club hallways. Three teams are already out. Phoenix, Portland and San Antonio are still alive. @NYTSports on the tension that grips the Yacht Club Six:
Sacramento's playoff drought has reached 14 seasons and counting ... by far the league's longest Phoenix -- still alive trying to halt a postseason drought dating to 2010 -- goes for 6-0 tomorrow against Oklahoma City More here on the Yacht Club Six:
Five of the Yacht Club Six teams played tonight ... Spurs and Blazers move to 4-2 ... with @Dame_Lillard rumbling for 51 points Pelicans and Kings eliminated from the playoff chase Wizards drop to 0-6
Better stated: Zion Williamson's rookie season will not go beyond this week as the New Orleans Pelicans have been eliminated from playoff consideration in the Western Conference
Zion Williamson's rookie season is over
Joel Embiid is out for the rest of Philly's game against Portland with left ankle injury, Sixers say
The story also details how the Suns, Spurs or Blazers, I'm told, would move out of the Yacht Club and into the Grand Floridian Resort &amp; Spa after the playoffs begin ... IF one of those three still-alive Yacht Club teams can manage to swipe the West's No. 8 seed from Memphis
At the NBA's Yacht Club, stares are "getting colder getting on and off the elevator" according to Suns Coach Monty Williams For SportsMonday in the @nytimes we check in for a taste of the resort's tension that nags at the playoff-chasing Yacht Club Six:
Enclosed link is the #CacciolaAlert special on the new @jj_redick podcast ...
Let JJ stay in the Bubble ... for the sake of his new pod
Pop talks every day about how they're in the NBA Bubble just for "development" .... and then they go out and play Spurs-y yet again
After telling @NYTSports last night that he was on course to make his return against Indiana on Monday, Jimmy Butler practiced with the Heat today. He missed Miami’s previous three games with a foot injury
Warmest wishes to one of the game’s greats and a even kinder man: Paul Westphal, inducted into the @Hoophall last September, has been diagnosed with brain cancer, according to his close pal @MikeLupica. Best to Westy ... HoF player, highly successful coach and a true SoCal ledge
Tennis news you love to see involving two huge NBA guys ... Sir @andy_murray and Mavs superfan @mitch_krueger
Today in #thisbubble ... SACRAMENTO is eliminated from the playoffs with a loss OR a Portland win NEW ORLEANS is eliminated from the playoffs with a loss AND a Portland win MEMPHIS clinches a spot, at worst, in the play-in series with a win
Rick Carlisle on Doncic: "He's getting better by the hour"
It's been a long, bubblicious night ... capped by an absolute OT clinic from Doncic ... going anywhere he wants
With his 17th triple-double of the season tonight, Luka Doncic has clinched this season's triple-double crown ... LeBron and Jokic are next in line with 13 (and not enough games left to catch 77)
Devin Booker: "I think this Bubble opportunity was made for us and we're taking advantage of it"
Jimmy Butler tells @NYTSports after Miami's loss to Phoenix that he is on course to play Monday against Indiana after missing the Heat's last three games with a foot injury
And now @DevinBook and the Cinderella Phoenix Suns are 5-0 ...
Bubble went up several fun notches on this Saturday ...
Indiana vs. Miami on Monday ... most anticipated August game in NBA history (Unless the Clips and Portland play again)
I guess Mikal Bridges is gonna win Defensive Player of the Bubble when TJ Warren scoops up Bubble MVP ...
Wow ... my guy @ByTimReynolds writing about the one and only @nadiacomaneci10 from inside the Bubble ... RANGE
First #thisleague of The Bubble ...
Tensions in the NBA Bubble, it would appear, are rising Dame Time to PG13: "Keep switching teams ... running from the grind ..."
With no injuries listed on the Pelicans' day-before report, all indications are that Zion Williamson will play in New Orleans' must-win game Sunday against San Antonio
Considerable list of NBA Bubble injuries from serious to season-ending: Ben Simmons (knee) Domantas Sabonis (foot) Jaren Jackson Jr. (knee) Jonathan Isaac (knee) Marvin Bagley (foot) Justise Winslow (hip) Rajon Rondo (fractured thumb on top of those soft-tissue injuries)
The Grizzlies’ bus just left practice about 15 minutes ago and will have been greeted by welcome news on the ride back to their hotel: Portland loses a two-point game to the Clippers despite the absences of Kawhi Leonard, Montrezl Harrell and Pat Beverley
The three finalists for the NBA’s six major individual awards ... all here in one place:
Portland has sliced Memphis' lead for the No. 8 spot in the West to one game ... and will play the Clippers today with Kawhi Leonard out to rest his left knee
The Kings will be the second team to be eliminated from NBA Bubble playoff consideration if Portland wins today
The first team eliminated from The NBA Bubble, rather predictably, is the shorthanded Washington Wizards ... who have started 0-5 without their three best players: Bradley Beal, John Wall and Davis Bertans
Big night for Memphis: A huge win over Oklahoma City ... and ANOTHER sounding of the #CacciolaAlert 
Did I just (Raheem the) dream that?
Champions League is back in about 10 minutes ... Foden starts alongside KDB ... Might self-combust ...
The Pelicans announce Zion Williamson will not play against Washington tonight on the second night of a back-to-back
Campazzo has a hefty 6 million Euro buyout, but the NBA team can contribute $725,000 ... and I'm told Campazzo plans to forego $1.2 million Euros owed between now and October to facilitate the move. The rest, as other Spain-to-the-NBA stars have done, can be paid in installments
On a City v Real Madrid day, this Facundo Campazzo update seems appropriate: Campazzo's move to the NBA in October free agency has never looked more likely, league sources say Real has known for three months, sources say, that the Argentinean playmaker plans to go to the NBA
The NBA Bubble has turned one month old ... Its 22 teams, starting with the @OrlandoMagic, began arriving July 7
Last Update cause I tweeted way too much: Team of The Bubble 114, Indiana (and Hot Hand of The Bubble T.J. Warren) 99 The Suns move to a thoroughly unforeseen 4-0 ... with Book closing AND chirping late at the Indy bench Warren? Held to 16 points on 7-for-20 shooting
Update: This game is insanely fun and I will shed actual tears when the league stops using the VISA Center for games after the "seeding" round ends and these ridiculous, turn-back-the-clock seats go away
Update: The Pacers were offended by all these tweets and, just like that, are back within seven. Monty Williams has to bring Devin Booker back with five fouls and 8:08 to go
Update: @campayne-led Suns have stretched their lead to EIGHTEEN ... all with @DevinBook on the bench #BubbleRandomness
Update: Don't think I've live-tweeted a Suns game this much, well, ever ... cause the Nash-era glory days were (mostly) pre-Twitter PS -- Cameron Payne, freshly signed from the @TexasLegends, has 5 more points to start the fourth quarter ... and sneaked in a contest at the rim
Update: Cameron Payne's Cinderella Bubble Renaissance continues and the Suns take an 86-75 lead into the fourth quarter ... even though Devin Booker -- for the second time in three games -- racked up five fouls halfway through the third quarter
Update: We're inching toward to the fourth quarter in The T.J. Warren Bowl with Warren having scuffled his way to 16 points and saddled with four fouls ... Indiana has seized a 72-70 lead regardless over the 3-0 Suns
Update: Warren shakes loose for seven consecutive Pacers points. Suns' lead sliced to five after a quarter as Phoenix chases the 4-0 start no one saw coming.
With Mikal Bridges getting the primary coverage assignment, Phoenix has pressed pause on the hottest August in NBA history, holding T.J. Warren scoreless for nearly seven minutes and jumping out to a quick 13-point lead ...
Minutes away from The T.J. Warren Bowl: Pacers v Suns ...
The Lakers say LeBron James will not play tonight against Houston to rest a sore right groin
The Sixers say Ben Simmons has suffered a subluxation of the left patella (knee cap) and is out indefinitely
Gregg Popovich on Nikola Jokic: "He's a reincarnation of Larry Bird"
Post Caruso please ...
Testing update from the NBA: Of the 343 players tested daily since the league last announced results on July 29 ... zero confirmed positive tests
Milwaukee’s Bubble strategy, Pop’s Bubble coaching hack, Patty Mills and Brett Brown, wild tales of stalking breakfast stations and pesky raccoons, questions/answers/numbers and more ... all here in the digital edition of the @nytimes NBA newsletter —&gt;
The digital edition of this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter — with so many notes, scenes and rumbles from The Bubble at Walt Disney World that it could fill a bubble of its own — is one click away:
All it takes is an email address to subscribe and the @nytimes NBA newsletter will be expedited right to your Inbox, anywhere in the world, full of hoop goodness every Tuesday ...
Hiatus-to-restart, Adam Silver, Bucks strategy, Pop’s hand signals, Patty Mills and Brett Brown, many tales of wonder (and struggle) Inside The Bubble and much more ... all via the latest edition of the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter ... freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide
The Grizzlies announce the loss of Jaren Jackson Jr. for the rest of the season to a torn meniscus
Dallas is playing Sacramento and Mavs owner Mark Cuban tells @NYTSports he's in the bubble ... @ABCSharkTank's West Coast filming bubble It's an "NBA copy," says Cuban, who plans to arrive in Florida later this month for the Mavericks' first Dirk-less postseason games since 1990
For @nytimes Interactive and @NYTSports, here is my first-ever Burst dispatch ... which makes it a Bubble Burst since it comes from inside the NBA campus at Walt Disney World:
More Cacciola on a Monday? Now he takes us inside the ever-entertaining rim attacking delivered by the Memphis rookie @JaMorant ... must-see whether the dunks go down or not 
The Raptors, remember, were together as a group in Florida earlier than anyone except the actual Florida teams. It already shows thanks to Toronto’s impressive 3-0 start to Bubble Ball
Heat coach Erik Spoelstra has confirmed that Jimmy Butler is "going to play" this afternoon against Toronto
It's 9-2 over the last two days and actually 13-6 overall going into today for the "home teams" in the smallest (but funnest kind) of sample sizes
Home-court advantage is allegedly dead at the NBA Bubble in arenas with no fans ... but "home" teams have gone 9-2 the last two days and are 14-7 overall
The Pelicans  @jj_redick tells our @ScottCacciola that he is expanding his range — his broadcasting range — by launching a new podcast AND his own company. From SportsMonday in the @nytimes:
Worse than the Houston collapse? Has to be for Dallas .... unraveling in the second half even though Devin Booker and Deandre Ayton had both rung up five fouls with seven-plus minutes left in the third quarter Quite a rally, on the flip side, for the Bubble Suns to go to 2-0
Bucks-Rockets? Nah From 13 down at halftime, Phoenix just went up six on Dallas with both Devin Booker and Deandre Ayton on the bench with five fouls each ... on back-to-back 3s by @TexasLegends ex Cameron Payne
Best thing about Bubble Life ...
The current expectation, sources tell @NYTSports, is that Jimmy Butler will be available Monday for Miami's game against Toronto Butler did not practice Sunday with the Heat, but they did not list him on their injury report tonight report in advance of the Toronto game
Missed Eagle and Kustok ... #leaguepassintheroom
Teams were also reminded today that penalties for non-compliance on mask wearing at the NBA Bubble range from warnings to fines, suspensions and potentially even removal from campus, @NYTSports has learned ... with repeat offenders subject to enhanced discipline
NBA teams were notified today by the league office to re-emphasize the use of masks and face coverings by everyone in the NBA bubble and were also told to utilize a portion of their next team meeting to reiterate the importance of doing so, league sources say
From Sunday’s @nytimes: The print display of @NYTSports’ piece on San Antonio’s @Patty_Mills and what he describes as a battle against systemic racism “on two continents” ... as edited by @shauntellowe and assembled here by @zagatam —
Today's clinching scenarios in the NBA: Dallas seals a playoff berth with a win or a Memphis loss Milwaukee secures the East's No. 1 seed with a win
Friendly reminder from @NYTSports: The last Pacer to score 50 in game before tonight -- @jermaineoneal in 2005 -- recently revealed that he is forming a sports agency with a certain Tracy McGrady Full story here:
Didn't understand the TJ Warren trade then ...
TJ Warren ... 53 points #thisleague
Harden 49 last night, TJ Warren goes for 50 (and counting) tonight ...
TJ Warren .... 50 Box scores back in our lives ... yes, please
How many days again until Miami and Indiana play? In related news: Indy's TJ Warren has 47 tonight
The Kings are freeing assistant coach Igor Kokoskov from NBA Bubble duty to leave the team and start preparing for his new head coaching job at Turkish power Fenerbahce. Kokoskov was in his usual assistant's role Friday beside Luke Walton when Sacramento played San Antonio
Jimmy Butler says he doesn't know exactly why he was asked to change his jersey before tipoff and adds "I don't care" about the league's explanation. Butler said he relented "for my teammates" and described it as "to be determined" if he tries to play in a blank jersey again
NBA spokesman (continued) on Miami’s Jimmy Butler being asked to take off a jersey with no name and replace it with a jersey bearing BUTLER: ”Per league rules, the uniform may not be otherwise altered and anyone wearing an altered jersey will not be permitted to enter the game.”
NBA spokesman on Jimmy Butler: “Displaying no name or message on the back of a player’s jersey was not an option among the social justice messages agreed upon by the Players Association and the NBA as modifications to the rules regarding uniforms.” (1/2)
The Heat tweeted out this video of how Butler's jersey looked when he first took the floor ... before he was asked to change it
Miami's Butler revealed his intention to wear a blank jersey two weeks ago, acknowledging that the league had not signed off on his request "I'm no different than anybody else of color and want that to be my message," Butler said of his desire to play in a nameless jersey
Miami's Jimmy Butler wanted to wear a jersey with no social justice message and no name -- completely blank except for his No. 22 -- as the ultimately expression of equality. The league would not allow it
Jimmy Butler took floor for Miami vs. Denver today with no name on the back of the jersey as he vowed ... referees have made him switch to a jersey with a name plate before allowing the game to start
Also: The NBA restart is officially bubbling and your questions for the @nytimes' weekly NBA newsletter are welcomed via email at marcstein-newsletter@nytimes.com
For SportsSunday in the @nytimes: My piece on the emerging activism of the Spurs' Australian mainstay @Patty_Mills and what he describes as a battle against systemic racism "on two continents" @NYTSports link:
At stake today: A Lakers win or a Clippers loss clinches the West's best record for the Lakers A Toronto loss would seal the East's best record for Milwaukee
Spurs coach Gregg Popovich chose to stand for tonight's national anthem. Pop postgame when asked to explain: “I'd prefer to keep that to myself. Everybody has to make a personal decision. The league's been great about that; everybody has the freedom to react any way they want"
Link is enclosed here to our story on @Patty_Mills and his emerging activism ... which he has been building to since his first traumatic day of kindergarten:
Better shot of Patty Mills’s coaching at work ... notebook is in his left hand
At the VISA Center in the sort of on-the-floor seat I never thought I'd see again and makes an NBA game delicious beyond words Patty Mills, whose emerging activism will be featured in Sunday's @nytimes, is a healthy scratch for San Antonio ... toting a notebook as a pinch coach
San Antonio plays tonight and Gregg Popovich says of @Patty_Mills: “We’d be lost without him.” For SportsSunday in the @nytimes, I profiled Mills in his other role to go with Spurs Compass: Emerging activist after enduring racial abuse dating to age 5:
The story of the first basket in NBA history, via @rudygobert27, that ever counted in July ... and a social justice moment amid a long-awaited comeback that the league will never forget ... all from inside The Bubble for @NYTSports:
Two NBA games Two two-point games
NBA commissioner Adam Silver on both teams kneeling tonight: “I respect our teams’ unified act of peaceful protest for social justice and under these unique circumstances will not enforce our long-standing rule requiring standing during the playing of our national anthem.”
Noisier in here than scrimmages were ... with the virtual fans' adding some sound ... but player and coaches voices still break through and remain more audible than you would ever hear during a typical game
First basket in the NBA in more than four months: Rudy Gobert
Zion Williamson starts for the home-team Pelicans ...
For more than four minutes, players and coaches from the Jazz and the Pelicans stood together along the whole sideline at the HP Field House where BLACK LIVES MATTER is emblazoned on the floor ... then all kneeled together -- with the referees -- during the national anthem
"Please welcome YOURRRRR New Orleans Pelicans"
The Utah Jazz just took the floor ... NBA basketball less than 20 minutes away
The NBA has added a cloth covering to referees' whistles to try to prevent the spread of spittle ...
The Knicks just introduced Tom Thibodeau as their new head coach
SI reported below that the alleged assault happened at Summer League in July 2019 -- nearly 18 months after an SI report on a culture of harrassment and abuse in the team’s business offices that led to an organizaitonal overhaul and a $10 million donation by Mavs owner Mark Cuban
The Mavericks on Wednesday issued a lenghty statement in response to a Sports Illustrated report detailing a new sexual assault allegation against a front-office executive, saying they are "appalled" it would be published without the team receiving "all of the purpoted evidence"
Anthony Davis rejoined Lakers practice today ... sans sunglasses
One more sleep and the NBA is truly back. Eight key areas of focus on the league's restart, our latest window into Bubble Life and why a 10-day quarantine was the max sanction for Lou Williams ... all here in the @nytimes NBA newsletter (in Digital form):
Official statement from the league and the union on zero positive coronavirus tests as the NBA Bubble moves into its fourth week of operation ...
The NBA has announced that zero of 344 players on the league's campus have returned positive tests for the coronavirus since results were last announced July 20
Behind-the-scenes discussions among players have been intensifying for days here at the NBA Bubble as they seek to make a social justice statement in united fashion during anthems here ... and, as @NYTSports first reported Monday, coaches have been holding talks to join them
The NBA, as Silver noted in the interview, has had a rule "that preceded David Stern" dating to 1981 that mandates players, coaches and team staff members "to be present, stand and line up in a dignified posture" during the playing of the American and Canadian national anthems
The full quote from NBA commissioner Adam Silver to @RobinRoberts on @GMA: "I respect peaceful protest. I'm not sure what our players will do when they come out tomorrow night and we'll of course address it at the time, but I also understand these are highly unusual times."
On Pelicans and Jazz players and coaches and their expected plans to kneel in solidarity around the BLACK LIVES MATTER floor lettering during Thursday night's national anthem, NBA commissioner Adam Silver told @GMA this morning: "I respect peaceful protest." (1/2)
Bubbles ...
Two more sleeps until the NBA is truly back ... This week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter, freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide, has eight great starting points to train your focus ... as well as our latest batch of Bubble Life tales:
Zion Williamson will be out of quarantine tomorrow, according to Pelicans coach Alvin Gentry
Good visit earlier today talking hoops and Bubble Life with the @dpshow ...
The NBA, I'm told, is spending at least $180 million with its Bubble partner Disney and on its testing operation in hopes of crowning a champion in the league's 74th season like it has in the previous 73 ... More in @NYTSports' NBA Bubble progress report:
Behind-the-scenes discussions among players about kneeling and other potential postures to take during the national anthem are intensifying at the NBA Bubble as Opening Night 2.0 approaches, @NYTSports has learned, with discussions also ongoing among NBA coaches to join players
It didn’t take long to validate the NBA’s insistence on a bubble concept given baseball’s instant crisis. Yet Adam Silver went no farther than saying he’s “cautiously optimistic we’re on the right track” in combatting COVID-19 ... @NYTSports coverage:
Silver also tells @NYTSports he is scheduled to make his first appearance on the NBA campus Thursday for Opening Night 2.0 He must register two negative coronavirus tests before departure and another negative upon arrival in Florida to attend Pelicans/Jazz and Lakers/Clippers
For Monday's @nytimes: An NBA Bubble progress report ... Commissioner Adam Silver tells @NYTSports he is "cautiously optimistic we're on the right track" "But I also know what we're doing has not been done before, and the competition is just beginning"
Adam Silver last night said talks are at an "intense" stage and Chris Paul said the figure being discussed is a $300 million pledge from the league in which players "get an opportunity to determine where it goes." A formal ownership vote to approve the foundation is expected soon
Post-game announcements from Chris Paul: 1) NBA and WNBA players will soon speak with Michelle Obama to discuss voting initiatives 2) CP3 spoke with excitement of the NBA forming a joint foundation with the players' union to support economic empowerment in the Black community
Mavs coach Rick Carlisle says Kristaps Porzingis, like Denver's Paul Millsap previously, will have to sit out today's scrimmage after missing a coronavirus test yesterday
Lou Williams’ 10-day quarantine began Saturday after he confirmed to the league that he picked up food in Atlanta while on an excused absence
The league has mandated a 10-day quarantine for the Clippers’ Lou Williams
The talk of The Bubble tonight: Lou Williams' status Richaun Holmes was sent back to quarantine for 10 days after crossing a campus border sans authorization Williams had clearance to leave ... but obviously not to detour to a gentleman's club A whole Bubble awaits the ruling
Stat of the Week: The NBA's delivery hub here at The Bubble, I'm told, is receiving more than 1,000 packages a day ordered by players, coaches, team staff members and, yes, reporters
The NBA announces a four-day quarantine for New Orleans' Zion Williamson after he registered negative coronavirus tests every day while away from the team It leaves open the possibility that Williamson could play Thursday against Utah on Opening Night 2.0
The Pacers announce that Domantas Sabonis will leave the NBA Bubble indefinitely to receive treatment for plantar fasciitis in his left foot
Significant week at the NBA Bubble not only for the scrimmages ... Wednesday also marked the first day, I'm told, that players, coaches and team staffers were allowed to visit the other two hotels beyond the hotel where their teams are staying
The Spurs have designated Becky Hammon as their head coach in today's scrimmage against Milwaukee ... with a masked Gregg Popovich serving as her assistant
Kemba Walker practiced today for the Celtics, Brad Stevens says
More NBA news for those of you who like beer: Miami’s @JimmyButler is the star of the campaign ...
The NBA just announced that Michelob ULTRA is the new official beer partner of the league
Hearing @JonChampionJC do the tease for SportsCenter's NBA coverage and the Mookie Betts deal is absolute poetry ...
Assuming your food-and-beverage-making skill tops out at ... toast
Aeropress maestros out there ... how hard really is it on a scale of 1 to 10?
For the first time in more than four months, two NBA teams shared the same floor this afternoon at Walt Disney World. All the sights and sounds from @NYTSports:
Season opener is eight days away for the Pelicans and Williamson's quarantine length remains TBD based on his ability to keep recording negative tests while away
Pelicans announce no current timetable for Zion Williamson's return to the team
Missed organ music at the arena so much that I am loving even the synthesized non-human version when it piped in ...
PS: We are roughly 25 miles away from the Magic's home at Amway Center
Just heard from the PA man: "Please welcome the visiting team ... the Orlando Magic"
Clippers have just taken the floor for layups ... with 10 players
With tipoff in 15 ... here's my latest from The Bubble ... featuring a chance encounter with one of the NBA's two happiest players and MUCH more from the inside via the Digital edition of the @nytimes NBA newsletter Link: Signup:
NBA basketball ... from my seat ... TODAY
The Kings announce that Marvin Bagley (lateral sprain in his right foot) is out for the rest of the season
Also in newsletter news ... signing up has never been easier. All it takes it an email address:
I ran into one of the two happiest players in the NBA on Monday. This week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter, freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide, leads off there and details reporting life now that we’re out of quarantine and on the practice circuit here at Disney’s NBA Bubble ...
Ricky Rubio participated in Suns practice here today at Walt Disney World ... and Devin Booker told me -- more than once -- that he feels game-ready already ... as if Phoenix had one tonight. "I'm right there," @DevinBook told @NYTSports
The Grizzlies say Justise Winslow is out for the rest of the season after injuring his hip in an intrasquad scrimmage
Our @SopanDeb tackles an important question: Who handles content for @NBABubbleLife and @WNBABubbleLife?
Official release from the league and the union on zero NBA players out of 346 tested for the coronavirus since July 13 returning a positive test
The NBA says that zero NBA players out of 346 have tested positive for the coronavirus since test results were last announced July 13
Pacers coach Nate McMillan says he expects Victor Oladipo to play in Indiana's scrimmages starting this week
Neat Freak Nirvana: TFW your room gets cleaned for the first time in eight days ...
The Kings' roster crisis has deepened: Marvin Bagley sustained a right foot injury in Sunday night's practice
Good to be back in a gym, y’all ... watching a headband-sporting Luka Doncic jab-stepping Mavs assistant Jamahl Mosley like it’s normal day in the NBA ...
The Mavericks just sang Happy Birthday to Dwight Powell to conclude practice ... and in related news it appears I am covering NBA basketball again
These six-feet-apart sensors do indeed chirp loudly at the NBA Bubble. On our way to the first practice we will cover here, @townbrad and I have to sit way apart on a mostly empty bus to keep them from beeping ...
The story details the journey from their first meal to what McGrady says is "a calling that we have" T-Mac will be co-owner/adviser and tells @NYTSports he will likely step away from broadcasting. Co-owner Jermaine O'Neal will test to become a certified NBA agent in January
In an interview with @NYTSports, @hoophall inductee Tracy McGrady and six-time All-Star @jermaineoneal reveal they are co-launching a player representation agency: Seven1 Sports Group and Entertainment Full story for SportsMonday in the @nytimes:
I was today years old when I learned this is a reference to the Hype House on Tik Tok ...
Leaner than Skinny Melo ... makes videos like Thybulle
After 165 consecutive hours of hotel room inhabitance ...
Haynes explains here how and why he was in and out of quarantine faster than the 15 of us in the media wing of the NBA Bubble who will finally be permitted to exit our rooms in the next hour or so ...
Mood (on the last night of quarantine):
How did the manager of the Angels get my van?
Mood:
Also: Happy for Arteta ... but Pep's jeans ain't it. Gotta retire them
Knew our Wembley streak was due to perish but that was by far the worst 90 minutes of these 7 days locked behind a hotel door Absolute clinic leading the line from Aubameyang -- one thing SO glaringly missing sans Sergio Congrats to @MarcJSpears @mikezarren  (dangit) @swish41
Buffalo #The716
Just stared out my window for several minutes watching what looked like an entertaining downpour ... or as Reynolds taught me to say: "It's like rain that was put in a microwave first"
There’s a story behind getting the game needed to make use of this impressive steering wheel @NikolaVucevic brought to the NBA bubble ... and the one homecourt advantage the @OrlandoMagic do have at Disney World ... It’s all explained here via @NYTSports:
The @OrlandoMagic may be a short bus ride away from home, but there has been only one real home-court advantage so far inside the NBA bubble ... We explore for @NYTSports with input from @NikolaVucevic, @augustinDj14 and Steve Clifford:
Inside always brings a ray of light somehow ...
James Harden is officially out of quarantine and headed to Rockets practice ...
Earlier today @KevinOConnorNBA tweeted this snapshot of league rules on exit and re-entry which illustrated that several conditions must be met to keep the quarantine under 10-to-14 days ...
Among the variables that the league is expected to factor in to its decision when determining the length of Williamson's quarantine: Where specifically Zion went, his mode of travel and his frequency of COVID-19 testing while away from the team
The exact requirements for Zion Williamson's re-entry to the NBA bubble at Disney World -- in terms of how many days he must spend in quarantine -- will be determined "once we learn more about Zion's specific circumstances," according to a league spokesman
Here is the Pelicans’ full statement on Zion Williamson leaving the team today ... 14 days before they are scheduled to face Utah in the July 30 opener of the NBA restart
The Pelicans say Zion Williams has left Orlando to deal with an urgent family medical matter Williamson "intends to rejoin the team in Orlando for the NBA restart at a later date”
We all trash this thing ... 'til the power goes out
The Kings' De'Aaron Fox is out for at least 7 to 10 days with a sprained left ankle he suffered in practice tonight ... as we tried to tweet an hour ago
Taking you inside my first 48 hours from the NBA Pre-Bubble -- in pursuit of clearance to enter the actual NBA Bubble on Monday -- and more on Stephen Jackson and a mantra forgotten ... all via the Digital edition of the @nytimes NBA newsletter:
Orlando's James Ennis III disclosed that he recently tested positive for the coronavirus but has recovered and, after gaining clearance, practiced today for the first time with the Magic
James Harden has arrived at Walt Disney World tonight and will have to isolate and register three consecutive negative tests for COVID-19 before he is cleared to join the Rockets
Freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide: The latest @nytimes NBA newsletter covers my first 48 hours in the NBA Pre-Bubble before I (fingers crossed) receive admission to the actual Bubble ... plus more on Stephen Jackson. Sign up here to get it direct:
Denver's Nikola Jokic has been on the Disney campus since Saturday to satisfy his quarantine requirements, according to a league source, and emerged from that quarantine today as pictured
The Nuggets have welcomed Nikola Jokic to Walt Disney World ...
The Kings' Harrison Barnes announces that he tested positive for COVID-19 before the team left for Walt Disney World ...
Tim Duncan will not be here at Walt Disney World on the Spurs' bench ... The team says Duncan, in his first season as an assistant coach to Gregg Popovich, stayed in San Antonio with a few Spurs medical and performance staffers to supervise LaMarcus Aldridge's injury rehab
League says in a statement: "Those players never cleared quarantine and have since left the campus to isolate at home or in isolation housing"
The NBA has announced that two out of 322 players tested positive for the coronavirus on July 7 while on campus at Walt Disney World
Richaun Holmes of the Sacramento KINGS reveals that he is back in quarantine for eight more days and apologizes here after “accidentally” crossing the NBA campus line to pick up a food delivery ...
Houston's Russell Westbrook announces he is in quarantine and "feeling well" after testing positive for the coronavirus
The Lakers have lost Rajon Rondo for 6-to-8 weeks after he fractured his right thumb in practice tonight at Walt Disney World ... with surgery, according to the team, scheduled to take place in the upcoming week
First night in media wing of The Bubble and what’s on TV? Surprise treat to start the seven-day quarantine: @WorldTeamTennis doubs with @SJohnson_89 and the Dallas-based Brit @Bambo290 playing for my hometown OC @BreakersTennis ...
Home ... for the next couple months anyway
Nice video from Golliver ... who I can exclusively report may be the media’s answer to Big Spain, Jokic and Harden. He is in lean shape and ready to Bubble ...
Quarantine for media members is seven days -- compared to 48 hours for everyone in team traveling parties -- because A) media members are traveling commercially and B) we were not tested regularly for two weeks before arriving in Florida like teams were doing in their facilities
After an even 120 nights in a row at home -- personal record since 1993 -- it's time to go Bubble ... Seven consecutive days in quarantine without leaving the Walt Disney World room starts later this evening
Goal of the Season ... @sterling7 header today narrowly finishes second
Park-goers obviously can’t get into the NBA Bubble, but the mere fact that Walt Disney World really did open today given the state of COVID-19 in Florida ... In other news: A slew of NBA reporters fly into MCO tomorrow to begin seven-day quarantines required for Bubble entry
Might win a couple more trophies playing like this ... 
Thanks to my friends from a glossy and glorious basketball magazine that still gets it done every month ... two extra masks arrived just in time to bring them to @NBABubbleLife. Thanks, @GIGANTESbasket!
It's July 11th ... precisely four months removed from the abrupt stoppage of the 2019-20 NBA season However ... 22 NBA teams are scheduled to practice later today at Walt Disney World #thisleague
Clippers coach Doc Rivers says on a conference call with reporters that Kawhi Leonard is en route to Orlando to join the team
"But the opportunity to play again was greater than that last game for me," Jamal Crawford said. "My love for the game trumps how great that game was." In Dirk Nowitzki's last home game in Dallas on April 9, 2019 ... Crawford rumbled for 51 points for the visiting Phoenix Suns
Spoke to the newest Net and here Jamal Crawford (@JCrossover) explains to @NYTSports why he was NOT tempted to let 51 points in his last game stand as his NBA walkoff: "It wasn't tempting. It was more, 'If I don't get a deal, that was a heck of a way to go out.' But ... (1/2)
The Nets just officially signed Jamal Crawford
The Nets strongly considered Amir Johnson for their frontcourt vacancy, as @NYTSports reported earlier this week, but turned their focus to Hall after striking deals this week to sign veterans Michael Beasley and Jamal Crawford
Donta Hall's strong @nbagleague play earned him a call-up to the Detroit Pistons before the season was suspended in March and the Nets, league sources say, are now turning to Hall for a rest-of-the-season deal to fill the frontcourt vacancy created by DeAndre Jordan's absence
The Nets are signing Donta Hall to a rest-of-the-season, league sources say
Our @ScottCacciola on LeBron as the Lakers enter the NBA bubble today ...
The most challenging undertaking in NBA history — 22 teams on one campus for the next three months — is underway The @nytimes NBA newsletter (in Digital form) explores the daunting race to get back to full-speed basketball before games resume July 30:
It's supposed to become more of a real hotel experience -- in the three team hotels -- once you guys are no longer stuck quarantined in your rooms
Food in the NBA bubble changes after quarantines are completed. Player meals won't look like airline trays after the first 48 hours ...
Gregg Popovich always says steps should never be skipped, but you can see why 22 coaches (Pop included) can't wait for the weekend ... As explored in this week's @NYTimes NBA newsletter, it's because practices finally start up again .. in conditions never more complicated:
And, yes, @NetsDaily: Caris LeVert is there
The Nets arrived in Orlando tonight as scheduled for their entry into the NBA bubble ...
The NBA bubble opened for business after the @OrlandoMagic team bus rolled in from the nearby Amway Center. Full @NYTSports coverage —&gt;
Statement from the @WNBA on Kelly Loeffler states that she "has not served as a Governor of the Atlanta Dream since October 2019 and is no longer involved in the day-to-day business of the team"
The Nuggets have officially promoted Calvin Booth to GM ... as expected after Arturas Karnisovas' departure to Chicago
Veteran center Amir Johnson has emerged as a prime target for the Nets, league sources say, in their search for roster reinforcements Brooklyn has been on the hunt for a big man since losing DeAndre Jordan and Nicolas Claxton
The Orlando Magic, thanks to a bus ride shorter than 30 minutes, have arrived at Walt Disney World to check into the NBA campus for the restart of the 2019-20 season ... with Brooklyn, Denver, Phoenix, Utah and Washington also scheduled to arrive today
The Wizards announce that Bradley Beal will sit out the NBA restart due to an injured right shoulder
Out since the pre-season with a broken foot, Green has recovered and received medical clearance to play. The 34-year-old will proceed to the free-agent marketplace in October
Houston is thought to be one of those teams given Rockets GM Daryl Morey's recent lament on Reddit: "Sadly we cannot sign Gerald back this year by NBA rule" The Rockets traded Green to Denver in February and thus couldn't re-sign him this season even after Denver waived Green
One free agent who drew interest from multiple teams before the NBA's transaction window shut June 30, league sources say, was veteran swingman Gerald Green Sources say Green elected not to play in the Fla. restart for family reasons, among them an expected childbirth in August
Promising development from the world of English soccer as the Premier League stages games without fans virtually every day: Zero positive tests from the last round of results which involved nearly 2,000 players, coaches and team staff members
Sacramento would be the seventh team of the 22 bound for Walt Disney World publicly known to take this measure at some point over the past two weeks since players were asked to be back in their home markets on June 22: Kings, Bucks, Heat, Clippers, Nuggets, Suns and Nets
The NBA’s full schedule of scrimmages at Walt Disney World before the scheduled July 30 resumption of the season ...
Overseas Elite  Titan Tech all-time leading scorer 
This perfectly destroys your credibility
Kid is so loveable!
Found Nowitzki's burner 
The most beautiful football in the world ...
Opening Night 2.0 in the NBA, I suspect, will belong to this young man ...
Major moves in basketball's international coaching ranks today with one of Europe's X-and-O stars Sarunas Jasikevicius taking over Barcelona and, as @ismailsenol reported, Fenerbahce luring Igor Kokoskov off the Kings' bench and away from the NBA to take over the Turkish power
Nine additional positive tests in that span have taken the league's total to 25 positive coronavirus tests from 351 players tested starting June 23 In that same span, 10 team staff members of a possible 884 have tested positive for COVD-19
The @nba and @TheNBPA have announced the results of team-administered coronavirus testing from June 24-29:
Thought you were a striker. PKs galore if you try to defend now ...
July 1 is typically a magical date on the  calendar. Walt Disney World is meant to be a magical place. You know the drill by now, though, in 2020 ... The latest in Hoop Life As We Never Expected via the Digital edition of the @nytimes NBA newsletter:
J.R. Smith  officially a Laker
Six positive tests for @FCDallas of @MLS  all registered after the team arrived in Orlando
July 1 signing 
Giannis Antetokounmpo on a conference call this morning: The NBA title in Orlando "is going to be the toughest championship you could ever win"
The longest-tenured beat writer in the game ... goes back to when Trader Danny was playing ... can't imagine the Cs without Bulpett
July 1 has never felt so ... not like July 1
The @nytimes NBA newsletter has been dispatched to inboxes worldwide with wistful reminders that July is supposed to be a magical time in the NBA ... like Disney World is supposed to be a magical place Alas, as @fredvanvleet sagely put it Monday, 2020 tends to have other ideas
Newsy @nytimes NBA newsletter will be out later today, featuring all the NBA restart latest and an instructive visit with the longtime former Mavericks team doctor and NBA Physicians Association president T.O. Souryal ...
The NBA plans to play the national anthem before all games at Walt Disney World starting July 30 as well as the Canadian anthem before Raptors games, a source told @NYTSports Our @SopanDeb has compiled more from Adam Silver on the anthem from Silver's visit today with @TIME:
The Nets say their practice facility has re-opened today -- after Monday's announcements by Spencer Dinwiddie and DeAndre Jordan that they have tested positive for the coronavirus
The Nets were getting free-agent commitments from Kevin Durant and Kyrie Irving one year (and six hours) ago today The Nets' current plight, with two key players freshly diagnosed with the coronavirus and uncertainty all around, is quite a sobering way to mark the anniversary
Jordan joins Wilson Chandler in ruling himself out for the Nets, Kyrie Irving and Kevin Durant are unavailable to play while rehabbing injuries and Spencer Dinwiddie told @ShamsCharania today that his Florida availability is also in question after testing positive for COVID-19
The Nets' DeAndre Jordan announces that he will not participate in the NBA restart after testing positive for the coronavirus
July 1 is the same day that the 22 teams bound for Florida must turn in rosters ranging from 13 to 17 and J.R. Smith’s looming deal to join the Lakers, league sources say, can be signed starting Wednesday at noon ET
Important reminder from cap sage @EricPincus: Players such as @TheRealJRSmith (Lakers), @JusAnderson1 (Nets) and @TreyBurke (Mavericks) must wait until Wednesday to officially sign deals because July 1 is the first day teams can go beyond 15-man roster limits with substitutes
The Lakers, league sources say, are expected to finalize a rest-of-the-season contract with J.R. Smith before Tuesday's 11:59 PM ET closure of the NBA's "transaction window" Rosters for the NBA restart at Walt Disney World must be turned in to the league office Wednesday
Momentous occasion 22 years ago today ... @swish41 lands on Dallas soil
Last dispatch from Germany's basketball bubble: @albaberlin went 10-0 and won the 10-team tournament. @MHP_RIESEN reached the two-legged final but played those games without injured MVP Marcos Knight The @easyCreditBBL reported no positive COVID-19 tests over the three weeks
Dallas' forthcoming addition of veteran guard Trey Burke does not require an additional roster move after Willie Cauley-Stein's decision to bypass playing in the NBA restart, which puts Lee on course to join the Mavericks' traveling party of 37 at Disney World near Orlando
The Mavericks' Courtney Lee notified the team this week that he is eager to join them at Disney World despite a calf injury expected to end his season, league sources say. Lee is a popular veteran in the Dallas locker room who emerged as a starter in March before the NBA shutdown
High school journalists: The best summer journalism camp in the world is going virtual AND free next month. I attended a bazillion years ago and can share first-hand that the @cspaworkshop will teach you tons. Check it out here:
Wrapping up another newsy Friday in the NBA for @NYTSports ... from the latest in league coronavirus testing to a finalized agreement to restart the season to "increased" concern about a surge of COVID-19 cases in Central Florida:
Zion Williamson will play in the first game of the NBA's restart: Pelicans vs. Jazz on July 30
Hartenstein is AN unrestricted free agent ... somewhat surprising given that he has shown some flashes The only move today was from the Knicks, who claimed Theo Pinson off waivers and waived Allonzo Trier
Isaiah Hartenstein has cleared waivers and is now and unrestricted free agent, league sources say
NBA commissioner Adam Silver acknowledges: "The level of concern has increased, not just because of the increased levels (of coronavirus cases) in Florida, but throughout the country."
The Pistons have today signed former No. 16 overall pick Justin Patton ...
The league will announce the schedule for the eight games each of the 22 teams will play later tonight ...
The NBA and @TheNBPA just announced that they have formally finalized a "comprehensive" plan for the July 30 restart of the 2019-20
These are the results (16 positives from 302 tests) from Tuesday’s leaguewide coronavirus testing. Team-administered testing continued Thursday and is scheduled to take place every other day until teams leave for Orlando on July 7, 8 or 9
The NBA and @TheNBPA announce that 16 players of the 302 tested this week have recorded a positive coronavirus test ...
The league's plan remains for teams to be allotted up to 17 extra guest rooms -- one per player -- for player guests after the NBA is down from 22 teams to a final eight entering the second round of the playoffs
After the first round of the NBA playoffs at Walt Disney World, player guests will have to do a three-day quarantine in the Orlando area away from the NBA campus and then a four-day quarantine on campus before having the abilities to move within the grounds, league sources say
One year ago today ... fun find #NBATwitter
Why does Klopp have to be so likeable?
As a kid, you felt Liverpool was undethrone-able ... This season they were again ... CONGRATS on a well-earned crown One trophy each in 2019-20 and two more to play for. Here's hoping what footy does to put these games on keeps working ... and that the NBA finds the same mojo
Tweets can't do it justice ... EDERSON!
I cannot believe how good this game is ...
Man Mahrez and Sterling deserved more there ... The passing and moves City keeps stringing together with no fans in the stands to feed off: Amazing
SCRUMPTIOUS KDB!!!
We've been examining Germany's basketball bubble for hints of what life may look like inside the much bigger and far more drawn-out NBA version ... with more insight here from a trio of American players -- @_YKing20, @LCSikma43 and @jcraw55 -- and @MHP_RIESEN coach John Patrick
German basketball's @easyCreditBBL completed its final round of COVID-19 testing today with no positive tests registered by the 10 teams over three weeks of play. The two-legged tournament championship tournament pits @MHP_RIESEN against @albaberlin on Friday and Sunday
Was lucky enough to be at the 2-1 City win in person in November and was terrified every time Pulisic had the ball and, well, keeping him in the XI would probably be wise
When an American can finish like that at a level like this ... how can I even be mad at the shambolic defending and the even more diabolical kit?
This is fine ...
Dort lands a four-year deal from the Thunder worth $5.4 million, league sources say
Basketball things are happening — and they are undoubtedly fun — but positive coronavirus tests for Nikola Jokic and Malcolm Brogdon help explain why this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter stayed focused on the league’s big-picture concerns. Digital edition:
Dort signed a two-way contract with the Thunder last July and emerged as a surprise starter this season, prompting them to convert his contract into a multi-year deal. OKC is 16-5 when Dort is in the starting lineup
The Thunder have signed Lugeuentz Dort to a multi-year contract
The Knicks announce an official role for William Wesley ... who had already been heavily involved in the assembly of Leon Rose’s front office and, of course, is a big Tom Thibodeau advocate
For you, @JaredDudley619 ... only 20 days of full-speed basketball before the games start — and after the longest layoff most players have ever had — IF everything goes right Also helps to post the correct link:
Basketball things are happening — and they are fun — while big-picture matters continue to drive the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide. There are several ...
The Grizzlies make it official and announce the signing of Anthony Tolliver to a rest-of-the-season contract
On Day 1 of team-administered coronavirus testing in the NBA: According to this @azcentral report from @DuaneRankin, two Suns players have tested positive for COVID-19, in addition to the @ESPN report about Denver's Nikola Jokic testing positive in his native Serbia
Sacramento's signing of Corey Brewer and the Suns' release of Harper are the league's first official moves since the NBA transaction window that opened today at noon ET
The Suns have waived Jared Harper, league sources say
Here is @alex_ante34, youngest of the four professional basketball players in the Antetokounmpo family, confirming he is signing with @UCAMMurcia of Spain’s @ACBCOM, widely regarded as Europe’s top league
The Mavericks plan to explore the marketplace but cannot make a signing unless Lee is formally waived. As @espn_macmahon noted, Lee had a productive March for Dallas after the Mavs had previously lost two key contributors, Dwight Powell and Jalen Brunson, to long-term injuries
The Mavericks will be among the teams looking for roster reinforcements Tuesday when the NBA's one-week transaction window opens after veteran swingman Courtney Lee suffered a calf injury during the shutdown that required surgery, league sources say
The Knicks have begun interviewing head coaching candidates on a video basis and their coaching search is expected to extend into July, league sources say
The Knicks have requested and received permission to interview the Lakers' Jason Kidd for their head coaching vacancy, @NYTSports has learned
Foden! That felt like sports ...
As teams begin administering COVID-19 tests and with a Wednesday deadline for players to opt out of next month's NBA restart, we review three prime sources of apprehension among players (and in front offices) in @NYTSports' latest On Pro Basketball column:
After stints with Portland and Sacramento earlier this season, Tolliver was just completing a 10-day deal with the eighth-seeded Grizzlies when the NBA season was suspended indefinitely March 11
Anthony Tolliver and the Memphis Grizzlies have a verbal agreement on a deal that can be finalized starting Tuesday when the league's one-week transaction window opens, league sources say
The Clippers, despite just 11 points from Kawhi Leonard in Game 7, won the 2019-20 simulated NBA Finals conducted by @StratOMatic @TeamLou23 led the Clips with 23 points and @ivicazubac posted 16 and 15 in a 124-113 Game 7 virtual triumph at MIL Box:
Reposting this piece from our own @SopanDeb from Thursday on the worrisome numbers mounting in Florida and a statement from the league that it is "closely monitoring the data in Florida and Orange County" 
NBA (and MLS) stat of the week from @ByTimReynolds ... Basically one of out of every 50 coronavirus tests was positive in Orange County, Fla., as of June 6 Two weeks later it’s one out of every seven tests is positive
Free agents like Jamal Crawford, JR Smith and Nick Young -- and DeMarcus Cousins, who spent much of the season with the Lakers -- are thus eligible to sign rest-of-season deals starting Tuesday Greg Monroe, after spending the season in Germany, is back in the US but not eligible
To be eligible to sign a rest-of-season contract, players must have held an NBA or G- League contract this season ... or were NOT under contract this season with a professional team outside of the United States, league sources say
Memphis is the likely destination for Anthony Tolliver when the league's transaction window opens Tuesday, league sources say, but Tolliver has attracted interest from multiple teams Tolliver's 10-day with the Grizzlies was expiring just as the NBA season was suspended March 11
The NHL announced tonight that more than 200 players have been tested for COVID-19 since training facilities re-opened ... with 11 players testing positive and then heading into self-isolation NBA teams are scheduled to begin team-administered testing of players on Tuesday
The NBA shutdown is 100 days old ... with 41 to go until play resumes July 30 at Walt Disney World
Informative short video that shows what Bubble Ball game action looks like in Spain's freshly relaunched @ACBCOM  widely regarded as Europe's strongest league ...
Players are required to report to their teams by Monday ... with team-administered COVID-19 testing scheduled to begin Tuesday
No punishment was ever specified in the league's various memorandums to teams and players urging the players to avoid working out anywhere but team practice facilities ... because the rule, I'm told, was conceived with the intent to be protective rather than punitive ...
Such workouts and pick-up games, of course, are against league rules and have been throughout the shutdown. But there has no been no indication that any players seen active of late in various videos or still footage will be sanctioned for exposing themselves to unsafe conditions
The Sixers have lost their borderline historic home-court advantage ... but they have regained a @BenSimmons25
Kristaps Porzingis and Luka Doncic will be back in Dallas "in the next few days," Mavs owner Mark Cuban tells @NYTSports. Porzingis posted an IG story yesterday indicating he is already en route ... with teams leaguewide scheduled to begin coronavirus testing of players Tuesday
NBA spokesman Mike Bass on the layoffs: “We are restructuring certain functions at the league office to better align with changes in our business, particularly around digital media, and be well-positioned for future growth.”
The NBA today confirmed it has reduced its workforce through a round of layoffs this week The figure was estimated to be 100 employees according to Wednesday night’s report below from the @MorningConsult
The Pistons have made it official and announced the hiring of Troy Weaver as their new GM, completing the deal @NYTSports reported Sunday
Missed you, @aguerosergiokun and @PhilFoden and @ManCity
Missed you, @DeBruyneKev
Missed you, @sterling7 ...
Let’s go inside a basketball bubble that is already operational ... thanks to three Americans playing in Germany’s @easyCreditBBL: @jcraw55, @_YKing20 and @LCSikma43  @MHP_RIESEN coach John Patrick Via the digital edition of the @nytimes NBA newsletter:
It is raining in Manchester and the football's on ... Kinda forgot how to do this ...
AND: Here is the @NYTSports latest from Tuesday’s afternoon and evening flurry of memos that, at last, has painted a detailed picture of what daily life in the Disney World basketball bubble will look like —&gt;
We also speak at length with Ludwigsburg’s American coach John Patrick in search of a glimpse of what awaits NBA teams in Orlando ... freshly dispatched to inboxes tonight and going digital tomorrow
In this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter, we take a trip inside the German basketball bubble operational since June 6 to get a glimpse of what it’s like ... with insight from former NBAer @jcraw55, @nbagleague alumnus @_YKing20 and (fresh off a triple-double) @LCSikma43 ...
Team staff and players who leave the NBA campus will be subject to a quarantine period upon return as short as four days for individuals with "extenuating circumstances" and up to 10 or more days for individuals who "leave without approval," league sources say
As @NYTSports previously reported, all team staff/players must complete an in-room quarantine of at least 36 hours to register two negative COVID-19 tests Players get three freshly prepared meals a day and four on game days "in individual servings rather than buffet style"
Under player amenities: Socialization outdoors "will be encouraged" and "barbers, manicurists, pedicurists and hair braiders selected jointly with the Players Association" are being provided by the NBA, league sources say
NBA teams have today received a 33-page Player Handbook for the resumption of the season at Walt Disney World and have been advised that a "complete set of health and safety protocols" expected to exceed 100 pages will be issued "shortly," league sources say
Quick story update: @FTiafoe, @MonicaAce93, @JackSock, @milosraonic, @geniebouchard, US @DavisCup captain @MardyFish and six-time Grand Slam champion @Clijsterskim have all signed on for @WorldTeamTennis' single-site 2020 season in West Virginia from July 12-Aug. 2
The WNBA just announced that it will launch its 2020 season with a 22-game schedule in Bradenton, Fla., starting in July with players to receive "full pay"
Longtime Thunder executive Troy Weaver has emerged as the top choice in Detroit's search for a new GM, @NYTSports has learned, with the Pistons actively working to complete a deal to hire Weaver
And here's another @ScottCacciola special ... from inside an American sports bubble 
Our @ScottCacciola for @NYTObits on Harry Glickman ... the man responsible for introducing the Trail Blazers to Portland
Massive week ahead for the league and the players' union ... with official health and safety protocols that will govern the resumption of the season in Orlando still being finalized and Adam Silver appearing Monday night in a TV summit with several other pro sports commissioners
In Friday night's conference call organized by Kyrie Irving -- one week after union team reps approved the NBA's 22-team plan by a 28-0 vote -- players also voiced concerns about the restrictions of bubble life and injury risk after the longest layoff most of them have ever faced
“We understand the players’ concerns and are working with the Players Association on finding the right balance to address them." -- NBA spokesman Mike Bass on worries players have raised about diverting attention away from the Black Lives Matter movement by resuming the season
Before he became a lifelong Spur, he was a true Titan. Love the passionate message on graduation day from @Bowen12 to the Titan Tech Class of 2020!
Gregg Popovich on the fight for racial equality to our @maureendowd: “It’s even deeper than you thought, and that’s what really made me start to think: You’re a privileged son of a bitch and you still don’t get it as much as you think you do ..." More:
Russell Westbrook and Carmelo Anthony were among the prominent voices on the Kyrie Irving-organized player call tonight, league sources Chris Paul, NBPA president, took part as well
Kyrie Irving will ultimately have to explain to NBPA colleagues why he is so out front challenging a proposal he didn't push back hard on last week ... But the union will ultimately have to explain why only team reps voted on the proposal ... and why all 30 were not on the call
All the latest twists and turns in the NBA via @NYTSports ... with teams in possession of a timeline for the next four months but numerous rising player concerns to address as the wait for published safety protocols continues —&gt;
The three scrimmages for NBA teams are planned for a window from July 21-29 at the tail end of a training camp scheduled to span 20 days
In the middle of the league's timeline update to teams comes an important story from @ChrisBHaynes, raising important concerns and questions among players  including why last Friday's union vote only included team player reps rather than the broader membership
Teams are scheduled to start arriving in Orlando from July 7-9, meaning that the eight teams that reach the second round in each conference would have to wait nearly 60 days before they could be joined by guests
Aug. 30 is the first day family and friends would be allowed onto the NBA campus, league sources say
All dates subject to change, according to the league's memo to teams, but the resumption is now scheduled to span from July 30 through Oct. 13 -- two days longer than it was outlined last week
The NBA has informed its teams that negotiations with @TheNBPA on health and safety protocols for the league's planned resumption of the 2019-20 season at Walt Disney World are ongoing, league sources say
NBA head coaches, I'm told, will be allowed to start participating in individual workouts that are ongoing in team practice facilities starting June 23
NBA teams have been notified that they will be allowed to play three scrimmages at Walt Disney World between July 9-29 before the scheduled resumption of the season July 30
The latest on coronavirus cases in Orange County, Fla. -- home to Disney World and soon the NBA -- via the @orlandosentinel: “We’re on our way up,” said Dr. Raul Pino, the state health department’s officer in Orange County. “There’s no other way to describe it.”
After backing the 22-team restart via vote by team player reps, @TheNBPA said "various details remain to be negotiated" and final approval required that "all parties reach agreement on all issues relevant to resuming play" That agreement was expected by the end of this week
The current expectation is players would face an immediate quarantine in the 48-hour range upon arriving at Disney World and then be asked to spend nearly 60 days without visitors from the outside while staying within the bubble ... essentially meaning team hotels and arenas only
Concerns about the rigid rules of bubble life, as well as fears the restart could sap momentum from the Black Lives Matter movement so many NBA players are actively supporting, have led to a growing belief leaguewide that there will be players who choose not to play in Orlando
Portland's Carmelo Anthony to @TurnerSportsEJ: "As far as actually playing ... I'm still up in the air a little bit because we don't have all the details. We don't know a lot of information, so until we have that, it's kind of hard to just commit to it 100 percent"
One of the most amazing (and inspiring) pics of recent NBA vintage via @breza89 .. #thejokicdiet
Roger B and Marty Mac  legends indeed!
Hall of Fame guard Mo Cheeks reveals a powerful story here about being wrongfully detained while out on a bike ride in Miami that he "kept buried for the last 12 years" ...
As the league and union continue negotiations on the safety protocols for their Walt Disney World bubble, sources tell @NYTSports the current expectation is that players would quarantine for up to two days in their rooms on "campus" until they register two negative COVID-19 tests
In his Warriors days, Stephen Jackson was known as Captain Jack ... Today in Minneapolis, Jackson (@DaTrillStak5) is back to resume the fight for his friend George Floyd by captaining a march on the District Attorney's office ... More from @NYTSports:
June 11 means the NBA's shutdown turns three months old today ... Will be longer than the usual offseason by the time games resume
Fresh off the video of Denver’s Nikola Jokic working on what Jamal Murray (@BeMore27) described as “a little four-pack” ... Here’s @JoelEmbiid talking about working out six times a week for the past month and saying, via the @sixers, that he has “something to prove” 
The NBA latest is included here, too ...
Today is also Leon Rose's 100th day on the job as Knicks president ...
Today is one year since Kevin Durant went down in the NBA Finals. The digital version of the @nytimes NBA newsletter on Durant’s quest to become the first player to reclaim peak form post-Achilles since Dominique Wilkins and the wisdom of going slow:
Wednesday marks one year since Kevin Durant's torn Achilles in the NBA Finals This week's @nytimes NBA newsletter, freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide, details precisely why Durant's insistence on coming back next season makes so much sense ...
All 30 practice facilities in the NBA have now been unlocked for voluntary, socially distanced player workouts after San Antonio GM Brian Wright announced today on a media conference call that the Spurs are open
LaMarcus Aldridge's surgical procedure, San Antonio says, was conducted April 24
The Spurs announce that LaMarcus Aldridge will not be going to Orlando for the NBA's restart after underdoing season-ending surgery 
It was always going to be the details team player reps started hearing today about the restrictions of "campus" environment that would mean far more to them than the how-many-teams debate ... One of the key points from this week's @nytimes NBA newsletter:
Union members were advised today that family members arriving at the start of the second round of the playoffs would also have to quarantine in Orlando for seven days, league sources say
Further agreements are needed, in other words, for NBPA approval of the league's plan to insist that players stay within the confines of the NBA campus at Disney World and that family members do not arrive until the second round of the playoffs when half the teams have gone home
The NBA players union just announced that it has indeed "approved further negotiations with the NBA on a 22-team return to play scenario to restart the 2019-20 NBA season" but also noted that "various details remain to be negotiated" before full "acceptance of the scenario"
Hornets owner Michael Jordan pledges to donate $100 million over the next 10 years to organizations "dedicated to ensuring racial equality, social justice and greater access to education"
The path to getting its season and, most crucially, its business back on line has been established ... yet so much uncertainty looms Digging into the NBA's reboot with @brooksbarnesNYT for @NYTSports:
The NBA just made it official and announced the cancellation of the remainder of the 2019-20 @nbagleague season The @WNBA, meanwhile, continues to pursue a single-site return this summer after its 2020 season due to begin in May was placed on indefinite hold by the coronavirus
The NBA has just confirmed today's voting results from the owners and have labeled it "the first formal step among many to resume the season"
A considerable amount of time on today's ownership call, sources tell @NYTSports, was devoted to the most important topic in the NBA -- how deeply the killing of George Floyd in Minneapolis has affected so many players, coaches, team employees and, most of all, communities
The Knicks are now officially done with this season and poised to formally commence their coaching search ...
The NBA has taken its first signifcant step back with the owners’ landslide ratification of the league’s 22-team return plan next month in Orlando ... with the union’s turn to weigh in next up. Full @NYTSports coverage:
One bookkeeping note before we proceed to the NBA's ownership call that starts momentarily: Detroit's decision to open its practice facility today leaves San Antonio as the only team in the league yet to unlock its doors for voluntary, socially distanced player workouts
The NBA Players Association has scheduled a virtual meeting for its membership Friday to discuss the NBA's 22-team return plan that owners are scheduled to approve today, @NYTSports has learned
More on the NBA’s big vote tomorrow from @NYTSports as the league shuttered since March 11 nears a 22-team return —&gt;
Far bigger for players than the how-many-teams debate: All the yet-to-be-explained safety protocols that will be implemented for the NBA’s restart That and much more here in the digital edition of this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter —&gt;
First burst of coverage of the NBA's looming return, with updates to come from @NYTSports ...
One key element of the NBA's return-to-play plan is that it calls for best-of-seven series in every playoff round ... after concerns in the early days of the league's shutdown that the playoffs would have to be modified
The latest @nytimes NBA newsletter, after an unforeseen delay, has been dispatched at last to inboxes worldwide ... albeit with the NBA world focused on much bigger things:
Pop? On a podcast? With Kerr?
On the life and career of the great Wes Unseld ... from our @RichSandomir for @NYTObits
I only very briefly got to dabble in covering Les Boulez and the legendary Wes Unseld  so read this from DA because he has amazing tales from covering Wes' post-playing career as closely as anyone #RIP
Wes Unseld is a former MVP, NBA champion and did it all for the Washington franchise — player, coach, executive — on his way to the @Hoophall. He was 74 #RIP
Charlotte @hornets owner Michael Jordan just issued this statement on the death of George Floyd and the days of protest since: “We have had enough”
After they scored goals in the German Bundesliga today, @MarcusThuram and Jadon @Sanchooo10 paid tribute to George Floyd ... (: @guardian_sport)
Clippers coach @DocRivers:
Some wise words from Pistons coach Dwane Casey ...
The Wizards just announced that they, too, are now opening their practice facility for voluntary player workouts
If the NBA decides to invite six extra teams to Orlando on top of the 16 that held playoff berths as of March 11 ... it would give the franchises with the league's two longest postseason droughts an opportunity to end them: Sacramento at 13 seasons and counting; Phoenix at 10
If the NBA ultimately goes this route  it would increase the number of teams invited to Orlando from 20 to 22 and add Washington and Phoenix to Portland, New Orleans, Sacramento and San Antonio
And the Celtics just announced that they will open Monday for voluntary player workouts to take the list of NBA practice facilities still locked down to four 
There are now just five NBA teams that have not opened: Celtics Pistons Wizards Spurs Warriors
The Knicks say they have opened up their practice facility ...
Mark Cuban cautioned to @NYTSports that the NBA would likely need this week and next to make its "big" format decisions Bucks co-owner Marc Lasry echoed that on @CNBC, saying he anticipates a presentation of return-to-play plans on Friday's owners call and then a vote next week
The former NBA champion and current analyst Stephen Jackson (@DaTrillStak5 ) appeared on the @TODAYshow to talk about his lifelong friend George Floyd, who died this week in Minneapolis police custody ...
According to the latest in Chicago as reported by @KCJHoop, Friday is the Bulls' target to open their practice facility and leave the NBA with just six locked gyms: Celtics Knicks Wizards Pistons Spurs Warriors
The Mavericks say they are opening their practice facility Thursday to become the 23rd NBA team to unlock its doors for voluntary and socially distanced player workouts ... The seven teams that still haven't: Celtics Knicks Bulls Pistons Wizards Spurs Warriors
NBA teams were reminded last week, though, that they must adhere to and follow the current government approach to quarantines in their specific markets for players returning from abroad
The NBA has today notified its teams that players "currently outside the United States" do indeed have government clearance to re-enter the country even if they are traveling from nations under U.S. travel restrictions, league sources say
Some wonderful follow-up questions of prime record-book importance getting posed here: Does JJ Redick's personal playoff streak continue if the Pelicans make the Orlando cut as No. 18? Does the league's longest playoff drought come to an official end if the Kings are No. 19?
Reverse jinxed you to help my Blue hero Uwe ... apologies
One related matter of interest for record-book nerds (like me) who obsess about such things: If San Antonio is invited to Orlando as team No. 20 ... will that count as playoff berth No. 23 in a row?
Only two goals in the previous nine games for @Larrydn22's Schalke and up pops the American @WMckennie with a dagger header against @f95 and the boss Uwe Rosler
Prediction: The NBA invites 20 teams to Orlando 30 too many to host comfortably 24 too arbitrary  some non-playoff teams want to play and some don't 16 is fairest if all 30 can't be invited ... but 20 is the easiest compromise Top 8 in each conference and West 9-to-12
More on our weekend tennis story: @WorldTeamTennis CEO @carlossilva tells @NYTSports that the league is in talks with two-time Slam winner Naomi Osaka to play the 2020 season ... with WTT hopeful for multiple marquee signings since tour tennis is unavailable to players in July
Also curious to read the forthcoming Peltonian and Hollingerized studies on how games are called with no hostile home crowds howling at the officials ....
Reminder: All it takes is an email address, entered at the enclosed link, to get my weekly NBA newsletter from @NYTSports sent directly and expeditiously to your inbox every Tuesday:
All signs say that the NBA is coming back ... but I must confess, as I do in this week's @nytimes NBA newsletter freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide, that I feel uneasy with every dribble closer to a return 
These are interesting numbers for the NBA to study as well  even though NBA games in Orlando would be without fans AND at a neutral site: 22 "ghost" games in empty Bundesliga stadiums so far  only three home wins
The various proposals for NBA playoff formats, meanwhile, stray farther from the norm with each new submission  Which is only going to raise the volume on the asterisk talk (@NYTSports link from early April enclosed) rather than tone it down
Twenty-four of 31 teams going to the NHL playoffs and STILL not enough around my guy Jack Eichel to help him taste the postseason. Nine years in a row for #letsgobuffalo ... #sigh
The eight teams yet to open: Celtics Knicks Bulls Pistons Wizards Mavericks Spurs Warriors
The Sixers announce they will open their practice facility in Camden, N.J., on Wednesday ... taking the NBA to 22 teams with unlocked practice facilities for voluntary individual workouts
One of the finest in @csuf and @thedailytitan history and a pillar of @latimessports  desperately sad news #RIP
Amid so much chatter about the dizzying number of schedule/playoff structure formats flying around the NBA this week: Some teams expect the NBA Draft to now land in September ... with forecasts of free agency starting as late as Oct. 1 The line, of course, may keep moving
German basketball's Bundesliga will hold a three-week tournament June 6-28 to finish its season ... with 10 of 17 teams agreeing to play But Bayern Munich announced today that Greg Monroe, the league's most prominent former NBAer, will remain in the USA due to a family illness
Patrick Ewing Jr. announces that his father, Knicks legend Patrick Ewing, is "now home and getting better" after revealing he had tested positive for COVID-19
Realistically impossible, of course, for the EuroLeague to mold a "campus" with clubs from different countries ... still TBD how many basketball leagues abroad move forward with restarting their domestic competitions Germany will be the first in Europe to come back next month
Some big news in international basketball: The @EuroLeague announced today that it is canceling the rest of its 2019-20 season rather than try to reboot like the NBA hopes in late July ...
The Hornets say they, like the Nets, will open their practice facility for voluntary workouts starting Tuesday, taking the NBA up to 21 teams to have unlocked their doors ... We still await: Celtics, Knicks, 76ers, Bulls, Pistons, Wizards, Mavericks, Spurs and Warriors
Andrew Bogut expounds here on putting his basketball career on hold 
After Governor Cuomo’s announcement earlier today, Nets say they will open their practice facility for voluntary player workouts Tuesday:
I think this means former world No. 7, US @DavisCup captain and renowned @Timberwolves superfan @MardyFish is also playing @WorldTeamTennis ...
The 11 NBA teams, entering the weekend, that had yet to fully open their practice facilities for voluntary player workouts: Celtics Nets Knicks 76ers Bulls Pistons Hornets Wizards Mavericks Spurs Warriors
For SportsMonday in the @nytimes: @WorldTeamTennis picks The Greenbrier in West Virginia to host its 2020 season featuring the likes of @AustralianOpen champ @SofiaKenin, former @usopen champ @SloaneStephens and doubles kings @Bryanbros  @Bryanbrothers —&gt;
New York's Governor Cuomo says the state's professional sports teams can now open their training facilities ... Nets and Knicks are among the 11 NBA teams yet to open
The ledge (and my City fave) Uwe Rosler managing @f95 against @benbeckertennis' FC Koln in a live game right now ... MOST welcome Sunday morning fare! Faux crowd noise on the broadcast for this one as well ... and as some smarter tweeters have noted the players do not hear it
Piped-in crowd noise in the Bundesliga seems to work (for some) ... although I'm eager to hear players reaction Piped-in NBA acoustics would surely be different -- organ, stadium music, etc. Also lots of NBA fans may well prefer hearing the "real" sounds of a gym without fans
Tennis news dribbling in: @WorldTeamTennis is poised to announce The Greenbrier resort in West Virginia as its single-site home for the 2020 season July 12-Aug. 1, @NYTSports has learned WTT features top men's and women's pros in a three-week league every July after Wimbledon
Note that the NBA statement says “late July” ... indicating that a return to actual games is likely to be slightly later than many around the league have been anticipating
The NBA says it has begun talks with Disney, one of its two main television partners, to restart the remainder of the 2019-20 season in late July at the Wide World of SPORTS Complex in Orlando as “the single site for an NBA campus.” Statement from league spokesman Mike Bass:
For Sunday’s @nytimes co-scribed with @ByJamesWagner: Athletes and coaches — especially those with underlying health conditions — have much to consider as various sports in North America shut down by the coronavirus move closer to reopening —&gt;
No fans at games in Germany? In response, 13,000 Borussia Monchengladbach fans ordered cardboard cutouts of themselves to be placed in stadium seats ...
Patrick Ewing announces he has tested positive for COVID-19 ...
League sources say NBA teams have been informed they would likely be allowed to bring (roughly) 35 players/coaches/staff into a "campus" environment if the 2019-20 season, as increasingly expected, resumes in July In normal circumstances, team travel parties routinely exceed 50
Wonderful four-minute film on Jerry Sloan  as consistent in his approach, first as a rugged player and then as a legendary coach, as the NBA has ever seen
Bundesliga soccer returns this afternoon and NBA teams are monitoring health developments as well as match-day operations with fan-less games There were in the range of 15 soft-tissue injuries in Germany's top two divisions as they got back to full speed after such a long layoff
Important to remember that, before the Pop, Timmy and David Spurs became a model franchise, Utah was their blueprint ... largely because of how tough and good Stockton, Malone and Sloan were for so long (as explained further in this excerpt from 2014:
The Jazz announce the death of legendary coach Jerry Sloan at 78 after a battle with Parkinson's disease
A New Yorker who detoured to Dallas and became as Sacramento as the Kings themselves  #RIP
Bucks co-owner Marc Lasry told @CNBC today that the NBA's Board of Governors are scheduled to meet via teleconference next Friday (May 29) and said: "I think we're getting a lot closer."
Many around the league have been buzzing about the same rough timeframe described in this tweet ... practices that would launch one month from now ... with an NBA season resumption date in the July 15 range ...
One of the most beloved figures to ever enter an NBA press room ... and as synonymous with the Kings in his heyday as any player #MartyInTheMento #RIP 
The debate it really settled: A realm without a Mediadel is boring and sad 
Fun street to live on ...
Along with this timely picture of Devin Booker ... add Phoenix to the list of teams (now up to 19) inviting players back for voluntary individual workouts -- except the Suns are using the old Veterans Memorial Coliseum while Talking Stick Resort Arena undergoes renovations
Last word on “The Last Dance” and a basketball public that just wanted Michael Jordan in that chair via any means necessary ... via the digital version of the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter:
The Timberwolves are opening their practice facility to players for voluntary workouts on THURSDAY, taking the league’s total to 18 teams that have unlocked their doors ...
Thanks, BG. You and the former California Oranges star inspired me to find a wall hit ...
Roger B. was a fixture on the NBA beat in Dallas for many, many years  way too soon #RIP
Horace Grant holds nothing back as a media critic ...
Freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide: My last word on “The Last Dance” and a tribute to the late Malik Sealy as we approach 20 years since Silk’s tragic death ... all in the latest @nytimes NBA newsletter 
Finalizing a detailed set of safety protocols a la MLB Establishing consistent, leaguewide COVID-19 testing guidelines for all 30 teams Determining whether all 30 teams or just playoff teams (or a mix) would be summoned to play in the NBA's "campus" environment (2/2)
Some of the key return-to-play items that the NBA continues to work on as it weighs restarting the season in July: Settling on a game venue(s) -- Orlando said to be in the lead and Vegas still vying Pinpointing dates for teams to start reporting to a centralized site (1/2)
Among NBA return-to-play scenarios being discussed, league sources say, is a template calling for teams to conduct Training Camp 2.0 in their own practice facilities before heading to one or two centralized sites to resume play, with Orlando and Las Vegas still vying for games
Something to monitor for any North American sports league with a team in Canada ...
Down to four teams in @StratOMatic's simulation of the NBA playoffs: Bucks v Celtics in the East finals Lakers v Clippers in the West Milwaukee went 9-1 in the first two rounds; Boston ousted both Philly and Toronto Houston had a 3-2 lead over the Lakers in Round 2
Yankees legend Reggie Jackson turned 74 today  In this late February edition of the @nytimes NBA newsletter, we visited with @mroctober to try to learn how a team copes with unspeakable tragedy:
White House discourse on the Houston Rockets 
The Thunder announced today that they have opened their practice facility for voluntary workouts ... taking the NBA's total to 17 of 30 teams allowing players to start working their way back
Gentry (65) is one of three active NBA coaches in that club alongside San Antonio's Gregg Popovich (71) and Houston's Mike D'Antoni (69) "I'm going to approach it with caution," Gentry said, "but I will be immersed in it totally from a competitive standpoint and everything else"
New Orleans @PelicansNBA coach Alvin Gentry tells @NYTSports that CDC warnings about the increased vulnerability to COVID-19 for those 65 and over will "not stop me from doing my job one bit" if the NBA can successfully resume its 2019-20 season
Steve and I have discussed it a few times  and I am (almost) over it
NBA teams that have either already opened their practice facilities or will be open for voluntary workouts as of Monday: Cavaliers Trail Blazers Nuggets Grizzlies Heat Magic Bucks Raptors Hawks Pacers Jazz Kings Lakers Clippers Rockets Pelicans
The Clippers have announced that they are the latest NBA team that will open their practice facility for workouts starting Monday ...
The two Game 7s in their title run  you're right
Not long after Chicago narrowly beat Larry Bird-coached Indiana in one of just two Game 7s that the Jordan Bulls faced in the 1990s 
Few bigger winners in The Last Dance than Philip Douglas Jackson  One more time from @NYTSports:
Still can't believe the way MJ trash talked Larry Legend ... And Karl Malone going on the Bulls' bus to congratulate them personally Powerful scenes
The reality is that the cigar cutter injury Michael suffered during the lockout likely would have ruined them in 1999 even if they had all come back for one more ... But the Bulls, remember, broke this up before that injury happened
Don't normally defend the Long Beach guy ... but @BRuss3 drew the foul there ... #pushedoff
Has anyone on Planet Hoop ever dared to speak to Larry Legend like that? Man ...
I really thought Reggie was gonna retire Michael Jordan, too Ridiculously good series and grateful to have been there ...
Last Bundesliga game of the day about to kick off and Eintracht Frankfurt is using the Bulls' glory-days intro music ...
Think this means he's gonna let his boots do the talking ...
Scores ... from real games:
Haaland toying with Schalke
There HAS to be a way to go around the grounds at halftime and give us scores, highlights, just reading summaries of the other matches ... SOMETHING Did the Bundesliga not know the world would be watching today? Again: We need Toby Charles
Something tells me, as invested as an American audience is in the players, that an NBA game where we can hear the chatter on the floor will be welcomed much more than this, uh, atmosphere
We need Toby Charles ...
EERIE in this cavernous stadium ... but I suspect most of us will take it And, yes, of course it's GIO and I can't type at this hour
Cannot believe there's a game on ... no fans and not many words Brutal, though, that American teen-ager Go Reyna got injured in the warm-up and is out of the Dortmund XI
Happy 80th birthday to the one-of-a-kind Don Arvid Nelson ...
No one knows the Americans abroad, especially what they're up to in the Bundesliga, like my pal (and an @ESPNSoccerToday favorite) Sciaretta ... If you're looking for American rooting interests when the German footy kicks off tomorrow  here's a good breakdown:
Such a detailed and educational retrospective here from our @RichSandomir on the life of former ABA commissioner and longtime team executive Mike Storen ... also the father of one of the game's finest voices: @HannahStormESPN
In recent calls with both players and team owners, Adam Silver brought up the Bundesliga's return as a league the NBA is monitoring for study ... On the personal side: Never really had my own Bundesliga club but naturally drawn now to @f95 -- with the ledge Uwe Rosler as manager
As a soccer fan in the USA in the 1970s, Soccer Made In Germany with the legendary Toby Charles on @PBS was pretty much all we had on TV ... Now the @Bundesliga_EN is the world's first major sports league coming back after two L-O-N-G months.  for a safe return tomorrow ...
Bob Watson was an All-Star and a World Series-winning GM and a Bad News Bears legend forever thanks to two unforgettable lines ... #RIP
The NBA can certainly come back — but can it stay back? Digging into the Money vs. Safety calculus confronting everyone in the league ... via @NYTSports (and with some pertinent excerpts!) —&gt;
The NBA will also switch to Wilson for the @WNBA and the @nbagleague ...
The NBA makes it official and announces it is switching the league’s ball from Spalding back to Wilson starting with the 2021-22 season ...
Spalding has been the NBA’s official ball since 1983 ... to go back to Wilson, as Haynes reports here, is a biggie
The famed @DrewLeague in Los Angeles just announced the cancellation of its 2020 summer season 
Breaking down the Money vs. Safety calculus that, in the Coronavirus Era, now grips this whole league ... via the digital edition of this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter —&gt;
Can the NBA actually stay back this summer after the comeback it hopes to make? We dive into all the health-and-safety concerns in this week's edition of the @nytimes NBA newsletter ... freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide 
Obviously not the NBA’s biggest problem at the moment, but state-run TV in China (CCTV) has announced that it will continue to keep the league off its air in the wake of Daryl Morey’s tweet about Hong Kong last fall ...
Inspiring picture to help you work through writer’s block ...
March 11 to May 11 ... two months, officially, for the NBA's shutdown
Best plan yet ...
Sport ... (Good Sunday night)
The memes meme themselves ...
Can't believe how fast we've mowed through eight of these already ...
Could really use a Tim Grover body-reconstruction session  or 23
I stand corrected  there was a penalty (of sorts)
Funny how the whole "you have to wait until the following season to change your number" rule didn't apply to His Airness
MJ might have a Competition Problem ...
Michael on LaBradford Smith: "I made it up"
Episode 7: Tears BREAK
Kerr drive and dish!
Thank you, Andy Thompson
Still can't believe he got through the whole season in Class AA after more than a decade without touching a bat or glove. Homered in August nearly two weeks after MLB had gone on strike. INSANE
Imagining how Michael Jordan's baseball career would have been covered in the social media era is a pretty delicious what-if in itself
John Calipari's Nets 
Alex Antetokounmpo, Giannis' younger brother, announced he will play in Europe next season to prepare for the 2021 NBA Draft "I was born and raised in Europe, I know European basketball ..." @alex_ante34 told @Eurohoopsnet of playing abroad for a year over the NCAA or G League
First edition @NYTSports story on NBA practice facilities opening today in Cleveland and Portland ... with updates to come —&gt;
Cavs players submitted to temperature and symptom checks and each wrote their number on two basketballs in thick Sharpie ink so no one else uses them After roughly 90 minutes of weights and shooting, Nance said: "It was more for mental health than physical to be honest with you"
Cleveland's Larry Nance Jr. (@Larrydn22) to @NYTSports on returning to the team's practice facility today: "It was wonderful." Nance was in the Cavs' first group of the day alongside Kevin Love, Cedi Osman and Ante Zizic. "All of us actually shot it really well," Nance said.
On the plus side: There was live televised sport in America today on @TennisChannel and the big Bulls fan @ReillyOpelka was a big part of it #thankyoutennis
Admission virtually no NBA scribe has made since 1983: Tonight marks a stunning 57th straight night NOT in a Marriott
Good Woy-key stuff on one of the NBA's fun 1990s fables 
The Cavs say their official policy will be to NOT discuss who shows for workouts because the league deemed these strictly voluntary. Mr. Vardon has supplied three new names here after Larry Nance Jr. told @NYTSports yesterday that he would go in on Day 1
Orlando is targeting Tuesday for opening its doors after receiving authorization from Dr. Raul Pino of the Orange County Department of Health that asymptotic COVID-19 testing is robust in Orange County (Fla.) ... thus allowing the Magic to administer tests to facility entrants
You're a pretty lucky intern to enter the highly intimidating world of the Frank Robinson Orioles and be able to watch and learn from Cal State Fullerton's own Peter @SchmuckStop and @Ken_Rosenthal Congrats Pete ... one of the best (and best Titans) to ever do it!
Fifty years to the day that the Knicks won their first championship with a Game 7 rout of the Lakers on May 8, 1970, @NYTSports brings you two remembrances ... From the HoF'er Harvey Araton (@AratonHj): And from me:
It is doubly significant because Nance suffers from Crohn's disease, which is typically treated with immunosuppressive medication that can make Crohn's sufferers more vulnerable to infections. But Nance says he has confidence in the drug (Remicade) he takes to combat Crohn's
The Cleveland Cavaliers' Larry Nance Jr. tells @NYTSports that he plans to go into the Cavaliers' practice facility Friday when the Cavs join Portland and Denver as the first three teams to open their doors for voluntary individual workouts on the NBA's first allowable day
Caruso ... KDB ... just two Blues hangin' out
The latest from Germany from my colleague @tariqpanja. The sports world will be watching to see how this plays out ...
Hojo Beck ... voice actor We've heard it all now
Yet we repeat -- referring to the league's own words in its Tuesday night memo to teams -- all plans related to Friday's targeted opening of practice facilities in states with eased shelter-in-place restrictions are "pending new developments"
Portland and Denver have confirmed tonight that, like the Cavaliers, both plan to unlock their doors Friday and make it at least three NBA teams preparing to open their practice facilities for voluntary individual workouts on the league's first allowable day
The Rockets are among the NBA teams that can open their practice facility Friday, but a team spokeswoman tells @NYTSports that Houston plans to wait until May 18 -- in accordance with Texas Governor Greg Abbott allowing gyms to re-open statewide that day
Any NBA practice facility that re-opens for these voluntary workouts must: Limit occupancy to a maximum of four players at any one time Enforce a one-player-per-basket rule Prevent head coaches, front-row assistants and front-office staff from participating in workouts
Multiple teams that would be allowed to open Friday based on the NBA's latest pronouncements, including Orlando and Dallas, have said they are still gathering information and have yet to establish a firm date to re-open
As @NYTSports reported last night, NBA teams were notified Tuesday evening that the league remains intent and on course to let practice facilities open in "jurisdictions in which that is permitted" ... "pending new developments" between now and Friday
The Cavaliers, according to a team spokesman, will indeed make their practice facility open to players Friday for voluntary workouts ... once the league makes it official and allows facilities to re-open in states (like Ohio) where shelter-in-place restrictions have been eased
Elite-level sport for the NBA and other North American sports leagues to study is one significant step closer to resuming in Germany later this month 
Friday marks 50 years since the Knicks clinched their first championship, so we dialed up Spike Lee and Marv Albert for their best recollections from inside Madison Square Garden ... via the digital edition of this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter —&gt;
NBA teams will receive a further update Wednesday on the various specifics involved, league sources say, with any strength and conditioning activities (such as weightlifting with a spotter) prohibited if it requires players and staff members to be closer than 12 feet apart
The NBA, I'm told, just notified its teams that it intends to allow practice facilities in states where shelter-in-place regulations have been eased to re-open Friday as planned ... "pending new developments"
Freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide is a slew of stories from Spike and Marv ... including this tale from “the voice of the NBA” about a special assignment from Wilt Chamberlain back when Marv was a Knicks ballboy ...
Today we press pause on the usual Knicks discourse because it's their time to bask in the Nostalgia Spotlight ... Friday marks 50 years since the Knicks won it all in 1970 ... and we've got stories galore from Spike Lee and Marv Albert in this week's @nytimes NBA newsletter:
Orlando, for example, would have the right to open up Friday if the NBA maintains its current schedule ... but a team spokesman says the Magic are still gathering details on making a re-opening work as smoothly as possible for players and staff and do not yet have a set timetable
If the NBA sticks with the current timetable to have practice facilities re-open Friday in states where shelter-in-place restrictions have eased, remember: Player participation is voluntary Only a max of four players can be in any facility at once ... and only ONE per basket
Even in states with eased shelter-in-please restrictions, early indications are that some teams are likely to wait until next week to re-open their practice facilities The NBA must first officially allow facilities to re-open on a limited basis ... which is scheduled for Friday
Brazil's NBB announced Monday that it is canceling the rest of its 2019-20 season ... Last week we shared the story of former Sun and Warrior Leandro Barbosa testing positive for COVID-19, alongside his pregnant wife, after the NBB halted play in March:
Starting a pro career in France worked out OK for a Titan named Bruce @Bowen12. Your turn, @JacksonRaw
In Germany, more players test positive for COVID-19 as the Bundesliga tries to stay on course to become the world's first sports league of stature to resume operations. Our @tariqpanja continues to be at the forefront of the coverage here ...
Week 8 sans hoop is upon us ... Is 51 too old for a mullet?
The best line in the story is now also on Twitter 
When is @SkySportsNews coming back on @NBCSports? Surely there is still an hour a day somewhere in the schedule for the updates we need on what's happening throughout Europe
A look at how the COVID-19 outbreak has forced NBA stars to take it outside more than ever before ... alongside @ScottCacciola for SportsMonday in the @nytimes and with visits from @JimmyButler @MeyersLeonard @NikolaVucevic @pconnaughton and @JCrossover —&gt;
Let's not forget that the Suns were without the injured Cedric Ceballos of Fullerton State that whole series
The Knicks of New York, BTW, made the playoffs every season during the 1990s
"I have a competition problem"
Miss you @CNN Sports Tonight
Glass always takes the drink to a higher level
The way Kukoc bounced back from this Olympic baptism let you know how great he really was
No amount of success ever gets No. 23 to stop thinking he's being disrespected ...
PS -- That Converse commercial felt groundbreaking in the moment
BREAKING: Michael Jordan really did prefer Adidas before he signed with Nike
Footage! Give me all the previously unseen trash talk please
Man today was a long day 'til now ...
One of the few flaws of 1980s NBA fandom  too many years without @Topps and not enough basketball cards
Catching up with the simulated NBA playoffs from @StratOMatic ... Dallas wins a Game 7 on the road in OT at Denver, Toronto/Boston and Milwaukee/Indiana are the East matchups in Round 2 and Houston plays host to Utah in a Game 7 for the right to face the Lakers in Round 2
Great memories ... thanks for posting. Oh how I loved the famous font and stately nature of the old bylines in the @dallasnews
My @NYTSports colleague @KevinMDraper has details from MGM's proposal to the NBA/WNBA, NHL and others pitching one fully quarantined campus and a block of the Las Vegas Strip for a league (or maybe leagues) to try resume play --&gt;
"Hot Together" would get my vote  but these were all sensational. @cedricmaxwell81 got some good run here 
A positive to take from this is the fact that delaying the draft lottery reinforces that the NBA hopes to restart this season with regular-season games Can't have a draft lottery until the 2019-20 NBA standings are final ... and they are clearly not final
As discussed last night ... this is now official: The NBA has formally notified its teams that it is postponing this month's draft lottery and NBA Draft combine in Chicago
Germany's Bundesliga was the first league of stature planning to restart this month (no fans). FC Koln just announced three new positive cases among players/staff after tests Thursday  highlighting just how difficult it is to combat COVID-19 at even the highest levels of sport
Live exhibition tennis on German clay on @TennisChannel? Players I've never heard of? LIVE? Of course I'm watching!
As long hope persists for the resumption of the NBA season -- and the league, as discussed earlier, intends to give the current season every chance to be restored in some fashion -- teams understand that this month's lottery (and potentially the June 25 draft) will have to wait
Likely among the first issues to confront: The NBA will have to make formal decisions on its May 19 draft lottery and the May 21-24 draft combine in Chicago. It is expected both events will soon be postponed officially
The calendar has flipped to May 1 and a month expected to nudge the NBA into some firm decision-making about various aspects of the 2019-20 season is upon us ... after Adam Silver insisted on an April of "listening mode"
More from Leandro Barbosa on his family's recent COVID-19 saga in Brazil in his chat with my guys @LaurenceScott and @warriorsvox 
Earlier today Taiwan Beer finished off the Super Basketball League season we've been monitoring with a 39-point trouncing of the Yulon Luxgen Dinos in a closed-door, fanless Game 7. Highlights below ... with the original @NYTSports story on the SBL here:
I really, really, really love this show ...
My sense is that, at league level, they see no downside to trying to salvage some semblance of a "representative conclusion" to this season while also preparing as much as they can for next season. It's not looked at as one or the other ... at least not yet
Meanwhile ... stunning developments here. Stunning! Quite honored ... as well as awestruck by Centaur Windhorst
Quite a forceful statement from LeBron James as the NBA shutdown dribbles toward the two-month mark: "As soon as it’s safe we would like to finish our season," @KingJames tweeted. "I’m ready and our team is ready. Nobody should be canceling anything"
While baseball's Hall of Fame has postponed its 2020 induction ceremonies in July, basketball's @Hoophall remains hopeful that it can still go ahead with its scheduled events -- featuring the inductions of Kobe Bryant, Tim Duncan and Kevin Garnett -- as scheduled in late August
Some really moving stuff here from an array of 1980s Celtics legends on the former @bostonherald beat writer Mike Carey ... #RIP
At my first summer league in 1989, in an era when it wasn't heavily covered, Bob Ford was the first big-time NBA writer I met and incredibly gracious in giving guidance to a very intimidated college kid covering the pros for the first time. Will never forget that, sir. Thank you!
Playing against Arsenal at lunchtime and then flying to New York to watch LeBron James that same day? That’s the sort of NBA superfan we found in @RealMadrid’s @thibautcourtois ... here in the digital version of this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter —&gt;
Dr. Anthony Fauci, in a new interview with our @ByJamesWagner and @el_belson, says: “I would love to be able to have all sports back. But as a health official and a physician and a scientist, I have to say, right now, when you look at the country, we’re not ready for that yet"
Freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide: Real Madrid’s @thibautcourtois explains his Twitch channel devoted to @NBA2K ... and why he has to find a way, whenever he gets a few days off during the season, to fly to the States to see some live hoop no matter how much jet lag results
In a sportswriting and Zoom call first: @nytimes scribe with a @csuf hat from the 70s interviews world-class goalkeeper wearing a 1-of-1 @JmCalderon Atlanta Hawks game-worn jersey. The story of my visit with Real Madrid’s @thibautcourtois tops this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter
In Taiwan, at least, Game 7 of the Super Basketball League finals will be played Thursday after Yulon (featuring @Marcus3Keene and @SimBhullar2) forced a Game 7 against Taiwan Beer (led by Kentrell Barkley) ... with Keene scoring 46 points in Game 6
The merits of moving cautiously in trying to combat COVID-19, as seen from the @NBA in its reluctance to commit to next steps, seem to be highlighted by the fickle nature of "clarity" in European soccer ... as our @RorySmith explains here 
When the coronavirus ran down one of the fastest players in NBA history and the symptoms hit him the hardest, former Suns and Warriors guard Leandro Barbosa feared the worst ...
One of the most popular Warriors from their big run — Leandro @TheBlurBarbosa — shares the scary tale of he and wife Talita contracting COVID-19 days before she was to give birth ... Mom, Dad &amp; Baby Isabela are all healthy and together now. For @NYTSports:
A summary of the guidelines direct from the NBA:
Even if this plan goes into effect on May 8, league officials say NBA players will continue to be barred from working out anywhere besides their own team's practice facility -- no health clubs, fitness centers, gyms, college facilities "or the like"
If a team's practice facility is in a city no longer subject to a stay-at-home, starting on the target date of May 8, the NBA is planning to allow teams up to a maximum four players in the facility at once for workouts or treatment "on a voluntary/individual basis"
The NBA has informed its teams it is targeting May 8 as the earliest date for opening practice facilities in states where stay-at-home restrictions have been eased, league sources say
This follows Mavericks owner Mark Cuban telling CNN on Sunday: “The minute it’s safe we want to get back and get the guys practicing and getting ready for games. But we’re not there yet.” Teams are expecting official guidance from the league this week
Hawks GM Travis Schlenk says in the enclosed interview that Atlanta has "no plans" to open their practice facility Friday -- even if the NBA officially clears teams this week to do so in states (like Georgia) where stay-at-home restrictions have been eased
The furious day-after debate about handshakes from a couple NBA playoff series in 1988 and 1991 would suggest the following: We miss sports
Or SHAKEN if I actually I remembered English
Michael's right (Pistons should have shook their hands) ... And Isiah's right (Celtics invented it)
Tex put the T in Triangle
It was #thisleague back then, too
I'd you care to read more about the coach who let Dennis Rodman leave his team for 48 sleepless hours in Vegas in the middle of the season ...
Harp ... #truthteller
That press-row beat writer story @SamSmithHoops just told ... gold
Best decade in league history don't @ me
Anstey was always ready to scrap with Dennis  they got into it more than once
Am I about to get overly excited watching this sequence from the 63-point game with the soundtrack starring LL Cool J and Jim Durham for the 23rd time in a week? Yes ... yes I am
Rodman, for the record, averaged 14.3 rebounds over those 12 games with his hometown Mavericks at age 38  and here's a picture of him with the jersey that never was ...
Also want to thank @dallasnews for re-publishing my game story from Rodman's Mavs debut a few years back. Forgot until I re-read it that I was fortunate enough to be waved into the workout room that night to pull off a highly unexpected #Rodmansidle
Rodman, 38, was abruptly waived. Cuban was (narrowly) approved as an NBA owner by some uneasy peers a month later. The following season Dallas halted a playoff drought that spanned a decade with the first of 11 50-win seasons in a row, led by Dirk, Steve Nash and Michael Finley
Last straw: After a loss that dropped Dallas to 3-9, Rodman blasted Cuban for being too close to the team "like Jerry Jones" and ripped virtually everyone on the roster by saying the Mavs needed “a backup center, a starting center, a true power forward, a couple of guards”
Rodman liked to shower before games (often while Nellie gave instructions) and skip showers afterward to lift weights. He got ejected twice in 12 games, suspended once for sitting on the floor and averaged 11.2 RPG over 29 of the longest days in team (and beat writing) history
On one morning Don Nelson scrapped shootaround, Dirk Nowitzki was working out with shot doctor Holger Gescwindner when Rodman strolled in. Dennis went from basket to basket at the Landry Center hurling the ball as hard as he could at the glass to work on rebounding ... by himself
Rodman requested No. 69 when he joined the Mavs. They even printed up a few jerseys which I'm told Mark Cuban still has -- Cuban had just struck a deal to buy the team but was not fully ratified yet as the new owner The NBA vetoed that number. Rodman went with No. 70 ... 69  1
Saving most of it for the doc on @dennisrodman’s real last dance with the Dallas Mavericks in the 1999-2000 season, but I figured tonight is a good night to share a few Rodman stories from his 12-game stint as a Mav before he is featured in the MJ doc ... along with this pic:
From Tim Duncan's 44th birthday yesterday ... our latest in a series of pieces on the 2020 @Hoophall class tells the story of Timmy's signature bank shot 
Here is @MalikRose, now an assistant GM for the @DetroitPistons, with some history on Duncan’s bank shot:
Tim Duncan turned 44 today. As part of our ongoing series on the 2020 @Hoophall class, here is my ode to Duncan's timeless (and peerless) bank shot: (H/T @MalikRose for the origin story I had never heard ... AND H/T @MicahAdams13 for the Timmy stat gold)
Print headline in @nytimes SportsSaturday was too good not to share one more time  My piece on Raptors coach Nick Nurse and his longtime "mentor" Phil Jackson and how The Last Dance brings Phil's legacy full triangle:
Here’s Dennis and Madonna leaving the same game (April 24, 1994) at the Sports Arena .... with the photo taken by who else but the seen-it-all Andy Bernstein (@ADBPhotoInc)
Unforgettable day: 71 for @DavidtheAdmiral Robinson, Luke (@JLEnterprises) coaching, Madonna in the visitors' locker room at the old Sports Arena to see @dennisrodman  and a punk kid in the bottom right corner giddy to write about the Spurs when they were (get this) circus-like
Heading into episodes of The Last Dance spotlighting @dennisrodman and @PhilJackson11 ... here is our @NYTSports deep dive into how much this doc will do for Phil — plus the backstory of his friendship with another championship coach: Toronto’s Nick Nurse:
Thanks for the invite, Sanja and @24UR. Hopefully someday I can visit Ljubljana for real to work on it  OSTANITE ZDRAVI
Union president Paul also insisted that the NBA -- if it can resurrect this season -- will not rush training to get to games: "That's not going to happen. Whatever the amount of time is, just know that players will have the input, the say-so, because we're the ones playing'"
Chris Paul of @TheNBPA speaks often with Adam Silver amid the NBA shutdown and gave this update Wednesday via conference call: "This is a situation where no one knows. The virus is actually in complete control ... it's not like I've got the answers and I'm just not telling you"
Congrats to the Mavs' tireless @scootertomlin -- diehard-est Bengals fan I know -- on the drafting of his franchise savior
My man @michaelirvin88 winning the draft so far #energy
Earlier this week, @SBondyNYDN reported on the mutual interest between Clippers assistant Ty Lue and Kyrie Irving in a potential Brooklyn reunion after their time together in Cleveland. Golden State assistant coach Mike Brown is another name to monitor ...
The Nets' process to name a full-time replacement for Kenny Atkinson is not expected to hit top speed until this season is either completed or canceled, but they have been collecting names and, at this juncture, Tom Thibodeau is believed to be solely a Knicks candidate
Tyronn Lue, Jason Kidd, Mark Jackson, Jeff Van Gundy and the incumbent interim coach Jacque Vaughn are among the names on the Nets' developing list of coaching candidates, league sources say
Makin' us quit live sports cold was not nice 
Not sad about growing up in the '80s CONT'  watch Bernard King and World B. Free on the same Warriors squad  and listen to vintage Chick Hearn on the call
One approach: Reports of the NHL's potential July return in a few "bubble" arenas are openly circulating Another: The NBA has consciously downplayed talk of return timetables. Adam Silver said Friday they're only listening to bubble ideas and not "yet" seriously pursuing them
Watching “The Last Dance,” says Toronto’s Nick Nurse, is like “reliving my own life” as a huge Phil Jackson fan in England in the 1990s ... one example why the MJ doc is huge for Phil, too. More in the digital edition of the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter:
This is a concern that G League teams are sure to echo ...
One unknown variable: How close (or, rather, far away) the NBA is from ridding itself of the one-and-done rule. Another: Finding enough G-League veterans interested in launching their pro coaching/personnel careers by filling out these rosters in mentoring roles
How quickly that can actually happen will naturally depend on how Year 1 goes with Green and @zaytodd and the select team scheduled to debut in the @nbagleague next season ... but the NBA has been discussing the pursuit of enough players for four or five such teams in the future
The NBA has long-range hopes of growing its G League "Select Team" concept starring @JalenGreen into a "division" within the @nbagleague featuring multiple teams that can play against each other, league sources say
The newsletter, freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide, also tells the story of Raptors coach Nick Nurse following Phil for years from afar ... and then getting the chance to huddle with him in Montana shortly after getting the Toronto job
From the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter: Phil Jackson is responsible for the name of Michael Jordan's documentary ... and will benefit from the doc hugely after the focus for years was far more on his Knicks tenure than his coaching successes
Yet I think it will always remain one of the NBA's great What Ifs: What happens if the Bulls extend Scottie when they could have in 1995 before he became terminally unhappy in Chicago? As old as the Bulls may have looked by the end of "The Last Dance" they still MJ/Scottie/Kukoc
Must-listen stuff from Sam -- who was obviously there for all of it -- on his long-held contention that Micahel Jordan and Phil Jackson wanted the Bulls' breakup in 1998 as much as anyone ... in part because Phil felt he shouldn't coach any one team for more than seven years
From our own @SopanDeb 
Scottie signed the deal he signed, which Jeff notes was favorable at the beginning, while MJ could have intervened and didn't But Pip was simply too important to the Bulls -- and specifically MJ -- for them not to try to get ahead of his peak unhappiness. They had that chance
But Jerry Reinsdorf famously had a "no renegotiation" policy as he acknowledged in the documentary ... and that, on this scorecard, goes down as the Bulls' mistake  while acknowledging that Scottie (and frankly MJ) could have handled things better here, too
Jeff has done the exercise we needed last night by reviewing Scottie Pippen's contact situation and notes that there was a window for the Bulls to extend Scottie in the 1995  not before the 1997-98 season
Some great tales from Chicago's glory days from my former Rio Olympics colleague @mkisaacson  who was a fixture on the Bulls' beat throughout the MJ era
UPDATE: That was the fastest two hours in NBA history ... plus that tweet about Scott Pippen's voice
Not sad about growing up in the '80s
30-52 and had the Celtics SHOOK
Jim Durham's silky Bulls play-by-play ... what an honor to work with and know him
Can't fully remember the cap rules back then and how hard or easy re-negotation actually was ... but the Bulls willingly let Scottie's unhappiness fester ... knowing MJ's favorite all-time teammate was unhappy. That's on them
BTW: Pippen has the best voice in NBA history
Jerry Krause did do the draft-night dealing to make Scottie a Bull. Let's not forget that
Forgot how heartbreaking Scottie's childhood was ...
Sirius ... The Alan Parsons Project ... #magic
That song ...
And few bantered better than @HARPER04_5 and MJ "Don't let Jerry get it" ... MJ on the McDonald's Open trophy and, of course, Jerry Krause
Bench banter is gold
Don't want commercials, either, but man ... we're already down to nine of these
These episodes are going too fast #TheLastDance
Make that MJ next to Cal State Fullerton's Leon Wood, his backcourt mate, arm-in-arm on the track in triumph at the '84 Olympics @csuf #titantech
Chicago Sting! @MISL! #drink
Very sad and not fair Jerry Krause isn't here to speak for himself  but I doubt time would heal any of the wounds in the Bulls' locker room or coaches' office
Not sure any team in NBA history has had a unifying force greater than those Bulls did in their collective contempt for their own GM ...
Tipoff ...
No detailed spoilers here. Just have to say ... chapeau in advance to my guy @jadande and the old heads @davidaldridgedc, @RealMikeWilbon, @SamSmithHoops and Brian McIntyre. They are all really, really good in this and remember a lot
Basketball-on-TV anticipation feels prettay, prettay good
Here’s @NBATVAhmad Rashad on footage that sat in the league vault for 20 years ... and Andy Thompson on Rashad introducing him to MJ .... and MJ revealing his mother once scolded him for spelling his name “Mychal” like Andy’s brother @champagnennuts ... all from @NYTSports:
With seven hours to go  our @nytimes preview of The Last Dance The great @Wesley_Morris' review: On Andy Thompson, Mychal's brother, Klay's uncle and cut by three NBA teams, making hoop history of his own as the project's spark:
One of the few things that must be close to unanimous  even #onhere: It is impossible not to get hyped when you hear the Bulls' intro music
Top left should be Kenny Reeves. Or Artis Gilmore Also: No @CarsonsRibs?
If a box-score fix can help you on what should have been Day 1 in the NBA playoffs  go to @StratOMatic for their first four simulated playoff games: Magic 123, Raptors 121 Sixers 107, Celtics 105 Lakers 113, Pelicans 108 Nuggets 117, Mavericks 104
In Taiwan: Led by @Marcus3Keene and @SimBhullar2, Yulon seals a three-game sweep over short-handed Pauian and @OrlandoMagic ex Ben Metcalf. Yulon faces Taiwan Beer in the best-of-seven finals  but SBL rules say Taiwan Beer starts the series up 1-0 More:
Will we ever know Michael’s full motivations for finally greenlighting use of all that old footage? Ahmad Rashad, who knows MJ as well as anyone, doesn’t anticipate much elaboration after the 10 episodes that loom ... as explained here to @NYTSports:
Here's Michael Tollin, executive producer of "The Last Dance" which debuts Sunday, telling @NYTSports the story of how MJ agreed to sign off on the documentary in their first face-to-face meeting in June 2016 ... on the day of the Cavs' championship parade
One interesting theory, which I first heard from @BillSimmons, posits that Michael Jordan finally sanctioned a documentary on his career because the 73-win Warriors -- and LeBron James by beating them in the 2016 Finals -- were threatening to obscure some of the Bulls' greatness
Top this Friday night ...
Dallas took a German. Sounds right ...
Sabrina Ionescu (@sabrina_i20 ) just officially went No. 1 overall in the @WNBA draft to the @nyliberty
Memorable, moving moment 
Alyssa Altobelli, Gianna Bryant and Payton Chester were all just announced as honorary @WNBA draft picks ... all from Orange County, California
Among Commissioner Adam Silver’s final comments on today’s conference call with NBA media members: “Our revenue in essence has dropped to zero”
Adam Silver just said that the league has not identified a firm date to decide that it must cancel the rest of this season
Adam Silver says the NBA "has only listened" to "bubble" proposals and is "not seriously engaged yet" on putting the whole league in Vegas or Orlando, etc., for closed-door games
Adam Silver acknowledges that the NBA is not yet "at the point" where it can pinpoint prerequisites "A, B and C" to establish "a clear path" to a return
Here is Andy Thompson telling the story of meeting Michael Jordan and how MJ told him he was once scolded by his mother for spelling his first name “Mychal” on his school notebook ... in an attempt to emulate Andy’s older brother @champagnennuts
NBA commissioner Adam Silver: "We are not in a position to make any decisions and it's unclear when we will be"
You’ve heard of Mychal Thompson. And @KlayThompson. Now meet Andy Thompson ... cut from three NBA teams but who won his own ring of sorts with the idea to embed with the Jordan Bulls and collect the footage that led to The Last Dance doc. For @NYTSports:
Any chance the @DallasWings trade up somehow tonight to get Ionescu? Asking for me ...
Gianna Bryant, Alyssa Altobelli and Payton Chester will all be honored during tonight's @WNBA draft ... as Vanessa Bryant announced today via Instagram
It ain't the playoffs obviously  but WNBA draft  The Last Dance  our best basketball weekend in WEEKS
Decent Jerry West draft pick at No. 26 
I don't know if he was good enough to make the majors  but Terry Francona and plenty more smart baseball people said he had a chance if he stuck with it. Also: MJ played RF and stole 30 bases and drove in 50 runs. Slash line? He walked in off the street and was plenty passable
Michael Jordan was crushed for trying to become a baseball player  but I STILL can't believe he was a passable OF for a whole season only two rungs away from MLB after 10 years away from his bat and glove. One of MJ's most amazing feats  and more stories in the enclosed link
You can only love what you love 
Will add the Pony City Wings low when I expand to a top 10 list someday  in honor of you, Vecsey and Dallas' own Spud Webb @swebb_anthony!!!
Once wrote about my all-time top 5 shoe selections that I freely admit will make zero sense to anyone but me 
These and these are what I loved back then 
Probably the Lambaste lows cause my favorite shoe of the era -- Air Darwin canvas -- was too easily ripped
Luckily for @KCJHoop I couldn’t find the one with the two lefty scribes cornering Harp in our basketball gear because there was a media pickup game to go to after interviews ...
Getting ready for “The Last Dance” and the @HARPER04_5 Q &amp; A later today on Twitter by wondering where the last 20-odd years went since this picture was taken at the 98 (or maybe 97) Finals ...
As savage as it was 35 years ago today  #dang
The Committee of One would certainly have its own order -- Bad Boys higher for sure and sorting out Nos. 3-4-5 is super complicated -- but  chapeau for a wonderfully provocative rankings assemblage from my old friend Professor @kpelton
On Day 36 of the NBA’s shutdown, here’s our latest league progress report amid the coronavirus crisis ... via the digital version of the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter —&gt;
The game of my youth — @StratOMatic — has simulated the remaining 20 percent of the NBA’s regular season and will begin simulating playoff games on Saturday (when the actual playoffs were supposed to start). Details here 
Dr. Anthony Fauci speaks optimistically to @PeterHamby about the “bubble” concept for Major League Baseball ... and thus, by extension, the NBA (: @RealGM)
Now 35 days into the NBA shutdown, we present a progress report in this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter ... freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide ... with signups here —&gt;
Here is the video of Trump citing NBA commissioner Adam Silver and Mavericks owner Mark Cuban among the sports figures he has included in today's committee announcement ...
President Trump announces that numerous sports commissioners, along with Dallas Mavericks owner Mark Cuban from the NBA, will be on the committee he's forming to reopen the country
For Times Insider and @readercenter, an array of NYT staffers from an array of desks were ask to share One Bright Thing they have experienced "amid the bleakness." Included: A personal disclosure about the healing powers of  cleaning out one's garage -&gt;
Kobe's SIXTY and the Warriors' 73rd  how did all that happen on the same night? Still can't believe it #april13
The Timberwolves just made the very sad announcement that Jacqueline Towns, mother of star center Karl-Anthony Towns, has passed away after battling COVID-19
The Bulls announce that John Paxson is moving to an advisory role and that GM Gar Forman has been dismissed after today's official hiring of Arturas Karnisovas as EVP of basketball operations
Xbox &gt; writing til 4 AM
From SportsSunday in the @nytimes ... our peek inside the first "bubble" in pro basketball worldwide: In a country that has coped with COVD-19 as well as any other globally, Taiwan's Super Basketball League plays on --&gt;
Vintage Stu Scott, old-school McNichols Arena, @HowardBeck as the beat writer by this point  and, of course, blossoming Young Kobe
Taiwanese baseball was scheduled to start today (if not for rain)  and here is my @NYTSports story on Taiwan's scaled-down version of the basketball "bubble" that the NBA will try to create IF it gets the chance to play again this season:
Only Branch. Always Branch 
April 11  one (long) month in the books for the suspended NBA
Pro basketball’s first so-called “bubble” in response to the coronavirus can be found in Taiwan. Here’s a look inside it for @NYTSports through the eyes of former @OrlandoMagic video coordinator Ben Metcalf and veteran American forward Charles Garcia —&gt;
What does a basketball bubble in our COVID-19 world actually look like? @NYTSports checked in with an American coach and star from the only recognized professional league in the world with games this week -- Taiwan's Super Basketball League -- to find out:
Honored to join my pal Andy Bernstein -- Hall of Fame photographer and co-star of Kobe Bryant's "The Mamba Mentality" book -- to tell all kinds of stories on Andy's @legends_ofsport podcast --&gt;
Aggressive ... The nearly 30,000 fans I was lucky enough to join at Maine Road on a Tuesday night in 1998 v. Bournemouth in what was then the THIRD division -- plus the zillions at every City game before and since -- understand that this had to be an attempt at humor (or a typo)
A look at the historical implications of an NBA season like no other ... in the digital edition of the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter —&gt;
Our @tariqpanja with a report on the German Bundesliga ... top-level soccer with all of its teams back in training and hopes for real (albeit closed-door) games starting in May
We explore some historical aspects of the NBA’s suspended season in this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter ... and how we appear headed for the boldest  in league history no matter what happens next — with some interesting insights from the tireless Aussie historian @toddspehr35
Vegas bubble for the NBA ... Arizona bubble for MLB?
Included in the report is the following statement today from NBA to our @SopanDeb which says, in part, that “any decision on a date to restart the season is likely weeks away”
How soon can sports leagues realistically resume after President Trump’s optimistic weekend forecast? @el_belson leads an @NYTSports group effort on this report for SportsTuesday about the NFL, NBA, MLB, NHL and many more —&gt;
The Bulls have received permission to interview Denver’s Arturas Karnisovas and Utah’s Justin Zanik, according to @KCJHoop, who also reported today that Chicago is unlikely to get a shot at Toronto’s Bobby Webster
The Heat say Adam Simon will remain in their front office ... making Simon the second Chicago Bulls target to withdraw from consideration after @ShamsCharania reported that Indiana’s Chad Buchanan is also staying put
The Players Only @NBA2K tournament continues tonight ... bracket enclosed:
Kevin Garnett and Tim Duncan soon to speak on the @hoophall broadcast on @espn ...
Your 2020 @Hoophall class: Kobe Bryant Tim Duncan Kevin Garnett Tamika Catchings Rudy Tomjanovich Eddie Sutton Kim Mulkey Barbara Stevens Patrick Baumann
Rudy T! HOF!
Tim Duncan gets his official nod, too
Kevin Garnett ... HOF'er
Kobe Bryant ... Hall of FAMER
Tim Duncan and Kevin Garnett officially join Kobe Bryant as Hall of Famers
Kobe Bryant is officially a Hall of Fame
President Trump is scheduled to speak to a slew of sports commissioners today at noon -- including the NBA's Adam Silver -- at the same time that the @Hoophall officially announces its 2020 class
The @USTA has urged tennis players nationwide to "take a collective pause from playing the sport we love"
Mayor of Houston @MarkBermanFox26 here with some big Rudy Tomjanovich news ...
Tim Duncan, Kevin Garnett and Kobe Bryant ... 23 hours from now (Saturday at noon) we learn if they are indeed confirmed as first-ballot inductees of the @Hoophall's 2020 class
The NBA appears to have taken a similar approach. Daunting as the landscape looks now in terms of playing games in the summer, what is the upside to canceling fast? The NBA will surely give itself every last chance to bring this season to some semblance of a proper conclusion
For NBA fans curious how other sports are handling the coronavirus crisis: UEFA -- which governs European soccer -- has urged its various leagues NOT to cancel their seasons right now as it holds out hope of resuming games in July and August
The story of Mike Breen’s clutch jumper — two makes in two takes for the Knicks/ESPN play-by-play ace — is here alongside our visit with @joshhart and @Larrydn22 on the shock to the system of losing two seasons at once:
Not quite NBA games ... but it is a four-episode installment of Game of Zones at month's end
They are NBA players but also soccer-crazed Chelsea fans. So I spoke to @joshhart and @Larrydn22 about, as Nance neatly put it, feeling “like I lost two seasons” ... here in the digital version of this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter—&gt;
Good riddance, March
Detailed look by @jgsiegel via @earlybirdrights on the topic du jour in the NBA ... "force majeure" It becomes an automatic reality for players as soon as the league takes the step of officially canceling games, as spelled out in its collective bargaining agreement with the NBPA
The latest @nytimes NBA newsletter, freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide, on former teammates @joshhart and @Larrydn22 and badly missing not only their own league but also their beloved Chelsea. Can’t say it better than Nance did: “I feel like I lost two seasons ...”
Mayor Tory's office has subsequently issued a clarification that the Toronto ban announced today does not including sporting events -- city events and event permits only
Significant COVID-19 news from Toronto: Mayor John Tory has today canceled all city events through June 30
All of this will come into the greater focus if league decides to indeed make checks stop. Some league observers are indeed curious to see if the NBA's recent decision to reduce the salaries of its 100 best-paid employees proves to be a precursor to trying withhold player wages
In its recent collective bargaining negotiations with the league over the past decade, 12-month payment plans became the default for NBA players  but union officials did fight to preserve the chance to negotiate accelerated pay schedules for players/agents to pursue
The vast majority of players are on 12-month payment plans and will have received only 10 of their 24 checks for the 2019-20 regular season by the time April 1 payouts are complete.  Brooklyn’s Garrett Temple of the @TheNBPA told @joevardon and @sam_amick there are more than 400
Other known players in this select club include the Nets’ star duo of Kevin Durant (repped by Rich Kleiman) and Kyrie Irving (Roc Nation), Detroit’s Blake Griffin (Jeff Schwartz and Sam Goldfeder) and Chicago’s Otto Porter (David Falk and Danielle Cantor)
The nine Klutch players are naturally led by LeBron James and include John Wall, Kentavious-Caldwell Pope, Dejounte Murray, Miles Bridges, Darius Bazley, Darius Garland, Terrance Ferguson and Trey Lyles. Next season it will be 10 when Draymond Green’s contract extension kicks in
Nine who secured these all-you-can-get deals, which pay out 90-plus percent of their 2019-20 salaries by April 1, are represented by Klutch Sports on contracts structured and negotiated by agent Rich Paul and attorney Mark Termini
Less than 20 players leaguewide have negotiated all-you-can get deals which feature the maximum allowable salary advance alongside an accelerated six-month payment schedule
Roughly 90 percent of NBA players will have received less than half of their 2019-20 salaries by the time April 1 checks go out because they are on 12-month payment plans, league sources estimate
NBA players receive paychecks Wednesday but have not been assured further payments. Some details to keep in mind if the NBA seeks to withhold 1.08 percent of each player's 2019-20 salary for every game missed by invoking a "force majeure" clause designed for emergency situations:
The Lakers just announced that their players have today completed 14-day home isolations prescribed by team doctors -- and that all players are currently symptom-free of COVID-19 The team had previously announced that two unnnamed players had tested positive for the coronavirus
The complete 16-player field for the @NBA2K Players Only tournament starting Friday via The @boardroom ...
The IOC says the Tokyo Olympics will now be July 23-Aug. 8, 2021 That has to help for NBA participation in Olympic hoops, but more is TBD based on how far the start and end dates for next season may move More here from the last @nytimes NBA newsletter:
Time is unlikely to be the insurmountable obstacle. The NBA can theoretically play games in July/August/September and move next season to different dates -- as covered in a recent newsletter The hurdles to resume games, from a pure health-and-safety standpoint, are considerable
We can't forget NBA players may need up to a month to get back to passable shape -- then the league needs a locale or two that makes it safe, presumably with quarantine measures, for players/coaches/staffs and everyone else involved in putting on closed-door games to stay safe
Today's big story in England centers on the Premier League exploring all 20 teams convening in one or two locations to play out the remaining 92 games with no fans and televise them all Similar concepts have been making the NBA rounds for days, but we can't forget that ...
Sticking to hoops here: Today's news means the country is essentially closed until May 1 ... so you can understand -- given the potential for social distancing guidelines to be imposed beyond that -- why some around the league fear it may be July (at best) before games can resume
Tonight's White House press briefing: Coronavirus and social distancing guidelines are being extended nationwide through April 30
First stadium: Anaheim Stadium Last stadium: American Airlines Center Best stadium: Titan Gym/Maine Road/USTA National Tennis Center (TIED) Worst stadium: Old Traf ... I mean ... NO. SUCH. THING
Anyone else miss hoop so much that they scour You Tube for MSG organ music to play in their office and remember what a game sounds like?
Rising star ... no cap
The Knicks' press release says Dolan "continues to oversee business operations"
The Knicks just announced that owner James Dolan has tested positive for the coronavirus and is in self-isolation with "little to no symptoms"
Today's story with @JohnBranchNYT on COVID-19 and NYC's basketball community has been updated after we confirmed two former NBA players were also at the party detailed in the piece They are: Iona star Steve Burtt Sr. and David Britton (1980 No. 57 pick)
Yes, please: @sabrina_i20, soon to be the No. 1 pick in the WNBA draft, gets the full @kurtstreeter profile treatment for @NYTSports this weekend --&gt;
"There ain't no 'vista,' there ain't no 'view,' and there certainly ain't no vista of no view" -- Rhonda Deane
Twenty-eight glorious years and counting ...
The Basketball Hall of Fame says here that it plans to reveal its 2020 class officially on April 4 as planned even though obviously it cannot do so now as part of the NCAA Tournament ...
Here all night for Vecsey, Ryan, Max, Rick and anyone else from the glory days who wants to jump and tell us all the behind-the-scenes stories from the '70s and early '80s NBA that I was too young for. Please keep going!
Curly Neal, dazzling dribbler for decades for the Harlem Globetrotters, has died at 77. My story for @NYTObits:
If you grew up in the '70s or '80s and you loved this game ... at some point you dreamed of dribbling a basketball like Curly Neal of the Harlem @Globies. #RIP to a giant of the game Brief highlight reel here:
This doesn't even register as a problem right now ... but it will be one of the NBA's big challenges eventually: How much time players need to CAREFULLY ramp back up to full speed after such a sudden (and late) interruption to the season
Four fave hoopers en route to covering the NBA (pre-1994): Bob McAdoo Randy Smith Bernard King Cedric Ceballos (@csuf incarnation) Four tags: @MarcJSpearsESPN @ChrisBHaynes @ThompsonScribe @SherwoodStrauss
More from the WNBA about its plans to honor Gianna Bryant, Alyssa Altobelli, Payton Chester and their coach — Kobe Bryant — during the draft broadcast ...
The WNBA just announced that its draft will go ahead as scheduled -- albeit virtually without players, guests or media -- on April 17
Mike Breen, now Ian Darke ... which broadcasting ledge keeps the streak alive tomorrow?
Underrated how clutch this shot was so he didn't have to re-do the message #BANG!
Wimbledon (June 29-July 12) announces that it is actively weighing postponement or outright cancellation ...
The journalist we need ... @StephenCurry30
In this week’s diversion known as the digital version of the @nytimes NBA newsletter, I write a lot about Olympic hoop hypotheticals and Gregg Popovich and even a bit about my father:
After some optimism about restarting league play in mid-April, China's basketball association has pushed the resumption back into May Numerous Americans, including Jeremy Lin and Lance Stephenson, had been called back to start getting ready -- first with a two-week quarantine
The Wolves' Karl-Anthony Towns explains in raw, emotional terms how his mother has been placed in a medically-induced coma due to COVID-19: "This disease is real," Towns says. "This disease needs to not be taken lightly"
Basketball matters are trivial right now ... but  nerds like me can’t let go. If you wish to get lost for a bit in Olympic hoop hypotheticals, starting with Gregg Popovich’s stalled chase for international majesty, head to your inbox for the latest @nytimes NBA newsletter 
For @NYTSports: Story on the $400 million deal — in cash — that enabled the Clippers to buy the famed Forum in Inglewood, Calif., and brought a halt to Ballmer vs. Dolan —&gt;
Madison Square Garden Company statement regarding its sale of the famed Forum in Inglewood, Calif., to the Clippers: "This is the best resolution for all parties involved and we wish the new owners every success."
The Clippers have announced the purchase of The Forum in Inglewood, Calif., from the Madison Square Garden Co. for $400 million in cash
Updated coverage of the about-face decision by the Sixers and Devils to cancel planned salary reductions of up to 20 percent for employees making at least $50,000 is here via the @nytimes Coronavirus Impact live blog —&gt;
Sixers and Devils co-owner Josh Harris on canceling the salary reductions for both teams that were reported Monday by @NYTSports: "We have reversed it and will be paying these employees their full salaries. ... To our staff and fans, I apologize for getting this wrong."
Japan and the IOC made it official this morning: This summer's Tokyo Olympics have been postponed to 2021
From the @nytimes’ Coronavirus Impact live blog ... expanded coverage of last night’s news on the Sixers and Devils instituting temporary salary reductions from April 15 through the end of June —&gt;
The Sixers and Devils, through Harris Blitzer Sports &amp; Entertainment CEO Scott O’Neil, have confirmed @NYTSports’ report earlier tonight of salary reductions for full-time employees in both organizations with the following statement:
NBA players, remember, fall under a separate category. The league has already committed to paying players their April 1 checks -- but has not yet assured players their full April 15 amounts since contracts include a "force majeure" clause teams can invoke in emergency scenarios
The Sixers and Devils consider this a temporary measure aimed at avoiding layoffs and, according to the person, have not reduced any health or 401K benefits for the teams' employees. It was not immediately known if any other NBA teams have instituted a similar program
Executives such as Sixers GM Elton Brand, Devils president Jake Reynolds, Sixers president Chris Heck and Harris Blitzer Sports &amp; Entertainment CEO Scott O'Neil have agreed to participate in the program, according to the person
Contracted employees, such as members of the Sixers' coaching staff and front office, have also been asked to participate in the program but cannot be forced to do so, according to a person briefed on the situation who was not authorized to discuss it publicly
Sixers and Devils at-will employees were informed today that temporary salary reductions of up to 20 percent will be instituted for employees making more than $50,000 starting April 15 through the end of June, @NYTSports has learned
For @NYTObits: My piece on the longtime @FIBA secretary general Boris Stankovic, who died Friday at 94 and is widely regarded as the driving force to open up Olympic men’s basketball to professionals worldwide in 1989 —&gt;
Make it $323,000, to be exact, in honor of both Kyrie's March 23 birthday and, according to my man @HowardBeck, to pay homage to Kyrie's close friend @kobebryant since 3  2  3  8
The Nets’ Kyrie Irving marks his 28th birthday by donating more than $300,000 in hopes of distributing some 250,000 meals across the New York area during the coronavirus crisis (via IG)
In short: The TNT analyst and Basketball Hall of Famer announces he has tested negative for COVID-19 after disclosing March 12 that he was advised to test for the coronavirus after showing symptoms
Charles Barkley statement: “I’ve received my COVID-19 test results this morning and they are negative. I’d like to thank everyone for reaching out and expressing your concern and support. You all be safe and please take the necessary actions to help ensure your well-being."
BANGER! ... #559standup
Have long believed, along with countless others, there is little chance of the Tokyo Olympics going ahead in July ... but still a powerful statement to see a neighboring country declare this so firmly in response to the IOC stall game (with more such declarations surely looming)
Whoa, Canada
We just got one. Whether I actually finally try it is another matter ...
Bonus points for the NCAA Tournament team that Bobby Brown helped put together at a certain collegiate institution in North Orange County ...
The IOC at last acknowledged Sunday that it has been forced to consider postponing the Tokyo Olympics ... with final deliberations scheduled over the next four weeks. (Enclosed @NYTSports link: Our @MattFutterman spoke to IOC president Thomas Bach on Thursday)
Moses Malone, Randy Smith, Nate Archibald, Adrian Dantley, Swen Nater, Ernie DiGregorio, Bird Averitt and more McAdoo, McAdoo, McAdoo
A Cleveland Cavalier is playing @FootballManager in his enforced free time ... inspiring ray of sunshine
Listened to the song about 20 times today already. The Gambler sure knew how to put words together ... #RIP
It would be quite an unexpected turn if there was a sudden demand for CBA broadcasts among NBA fans after CCTV in China dropped NBA broadcasts this season and refused to bring them back ...
Lost amid this week's chaos: Jeremy Lin is back in China with the Beijing Ducks and has begun a 14-day quarantine in advance of the Chinese Basketball Association's expected mid-April resumption. "The world needs basketball now more than ever," Lin said via Instagram
The undisputed top five is right here from @NYTSports in February 2019 ...
Journalism students out there who have an interest in learning how to design the front page of a pretty good newspaper ... watch our DeBruyne put this together at home (Thread includes the finished product)
I'm no good at it any more and certainly can't compare to these YouTube wizards I see doing things with the ball that defy gravity and explanation ... but I got my first Astropitch and @ManCity team box in 1982! And still have 'em!
Beautiful sight ... here's to all that Subbuteo and @StratOMatic have given to home entertainment for decades!
The Mavericks just announced that Mark Cuban, Luka Doni and Dwight Powell are donating $500,000 to the University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center and Parkland Hospital to support childcare for healthcare workers on the frontlines of the COVID-19 response effort
Two TNT Thursdays into the NBA's indefinite hiatus ... wondering how long Professor @johnhollinger and I should wait before turning to fallback joys of @StratOMatic simulation as we did during the 2011 lockout
The NBA latest is embedded in the @nytimes’ perpetually refreshed Coronavirus Live Updates file here —&gt;
The player commentary on here, on yet another night when laughs are in short supply, is quite good ...
Marcus Smart announces he is the Celtic who has tested positive for the coronavirus
Lakers statement: "We learned today that two Lakers players have tested positive for COVID-19. Both players are currently asymptomatic, in quarantine and under the care of the team’s physician."
The Lakers confirm two players have tested positive for the coronavirus
Full Celtics statement ...
STATEMENT FROM THE BOSTON CELTICS The Boston Celtics learned today that a player has tested positive for COVID-19. Testing was initiated because of exposure to a known positive case.
From Thursday's @nytimes, alongside @mega2e and @SteveEder and with @NYTSports contributions from @SopanDeb @ScottCacciola @ByJamesWagner and @TylerKepner, our piece on the inequities in access to coronavirus testing throughout the country:
Adam Silver confirmed in last night's interview with @Rachel__Nichols that eight of the NBA's 30 clubs have undergone team-wide testing. The teams that are publicly known: Jazz, Thunder, Raptors, Nets, Lakers and Sixers
The Sixers say they received recommendations from "medical experts and the NBA" for players, coaches and "specific basketball operations" support staff to be tested -- tests, they say, that were "secured and processed" privately
The 76ers just announced that three "individuals" within the organization have tested positive for the coronavirus
As this beautiful document shows ... 25-year mark for the fax was actually reached yesterday and March 19, 1995, was MJ's first game back in the Bulls' lineup -- 19 points on 7-for-28 shooting in a 103-96 loss at Indy
Man ... Michael Jordan's "I'm back" fax (look it up) to announce his return to the Bulls was 25 years ago today
5 jobs/5 tags: 1. Tennis pro shop attendant 2, Sporting goods store employee 3. This ... 4. Since I was 18 ... 5. #notverygoodatthisgame 5 tags: @espn_macmahon @bdameris @BenRogers @SkinWade @MFollowill
We are finally on the same page. One of the best shows ever, way ahead of its time, basketball gold for a generation of kids who didn't get much of the NBA on TV ... and Kenny Reeves and Artis Gilmore will always be my favorite Chicago Bulls because of The White Shadow!
Long, long, long week Stay safe, y'all ...
Asked by @Rachel__Nichols about the NBA record book and what happens if the league is unable to crown a champion this season, what happens for current statistical leaders, etc., Adam Silver said: "I'm not there yet"
The digital version of this week's @nytimes NBA newsletter covers league calendar element of the conversation at length here --&gt;
Full statement from the NBA’s Mike Bass to @SopanDeb of @NYTSports ...
In the enclosed statement, NBA spokesman Mike Bass tells @NYTSports that "team physicians and infectious disease experts" recommended to the league that eight full teams be tested
Full Thunder statement enclosed ... which reiterates what the team told the @nytimes Sunday about choosing “an alternative path for testing of its personnel” in recognition of “the stress on the state of Oklahoma’s medical system”
The Thunder announce that all results "have come back negative" on players and staffers tested for the coronavirus
My man Hojo Beck has lots here on the rampant uncertainty across the NBA ... and this link to our digital version of the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter has more ... IF you’re looking to distract yourself from all of life’s larger unknowns —&gt;
I clicked on the Advanced Team Stats page today ... and I liked it
For those of you who may be interested in capping another really long day of real life with a voluminous @nytimes NBA newsletter on where the league will try to go from here ... it has been freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide:
The draws for the men's and women's @Tokyo2020 Olympic basketball tournaments -- scheduled for Friday -- were indefinitely postponed earlier today by @FIBA
This @NYTSports story Monday quotes a Thunder spokesman saying OKC secured testing for players through "alternative" means to avoid depleting the state supply of test kits ... @espn reports the Nets did the same by paying "out of pocket to a private company to conduct tests"
The Nets were scheduled to play the Golden State Warriors last Thursday in San Francisco in an arena closed off to fans before the NBA shut down Wednesday night
The Nets just announced four players have tested positive for the COVID-19 virus and, of the four, one player is exhibiting symptoms while three are asymptomatic
Here is @nytimes executive editor @deanbaquet on China's expulsion of American journalists ...
Game 6 of the '75 Stanley Cup finals on the @NHLNetwork for the umpteenth time. Keep thinking our @BuffaloSabres gonna force a Game 7 if I keep watching ...
The latest in Dallas: Dwight Powell is back ... and Luka is Luka:
From SportsMonday in the @nytimes: On Oklahoma City’s Italian star Danilo Gallinari and coping with the Coronavirus Crisis on two continents —&gt;
Enclosed is our @NYTSports story on Oklahoma City's Danilo @gallinari8888 ... reflecting on the sudden suspension of the NBA season just as the Thunder were about to play Utah and the depths of the Coronavirus Crisis in Gallo's native Italy:
In the strain to find silver linings amid this crisis, there are teams out there eager to see if real NBA games in the summer would be as "hot" as some believe -- since there certainly is a pocket of power brokers in the league intrigued by an Opening Night on Christmas calendar
G League arenas and practice facilities obviously only become options if NBA games are closed off to fans ... which is the growing fear in the wake of the latest CDC recommendations we discussed last night discouraging crowds of 50 people through at least mid-May
The NBA has begun collecting data on available arena dates at G League buildings and practice facilities through the end of August -- as well as teams' regular arenas -- as it holds of hope of resuming the 2019-20 season, league sources say
Such a schedule would also make it a lot tougher for NBA players to participate in international events like the Olympics ... which would not-so-secretly please a lot of teams
A stretch to call this sports-related .... but a pretty telling illustration of the current climate: Starbucks is going to to-go coffee only in the US and Canada for the next two weeks to promote social distancing
Only 292 days left in the worst year in a long, long, long time
As @gallinari8888 put it earlier this week ... #RESTIAMOACASA
Important development for sport throughout the country: The CDC just announced it is recommending NO gatherings of 50 people in the United States for the next EIGHT weeks
Spoke today to Danilo Gallinari (@gallinari8888) ... since the coronavirus crisis not only brought the Thunder's Cinderella season to a sudden halt but has also consumed him for weeks given what's happening in Italy. For SportsMonday in the @nytimes:
With no NBA on our TVs ... let's go back to how it was in the '70s when the game was hard to find and we had to rely on alternative basketball programming: White Shadow marathon someone PLEASE!!!!!
Rudy Gobert speaks ...
Just seeing that old newsroom and hearing that soundtrack can make a journalist feel bionic ...
After taking the Iona job, @RealPitino tells @NYTSports via text message that he still plans to coach the Greek national team in the Olympic qualifying tournament scheduled for British Columbia in June -- provided, of course, that the Olympic qualifier goes ahead
Gobert's donation includes 100,000 Euros to the health-care system in his native France with the full Utah Jazz statement shown here ...
Jazz center Rudy Gobert just donated $500,000 to "support both the employee relief fund at Vivint Smart Home Arena and COVID-related social services relief in Utah"
Pitino has been coaching in Greece and was supposed to coach the Greek national team at the Olympic qualifying TOURNAMENT in Canada in June that, like everything else in sport, is presumably in jeopardy
Rick Pitino returns to college basketball ... at Iona
Full Raptors statement ...
The Raptors just announced that everyone in the organization they have tested for the coronavirus have all received negative results
This is still a pretty good league: Kevin Love, Giannis Antetokounmpo, Blake Griffin, Zion Williamson ... all pledging money to help arena workers in need
Brunson, of course, had originally planned to delay surgery until the off-season and keep playing with the help of in-season rehab ... but the league's unexpected shutdown for a minimum of 30 days created a window for the procedure now
The Mavericks announce that guard Jalen Brunson has undergone surgery on his right shoulder. No timetable for his recovery was immediately set
From the most dispiriting season in NBA history ... to no season: Behind the scenes on a sudden (and indefinite) press of the pause button with my colleagues @ScottCacciola, @SopanDeb and @kevinmdraper for @NYTSports —&gt;
On the same day that the Prem stunningly announces that its games will go on ... it is confirmed that the Arsenal manager Mikel Arteta has tested positive for the coronavirus
The NBA, league sources say, has also asked team doctors and athletic trainers to check in at least once a day with players on their health status and use a "one player, one coach, one basket" rule if multiple players are working out at the same time in team practice facilities
The NBA has notified its teams that all players are advised to stay in their home markets, remain home as much as possible and that teams are not allowed to hold group practices, meetings or workouts through at least March 16
Same ...
The English Premier League just announced that its weekend games WILL GO AHEAD ...
Rudy Gobert speaks (via Instagram) ...
March Madness is CANCELED, NCAA says
An update from Rudy Gobert’s French national team teammate Evan Fournier ...
Sport is supposed to be an escape from real life ... but 2020 apparently has a previously unseen capacity to defy that notion
The NBA has suspended the season in the wake of the Coronavirus Crisis. Its official statement:
A most welcome hoop tweet: Joel Embiid is due back on the floor for Philly tonight after missing five games with a shoulder injury
The ATP, which governs men's tennis, is in advanced discussions on suspending its tour events for six weeks, @NYTSports has learned
And now here is the NCAA — March Madness — on its plans for basketball tournaments (largely) without fans ...
Latest from the tennis world: I'm told that the Miami Open, like Indian Wells before it, is poised to formally announce cancellation of this month's event as early as today
Not super sure what’s right or wrong at a time like this, but if you’re in the mood for a basketball read here’s the digital version of the @nytimes’ weekly NBA newsletter on the funkiest of seasons for both the Knicks and the Nets —&gt;
First installment of @NYTSports’ coverage of the Coronavirus Crisis that will force Golden State to play host Thursday night to Brooklyn in an empty Chase Center —&gt;
The Warriors have just issued their official statement confirming that Thursday night's game at Chase Center against Brooklyn will be played with no fans admitted ...
After playing host to the Nets in an empty arena Thursday night, Golden State is scheduled to leave town for a five-game road trip. The Warriors' next scheduled home game is March 25 against the Hawks
The Warriors, league sources say, will be directed to play host to the Nets on Thursday night at Chase Center in a game CLOSED to fans
The city of San Francisco has banned gatherings of more than 1,000 people, according to the @sfchronicle. We still await official word from the NBA on the fate of the Warriors' home game Thursday night against the Nets
The NBA has scheduled a conference call Thursday for the league's 30 GMs to discuss the latest on the Coronavirus Crisis, league sources tell @NYTSports -- but first up is Wednesday's conference call for NBA team owners
After Kenny Atkinson’s exit, we examine this funky season for New York basketball in the latest edition of the @nytimes NBA newsletter ... freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide 
Some bold NBA commentary: Milwaukee ain't gonna finish the season 17-0 and thus won't win 70 games Milwaukee also really misses that Giannis Antetokounmpo dude ... whose MVP case wasn't exactly weakened by the Bucks' three-game skid (since two of those Ls were without him)
The latest on the impact of the coronavirus crisis on North America’s sporting landscape after it shut down Indian Wells tennis ... co-scribed with my esteemed colleagues @christophclarey and @MattFutterman for @NYTSports —&gt;
Enclosed is the official joint statement from the NBA, NHL, MLB and MLS on their new locker room access restrictions in the wake of the coronavirus crisis ...
Several pro sports leagues in this country -- NBA, MLB, NHL and MLS -- have come together to issue joint temporary restrictions on locker room access. Locker rooms and clubhouses "will be open only to players and essential employees of teams and facilities until further notice"
LeBron James and Norman Powell were just named West and East Player of the Week, respectively, by the NBA
Stunning development: One of the biggest tennis tournaments in the world just canceled its prestigious men's and women's events due to the ongoing coronavirus crisis
The Bucks say Giannis Antetokounmpo is out at least two games with a minor joint capsule sprain in his left knee
The NBA's conference call with team doctors and athletic trainers is scheduled for Monday evening ... only six teams are playing on very light night schedule-wise and the league is encouraging those teams to make sure they have a representative on the call
The Bucks are listing Giannis Antetokounmpo (left knee soreness) as doubtful for Sunday's visit to Phoenix
Starting Tuesday it will be mandatory, league sources say, for NBA teams to distribute hand sanitizer to all players and team staff members and advise them it is a complementary measure to regular hand-washing
The NBA has tonight informed its 30 teams that it will hold a conference call Monday morning to brief team doctors and athletic trainers on the latest measures to deal with the coronavirus pandemic, league sources say
The Pacers are listing Malcolm Brogdon as “week to week” with a quadriceps muscle injury
Caris LeVert rings up 51 in a win over Boston ... Brooklyn rings up 139 in a win over Gregg Popovich and the Spurs just last night ... and the Nets' week ends with a Saturday morning ouster of Kenny Atkinson #thisleague
All three in-season coaching changes in the NBA this season have been with Eastern Conference teams: Knicks (David Fizdale to Mike Miller), Cavaliers (John Beilein to JB Bickerstaff) and Nets (Kenny Atkinson to Jacque Vaughn)
Jacque Vaughn installed as the Nets’ coach for the rest of the season
The Nets just announced that Kenny Atkinson is OUT as coach ...
Among the measures that the NBA wants its teams to start preparing for is the possibility --- if the situation worsens --- for instituting "temperature checks" on various players, team staff members, referees and anyone else deemed "essential" to stage a game in such conditions
Postponing or canceling any game due to the coronavirus is a league office decision but the NBA, sources say, has notified teams to start "developing" contingency plans in case "it were to become necessary to play a game with only essential staff present" -- no fans, media, etc
The Wolves say Karl-Anthony Towns (fractured wrist) will be out at least two more weeks as Minnesota continues to "pursue a non-operative strategy" for Towns' recovery
The publicly known fine total for Cuban's 20 years and two months of Mavericks ownership is $3,115,000 ... but not all NBA fines are announced by the league
Today's fine takes Mark Cuban's career total of publicly known financial penalties from the NBA past the $3 million mark for his 20 years of Dallas Mavericks team ownership
The league's official announcement says Cuban has been fined $500,000 for "his public criticism and detrimental conduct regarding NBA officiating"
Silver has also fined Mark Cuban $500,000
Adam Silver has denied the Mavericks' protest of their Feb. 22 loss at Atlanta
Dueling with an NBA team owner at Wembley and a look at Wes Edens’ journeys with the title-chasing Milwaukee Bucks and relegation-threatened Aston Villa ... all here in the digital version of this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter —&gt;
The skating video I'm not adept enough to cut myself ...
You do not see many people do that to Jrue Holiday ... twice on one possession
And after this old tweet was just forwarded to me, I better amend my last tweet to say Hazard is likewise at the American Airlines Center to watch his friend and Real Betis superfan @kporzee
Real Madrid star Eden Hazard is in Dallas tonight ... and is watching Real Madrid star alumnus Luka Doncic take on Zion Williamson before Hazard (according to Spanish media reports) undergoes surgery
It would appear Stephen Curry is eager to return to the court Thursday night against the Raptors of Toronto ...
This week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter comes to you from London with the tale of Bucks co-owner Wes Edens and I winding up on opposite sides of a Cup final at Wembley ... and much more about Edens’ dual life with relegation-threatened Aston Villa and title-chasing Milwaukee 
And Timmy Duncan is doing the postgame presser in Charlotte ... which @tom_orsborn has been graciously live-tweeting
In related news ... I wish I was in Charlotte tonight
I hate myself for tweeting this ... but here's the annoying reminder that Tim Duncan's win tonight still goes on Pop's ledger based on the way NBA bookkeeping for coaches is done
The Suns have announced that Kelly Oubre will be sidelined at least four weeks after undergoing arthroscopic surgery on his right knee
I presume this means Duncan will also be doing pre- and post-game media tonight after denying all interview requests this season ... his debut season as an assistant coach for Pop
The Spurs just announced Tim Duncan is the head coach against Charlotte tonight because Gregg Popovich is missing the game due to personal business.
Was really expecting Houston's Russell Westbrook to snag this honor in the West after the monster February both Russ and the Rockets had. @BillSimmons' beloved Tatum, meanwhile, had to be great -- and was -- to deny Milwaukee's Giannis Antetokounmpo for the first time all season
LeBron James and Jayson Tatum were just named West and East Player of the Month by the NBA
My @NYTSports colleague @SopanDeb has spoken to Spike Lee this afternoon post-Knicks statement and has much more on last night's MSG flap. Best to just go to Sopan's feed because RT'ing one or two entries from the exchange would not do it justice
Zion Williamson and Coby White were just named West and East Rookie of the Month
Remember when one of the greatest players on the planet said “the cool thing right now is not the Knicks?” Even if he really believes Spike is the one creating “a false controversy” ... how does Dolan not see the damage this does to the Knicks’ brand handling things this way?
And the Nets’ statement on Kyrie Irving’s season-ending shoulder surgery:
The Knicks’ statement on Spike Lee:
Completely and utterly incomprehensible that this is the story du jour for the Knicks on the morning after they beat Houston and formally announced the hiring of Leon Rose as team president
You cannot alienate Spike Lee. Whatever the circumstances here ... you just cannot
Houston's Mike D'Antoni and Milwaukee's Mike Budenholzer were just named NBA Coach of the Month in the West and East, respectively
Kristaps Porzingis and Giannis Antetokounmpo were just named NBA Player(s) of the Week
Rough news for New Orleans in its bid to win the crowded race for No. 8 in the West. The Pels' schedule is by far the most favorable in the chasing pack but they certainly didn't need another injury
The Pelicans say they have lost JJ Redick for at least two weeks to a hamstring strain
Foden starts! Christmas in March!
If it is OK with certain governing bodies ... I shall now walk down Wembley Way and go to this Cup final #werethefamousmancity and #weregoingtowembehlee
Good shout, Hojo. All suggestions welcome ...
The Rockets today signed Jeff Green for the remainder of the season after initially bringing Green to Houston on a 10-day deal
The NBA just fined the Minnesota Timberwolves 25,000 for violating the league’s player resting policy. The violation occurred when the Timberwolves rested D’Angelo Russell -- a healthy player under the policy -- during a road game against the Denver Nuggets on Feb. 23
TFW you score some Patrick Deadstock Grails from the 1980s -- UNWORN -- that look like they were found in Kevin Keegan's closer. Tell 'em, @DeadstockUtopia
Also: Steve Kerr told reporters today Stephen Curry may need more scrimmage time to be cleared, putting Sunday vs. Washington is some doubt. "I think yesterday’s report, which was news to us, is not official," Kerr said. "Nothing’s official. Steph will play when he’s ready to go"
The Lakers have ruled LeBron James (left groin) out for Thursday's game at Golden State
Have to say it's something to see the little Bolton man grow up to be quite a fill-in host ...
Listen to the Chelsea fan ... not me
Also: @DeBruyneKev is the most delightful-to-watch player I've ever seen besides my two children ... and now I shall STICK TO HOOPS, STEIN
If it is OK with UEFA ... I shall now tweet out a football score: Real Madrid 1, Manchester City 2
The prominent player agent Leon Rose takes over as the Knicks’ new team president when the calendar flips to March ... Sunday. More coverage for @NYTSports:
The Yankees had to play on with zero time to grieve after the death of an icon in 1979. Here’s the link to my @NYTSports convo with one of their pillars — @mroctober Reggie Jackson — to get a sense of what the Lakers face as they try to do the same —&gt;
Leon Rose will start in his new role as Knicks president March 1 -- this Sunday -- @NYTSports has learned
A lifetime of RedVines memes awaits ...
Could use some of this from @ACFresh21 at the Bernabeu tomorrow ...
My man @ChrisBHaynes just reported on TNT that Dion Waiters has a March 2 meeting date with the Lakers
The New York Yankees had to play on with zero time to grieve after the death of an icon in 1979. For this week's @NYTimes NBA newsletter, I spoke to one of their pillars — @mroctober Reggie Jackson -- to try to learn more about what the Lakers face as they do the same ...
Complete top 10: 1. Rui Hachimura 2. LeBron James 3. Stephen Curry 4. Kyrie Irving 5. James Harden 6. Russell Westbrook 7. Anthony Davis 8. Luka Doncic 9. Kawhi Leonard 10. Kevin Durant
NBA's top jersey sales in Japan: 5. Harden 4. Kyrie 3. Curry 2. LeBron 1. RUI
The season doesn't feel nearly as wide open as some billed it ... but we also can't be too sure about which two teams will be playing June 4 #refreshing
The NBA just announced that Game 1 of the NBA Finals will be June 4
Whoa: Canceling this summer's Tokyo OIympics in the wake of the coronavirus, according to an IOC official, is a consideration ...
From an @MLS career and the left back slot in the All-Time Dallas XI, this @GreenhillSchool legend is now writing daily about the NBA. Proud of you, kid ...
Big Gheorghe is there, too. Something also tells me he's a bigger Ionescu fan than anyone ...
Hagi. Comaneci. Nastase. Halep ... it looks more and more as though Romania's sporting greats indeed have to make room for, yes, a basketball player to join their pantheon: @sabrina_i20
From @ScottCacciola, @tarangoNYT, @alanblinder and the whole squad: All the sights and sounds from today's service at Staples Center ...
Full @NYTSports coverage of Michael Jordan's teary tribute to Kobe Bryant:
Don't think anyone watching today will ever forget this image of Michael Jeffrey Jordan ... talking about his friend Kobe Bean Bryant ...
Michael Jordan helping Vanessa Bryant off stage ...
Vanessa Bryant with strength that defies words in closing her unbelievably moving remembrance: "God knew they couldn't be on this Earth without each other. He had to bring them home to heaven together"
Fantastic story from my colleague @ScottCacciola on today's Kobe and Gianna Bryant Memorial and how other (bigger) venues were considered ... but how only Staples Center was truly appropriate --&gt;
An all-day @nytimes live blog of Kobe Bryant memorial coverage — including my latest on the Hall of Fame photographer Andy Bernstein and the assignment Kobe’s dear friend and co-author has taken on today — is here and will be updated frequently:
But how do you convince your significant other this is completely normal behavior?
Markieff Morris has cleared waivers, league sources say. He's a Laker
This is the second protest of an NBA game this season following Houston's unsuccessful protest in December of a fourth-quarter scoring error the league acknowledged in an eventual double-overtime loss to San Antonio
Sources say Dallas will also ask the NBA to review the first possession of the game in its belief that a play that resulted in a separated shoulder for Mavericks guard Jalen Brunson should have been reviewed
The Mavericks, sources say, believe league rules should have prevented John Collins' decisive basket to stand. The officials on the floor allowed Collins' basket to count following a video review that overturned a goaltending call
Dallas will be making the case that the end of the game should be replayed, with Atlanta ahead by two points and a jump ball with 9.7 seconds remaining
The Dallas Mavericks, citing a "misapplication of the rules," have filed an official protest of Saturday's road loss to the Atlanta Hawks to the league office, @NYTSports has learned
For our @readercenter Times Insider series on A2, in advance of Monday’s memorial, I wrote about an old Dallas ritual with Kobe Bryant and how much I enjoyed watching Mamba and The Mambacita in late December —&gt;
Doubt I'm here for the next one but it looks like we're good for a miracle on ice every 40 years on this date ...
A complaint Cuban has been voicing directly to the league for some time is now more public ...
The fact that this happened to Buffalo's forever Adams Division enemies does not factor into the reality that this story is INSANE and irresistibly good
#Sport
You know you might be writing a lot about someone when your phone autocorrects Luke to Luka ...
The Pistons are signing Donta Hall from Grand Rapids in the @nbagleague to a 10-day deal, league sources say
An excerpt from @shaq on coping with Kobe Bryant grief as Monday’s memorial service in Los Angeles draws near ...
I remember, sir. Freshman! You were among four or five future NBA players in that game. Not even 4,000 people in there but a LOT of noise
1986: @HankDaHighFlyer answers Geoff Witcher’s “will he slam it?” with a 360 as @csuf routs Washington  scaring Pac-12 teams away from Titan Gym for all eternity  and @WorldWideWob is a patient saint to make this for @RexChapman, @DavidAldridgeDC &amp; Titan Tech fans everywhere
NBA rules allow a player waived when injured to continue rehabbing with that team. DeMarcus Cousins is unlikely to be formally released by the Lakers until Sunday ... and is expected to be granted access to keep using Laker facilities in his comeback from an ACL tear if needed
And, yes, it means that the Lakers will be forced to play a back-to-back-to-back on April 7, 8 and 9
The NBA rescheduled three other games after moving Lakers vs. Clippers to April 9: Bulls at Clippers on April 8 has been moved to April 6 Warriors at Lakers originally scheduled for April 9 will be played on April 7 Bulls at Lakers on April 7 will be moved to April 8
The NBA has rescheduled the Lakers-Clippers game from Jan. 28 to April 9
For SportsSunday in the @nytimes: As Monday's memorial service for Kobe Bryant draws near, Shaquille O'Neal and the duo's first Lakers coach, Del Harris, discuss the grief that continues to grip the NBA --&gt;
Don't make me post the Henry Turner 360 against Washington in the last game that a Pac-10 (or Pac-12) team dared to set foot inside Titan Gym ...
Thompson, though, remains in contention for a spot on the United States' 12-man roster for the Tokyo Olympics. @usabasketball will finalize that roster in June and Klay is said to be making good progress in his recovery from a torn left ACL in Game 6 of last season's NBA Finals
The Warriors have this week made it official and fully ruled out Klay Thompson (left knee) for the remainder of the season, league sources say
Gridiron Football Tweet: Please sign this man, @BuffaloBills ...
Undeniably disheartening as it is to see Irving in uniform for just 20 games in his maiden season as a Net, this is obviously the smart course. Brooklyn should make the playoffs anyway in the ever-thin East and can focus on getting Kyrie and Kevin Durant fully fit for next season
Kyrie Irving said when he came back that he opted for a cortisone shot over surgery at the time to see if he could play through the injury. Nets GM Sean Marks said today that, after consulting a specialist this week, Irving is opting for the season-ending procedure
Sean Marks tells reporters in Philadelphia that Kyrie Irving will undergo shoulder surgery and is out for the season
The Sixers say Ben Simmons (back) is out tonight and the Celtics say Kemba Walker (knee) is out Friday night. Both played in Sunday's All-Star Game
Here's our @powellnyt with a look at the battle for Staples Center supremacy between the Lakers and the Clippers ... just in time for resumption of the NBA's regular season tonight:
Amid growing fears Bagley may miss the rest of the season, this update indicates that the Kings have not abandoned hope that 2018's No. 2 overall pick makes it back. Sacramento is clinging to playoff viability with 28 games to go and a seven-game deficit behind No. 8 Memphis
The Kings announce that Marvin Bagley (sprained left foot) will be re-evaluated in three weeks
More Beilein: "I grew concerned for the consequences this toll could potentially take on my own health and my family’s well-being down the road. I was not certain I could be at my best for the remainder of the season and in the future.”
Beilein: “This was a very difficult decision ... but I want to be clear: This was my decision to step down and I truly appreciate the understanding and support of the front office ... I find losing very challenging and this year has taken a much bigger toll on me than I expected"
The Cavs announce that John Beilein has officially resigned
The Hawks say newly acquired C Clint Capela (plantar fasciitis) will be re-evaluated in two weeks
When I saw Allen Iverson at a @PaniniAmerica signing, AI knew the All-Star Game would be emotional. Yet he leaned totally into the mood of the evening ... as this video (and his Kobe attire) conveys. More from our chat from @NYTSports' Chicago coverage:
Marveling at Zion, missing Michael and other All-Star Weekend takeaways from the digital edition of the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter --&gt;
Here is the MSG statement after Charles Oakley's suit against Knicks owner James Dolan and the Madison Square Garden Company was dismissed today: “We thank the court for its ruling. This was an incident that no one was happy about. Maybe now there can be peace between us.”
Top TAKEAWAYS from an emotional All-Star Weekend and much more ... all freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide via the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter 
Put Edwards in. Or Sauve. HURRY!
Irving's injury is best described as a deterioration in the shoulder. When he discussed his return in late December, Irving acknowledged that he took a cortisone shot at the time in hopes of avoiding surgery. The reality is that he has been playing with on and off discomfort
Kyrie Irving has re-aggravated his injured right shoulder that cost him 26 games and is out indefinitely again, Nets coach Kenny Atkinson confirmed today
J.B. Bickerstaff is poised to take over in-season as an NBA head coach for the third time, league sources say, after Cleveland's inevitable parting with John Beilein. Bickerstaff also had to step in midstream in Houston (37-34 in 2015-16) and Memphis (15-48 in 2017-18) previously
About Last Night for @NYTSports: The NBA All-Star Game that was everything you expected in tribute to Kobe Bryant ... and still completely surprising thanks to a fourth quarter of unprecedented intensity —&gt;
A basketball game breaking out was what this weekend really, really needed
The All-Star hosts, according to the longtime Bulls maven @KCJHoop, have used this week to continue their backchannel search for candidates for a potential front-office revamp 
And here's how the cover looks in @nytimes SportsSunday print form as assembled by the incomparable @zagatam ...
Five hours before tipoff in Chicago: @NYTSports' look at Luka Doncic as the Dallas phenom prepares to make his first All-Star start -- along with the backstory about Luka's brief-but-unforgettable interaction with Kobe Bryant --&gt;
More on @usabasketball heading into the Tokyo Olympics: China's coronavirus crisis obviously creates a new potential obstacle to the two games it hoped to play there in July. USAB will name its 12-man roster in June and hold a domestic training camp in early July -- all else TBD
Gotta add a category to the All-Lefty Team for @TheRea1DJones
As Adam Silver said at his press conference, @usabasketball may play two exhibition games in China in July before heading to the Tokyo Olympics. If those games are confirmed, Silver said the NBA "may decide not" to try to stage two preseason games in China as seen most Octobers
"The Kobe Bryant MVP Award"
The NBA has named its All-Star MVP trophy in Kobe Bryant's honor, Adam Silver announces
Invaluable input for this Luka piece from Kobe's Slovenian tutor and longtime teammate @SashaVujacic, @kporzee and @mcuban in Dallas and Slovenia's maiden All-Star @Goran_Dragic
And here’s the latest from our own @SopanDeb on the NBA’s seasonlong tensions with China ... which are sure to be addressed tonight when NBA commissioner Adam Silver gives his annual All-Star State of the League address
The backstory on where Kobe Bryant picked up his Slovenian unprintables to lob at Luka Doncic -- plus many more Luka stories -- is all here in this @NYTimes SportsSunday special as Doncic prepares to make his first All-Star start --&gt;
All I can see is a trip to Wembley on March 1 ...
What a Gowdy group announced by the @hoophall today. The peerless Mike Breen ... Jim Gray stalking the sidelines in #thisleague for as long as I can remember ... @NBAonTNT's Inside as the No. 1 show for basketball fans for 30 years -- CONGRATS TO ALL
When I was a @washingtonpost intern many years and pounds ago, @RealMikeWilbon was such an open, patient, willing mentor. LOVE seeing him get The Gowdy today from the @Hoophall ... one of the best hoop scribes to ever do it long before he became the TV star you all know now
Both Dragan Bender (Milwaukee) and Ryan Broekhoff (Dallas) have cleared waivers to become unrestricted free agents, league sources say
The NBA announces that Devin Booker will replace the injured Damian Lillard in the All-Star Game
The digital version of this week's newsletter also includes a bonus fourth section created by the newsletter staff to create the extra real estate needed to get into the latest developments with the Knicks and their new front office ...
The top decision-maker for at least four NBA teams still rocks a @BlackBerry. One of them, Minnesota’s Gersson Rosas, made three trades last week with his. We explore the league’s small but loyal cadre of BB holdouts in the latest @nytimes NBA newsletter:
The newsletter also expounds on the four lead decision-makers in the league known to still rely on @BlackBerry devices for their main wheeling and dealing ... as well as a special new fourth category our newsletter staff created because, well, we needed more Knicks real estate
Freshly dispatched the inboxes everywhere: Our latest @nytimes NBA newsletter featuring the @BlackBerry-toting GM who just made three trades ... with Minnesota's Gersson Rosas unaware that his beloved gadget took one sad step closer to EXTINCTION during Trade Deadline Week
The Knicks issue their first Steve Stoute-related statement after today's interview on @FirstTake ...
Lengthy appearance today on @FirstTake from the Knicks' new rebranding consultant Steve Stoute. He called himself a "branding guru" and a "marketing guru" and is a well-known entertainment figure in NBA circles ... but the Knicks first and foremost need a TEAM-BUILDING guru
Message from the classy and beloved-in-his-locker room @RBroekhoff45 ...
Dallas must make a roster move Tuesday to add Kidd-Gilchrist, who secured his buyout from Charlotte over the weekend. The Mavericks will waive Ryan Broekhoff, league sources say, and then sign Kidd-Gilchrist
The Mavericks are nearing an agreement to sign Michael Kidd-Gilchrist, league sources say.
The Raptors of Toronto, who made zero trades but have zero losses in their last 15 games, clearly intend to meet up with Milwaukee again in the Eastern Conference finals
Don't think Philly will be allowed to play all its playoff games at home. Don't think Dallas will be allowed to play all its playoff games on the road. But both teams should ask ...
The season Jimmy Butler is having ...
Denver's Nikola Jokic and Boston's Jayson Tatum ... NBA Player of the Week in the West and East, respectively
From SportsMonday in the @nytimes: Giannis Antetokounmpo just tunes out the noise and keeps attacking the rim —&gt;
The big takeaway: Today's roster doesn't mean LeBron and Kawhi and the stars dealing with major injuries (Curry, Durant and Klay) are definitely going to the Olympics ... but it means they have all volunteered to some degree with four-ish months to go until the roster is set
As @usabasketball chairman Jerry Colangelo told @NYTSports last month, this preliminary roster features virtually every top American name available -- with the 12 players who will ultimately go Tokyo to be selected and announced in June before the NBA playoffs are complete
Stephen Curry, Anthony Davis, Kevin Durant, Paul George, Kyrie Irving, LeBron James, Kawhi Leonard, Damian Lillard and Klay Thompson -- they're all on the @usabasketball 44-man preliminary roster for the Tokyo Olympics just officially announced ...
My man @stephenasmith was covering the Sixers when I met him. Tonight he's doing the live postgame show at the Oscars #chapeau
Column for SportsMonday in the @nytimes: Giannis Antetokounmpo drafts anyone he wants, plays ferociously hard every night and, as often happens for the star of the 45-7 Bucks, won Trade Deadline Week as much as anyone while chaos ensued around him —&gt;
Big West must be a tougher league ...
Stephen Curry says during the Warriors/Lakers national broadcast that "first week of March" is his target to return from the broken left hand suffered four games into the season
Twenty-two years ago tonight ... at MSG
Beal won my mythical All-Star vote on Opening Night when the Mavs were toying with the Wiz and he started guarding Luka Doncic like his life depended on it. Stunning revenge for Beal and the Wiz tonight
Detroit's Reggie Jackson is still assessing whether to pursue a buyout or complete his Pistons contract, league sources say, but the Clippers have emerged as a likely suitor if Jackson goes that route The Clips, of course, also have interest in prime Laker target Darren Collison
Sound the #CacciolaAlert ... it's our man on Rockets Microball:
For SportsFriday in @nytimes: All the big stuff in one place from our sweep through the last day trades were allowed this season in the NBA —&gt;
The All-Star rosters as drafted by @KingJames and @Giannis_An34 ...
James Dolan announces he is NOT selling the Knicks but that he is "actively looking" for a new team president and hopes to "conclude the search as quickly as possible" ... with the entire NBA now awaiting the official hiring of longtime player agent Leon Rose
The Lakers are expected to give free agent guard JR Smith a post-trade deadline audition (perhaps as soon as next week) and remain favorites to sign Darren Collison if Collison elects to make a comeback to the NBA -- in addition to potential pickups on the buyout market
The Warriors clearly believe that bringing Andrew Wiggins into a winning environment -- something he has really never experienced -- will take him to a new level. They will face no shortage of skepticism ...
The Warriors are trading D'Angelo Russell to Minnesota, @espn reports
Despite pitches from Orlando and others, Phoenix has yet to receive an offer that would convince the Suns to part with Kelly Oubre, league sources say. Two hours left until the NBA trade deadline ...
Turning the Knicks around is a mammoth task -- and the timing of this week's moves has made their trade deadline a roller-coaster -- but getting Rose to leave one of the richest agent seats in the business gives New York its most well-connected, widely respected leader in years
Leon Rose has no front-office experience ... but if the Knicks were not prepared to undertake a protracted pursuit or Masai Ujiri or any other established name under contract they have at least managed to poach one of the biggest names possible from the player agent ranks
A major motivation for the Kings' trade with Atlanta is re-signing Bogdan Bogdanovic ... and league sources say Sacramento is indeed optimistic it has established the needed financial flexibility to match any offer sheet for the RFA-to-be and keep Bogdanovic in Sactown
The Pelicans just upgraded Zion Williamson (right toe) from questionable to available Thursday night in Chicago ...
D'Angelo Russell IS scheduled to be in uniform tonight for the Warriors in what would D-Lo's return to Brooklyn after an All-Star season for the Nets
The Warriors are expected to hold Glenn Robinson III and Alec Burks out of tonight's game in Brooklyn in anticipation of trading one or both before Thursday's 3 PM ET deadline
The Pelicans just listed Zion Williamson (right toe sprain) as questionable for Thursday's game in Chicago
The Suns are fielding trade calls on Kelly Oubre with 22 hours and change to go before the NBA trade deadline, league sources say
Among the key points of emphasis in the final 24 hours before the NBA trade deadline: The Knicks know they can move Marcus Morris -- it appears to be only a matter of where now -- and we await the Clippers' long-awaited move(s)
The digital version of this week's @NYTimes NBA newsletter explores the hints of promise, as well as the considerable hurdles the Knicks face in terms of compensation issues and granting sufficient autonomy, in the pursuit of Toronto's Masai Ujiri --&gt;
Let’s get into the Knicks’ pursuit of Toronto’s Masai Ujiri ... inside the latest edition of the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter ... freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide 
Mega Knicks @NYTimes weekly NBA newsletter coming soon. Sign up via email here so it gets sent straight to your inbox:
The Bulls have naturally received trade feelers for Zach LaVine but "off limits" was the description used by one source briefed on Chicago's thinking
The Raptors declined comment Tuesday when asked if the Knicks have sought formal permission to speak with Toronto president Masai Ujiri, citing a team policy of not commenting on personnel matters
Memphis' Ja Morant and Miami's Kendrick Nunn were just named West and East Rookie of the Month for January
Ousting Steve Mills before he makes another move -- if you know you ultimately want to replace him -- makes good sense ... except when it happens 48(ish) hours before the trade deadline. The Knicks have to land Ujiri or someone on Masai's level to make people forget the timing
The Knicks' statement on Steve Mills' exit ...
There have been strong rumblings since December that the Knicks believe they have a real shot to lure Masai Ujiri away from Toronto to take over. Of course, many also believed the Knicks knew they were getting Kevin Durant and Kyrie Irving when they traded away Kristaps Porzingis
The pride that the four pillars of Mount Grizzmore --- ZBo, Tony Allen, Conley and MGasol -- had for representing Memphis was always so tangible. The stars of the new-age Grizz clearly have it, too
Since the one-year anniversary of last season's trade from the Knicks to Dallas, Kristaps Porzingis has posted two 35-and-10 games. According to @MavsPR research, @kporzee had one in his first 222 career games
Can't believe this didn't come up on the pod @ZachLowe_NBA and @WindhorstESPN ... no one and I mean NO ONE ever made an NBA trade demand better than Lucian Tucker of the Pittsburgh Pythons (expertly played by ex-Buffalo Brave Jerry Chambers) in The Fish That Saved Pittsburgh
Toronto's Nick Nurse and Memphis' Taylor Jenkins were just named East and West Coach of the Month, respectively, by the NBA
According to former Spurs beat writer @JabariJYoung, now of CNBC, San Antonio is working with DeMarre Carroll to find him a new home via trade before Thursday's 3 PM trade buzzer
Jaylen Brown and Damian Lillard were just named East and West Player of the Week by the NBA
China's coronavirus outbreak has reached such a serious state that the NBA sent a memo to teams last week to clarify that this is now considered a global health emergency and reminding them that travel to China is strongly discouraged at this time, league sources say
The Iguodala situation is fascinating because Memphis is adamant that it will not buy him out if a trade fails to materialize by Thursday's 3 PM buzzer. You obviously expect the Grizzlies to say that now ... but there are only 75 hours left to find a trade anticipated for months
The Mavericks still seek a wing upgrade after the acquisition of big man Willie Cauley-Stein -- but league sources say Dallas has maintained its reluctance to join the Andre Iguodala trade chase (as reported here in December) and is also not actively bidding on Robert Covington
And, as noted here Jan. 23, lots of rival teams are anticipating at least one trade this week from the Clippers, who have been pursuing a big and a wing even after their home-run summer acquisitions of Kawhi Leonard and Paul George
Many thought the Warriors would wait until draft time to seriously ponder moving D'Angelo Russell, but sources say they are listening to pitches -- with no secret Minnesota wants D-Lo badly. Golden State is widely expected to trade Alec Burks and/or Glenn Robinson III this week
Ambitious as it sounds, Minnesota has sought two first-round picks in exchange for Robert Covington in advance of Thursday's trade deadline, league sources say. Let's see where the Wolves land if/when they actually deal him, with Philly and Houston at the front of the RoCo line
It's officially NBA Trade Deadline Week ... in the Eastern time zone. Buzzer is Thursday at 3 PM ET
Didn't really have a rooting interest ... until I heard Andy Reid has @OriginalTommys burgers frozen and mailed to him on occasion
Steve Kerr is right. Replay only works in tennis and nothing else
VAR infiltrates our Sunday again
A week ago, at noon Pacific time, former NBA champion Jason Terry was scheduled to coach against Kobe Bryant for the first time. For SportsSunday in the @nytimes, Terry retraces the most tragic of basketball weekends and its aftermath —&gt;
Kyrie Irving post-game tonight: "What a week. I'm OK, though. Just gotta get an MRI. X-rays were negative ..."
Kyrie Irving left the Nets' game tonight with what the team termed a knee sprain
Unreal that an ankle epidemic has now felled both freshly minted All-Stars in what was supposed to be a Trae v Luka duel tonight
A sprained right ankle has knocked Trae Young out of tonight's game in Dallas
A week ago @jasonterry31 hugged Kobe Bryant courtside and scouted Gianna Bryant. Kobe’s helicopter crashed en route to a game against Terry’s @LadyDriveNation the next morning. For SportsSunday in the @nytimes, Terry retraces the tragic tale a week later:
The Raptors' Norman Powell is out indefinitely with what the team lists as a fractured fourth METACARPAL in his left hand
Does Dame ever miss a 30-footer?
Live @nytimes updates from the Lakers/Blazers Kobe Tribute Game at Staples Center:
Pretty sure no ever has to ask again if LeBron will be embraced as a Laker ...
Man ... when Lawrence Tanter's voice is cracking
Young Kobe and Chick ...
No definitive recovery time frame yet on the Maverics' Luka Doncic, but one source briefed on his condition described Thursday's injury in practice as a "manageable ankle sprain." Doncic missed four games in December with a similar injury
Every time you hear those nine names  it just gets sadder and sadder and sadder
All-Star starters and reserves:
Lakers GM Rob Pelinka, Kobe Bryant’s former agent, pays tribute to Kobe and his daughter Gianna ...
The cap remains poised to rise $6 million from this season to next ... but the NBA is still assessing the extent of the damage from the China controversy stemming from Daryl Morey's pro-Hong Kong tweet as well as general "volatility" above the norm in leaguewide economics
The $116 million projection for next season's salary cap was in September and the next projection, following today's estimate of $115 million, is due in April, league sources say
The NBA has just informed its teams that the salary cap for next season is expected to be $115 million .. still well up from this season's $109 million but down slightly from previous projections of $116 million
It's the same right ankle Doncic sprained in December. He made it back into the lineup after missing four games last time .. Dallas has eight games left before the All-Star break
Luka Doncic, I'm told, will undergo an MRI exam Friday to gauge the full extent of the ankle injury he suffered Thursday at practice
A breakdown from the NBA on its new All-Star Game format ...
The NBA is tweaking its All-Star format, reports @ByTimReynolds, with an element in tribute to Kobe Bryant included ...
Deplorable stuff to cap a night at MSG where the Knicks found all the wrong reasons to enter the national discourse 
Here is Vanessa Bryant’s IG post released today ...
On the basketball obsession that bonded Kobe and Gianna Bryant for @NYTSports ... with reflections from the dribbling maestro God Shammgod on his unprecedented opportunity to coach them both:
What Up, Beck?
And now the digital version of the @nytimes NBA newsletter on the basketball obsession that bonded Kobe and Gianna ... and what it was like to actually coach them both for Gianna’s Uncle Shamm: Mavs assistant God Shammgod —&gt;
This week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter can only be all about Kobe ... and Gianna. With tremendous insight from the man who had the extraordinary opportunity to coach them both: Mavs development coach and dribbling wizard God Shammgod — or, as Gianna called him, Uncle Shamm
Tape it. Watch it. Trust us
West was in the process of winning Executive of the Year honors with the Memphis Grizzlies at the time ... but he obviously still had a huge role as a life coach and sounding board for Kobe after bringing him to Los Angeles as a 17-year-old
If you missed maybe the best hour of TV we've ever seen from Inside ... you also missed Jerry West -- no longer a Laker employee at that point -- revealing how he told Kobe Bryant in the 2004 that he should not sign with the Clippers because he should not play for Donald Sterling
Also: The Logo Jerry West should be the logo for raw emotion ...
Shaq telling the story of Kobe telling him .... "I'm going to be the best player in the world ... and off the court I'm going to be bigger than Will Smith"
The Big Human ...
It's obviously an individual decision for every player to make whether they want to keep the number they have or ask to change it. Some players may feel as though they are honoring Kobe's legacy by continuing to wear No. 8 or No. 24
There are 20 more players in the league who currently wear No. 8 --- after the Nets' Spencer Dinwiddie and Orlando's Terrence Ross gave theirs up today --- and 12 players who wear No. 24, according to research by my friends at @bball_ref
Requests by current NBA players to change from No. 8 or No. 24 to a new number in tribute to Kobe Bryant, like the Nets' Spencer Dinwiddie just did, will be reviewed by the NBA on a case-by-case basis, according to a source briefed on the process
The NBA typically makes players wait for a new season to start to allow players to change a jersey number but Dinwiddie has been granted permission to make the switch to No. 26, according to a source familiar with the decision
The Nets’ Spencer Dinwiddie announces his number change from No. 8 — one of Kobe Bryant’s Laker Numbers — to No. 26
"We're still gonna have the best duo ever created, that's not gonna change, but I wish at 60 and 70, in the old folks' home or on a show, we could talk about it" -- @SHAQ on his own podcast about his eight-year partnership with Kobe Bean Bryant
Kobe's most defining on-court moments ... courtesy of @BenHoffmanNYT and @nytimes Interactive:
Today is also #HolocaustMemorialDay and so I take this one-tweet TO from everything happening at work to pay tribute to the millions of lives we lost  as well as my late father Reuven and his parents, Esther and Alexander, for miraculously surviving it
How good was Kobe on the mic, off the cuff, after those 60 points? Man. That @Hoophall speech would have been so, so, SO epic. More in the column below ... #MambaOut
Something else I missed earlier today: This @alleniverson tribute to Kobe with a great story in the heart-on-the-sleeve way AI always told it ...
Leave it to the ledge @miketirico to remember this and chapeau to @gordonhayward for doing it ...
Kobe Bryant was 17 when he hit the NBA and those of us covering the Lakers had never seen anything like him Some reflections from me for @NYTSports: And my man @HowardBeck ... who took over as the @ladailynews' Kobe Chronicler:
This is beautiful 
From the Lakers: The Los Angeles Lakers would like to thank all of you for the tremendous outpouring of support and condolences. This is a very difficult time for all of us. We continue to support the Bryant family and will share more information as it is available
No teams that played Sunday requested for games to be canceled, league sources say, but there is obviously no manual for dealing with a tragedy like this. Teams that did play Sunday were allowed to keep locker rooms closed pre-game to delay Kobe questions until after the games
Continuing live updates from the @nytimes team on Kobe Bryant's death in a helicopter crash can be found here:
Here is the official league statement on postponing Tuesday night’s Lakers vs. Clippers game in the wake of Kobe Bryant’s death ...
The NBA has postponed tomorrow night's Lakers vs. Clippers game
The tweet that sums it up as well as anybody's 
My first @nytimes Kobe piece which runs under this moving @NYTSports cover in the wake of as tragic an NBA day as I can remember:
Full Mavericks statement:
Mavericks team owner Mark Cuban announces that no player in Mavericks history will ever wear No. 24 again in tribute to Kobe Bryant
1. Kareem 38,387 2. Mailman 36,928 3. LeBron 33,644 (and counting)
Not the score he was after in Philly ... but LeBron James has officially moved past Kobe Bryant for third place on the NBA's all-time scoring charts
Lakers about to go to 12-0 in back-to-backs after bring some serious buzz to Madison Square Garden and Barclays Center this week. Regular-season focus we don't often see anymore in #thisleague
Win them all, Liverpool. Run the table. Get it all out of your system ...
We sent the Zion of our staff to New Orleans last night to capture the majesty of the prized rookie's debut. Sound the #CacciolaAlert
Andre Drummond and Steven Adams are the big-name bigs available, but among the most intriguing is Aron Baynes. The Suns are not shopping Baynes, league sources say, but they have also not ruled out moving him before the Feb. 6 deadline if a team meets their trade price
The Mavericks are in a similar position after the season-ending loss of the frontcourt mainstay Dwight Powell. Dallas was already in the market for a wing upgrade and, league sources say, is exploring its options for a move (trade or signing) to bolster its frontline as well
Doesn't guarantee that they'll make a deal, of course, but the Clippers are said to be concerned about their lack of muscle up front compared to the Lakers' length as well as the ongoing health issues Kawhi Leonard and Paul George are battling
The Clippers, even after the off-season of their dreams, are exploring the trade market for dependable size as well as potential wing depth in advance of the Feb. 6 trade deadline, league sources say
First step toward Zion vs. LeBron in the first round ...
Zion Williamson’s official NBA debut is only a few hours away now. Here’s a preview, via the digital version of the @nytimes’ weekly NBA newsletter, with some valuable input from New Orleans’ seen-it-all vet JJ Redick —&gt;
Maccabi Tel Aviv announces the signing of Amar’e Stoudemire ...
Rookie of the Year honors are out of reach for Zion Williamson ... but a first-round playoff showdown with LeBron James is not. We preview Zion’s comeback in this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter. (Sign up here:
Zillions of basketball luminaries in attendance today at the David Stern tribute memorial in New York City, as @MarcJSpearsESPN noted, and Yao Ming is indeed in the front row after all the tumult between the NBA and China to begin the season
Nobody beats Kemba Walker 29 times in a row (H/T Vitas Gerulaitis)
Ben Simmons and Kawhi Leonard have just been named East and West Player of the Week by the NBA
To supplement your #MLKDay viewing, please welcome back The Committee (of One) for its annual one-week return to deliver NBA Power Rankings at the regular-season midpoint —&gt;
The Committee (of One), as always in mid-January, is back for a one-week engagement with a fresh batch of Power Rankings now that teams have crossed the 41-game mark —&gt;
LeBron at 35 and Fed at 38 #notfair
Polite of the local basketball franchise to let the 49ers borrow some Bay spotlight ...
Our Sunday story details the surprising Mavs-style zone thrown by the Lakers at Dallas on Jan. 10 ... and here is @hmfaigen with some revealing sentiments from Frank Vogel about how the Lakers’ coach barely enjoyed it even though it was successful 
The expectation is virtually every top American player -- after such a struggle at last summer's @FIBAWC in China -- will be on the @usabasketball preliminary roster. Colangelo, Popovich and Sean Ford will then use the next three months to nail down a dozen commitments for Tokyo
The plan from there, Colangelo said, is for @usabasketball to narrow that initial expanded roster down to a 12-man final roster for the Tokyo Olympics in early June ... before Gregg Popovich brings the group together for training camp in early July
Program director Jerry Colangelo tells @NYTSports that @usabasketball is planning to announce a preliminary roster for this summer's 2020 Olympics by month's end that could approach 40 players. "We've had a great response," Colangelo said
To counter the NBA’s offensive revolution, teams are increasingly turning to a polarizing old reliable ... zone defenses. An examination for SportsSunday in the @nytimes:
For much of the season, Doncic played the entire first quarter and the entire third. He is now taking breathers in those quarters and couldn't have been more ruthless late tonight in combining with Tim Hardaway Jr. and Seth Curry to turn back Portland's comeback
The Mavericks, league sources say, made the data-driven decision to stop playing Doncic for entire first and third quarters to keep more in his tank for crunch time. Dallas knows it must keep Luka as fresh as it can for closing time given how much he is asked to do offensively
After watching Luka Doncic close out Wednesday's road win at Sacramento and then Portland at home tonight, Mavericks officials are hugely encouraged by the recent shift they've made in their substitution patterns with Luka Doncic following his recent four-game injury absence
Melo's response: "HE'S a walking bucket"
Rainbow STEPBACK and I am quitting autocorrect forever ...
Luka's eighth 3 was the best of them of all. Rainbow snapback after a tough drive has sealed this one for Dallas ... with Doncic v Dame a quite tasty fourth-quarter show
Sneak peak at a @nytimes SportsSunday special: Examining the rise of antiquated, collegiate zone defenses in the modern, souped-up NBA ... with input from Rick Carlisle, Doc Rivers, Nick Nurse — and a dismayed Gary Payton:
As @NYTSports first reported Dec. 31, teams have been voicing "strong concern" for some time about proposals to re-seed the playoffs at the conference finals stage ... which has raised the possibility that the NBA will abandon the idea to re-seed those four teams
The league wants to take more time to refine aspects of a playoff play-in tournament and the much-discussed, soccer-style tournament that would take place during the season before putting it to a vote of team owners
The feeling in NBA circles remains that a play-in playoff tournament and an in-season tournament will still be adopted by the league ... but teams were indeed notified today that there will be NO vote in April
Results are based on sales between October and December and I’ve included the top 10 teams ... which do not include the Clippers despite this season’s SICK Buffalo Braves retros ...
Full top 15 in NBA jersey sales: 1. LeBron 2. Giannis 3. Curry 4. Tatum 5. Harden 6. Luka 7. Kawhi 8. Anthony Davis 9. Embiid 10. Kyrie 11. Ben Simmons 12. Durant 13. Westbrook 14. Kemba 15. Zion
The NBA announces that LeBron, Giannis and Steph are the current top three in jersey sales. Boston's Jayson Tatum is fourth
Wednesday night AGAINST San Antonio. It's a home game for the Pelicans
Zion Williamson's NBA debut has been added to the national television schedule: It's now Wednesday night in San Antonio at 9:30 PM ET on ESPN
Best @shaqtin of the season 
Treated to a stirring @BuffaloSabres win tonight and the rare pleasure of watching Captain @Jackeichel15 in person ... and now I have to admit: Eager for tomorrow night’s return to the AAC for my first live look at @carmeloanthony as a Trail Blazer
The @BuffaloSabres are in my city so it's Date Night with No. 9. JACK!!!
The latest returns in NBA All-Star voting before fan balloting closes Monday at 11:59 PM ET ...
In mid-November, Magic coach Steve Clifford told me @MarkelleF would be "at another level" 30 games from now. Looking like a wise forecast:
Also: Didn't know the dunk contest was at Staples tonight  @Double0AG won this time
Markelle Fultz going anywhere he wants in this fourth quarter 
The Nets also just announced the signing of guard Jeremiah Martin to a two-way deal
The Nets just signed Timothy Luwawu-Cabarrot to a 10-day deal
Revealing commentary about the conditions for @AustralianOpen qualifying this week ...
To supplement Magic at Lakers ... here’s the digital version of this week’s @nytimes NBA NEWSLETTER on the rise of the Lakers’ Alex Caruso from G-Leaguer to an “invaluable piece of our success” in the words of Frank Vogel —&gt;
Good thread in which Gregg Popovich discusses why Miami’s breakout star Bam Adebayo did not earn a @usabasketball roster berth last summer ...
The digital version of this week’s @nytimes NBA on the rise of the Lakers’ Alex Caruso from G-Leaguer to a player Frank Vogel describes as an “invaluable piece to our success” —&gt;
Jan. 22 against San Antonio is the target for Zion Williamson's NBA debut says Pelicans EVP of basketball operations David Griffin, who is speaking live to reporters now
I can't think of a single person -- not one -- who predicted before the season that Andre Iguodala could join a playoff team just by staying put
Revitalizing a franchise in your first NBA half-season is a good way to clinch Rookie of the Year before the All-Star break
Serbia's best player, of course, is also Malone's: Nikola Jokic. A deep Denver playoff run would make it a very short turnaround before Olympic last-chance qualifying in June, but Serbia's dream scenario is having both Nuggets for the six-team event it hosts for one spot in Tokyo
The Serbian basketball federation is in advanced discussions with Mike Malone to hire the Nuggets' coach as a top aide and consultant to Serbia head coach and Kings assistant Igor Kokoskov for this summer's Olympic campaign, according to league sources
An excerpt courtesy of the pride of @csuf and Lakerdom @hmfaigen ...
This week’s freshly dispatched @nytimes newsletter features the Lakers’ Alex Caruso — how he’s handling increased on-court responsibility, fame and LeBron’s high praise — plus yet another example of my idiocy by failing to list Thabo Sefolosha with Houston. But enjoy it anyway!
It wasn't "a take." Baseball pretty much invented scouting. Merely highlighting the contrast: Stealing signs VIA TECHNOLOGY is seen as such an advantage for hitters that MLB issued unprecedented penalties ... whereas even knowing the play coming in the NBA often doesn't help
Such an interesting contrast: Stealing signs is outright, blatant cheating in baseball ... and in the NBA every team, thanks to its tireless advance scouts, knows virtually every play the other team is running as soon as they call it out #sports
Need those qualifying draws, @AustralianOpen. Please!
The Kings say Richaun Holmes will be re-evaluated in 2-to-3 weeks after being diagnosed with a shoulder injury
The Lakers announce that LeBron James, Anthony Davis and Danny Green are all OUT tonight in Oklahoma City
LeBron having himself a decent Friday night amid the ripped jerseys and shorn sportcoats: 35 points, 16 boards and 7 dimes in 32 minutes to spark the Anthony Davis-less Lakers here in Lukatown
This has been an angry one in Dallas tonight. Guessing by now you've seen the clippage of Rick Carlisle and LeBron James jawing at each other after Bron overhead Carlisle complaining to the refs about a previous play
Luka Doncic just ripped his jersey in disgust after missing two free throws ... it's shredded down the middle
The NBA’s full explanation of the fines is here ...
"Escalating the incident on social media," according to the league's release, earned Butler the higher fine
The NBA has fined Jimmy Butler $35,000 and TJ Warren $25,000 for this week's spat
Best high school journalism camp in the country! Application details ...
Those who appreciate the art of high-level doubles and the pure entertainment of @NickKyrgios need to head to @TennisChannel immediately 
"Recklessly making contact above the shoulders OF an airborne shooter" was cited by the league as Portis' offense
The Knicks' Bobby Portis has been fined $25,000 for his foul on the Lakers' Kentavious Caldwell-Pope
The digital version of the @nytimes NBA newsletter features the rise of Luka, Siakam and Gobert alongside Giannis, Embiid and Jokic in an ever-growing contingent of All-Star-worthy players from abroad —&gt;
In 2018, Steve Nash predicted that the NBA could credibly institute a USA vs. Rest of the World format by the 2022 All-Star Game. In this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter, we detail how Giannis, Luka, Jokic, Embiid, Siakam, Gobert and Co. make Nash look smarter by the day ...
Very sad to hear @ESPNSoccerToday, after nearly eight years and almost 500 episodes, is going dark. The late, great Bobby Rhine dreamed of getting soccer on the radio dial in Dallas ... and we did it. Kudos to @SteveDavis90 &amp; @tylerakern for all they did to keep the show going!
Wanted 'em at Wem-beh-lee but this will do ...
What a night ...
As for Pistons center Andre Drummond ... one source briefed on Detroit's attempts to trade Drummond expressed confidence this week a deal to move Drummond will materialize before the Feb. 6 trade deadline
The Pistons just announced that Blake Griffin is out indefinitely after undergoing successful surgery today on his left knee
Wrong night to be on an airplane instead of a press-row seat ..
Giannis Antetokounmpo averaged 29.0 PPG and 11.7 RPG in a 3-0 week for Milwaukee; LeBron James averaged 23.0 PPG, 12.7 APG and 11.7 RPG in a 3-0 week for the Los Angeles Lakers
Giannis and LeBron were just named East and West Player of the Week, respectively, by the NBA
Sacramento is among the teams that has tried to engage the Lakers in Kyle Kuzma trade talks, league sources say. The Kings know they would have to include sharpshooter (and soon-to-be restricted free agent) Bogdan Bogdanovic, for starters, in a Kuzma deal
The Cavaliers say Kevin Porter Jr. will be re-evaluated in two weeks with what has been initially diagnosed as a left knee sprain
Kevin Love on IG about tonight’s events ...
Josh Allen wore a Braves jersey last week #mytotalsupport
1995 ...
Kyrie Irving, speaking to the media for the first time in two months, tells reporters in Brooklyn that he has opted for a cortisone shot in his ailing shoulder in hopes it will allow him to avoid surgery
I'm no gridiron football expert ... but I think it's a big deal when our Bills score early by THROWING a touchdown pass to the quarterback
Wrote my first David Stern story in 1991 ... off Magic’s HIV press conference. So I was asked to tell some tales from nearly 30 years chronicling The Commish, through countless scoldings for Mark Cuban to our last interaction in September, for @NYTSports:
Milwaukee's Mike Budenholzer and Oklahoma City's Billy Donovan were just named East and West Coach of the Month for December
Giannis Antetokounmpo and James Harden were just named East and West Player of the Month for December
Miami's Kendrick Nunn and Memphis' Ja Morant have been named East and West Rookie of the Month for December
CARMELLLLLO ANNNNNTHONY ...
One of THE best to ever do it 
Correction: It was LeBron and Steph in 2018  LeBron and Giannis last year  but the grander point stands: There is no league rule preventing players from serving as a captain in consecutive years
Further All-Star clarification: There is no such rule preventing players from repeating as an All-Star captain  LeBron and Giannis have already done it two years in a row
The NBA just announced it has fined Sacramento's Dewayne Dedmon $50,000 for making a public trade request -- same as Anthony Davis received last season while in New Orleans
And I still wish, instead of a TV show, that the captains would choose teams schoolyard-style a half-hour before the All-Star tipoff in Chicago with reversible jerseys to hand out
Voting continues through Jan. 20 Fan voting, remember, is only 50 percent of the equation The respective player vote and media vote count for 25 percent each PS -- Luka and Giannis as captains picking the two teams on TNT would be good (and historic) international theatre
Luka and Giannis have the early lead in All-Star voting ...
Another must-read from one of the old guard scribes who was covering the league when Stern was in his early commissioner days  Monnnnnroe!
My own Tales With The Commish is coming soon  but it can't be as good as this Hojo Special which beautifully captures what it was like to cover (and joust with) the occasionally cantankerous and condescending but forever perfection-obsessed crusader for his league David Stern
And, once again, from Thursday’s @nytimes: Our obit on former NBA commissioner David Stern in the wake of his passing at 77 —&gt;
A link to the digital version of this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter ... with predictions about Zion, Kawhi, LeBron, Pop and more in our Crystal Roundball forecast for 2020 PLUS the latest on Karl-Anthony Towns in Minnesota, too —&gt;
Here is our @AratonHj, who covered David Stern as closely and as anyone, with a front-row look at Stern's legacy for @NYTSports --&gt;
This was just a few years removed from a stretch from 1979 through 1981 in which seven NBA Finals games were shown on tape delay at 11:30 ET. SEVEN! PS -- In related news, I will ALWAYS love The Pointer Sisters 
An NBA commercial from my senior year of high school  three seasons into David Stern's commissionership and from a time when the league was really starting to get hot and FINALLY going truly national --&gt;
Our @kevinmdraper with an ultra-detailed timeline of David Stern's 30 years as NBA commissioner via @NYTSports --&gt;
Should have used the word MOMENTOUS rather than emotional in my first tweet but it's reassuring to see that this WellActually contraption works just as well in 2020 as it did in 2019
Scraps with David Stern were instant -- including a fight just to convince rival owners he should get the Mavs -- but Cuban said tonight: "David and I had many battles but most ended with a hug or laugh. We didn't always see eye to eye but we always knew we were on the same side"
It's going to be an emotional weekend in Mavsland: Saturday's home date against Charlotte marks 20 years of team ownership for Mark Cuban, whose agreement to buy the team from Ross Perot Jr. was struck Jan. 4, 2000
For @NYTSports and @NYTObits: Full coverage of the passing today of the former NBA commissioner David Stern at age 77:
Full statement from the league office on the passing of David Stern ...
The NBA has just announced that former commissioner David Stern has died at 77
2020 is here and the race is on: 36 days until the NBA trade deadline. Heard some fresh optimism on the final day of 2019 that Cleveland may just find a workable Kevin Love deal before the buzzer ...
Zion ... Kawhi ... LeBron ... Pop ... and more all covered here
In the final hours of 2019, we look ahead to 2020 with another edition of Crystal Roundball predictions ... via the latest @nytimes NBA newsletter freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide:
Also: Golden State is actively exploring ways to create the needed flexibility to keep Damion Lee on the roster after the 45 days on his two-way deal soon expire. The Warriors have made it clear they want Lee next season but remain hopeful they don't lose him for long this season
LaMarcus Aldridge's $24 million salary for next season becomes officially guaranteed tomorrow -- Jan. 1, 2020 -- after the Spurs agreed in October to move the date up from June 29, 2020
And, yes, I forgot the Raptors at 16-0
Make it two teams that will enter the new year unbeaten against sub-.500 opposition with the Lakers at 17-0
The Bucks are a tidy 21-0 against teams currently sporting sub-.500 records. Pretty dang efficient
Aw-SWISH-ika 
The NBA just announced a $35,000 fine for Golden State's Marquese Chriss for shoving Dallas' Luka Doncic to the floor Saturday
Boston's Jaylen Brown and New Orleans' Brandon Ingram were just named East and West Player of the Week by the NBA
Also here to see the show tonight: Kobe Bean Bryant
Various factors beyond my control have prevented me from seeing Luka Doncic live since Dec. 8. Perfect time to end that drought: Luka vs. LeBron tonight at Staples ...
My favorite NFL tweet of the season and maybe the decade ...
Gonna watch this on loop all night ... for the @BillWalton commentary and the bet-your-house-on-it @austen_acee floater FTW ...
The Warriors’ D’Angelo Russell has been diagnosed with a shoulder contusion after colliding with Luka Doncic
Thank you @austen_acee @JacksonRaw @waynearnold_11 @dee_clare5 @VLee763 @VenzantDaniel @CSFCoachTaylor @CoachArgenal @BMDunson @coach_asantos @CoachTB_1 @RobZewe @dashaw and the whole @FullertonMBB program for an unforgettable afternoon at Pauley. An all-timer!
The Hawks say an X-ray on Trae Young's sprained right ankle is negative but he will remain in Atlanta while the team travels to Chicago
Like THAT!
I love you Raheem The Dream but please no more pens
The NBA’s Decade In Review ... via the digital version of this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter —&gt;
Important summit featuring @KyleKorver and ... @ScottCacciola 
An ill Stephen Silas led Dallas' Rick Carlisle to move Jenny Boucek onto the bench vs. San Antonio. Said Carlisle: "I believe this is the first time in NBA history there were two female assistant coaches (Becky Hammon and Boucek) on the front of opposing benches in the same game"
There is something so nice about sitting on a couch for five minutes and watching #thisleague
Update from the SLC: Simons is nice ... and McCollum is continuing his tradition of shooting roughly 78.6 percent from the field if I’m tuned in any way, shape or form
About Christmas Night: The Lakers only have to rewind to last Christmas to know things could be a lot worse, but their second-half unraveling against the Clippers inflicted a disappointment that could linger. @NYTSports column:
A magazine I wish we could bring back ...
Freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide: Ten for the 2010s, this decade’s best and worst, in the latest edition of the @nytimes NBA newsletter. Happy Holidays to all!
Quite a December for Denver's Josh Kroenke. He awarded a two-year contract extension today to Nuggets coach Mike Malone ... after finally sealing a deal last week to hire Mikel Arteta away from a certain @ManCity to be the new Arsenal boss
A stream of thoughts here on various league proposals for a Cup competition from Mavs team owner Mark Cuban ... who says he “can’t hate an in-season, winner-take-all tournament enough”
Further details are expected before the All-Star Game in February as the league seeks to firm up a full proposal that teams can vote on in April -- although there has been "strong concern" registered against the proposal to re-seed the final four teams in the playoffs
In a memo to teams to last week, detailing a proposed $15 million pot for the championship team and $1.5 million for the winning coaching staff, "incentives for teams and fans" were listed as "to be determined"
The NBA continues to discuss draft compensation, potentially in the form of an extra first-round pick, as a reward for the winning team in the proposed in-season tournament for the 2021-22 season, sources tell @NYTSports
The OFFICIAL Christmas Day NBA preview ... from our own @BenHoffmanNYT 
Kyle Lowry and Dennis Schroder have just been named players of the week in the East and West by the NBA
The tenor of Christmas Day against the Clips has changed for the Lakers -- even with all the valid rationalizations for this three-game losing streak. The first 27 games couldn't have been much more seamless in Lakerland  now, suddenly, we'll see how they manage some adversity
Sunday Night Tradition  even on the first night of Hanukkah: Your questions for the next @nytimes NBA newsletter are welcome, with CORNER THREE in the subject line, by sending to marcstein-newsletter@nytimes.com
AGAINST Denver. LeBron suffered a muscle strain Tuesday at Indiana and played through it Thursday at Milwaukee. It's game No. 30 for the Lakers and the first James will miss this season  with a Christmas Day showdown against the Clippers looming
The Lakers have officially ruled LeBron James out of tonight's game at Denver
Here is the NBA’s full explanation for the Isaiah Thomas two-game suspension ...
The NBA calls it "a bright-line rule" that Thomas must be suspended for "deliberately entering the spectator stands during a game"
The NBA has suspended Isaiah Thomas for two games without pay
Some @ACFresh21-approved gear in this pic ...
The Grizzlies remain convinced they can find a trade partner for Iguodala and his $17.2 million salary before the Feb. 6 trade deadline ... while teams like the Lakers, Clippers and Rockets stubbornly retain hope that the former Warriors defensive ace becomes a buyout candidate
The Mavericks are fans of Iguodala and had interest during the summer, league sources say, but the word here in Vegas at the G League Showcase is that Dallas continues to be measured with its trade targets even after its 18-9 start
The Mavericks continue to be linked to Andre Iguodala, but league sources say Dallas is not actively pursuing a trade for the Memphis swingman and does not plan to
Shout out to another candidate announced today from this amazingly deep 2020 class of @Hoophall nominees: @markeaton7ft4! First NBA player I ever interviewed ... 30 years ago at the 1989 summer league at Loyola Marymount #nostalgistTID
What a group of candidates for the 2020 @Hoophall class: A trio of absolute stalwarts -- @chrisbosh, @matrix31 and @MichaelFinley -- in addition to the long-anticipated triumvirate of Kobe, Timmy and KG
And: With a third of the NBA's regular season gone  it's time to draw some conclusions in the latest @nytimes NBA newsletter --&gt;
One more time: The most comprehensive analysis EVER of @KingJames' social media game ... from the one and only @ScottCacciola:
After a glittering coaching career in Europe, Boston-area native David Blatt has returned to the States for his new front-office consulting role with the Knicks. Blatt announced today that he has retired from coaching as he battles multiple sclerosis
The NBA says All-Star voting will begin Christmas Day at 11 AM ET and run through the end of Martin Luther King Jr. Day on Jan. 20
Been waiting for this one: Our @ScottCacciola commissions an @NYTSports investigation into the social media side of @KingJames' life in Lakerland --&gt;
Freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide: Why there are echoes of Wilt Chamberlain’s game in the play we’re seeing from both LeBron James and James Harden one-third of the way through the regular-season schedule ... via my latest @nytimes NBA newsletter 
Tough development for the Wizards losing rookie forward Rui Hachimura (groin injury) for at least the next five games
Big @nytimes NBA newsletter coming this afternoon with Trimester declarations, our weekend visit with Miami’s @Bam1of1 Adebayo and more. Sign up here for fast, free and direct delivery to your Inbox:
Yet what that also means is Jrue Holiday is indeed available via trade, league sources say. It would surely cost a significant amount to pry him away from the Pels, but this is a notable change in status given how unavailable Holiday was to interested teams last season
While mired in a 12-game losing streak, New Orleans indeed remains reluctant to trade JJ Redick, according to league sources, on top of the team's two presumed untouchables: Zion Williamson and Brandon Ingram
The NBA just announced that former commissioner David Stern remains in serious condition following emergency surgery last week after suffering a brain hemorrhage
Much, much NBA crazy tonight
LONGEST WIN STREAKS IN NBA HISTORY: 33 Lakers 1971-72 27 Heat 2012-13 24 Warriors 2015-16 22 Rockets 2007-08 20 Bucks 1970-71 19 Hawks 2014-15 19 Spurs 2013-14 Celtics 2008-09 Lakers 1999-00 18 Bucks 2019-20 Bulls 1995-96 Celtics 1981-82 Knicks 1969-70
Porzingis gets the save, too, to go with those two LONG triples. But yikes that was less than convincing for Dallas
This game has to have set some sort of record for starters checking back in for the final minute
The Bucks didn't realize Twitter, yours truly included, declared this game over. Nervy finish in the MKE 
Adams with a reminder of the research instinct I miss working with every day 
Mavs as road juggernaut this season -- soon to be 10-2 -- was NOT anticipated. No shame for the Bucks, though, at 18-1 in their last 19 games inching toward Thursday night's showdown with the Lakers
Porzingis just drained two 3s from more than 60 feet combined and Los Mavs might actually do this in Milwaukee tonight with no Luka
Second week in a row that Miami and the Lakers produced POW winners; Bam and LeBron follow last week's winners Jimmy Butler and Anthony Davis
Bam Adebayo and LeBron James just announced by the NBA as East and West Player of the Week, respectively
The league's worst nightmare (or close): These Lakers are having outrageous fun and haven't had a dribble of drama all season
Stateside, of course, NBA Trade Season starts in earnest today, with nearly 120 players signed last summer now eligible to be dealt through the Feb. 6 trade deadline. Chatter is bound to ramp up this week when league executives converge on Las Vegas for the @nbagleague Showcase
Arsenal has issued a statement trying to distance itself from Mesut Ozil's comments after he protested China’s persecution of the Uighur population in the northwestern region of Xinjiang on social media and criticised Muslims for not lending more support:
The NBA now has company when it comes to controversy in China: Arsenal of the English Premier League -- owned and operated by Stan and Josh Kroenke of the Denver Nuggets -- saw its game removed from Chinese state TV today in the wake of comments by midfielder Mesut Ozil
So Jim Boylen is safe, based on what various Chicago beat writers were told today, amid the expected hot-seat talk with the Bulls at 9-18
Stoudemire recently had a 33-point, 17-rebound outing in China but returned in part, sources say, because of the great distance away from his family, which remained in the States while he was playing for the Fujian Sturgeons
Amar'e Stoudemire has returned to the States from a brief stint in China and is working out in South Florida in hopes of playing his way onto an NBA roster at 37, league sources say
The NBA just announced that former commissioner David Stern suffered “a sudden brain hemorrhage earlier today for which he underwent emergency surgery.” “Our thoughts and prayers are with David and his family,” Commissioner Adam Silver says
The Heat have suspended Dion Waiters again ... this time for continued insubordination
Our Power Rankings philosophies were known to clash, but even the Committee of One can admit that this Trade Season primer from Professor Hollinger is quite handy ...
About Last Night: The dispatch from Toronto after another chapter in Kawhi Leonard's one-of-a-kind story ... and why it had to be reassuring for Masai Ujiri, too --&gt;
As we await tonight’s Kawhi ring ceremony here in sunny Toronto ... here is the Digital version of the latest @nytimes NBA newsletter all about the depths to which the Knicks have sunk and how James L. Dolan — and really only Dolan — can get them out —&gt;
Maybe it’s only a FIBA nerd like me who can’t let go of this one ... but it’s becoming a bigger What If by the day: What if Team USA, which wound having so much trouble with its bigs, kept Bam Adebayo on the World Cup team that finished seventh in China?
Actually, Hojo, read this guy ... he's the one who had the very interesting stuff about Masai passing on a contract extension over the summer to potentially keep his options open:
Mets fans have more hope than Knicks fans this holiday season ... and there’s only one way James Dolan can fix that (since he’s not going to sell the team). The state of Dolan’s Knicks and MORE in the freshly dispatched @nytimes NBA newsletter:
More podding with Simmons about one of the great eras of our time ...
The Jazz are edging toward the Most Disappointing Team conversation. I was optimistic for them. They just don't lose like this at home ...
Kings sweep an unlikely back-to-back in Dallas and Houston  could get Marvin Bagley this week  and are roughly two weeks away from getting De'Aaron Fox back. Luke Walton has Sacramento on the rebound 
The league’s full statement on the matter ... including word that the three referees (James Capers Jr., Kevin Scott and John Butler) working that game received undisclosed discipline 
NBA commissioner Adam Silver said in his ruling that he agreed with Houston's contention that the referees working the game "misapplied the rules" ... but Silver ruled that Houston had "sufficient time to overcome the error during the remainder of the fourth quarter" and two OTs
The NBA has denied the Houston Rockets' protest from last week
Miami's Jimmy Butler and the Lakers' Anthony Davis were just named East and West Player of the Week, respectively, by the NBA
Pelicans coach Alvin Gentry was careful to caution reporters after Saturday's loss in Dallas that Zion will not be "coming in as CAVALRY." Williamson, after all, is expected to play under a firm minutes restriction (and with no back-to-backs) when he returns
Next Monday (Dec. 16) is the eight-week mark from the Oct. 21 meniscus surgery on Williamson's right knee, but Zion has yet to partake in any meaningful on-court work as part of his rehabilitation. And the Pelicans aren't about to rush him
For the Pelicans, there was resignation in some corners around them over the weekend that prized rookie Zion Williamson may have to wait until the calendar flips to 2020 to make his official NBA debut
It gets late fast in the NBA. We've passed the 20-game mark and suddenly a slew of teams -- Atlanta, Chicago, Cleveland, New Orleans, San Antonio and, of course, James Dolan's Knicks -- find themselves in uncomfortable situations
John Belein's insisted that talk of friction between the rookie coach and his players is overblown  but tonight's score will keep Cleveland under the microscope: Sixers 141, Cavs 94
The derby was a disaster. The fight was a snooze. The latest Luka Show was a matinee ... which means only one thing can save this Saturday night: Good questions for the next @NYTimes NBA newsletter sent to marcstein-newsletter@nytimes with CORNER THREE in the subject line!
If you can make it in New York 
Dec. 6, 2019: Giannis turned 25 and his Bucks, with a 28-point shredding of the vaunted Clippers, made all the 70-win talk feel real
Blazers say it's indeed a torn left Achilles tendon for Rodney Hood ...
As our @ScottCacciola reported Thursday in his ace Draymond Green feature Stephen Curry was unable to attend Green’s jersey retirement at Michigan State because of a long-planned procedure to remove pins from his surgically repaired broken left hand 
More coming from @powellnyt and I, but here’s the first burst of @NYTSports coverage of the Knicks’ firing of David Fizdale in the wake of two home losses by a combined 81 points —&gt;
David Fizdale will depart with the lowest win percentage -- .202 at 21-83 -- of the 29 coaches in Knicks history
For his 25th birthday, Giannis Antetokounmpo gets a date with Kawhi Leonard and the Clippers tonight
In other words ... can Houston conclusively prove that a solitary lost basket affected the outcome of a game in which it held a double-digit lead with nearly eight minutes remaining? It's a high bar
The Rockets' protest of their loss to San Antonio on Tuesday night is officially into the league office -- and will have to prove "clear evidence" that the outcome of the game was affected by the play in question to succeed
Living in Dallas and watching local sports Twitter process current events in Chicago in the midst of the Knicks' ongoing surrender/unraveling is ... wow
This, too ...
If he won't sell the team ... stack the cash high enough to lure Masai Ujiri out of Toronto, Sam Presti out of OKC or your Fill In The Blank team-builder with a proven track record for putting an actual program together
The coaching change, to be clear, feels inevitable now. The Knicks aren't even mustering a passable effort. But as ever you wonder, after 20 years of this, what will make James Dolan look at himself
Fizdale is sure to be the Knicks' first scapegoat -- because a team has to do something when it starts 4-18 and gets progressively non-competitive -- but this thing has veered way too far off course for anyone to think a coaching change is all it takes
Detoured from Manchester to Milan last week to watch the one and only @LScola4 playing for @OlimpiaMI1936 at nearly 40 ... and relished the ensuing chat as much as the hoop. Scola covers it all here in this visit with @NYTSports:
Oh how I wish Finger wasn’t such a savvy vet and responded with his suggested lineup!
Took a brief detour from Manchester last week to make my maiden trip to Italy and visit with the one and only @LScola4 about life, logical hoops and, of course, hair. All found in this week's @NYTimes NBA newsletter freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide ...
Doncic outduels Houston's James Harden for West honors ...
Milwaukee's Giannis Antetokounmpo and Dallas' Luka Doncic were just announced as the NBA's Players of the Month
Rookies of the Month in the NBA: Miami's Kendrick Nunn and Memphis' Ja Morant
Got a fun @NYTimes NBA newsletter coming later today featuring an international stalwart who enjoyed a prosperous decade in the NBA, too. Sign up here for prompt and direct delivery to your Inbox:
As for the West ... Harden and Luka both had history-defying October/Novembers and good luck trying to choose one for Player of the Month
Methinks Mr. @Giannis_An34 might have a fair shot at Eastern Conference Player of the Month when it is announced later in the today ...
Toronto's Nick Nurse and the Lakers' Frank Vogel have just been named East and West Coach of the Month for November by the NBA
Only in the rarest cases will a player who plays in just two games qualify for Player of the Week honors. Harden obviously just went for a ridiculous 60 points-in-three-quarters ... but it was indeed a mere two-game week for the Rockets
Melo averaged 22 and 8 and shot 57 percent from the field in a 3-0 week for the @trailblazers ... and this nostalgic sap ain't gonna quibble even though Harden and Luka obviously could
Carmelo Anthony of the Portland Trail Blazers ... Player of the Week in the Western Conference folks
Giannis Antetokounmpo and Carmelo Anthony and were just named East and West Player of the Week by the NBA
Any such measure would have to be ratified by league vote, but the league’s search is on for ways -- on top of bonus compensation for players and coaches who do well in the tournament -- to make teams eager to participate. A first-round pick would certainly help
All elements of the NBA's potential midseason tournament remain in the discussion phase, but one idea proposed to incentivize teams to embrace the new competition is furnishing the tournament winner with an extra draft pick, league sources say
Winning a championship in your first season as a head coach is supposed to be as good as it gets. But what Nick Nurse is getting out of this Kawhi-less Toronto team ...
Why does the NBA start some of these marquee Sunday games in the afternoon? So they can throw it on in Manchester in prime time. Let’s hoop ...
AND Sunday night can mean only one thing: Time to call for questions for the next @nytimes NBA newsletter. Please send them, with CORNER THREE in the subject line, to marcstein-newsletter@nytimes.com
As LeBron hosts Luka tonight -- No. 1 vs. No. 2 in APG -- here's Kristaps Porzingis on Doncic to @NYTSports: "He's just one of those super talents. He's born with it. The way he plays, with his confidence, he just has it. It's something you can't learn. You have it or you don't."
Sometimes you have to break down and put rivalries aside. Congrats to the prodigal Anteater ...
The Spurs' LaMarcus Aldridge will miss tonight's game in Detroit due to a thigh injury they hope will sideline him no more than a game or two, league sources say
Harden's scoring average rises by just over a point, back to 38.9 PPG, even if he sits the remainder
Is this sarcasm that went over my head? Capela's deal from Houston was well shy of the max ... and he is outperforming it
One plan proposed to the Suns in the build-up to the 2018 draft: Select Doncic at No. 1 and make a free-agent run at Clint Capela to fill the C void ... especially since then-coach Igor Kokoskov had been Luka's national-team coach. Hard to resist what-ifs in the desert tonight
And now for this #CacciolaAlert on the Bucks ...
Of the many things teen me, who so loved the International Herald Tribune, never would have believed: Geeking out thirtysomething years later upon seeing the modern-day equivalent in Manchester ... AND actually having something in it. All  I-@nytimes
The Nuggets are off to a 13-3 start, but the soccer team owned by the Kroenkes just fired their manager ... with Unai Emery lasting only one season and change after Arsene Wenger’s 22 years in charge
Cold, cold world this Sports/Entertainment stuff
(In related news ... my Cowboys-loving 13-year-old just texted me the following: “BYE JASON GARRETT)
Carmelo Anthony is winning Thanksgiving Week in the NBA ...
Kyrie Irving, missing his maiden return to Boston as a Net through injury tonight, speaks out via Instagram ...
Tim Duncan is granting no interviews as a rookie assistant ... but this hopeless hoop romantic HAD to go watch him coach — twice — during the season’s opening month. More on Timmy and the Spurs’ toughest season since the one that allowed them to draft him:
Happy Thanksgiving ...
For Canada, this draw means Jamal Murray and what Coach Nick Nurse hopes is a full complement of NBA players have to win a group headlined by @Giannis_An34, @RealPitino and Greece -- plus Turkey. But they'll have homecourt advantage in Steve Nash's hometown of Victoria, BC
The eight teams that have already made it to Tokyo in Olympic men's basketball: Argentina, Australia, France, Iran, Nigeria, Spain, United States and the hosts Japan
The fields for the four last-chance Olympic men’s basketball qualifying tournaments are in. One team from each of these six-team pools will go to Tokyo ...
The FIBA draw to fill out the four six-team groups is tomorrow. So we don’t know the breakdown yet. But Canada already does know that it won’t have to deal with the other three host countries which all rank from dangerous to fearsome: Croatia, Lithuania ... and Serbia
The “only” was slightly hyperbolic ... but let’s not kid ourselves: The homecourt is huge — as evidenced by the commitments already coming in — and 20 nations would love to trade places
Jamal Murray and Shai Gilgeous-Alexander have pledged to play for Nick Nurse-coached Canada next summer ... when the Canadians need only win a six-team tournament on Canadian soil to reach the 2020 Olympics in Tokyo. Canada's last Olympic appearance: Sydney 2000
Freshly dispatched to Inboxes worldwide: Our tireless sports biz ace @kevinmdraper joins the pantheon of highly decorated pinch-hitters gracious enough to step in for me on @nytimes NBA newsletter duty ...
Sound the #CacciolaAlert ... smart idea to watch a Clipper game with the forever Voice of the Clips @Ohmeomy
LOTS to unpack before Thanksgiving this year with Luka and the Mavs playing host to the Clippers tonight ... followed by Anthony Davis' return to New Orleans on Wednesday night
Thanksgiving Week is off to a bountiful start for @carmeloanthony with 25 points in a win at Chicago that the 6-12 Blazers desperately needed ... and lots of praise to go with it
In a win over Utah, Giannis Antetokounmpo posts this season's fifth 50-point game, joining Damian Lillard (60), James Harden (59), D'Angelo Russell (52) and Kyrie Irving (50)
For clarification purposes ... did not have the veal in 2018 or 2019
A restaurant you can find in Milan ... but don't count on a branch near MSG any time soon:
It's tougher to forecast how teams will view re-seeding the conference finals, as @ESPN reported is also on the table. Are Eastern Conference teams really going to vote for a format that raises the possibility that they'll have to play a West power in the conference finals?
The play-in idea for April, if approved, holds particular promise because only the top six teams in each conference would be guaranteed a playoff spot ... thus giving teams more incentive to push for a top-six finish
The league hopes a Cup competition in December, plus the play-in round for the final two playoff spots in each conference in April, would give the NBA's regular season more meaning amid declining TV ratings and the ever-increasing mentality that the playoffs are everything
The NBA, according to an @ESPN report Saturday, now wants the regular season to be reduced from 82 games to 78 to accommodate those two changes -- with a handful of regular-season divisional games used to determine the eight teams in the soccer-style knockout Cup competition
In the same May interview with @NYTSports, Silver said he also was targeting the 2021-22 season, when the NBA celebrates its 75th anniversary, for the introduction of play-in games to determine "the last two playoffs spots in the East and West" --&gt;
Monday AM thread: Here is @NYTSports' original May report in which Adam Silver explained his desire to implement an in-season tournament modeled after European soccer by the 2021-22 season to allow NBA teams to compete for more than one trophy per season:
Caruso 'bout to catch another body 
Podding with the enemy ...
In Dallas tonight watching @BillSimmons' beloved Luka Doncic rack up 22 points, 5 assists and 5 boards in the opening quarter against what's left of the Warriors. As Steve Kerr put it pre-game, Doncic regularly looks like "he knows he's the best player on the floor"
Guilty. I also cannot quit .. the press conferences
Here is the Digital version of the @MrChuckD-cited @nytimes NBA newsletter featuring Jamal Crawford and @JCrossover’s bid to find a new team, a la @carmeloanthony and @imanshumpert, after Crawford scored 51 points in his final game last season —&gt;
Flicked on @BBCRadioManc just to pretend I was waking up in Blue Heaven this morning ... and they just relayed confirmation that Jose Mourinho is the new Tottenham manager. Someone check on @SteveNash ...
Last word on this: 24 teams will be dueling in June for those final four Olympic spots and the coaching firepower is only growing with Kokoskov taking over Serbia, Rick Pitino joining Giannis Antetokounmpo with Greece and Nick Nurse in charge of Team Canada
Like seventh-placed Team USA, Serbia endured a hugely disappointing World Cup in China in September, finishing fifth. Expectations will be HIGH given Serbia's NBA talent (Nikola Jokic, Sacramento's own Bogdan Bogdanovic and Nemanja Bjelica, Boban Marjanovic, Marko Guduric, etc.)
Kokoskov -- who coached Luka Doncic and Goran Dragic to a storybook EuroBasket title with Slovenia in 2017 -- is now tasked with leading his home country to victory as host of one of four last-chance Olympic qualifying tournaments in June along with Croatia, Lithuania and Canada
Serbia's basketball federation pinpointed Kokoskov -- one of their own and the former Suns head coach -- to succeed Sasha Djordjevic and received permission from the Kings this week to hire Kokoskov while remains an assistant in Sacramento
Kings assistant coach Igor Kokoskov will be named coach of Serbia's Olympic team Wednesday, according to a source briefed on the announcement
Freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide: This week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter features the 50-point scorer @blakegriffin23 just tweeted about ... and how @JCrossover is working out twice daily in Seattle in hopes that he gets the call @carmeloanthony just got from Portland 
Luka Doncic is averaging 30, 11 and 9  and sources say that has prompted @BillSimmons to convene an Emergency Luka Podcast. More details as we get them 
Leicester won the most improbable championship basically EVER and Ranieri got sacked the next year. Pochettino took Spurs to their first Champions League final and doesn't see the next Christmas. Is the NBA coaching carousel, by comparison, even a ride?
Tottenham just sacked Pochettino? And they say the NBA is crazy ...
A matchup any @daviscup nerd like me would normally lust to see -- USA vs. Canada -- is being played in a new format right now: On a Tuesday in Madrid in an arena lit in a way so all the empty seats don"t show on TV. Freely admit I am overly resistant to change ... but really?
Damian Lillard will miss Carmelo Anthony's first game as a Trail Blazer due to back spasms, according to the team
Carmelo Anthony explains his decision to join the 5-9 @trailblazers in this YouTube video --&gt;
First 40-point game of Luka's career ... wearing a pair of @StephenCurry30 Under Armours. Doncic is indeed a sneaker free agent
Spurs down five with 1:14 to go and DeMar DeRozan up to 36 and eight himself. This has been one of those Dallas/San Antonio regular-season thrillers like they always used to play
Luka just clinched triple-double No. 6 ... in a league with 17
Career-high 39 points for Doncic ... who still needs one board for the triple-double ... but also has five fouls and the Spurs are still within five with 3:24 to go
Dallas' Luka Doncic up to 34 points, nine rebounds and 11 assists tonight against San Antonio entering the fourth quarter ... one more rebound would clinch his sixth triple-double
Nets say Kyrie Irving is out again tonight against Indiana due to his ongoing issues with a right shoulder impingement
Nikola Vucevic and James Harden were just named Eastern and Western Conference Player of the Week
Strong contender for the best three minutes of the day ... Happy 44th to the one and only @55buckets
You shouldn't. #eventhehawks can have an off night (or an off weekend)
The only rookie with multiple 30-point games this season: No. 41 overall pick @epaschall
This week's column for @nytsports on the inevitable pangs -- even for crusty old sportswriters -- to root for Markelle --&gt;
The jumper may still be a work in progress ... but this was some win-sealing moment for Markelle Fultz:
I also should note that since it's Sunday night and nothing else is going on: Send your hoop questions to marcstein-newsletter@nytimes.com with CORNER THREE in the subject line for possible inclusion in the next @nytimes NBA newsletter
The resurrection no one saw coming: Sacramento is 5-2 in November despite losing both Marvin Bagley and De'Aaron Fox and an 0-5 start. Luke Walton's Kings just ended Boston's 10-game winning streak and the two losses this month are by five points combined to the Raps and Lakers
The only team with fewer than three wins  went to the last five NBA Finals
That PG and Kawhi duo might have a chance 
Gregg Popovich clarified for reporters in San Antonio after the game that Tim Duncan was the acting head coach after his ejection. The Spurs’ fifth straight loss, as stated earlier, goes on Pop’s record
Reminder about NBA bookkeeping: The win or loss goes on Pop’s record no matter what ... and whether or not a stand-in head coach is actually designated
Like @JMcDonald_SAEN said: FASCINATING (extreme Spock voice) ... and so utterly Spurs-like for us to not be able to know for sure
Or maybe it’s a staff-wide conglomeration according to the sage on the scene Mr. Momroe ...
Raps/Mavs in Dallas is pretty absorbing ... but hard not to shift focus right now to San Antonio: Gregg Popovich has been ejected in the third quarter and Becky Hammon is now coaching the Spurs — with Tim Duncan as top assistant
Thank you, 9 #neededallfour
Chandler Parsons is active tonight and poised to make his Hawks debut: Atlanta at Clippers
Astonishing to hear Kemba Walker talking there about finally being in a game with Mark Jackson on the call  in his NINTH NBA season. Is this confirmable? Was Charlotte THAT far off the radar?
Frankie Utilizing and the Knicks sweep the season series from Kristaps Porzingis and the Mavericks
But now these are two parties that need each other badly. The Blazers thought they had their deepest team in a decade. A 4-8 start and the loss of Zach Collins, with Jusuf Nurkic still out, has them in deep trouble early
Let's do this better: As covered in this interview from October 2017, Melo waived his no-trade clause to facilitate a deal to OKC after strong lobbying from Damian Lillard and CJ McCollum  ultimately deciding then that the Pacific NW was too from home -&gt;
Carmelo Anthony will have a LOT of people rooting for him in Portland after a year in N.B.A. exile -- and two years after the Blazers unsuccessfully lobbied Melo to choose them in free agency over Oklahoma City
Hawks say Kevin Huerter is out at least two weeks due to a left rotator cuff strain with an associated shoulder capsule strain
Five hours from tip-off, as Kristaps Porzingis prepares to play his first game as a visitor to Madison Square Garden, here is a pulse-take the State of KP and his old team all rolled into one @NYTSports link —&gt;
About Last Night from Houston for @NYTSports: Challenges abound for the Clippers as they prepare to finally welcome Paul George to the squad ... and Doc Rivers is ready to embrace them all —&gt;
Full update on Huerter’s shoulder injury from the Hawks as this season’s ridiculously deflating run of injuries continues
Hawks say Kevin Huerter's MRI results will be further evaluated by team doctors; Huerter has return to Atlanta and has been ruled out of Thursday's game in Phoenix
Miss him already ... and @ScottCacciola? Inconsolable!
With Philadelphia in Orlando tonight, here is the @NYTSports latest on the Markelle Fultz comeback ... with insight from a man who knows what it’s like to be under a Fultz-like microscope: The former Dodger and Yankee Steve Sax—&gt;
Eric Gordon underwent an arthroscopic procedure today on his right knee and will miss at least six weeks, Rockets say
Freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide: The latest @nytimes NBA newsletter setting up Kristaps Porzingis’ Thursday night return to Madison Square Garden ... where the home team has been plunged into crisis faster than anyone expected
As Orlando’s Markelle Fultz readies to play the 76ers for the first time, here’s a pulse take on his comeback for @NYTSports ... with some bonus perspective from the former Dodger and Yankee Steve Sax —&gt;
Curry tells reporters in San Francisco that he indeed plans to return later this season from a broken left hand ...
Eight 3s for Kemba Walker tonight against the other team besides Boston that made him their No. 1 free-agent target
Monday blahs: Boston's Gordon Hayward (six weeks), Milwaukee's Khris Middleton (three-to-four weeks) and Sacramento's De'Aaron Fox (three-to-four weeks) all join the NBA's long-term injury list
The Kings say De'Aaron Fox will be re-evaluated in three to four weeks after suffering a sprained left ankle in practice today
Good news: You don't have to wait long for SIAKAM vs. Frankie Utilizing: Toronto hosts the Knicks on Thanksgiving Eve
To recap: PASCAL SIAKAM and James Harden are the latest Player of the Week winners and my awesome autocorrect curse rolls on ...
Pascal SIAKAM
Toronto's Paskal Shaka and Houston's James Harden have been named Player of the Week by the NBA in their respective conferences
In related news  Kristaps Porzingis' return to MSG on Thursday night just got a few notches more interesting. Which really didn't seem possible two hours ago
If the Knicks were playing as consistently hard and pesky as the Cavs -- from whom little was expected -- they surely wouldn't have felt the need to call for the sort of press briefing we almost never see at MSG
Remarkable how forceful and committed the Knicks were Friday night in Dallas in the Kristaps Porzingis Reunion Game ... and how quickly their collective effort and effectiveness dropped multiple notches just two nights later
Here is video of Knicks president Steve Mills from an impromptu press conference called tonight by Mills and Knicks GM Scott Perry in the wake of New York getting pummeled at home by Cleveland to fall to 2-8 ...
Here is Miami’s statement on its 10-game suspension of Dion Waiters without pay for “a number of instances this season in which Dion has engaged in conduct detrimental to the team” ...
Or how Reynolds said it 
60 for Dame, 52 for D-Lo ... and neither adds up to a win on Freaky Friday Night in #thisleague
Didn't even noticed that my drunk autocorrect changed it to Frankie Utilizing. Have I mentioned I hate autocorrect? NTILIKINA!!!!!
38, THIRTEEN and 10, I mean
Just 38, 10 and 10 for Doncic ... I should probably be charged for these seats
Knicks are up nine with 1:49 to go. Luka and Porzingis have combined for 62 and yet this night belongs to the aforementioned Julius Randle, Marcus Morris and an inspired Frankie Utilizing
Dec. 15 is still 37 days away ...
No slight to Julius Randle -- and no dancing around the fact his Knicks peak was only three seasons -- but those three seasons helped Bernard King get to the @hoophall. When I see NEW YORK 30 ... I can't help but wish the number was retired in King's honor
Statement from @Memphis_MBB says an emergency temporary restraining order will allow James Wiseman to play tonight
Wetzel is right, Van Smack! So deserved  and so overdue. Next stop: @BigWestSports HOF
Pitino and Giannis united ...
I also forgot how we chased off Dr. Jack to almost immediately lead Portland to the championship and traded McAdoo in the sort of epic giveaway that would have broken NBA Twitter
THAT'S how  and maybe in 40 more years I'll get over it
Cause we traded Moses after two whole games, then traded Dantley right after he won ROY, then Tiny tore his Achilles before he and Randy Smith could form the fastest backcourt in history AND then the Braves were robbed from Buffalonians right before Magic and Larry saved the NBA
Bob McAdoo, Randy Smith, Moses Malone, Adrian Dantley, Tiny Archibald ... and now Kawhi Leonard
#BravesAreBack for one night 
Full @NYTSports coverage of the Clippers’ $50,000 fine from the league office for “statements inconsistent” with Kawhi Leonard’s health status —&gt;
To clarify: The NBA has "confirmed that the team's decision to sit Leonard for management of an injury was consistent with league rules" but has fined the Clippers $50,000 for statements, including by head coach Doc Rivers, that were inconsistent with Leonard's health status"
So the Clippers have been fined today in essence for Doc Rivers' public insistence that Leonard is not injured
The Clippers, in the league's judgment, have "reasonably determined that Leonard is suffering from an ongoing injury to the patella tendon in his left knee and has been placed by the team at this time on an injury protocol for back-to-back games." So ...
The fine is officially for "statements, including by head coach Doc Rivers, that were inconsistent with Leonard's health status"
The Clippers have just been fined $50,000 for sitting Kawhi Leonard last night
First NBA press conference I covered coming out of @csuf ... and forever the Where Were You moment of my sports lifetime. This was my remembrance in 2011 on the 20-year anniversary of Magic's announcement: 
Pistons announce that Derrick Rose (hamstring) is still rehabbing and will be listed as day-to-day ... but Detroit adds that Blake Griffin (hamstring/knee soreness) has begun "a return to game action progression" after being cleared to rejoin all basketball-related activities
The Knicks have ruled Mitchell Robinson out of Friday's Kristaps Porzingis reunion game in Dallas after Robinson suffered a concussion Wednesday night in Detroit
Kyle Kuzma’s comeback, Alex Caruso’s promise, Dwight Howard’s renaissance, Rajon Rondo’s looming return and what looks like the scariest doubles team in a league full of top duos ... all here in the digital version of the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter—&gt;
PS -- Was in Atlanta tonight to see @TheTraeYoung second-half detonation first-hand. Detractors will always bring up what he doesn't do on D ... but we're not talking enough about how no one can guard HIM. Went anywhere he wanted on the floor after halftime
All you need is an e-mail address and a click to
All of the Lakers involved in that comeback in Chicago tonight ... all discussed here 
Freshly dispatched to Inboxes worldwide: This week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter reflects on the Game of the Season so far ... and what is looking like the scariest duo of them all 
The NBA announces a 25-game suspension for the Hawks’ promising forward John Collins for testing positive for Growth Hormone Releasing Peptide-2 (GHRP-2)
PJ WAshington, Herro, Nunn, Paschall ... lotta rookie surprises for a (welcome) change
The Suns took considerable grief for drafting Cameron Johnson and what was perceived as a curious surrender of TJ Warren — but the Aron Baynes acquisition looks more inspired by the day. Great to see that arena rocking again ...
Just one undefeated team left now: Sixers at 5-0
Dwight Howard flexing in San Antonio and Boban Marjanovic cooking in Cleveland. Centers!
Also II: Send your burning NBA questions to marcstein-newsletter@nytimes.com with CORNER THREE in the subject line for potential use in the next @nytimes weekly hoops newsletter ...
Also: Luka Again
Cleveland's preseason was pretty grim. Belein suddenly getting more out of the Cavs than many imagined mere weeks ago ...
So sad this keeps happening, over and over and over in various countries, and the limp punishments teams get mean nothing changes. Home team should take a 3- or 4-nil loss instantly as soon as these chants happen. Can we try that?
The Rockets never really had a chance at Jimmy Butler last summer ... but Miami’s start to the season is only adding to the justification for wanting him. Heat are a handful ...
For SportsSunday in the @nytimes: After China, Zion, Ayton, Embiid vs. Towns. Steph and more in October ... here’s hoping Friday night’s LeBron/Luka Instant Classic is a sign that the joyous season we’ve been expecting finally starts in November —&gt;
Stephen Curry underwent successful surgery Friday on his broken left hand, league sources say. Curry is expected to miss at least three months
The league's official roster survey finds that the average NBA player is 6-6 1/2, 219 pounds, 26 years old and has just under five years of experience
Sound the #CacciolaAlert for Kawhi vs. Spurs coverage ...
Embiid and Towns suspended two games each without pay "for their roles in an on-court altercation and for their continued escalation after the incident"
The NBA’s official announcement on the two-game suspensions for Joel Embiid and Karl-Anthony Towns ...
NBA teams have been formally reminded by the league office that team owners, front-office execs, coaches and other employees must keep the text from all contract-related communications with players and agents -- on their teams and others -- for one full year, league sources say
Those are GORGEOUS  please tell me you made a Buffalo Braves version
Will be interesting to see how much the league office factors the post-altercation chatter into the looming Towns/Embiid suspensions. As opposed to a mere social media beef that the league would typically ignore, this one could well be interpreted as a continuation of the scuffle
Sleep? Or stay up 'til Jimmy Buckets gets up in an hour for the 3:30 AM workout?
The Sixers have had an undeniably great start ... but it might be best for someone there to try to liberate No. 21 from his phone
Pretty much 
In other developments in #thisleague that are getting way out of hand and not going to shorten those suspensions any 
Good riddance, October 2019. One of the most depressing NBA months in recent memory 
To say this is NOT how tonight was supposed to go -- it's Steph Popcorn Bobblehead Night -- is the understatement of the early season
Kevin Durant, Klay Thompson and now Stephen Curry all lost to long-term injuries within Golden State's last SIX games that counted 
Remember the 20-62 San Antonio Spurs of 1996-97 coached by a new guy in charge named Gregg Popovich? Here comes the sequel 
Official Warriors announcement 
Whoa ...
In the meantime I wonder: Will the home team win at least one game in June in the NBA Finals?
We repeat: Call it a Dynasty On Hiatus --&gt;
Harden finishes with 59, Rockets escape with a 159-158 road victory despite Beal's 46  and that is my Houston/Washington update
Harden has 54, Beal has 40  and you still notice the rook Hachimura with an eye-catching 23
Tonight doesn't help, Arsenal
The digital version of this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter: On the road with the Warriors ... who could not quite pull off going on hiatus to Italy to ride bikes and sip wine as Steve Kerr once proposed but will recharge faster than you think —&gt;
The latest American import to Australia's @NBL is longtime NBA assistant coach Scott Roth, who has joined the coaching staff of the defending champion Perth Wildcats fresh off his coaching stint with host China's national team at the @FIBAWC
Freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide: My pulse take from the road with the Warriors and a reminder from Draymond Green that the longest-tenured Dubs still have lots left no matter how it looked in Week 1 ... all coming to you from the latest @nytimes NBA newsletter
The Raptors have promoted Alex McKechnie -- who developed the Load Management concept Kawhi Leonard popularized last season in Toronto --to vice president of player health and awarded him a contract extension
Zach Collins said his left shoulder "popped back in so cleanly" that it can be taken as a really good sign ... but the Blazers won't know for sure until Monday's MRI
Just a ridiculously good 48 minutes in Dallas tonight ... and quite a W for Portland after losing Zach Collins (shoulder injury) and Hassan Whiteside (who fouled out in the midst of an effective fourth quarter). Terry Stotts' late coach's challenge helps seal the wild escape
Doncic has 29, 11 and nine dimes. Porzingis up to 28 and 8. CJ (33) and Dame (26) both cooking as we inch toward the final two minutes and Blazers up 116-115
Doncic now one assist away from his 10th career triple-double and second in two games ... and it might not be enough against CJ and Dame. Sick game ...
The Blazers say Zach Collins (left shoulder) won't return and can only hope it is not as bad as it looked in terms of a possible dislocation. Yet Portland has forged on to seize a four-point lead in Dallas with 9:33 to go ...
Only blight on this fantastic Mavs/Blazers game as it heads to the fourth quarter ... Zach Collins just exited with an apparent shoulder injury (severity TBD)
So Rookies of the Week are Ja and Kendrick Nunn?
Guess this wasn't bad, either ...
Not sure which tilt you're watching ... but flip to Mavs-Blazers if you like offensive execution. Fun game
Absolute technician ... couple of offensive geniuses at work here tonight
Looked like the Mavs were gonna turn this into a Cowboys Bye Week party -- thanks to an array of gems from Porzingis and Doncic. But Portland has sliced a 19-point deficit to 8 thanks largely to vintage bucket-getting from CJ McCollum (up to 18 with 6:15 left in the first half)
This uncompetitive, this early in the season, is (insert eyes emoji)
As you immerse yourself in this nine-game Saturday night  send your burning questions to marcstein-newsletter@nytimes.com for potential use in the next @nytimes NBA newsletter
The Heat Are Gonna Finish Third In The East crowd -- @ZachLowe_NBA, @EthanJSkolnick and presumably Riles, Spo and Jimmy Buckets (who hasn't even played yet) -- are feelin' themselves right now
Suns news (sigh): Fresh of his FIBA heroics and strong start to the season, Ricky Rubio misses tonight’s game with the Clippers due to a knee contusion
Happiest Americans you'll find today: @cpulisic_10, @joshhart and @Larrydn22
Get this guy a @ProHoopsWriters membership. Quite a column on the NBA's unforeseen geopolitical crisis from someone who has an idea what it feels like to be on the receiving end of China's ire: @andrewbogut
Man that kickoff against The Villa is going to feel hauntingly early tomorrow ...
Oh man  Pels gotta score coming out of this timeout with the Beverly Hills Cop music playing
Twenty-one years of No. 41 and now this kid. Unreal ...
Finally home after a 3-games-in-3-nights, Ullmark shutout in the books and too much good hoop (@espn_macmahon calls it goop) to watch for the rest of the night #topmyfriday
There’s a giddy Davis Cup captain/Wolves Fan Club president smiling somewhere in Cali tonight ...
That Leicester-Saints score is nine times crazier than Suns-Kings ...
It’s not often I get to write about Helmut Lang fashion and Lil Baby (featuring Meek Mill). But this is life on the Rockets beat (with an assist to my pal @KellyIkoNBA) ...
Of course ... new fatherhood means that Butler will miss Sunday's return to Minneapolis with the Heat. Remember, though, that he did return to 'Sota last season after the Wolves dealt him to Philly
Jimmy Butler will bypass the Heat's two-game road trip after becoming a father to a baby girl this week
About Last Night: Daryl Morey's measured return to the spotlight, Harden &amp; Westbrook officially reunited, Milwaukee wins anyway after Giannis fouls out and Mike D'Antoni walks right into the pressure ... all here from my latest dispatch for @NYTSports -&gt;
Emotional decision for our @ScottCacciola ... but he wisely opted to forsake El Trafico and what might have been his guy Zlatan's farewell to MLS to cover the latest gaudy display from the Showtime Clippers that spoiled the Warriors' Chase Center debut :
The Six Seconds Or Less Rockets ...
Orlando has applied to the league seeking to have Timofey Mozgov’s remaining salary ($16.7 million this season and the next two) removed from the books under career-ending injury and illness provisions, league sources say
Updated @NYTSports coverage of Houston’s fall-from-ahead loss to Milwaukee in a home opener that the Rockets hoped would finally edge them away from the China controversy —&gt;
The Clippers want to be No. 1 in Monday's Power Rankings ...
Russell Westbrook finished with 24 points, 16 rebounds and seven assists in his Rockets debut. The last Rocket not named James Harden to post such numbers: Yao Ming way back in 2004 (41/16/7)
Here's your at-the-buzzer @NYTSports coverage of Houston's season-opening hone defeat to Milwaukee ... with updates coming soon --&gt;
The Suns' honeymoon after throttling Sacramento on Opening Night lasts less than 24 hours ... as 2018's No. 1 overall pick Deandre Ayton gets hit with a 25-game suspension ...
Cedi Osman has agreed to a four-year, $31 million contract extension with the Cavaliers, his agents Jeff Schwartz and Jordan Gertler of @excelsm tell @NYTSports
There’s really nothing in life like that first batch of NBA box scores that count ...
There is a lot going on in Houston today ... where the Rockets host Milwaukee in their season opener in three hours and the Astros just fired assistant GM Brandon Taubman
And this is the latest reminder from @ScottCacciola that he thinks HE’S actually the @NYTSports NBA scribe best qualified to crossover into footy coverage ... profiling @LAFC goal machine @11carlosV 
Fullerton fans everywhere will enjoy reading this @Ken_Rosenthal piece that neatly traces the career arc of Titan ledge @kurtsuzuki ...
It was preposterous ...
Another question: Is that Suns-Kings score really real?
Did that Kawhi &amp; Arnold Swarzenegger &amp; PG-13 &amp; Sarah Connor commercial I just saw really happen?
Bradley Beal said he intends to speak to the league office Thursday in hopes of getting his second T in Dallas rescinded. He and Doncic hugged right after Beal got tossed -- all sides clear that Beal got ultra-aggressive trying to slow him down because, until then, Luka dominated
This turned into some circus of a finish with offsetting techs for Beal and Doncic, then a second for Beal that got him ejected, then a ferocious Porzingis alley-oop finish that I trust @WorldWideWob will soon be posting for your enjoyment
Bradley Beal and Luka Doncic haven't been matched up a ton ... but it has been EDGY every time
35 is Luka's career-high. He's got 32 with two minutes and change left in the third quarter tonight against the Wiz
Scott Brooks is in there somewhere ... but the Game 1 pre-game press scrum is sizable with the Japanese media contingent that Wizards rookie Rui Hachimura has following him
The NBA has awarded the 2023 All-Star Game to the Utah Jazz in Salt Lake City
An 11-game night starts in 90 minutes ... and we’ve got your pre-game prep: Eight (almost) fearless predictions for the season to come in the Digital version of the @nytimes weekly NBA newsletter —&gt;
Only $7 million of Aldridge's 2020-21 salary was guaranteed before today ... so the Spurs' move guarantees an extra $17 million for the seven-time NBA All-Star
LaMarcus Aldridge's $24 million contract for next season with the Spurs has been fully guaranteed, his agent Jeff Schwartz tells @NYTSports
And here is my game coverage from Toronto ... where Raps @superfan_nav Bhatia received a championship ring of his own and supplied an explanation why he thinks The Six can cope just fine post-Kawhi 
Here is our Jere Longman on the Zion Phenomenon in New Orleans that landed the Pelicans on TNT on Opening Night as the ring-night foil for the champion Raptors —&gt;
Here is our @ScottCacciola from the most interesting Lakers/Clippers game (maybe) since Kareem hit the game-winner and Rookie Magic hugged him like they won a championship ... and Kareem had to remind him it was Game 1 of 82
At-the-buzzer coverage for @NYTSports from Toronto ... where the raucous Raptors fan base coped just fine without Kawhi or Zion ... but only thanks to an OT escape against the plucky Pelicans —&gt;
Also: Sound the #CacciolaAlert for a fresh look at @CJMcCollum’s fondness for podcasting when he’s not bucket-getting ...
Freshly dispatched to inboxes worldwide ... eight fearless, must-read predictions to get you ready for the NBA season that is 30 minutes away in this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter:
What it dooooo, bay-beeee? The NBA’s 74th season tips off right here in two hours ...
Detroit’s Blake Griffin is out until at least the first week of November after the Pistons announce that Griffin he will continue a treatment and conditioning regimen “for left hamstring and posterior knee soreness”
Said Griffin of Williamson: "He's in elite condition and he stays in elite condition. He also has a body type that we're leaning how to deal with as a 19-year-old kid. .. But the notion that this happened somehow because Zion is in poor condition is just asinine."
Link to the full David Griffin audio from earlier today after Pelicans shootaround in Toronto:
To cap a lengthy answer about the type of unique athlete Williamson is, Griffin added that it's "just asinine" to pin Zion's meniscus tear on weight concerns
Pels GM David Griffin, pushing back on suggestions that weight has factored in Zion Williamson's knee injury, said just now after shootaround: "He's in elite condition"
Also: Autocorrect is still the worst ever
This season obviously still has great potential because of the uncharacteristically wide-open nature of the title race ... but October has been so thoroughly downbeat for the NBA with the China controversy and now Zion's long-term absence confirmed
The fewest games played by a Rookie of the Year is still Patrick Ewing’s 50 out of 82 for the Knicks in 1985-86
Six weeks would sideline Zion for 20 games. Eight weeks would make it closer to 30
The Pelicans announce that Zion Williams underwent surgery today on a torn right lateral meniscus and will miss six to eight weeks
The gym at St. Marks in Dallas was destroyed by last night’s tornado ... and sadly there are too many pictures like this that could be posted. Scary, scary night in Big D
And one more time: As he prepares to try to lead Miami back to the NBA elite, @JimmyButler reveals what turned a Texas kid who had never kicked a soccer ball into the world’s biggest @neymarjr fan —&gt;
Nets guard @SDinwiddie_25 confirms to @NYTSports that he has another meeting scheduled with the NBA on Monday -- on the eve of the regular season -- as he continues to seek league cooperation to "tokenize" his contract. The NBA, to date, has said Dinwiddie's plan violates the CBA
Emotional dude  but I'm here for it. Congrats to the NBA fantasy hoops addict @andy_murray on getting back into the winner's circle when it once looked like he'd have to stop
An annual @NYTSports tradition: NBA season previews on the West and East from our @BenHoffmanNYT ...
As he prepares to try to lead the Heat back to the East's elite, @JimmyButler tells @NYTSports the story of how one trip to the magical Maracana transformed him into the world's biggest @neymarjr fan --&gt;
Back to Sabres/Sharks ... #SabresAfterDark
Goose and Sparky would never ...
Heat president Pat Riley on suspending Dion Waiters for one game: "There were a number of unacceptable incidents this week, culminating with his unprofessional conduct on the bench last night."
MAJOR issues with Hojo's Mitchell Robinson/MIP stance and his unending (and ill-conceived) Shake Shack vs. In-N-Out propaganda  but the column? Absolutely excellent!
Of course, we've yet to hear a single expert commentator from any precinct -- so many of whom are so angry at the NBA for not walking away from China -- explain why they aren't just as mad at Starbucks, McDonald's, Marriott, Walmart and whoever made the phone you're holding
The NBA is clearly not going to overreact to a Chinese media report  but if this chasm continues to widen it will be interesting to track what it WOULD take to convince the league to look elsewhere for the (estimated) 15 percent of annual revenue that comes from China
Knicks fans' thirst for a winner is bursting through the TV. Great atmosphere in this fourth quarter ...
On the strength of the organ soundtrack alone  MSG will always be great
Valid Friday night question: Will the Knicks win enough to help Mitchell Robinson factor in the MIP race?
The Rockets announce they have signed Matur Maker ... younger brother of Detroit’s Thon Maker
A 47-save shutout from @CarterHutton on the second night of a back-to-back ... and we will happily take it. #SabresAfterDark has seen far darker days
And they say Buffalo weather is bad ... #sabresafterdark
The West is impossible but I'm putting Luka in the 2020 All-Star Game now. 3-ball looks especially splashy
Porzingis suddenly looks weeks ahead of where he was a week ago ...
Stick To Hoops, Stein. Especially with Kawhi and Luka on from Vancouver!
If the Astros were still in the National League where they belong ...
More from Adam Silver's interview today with @RobinRoberts ...
Basketball development of a different sort from China: The Li-Ning brand Way of Wade has been pushing to close a lucrative deal with new Warriors guard D'Angelo Russell to make Russell a brand ambassador, according to industry sources
Some fantastic tales here about football writing and journalism across the pond from my pal @DTathletic, who rose from impossibly young scribe to one of the best in the world and the leading voice on the Barry Bennell scandal that rocked the sport. Quite a coup for @TheAthletic
The signing of the off-season and no one can convince me otherwise!
Digging into a potential contract extension and the New Celtics’ prospects for the coming season in our visit with Boston’s Jaylen Brown in the digital version of this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter —&gt;
Opening Night is in a week ... just hit me
Our @SopanDeb with a deep dive into LeBron's China commentary ...
Out NOW: The latest @nytimes NBA newsletter and a visit with the Celtics’ Jaylen Brown as the deadline for contract extensions for 2016 first-rounders — one of the many normally pressing October matters overshadowed these days by the NBA’s China crisis — approaches Monday at 6 PM
China-chaos-delayed edition of the @nytimes NBA newsletter will be dispatched to inboxes worldwide very shortly. In the interim ... my usual reminder that no trip to Miami is complete without a visit to the toy store to see @DeBruyneKev &amp; @aguerosergiokun #noplanstogrowup
As detailed here Sunday even before LeBron James’ first extended comments on the China controversy ... this was NOT the October anyone in the NBA expected after the wildest offseason of all-time in terms of roster upheaval. But the basketball will have to wait ...
Update: Herro running hook drops on first touch off the bench
No Sources Needed: Miami loves Herro Ball
Hawks 18, Tyler Herro 14 at tonight's exhibition outing. Only the second game I've seen live this preseason but the entertainment hasn't been lacking
The NBA has stated its position that the CBA forbids Dinwiddie’s plan and the Brooklyn guard clearly remains resolute to go ahead with trying to sell shares in his contract. This is heading for a showdown of sorts barring a reversal of the NBA’s position ... which seems unlikely
Saturday night  what else could be on your mind apart from posing a question for the next @nytimes NBA newsletter? Please send 'em in to marcstein-newsletter@nytimes.com with CORNER THREE in the subject line
For SportsSunday in the @nytimes: Nothing counts in the preseason, they say, but this China saga has been all too real for the shellshocked NBA —&gt;
They say this is preseason. No one told Giannis Antetokounmpo and Luka Doncic. Luka's 30-ish-footer makes it a six-point game at half. Giannis with 27 forceful points already; Doncic with 20 #prettygoodfridaynight
Fascinating reporting from China from the @nytimes' @KeithBradsher and @HernandezJavier on the Chinese government instructing journalists there to "tamp down public anger at the NBA" ...
The Mavericks have brought back their popular former sixth man Nick Van Exel as a pro personnel scout, league sources say
One theory in circulation: China allowed the game to go ahead in part because they wanted the NBA to see what a sponsorless game (with money withheld) looks and feels like
On CCTV in China, I'm told, instead of Lakers/Nets they are showing Chinese soccer ...
Lakers-Nets game begins with a message to the crowd: "Ladies and gentlemen ... welcome to Shanghai ... getting ready to enjoy and explore this unforgettable moment ... are you with me ... here we go"
According to the NBA’s official Weibo account — China’s answer to Twitter — Lakers vs. Nets is indeed on course for a tip at 7:30 AM Eastern Time
Neither team in Shanghai -- Lakers or Nets -- has scheduled a morning shootaround. So Thursday is a one trip-to-the-arena assignment in the 4-to-5 AM range Eastern Time for both clubs ... provided the game indeed goes ahead
Appreciate my fellow Titan @hmfaigen tweeting out the new @nytimes NBA newsletter — freshly dispatched with all the latest on the NBA’s complex China conundrum — as I embark on 25 hours of fasting/atonement. Rest assured the story will still be rumbling on when I re-emerge ...
More @nytimes coverage of the Rockets/China controversy  this story direct from Hong Kong from @bydanielvictor:
Go to @dmorey for Morey's own statement he just issued via Twitter
Echoing what @sam_amick just tweeted, one source with knowledge of the situation tells @NYTSports that Houston has "no discipline" planned for Rockets GM Daryl Morey in the wake of this weekend's Hong Kong/China Twitter controversy
According to the enclosed report from @JohnGonzalez of The @ringer: "Rockets ownership has debated Morey’s employment status and whether to replace him" in the wake of GM Daryl Morey's pro-Hong Kong tweet and the ensuing fallout in China
Very sad news to see today that, two months after he revealing he is afflicted with multiple sclerosis, former Cavs coach David Blatt has been forced to relinquish his job coaching @EuroLeague power Olympiakos
Touchdown, Sabres ... and I’m 7 years old again
Year 50 for my @BuffaloSabres and nearly five full decades of fandom and I finally -- FINALLY -- made it to a home opener. LGB!
Earlier today, @ShamsCharania reported that Dinwiddie made his case to league officials Thursday that selling shares in his four-year, $34.4 million Nets contract did not violate league rules and that he “still plans to move forward” with the project
Here is @NYTSports’ report from last Friday on the league informing Dinwiddie that the NBA’s collective bargaining agreement prohibits third party inclusion in an NBA contract
An NBA spokesperson tells @NYTSports of the Nets’ @SDinwiddie_25 and his ongoing attempts to sell shares in his contract: “The arrangement discussed in yesterday’s meeting remains prohibited by the CBA.”
Maybe I don't want my soccer kid to be a kicker ...
I do now ...
Did I misunderstand the rules?
A place in downtown Toronto called “Real Sports” with countless TVs couldn’t show Sabres at Pens —when it IS airing on a Canadian network. (To be fair it also happened at four more places nearby) PS — It’s Opening Night for most of the NHL and this is Toronto, Ontario, Canada
Isn’t every night in Canada always Hockey Night In Canada?
The Sacramento Kings are on tour in India and our @SopanDeb profiles Kings owner Vivek Ranadive ... who retains ever-ambitious goals amid a long postseason drought 
But that team is WAY too big and Kelvin Kim, I'm reliably informed, HAS to be the point guard after playing at both UCLA and UC San Diego 
Would love to say I am qualified here  but haven't seen a game in forever. Need help from some Chargers with more modern knowledge -- Jeff Arnold (Purdue), Ron Holmes (USC), Eric Speaker (Columbia), Greg Everett (Creighton) and Khari Johnson (UCI) are my nominees from my era
The NBA just announced a partnership that makes @WilliamHill an "authorized sports betting operator of the NBA in the United States"
The deal with @PUMAHoops that the Lakers' Kyle Kuzma finalized last week will pay him in the $3 million range annually over the next five seasons, industry sources say
Also: It's Day 2 for most teams and Shaq and Dame are throwing diss track haymakers at each other. Only #thisleague
This must be how it feels when City brings Sergio off the bench: For the first @nytimes NBA newsletter of the new season, fresh in your inbox NOW, what an honor to welcome the far more well-rounded @JohnBranchNYT to the space for a far more well-rounded piece than usual. Enjoy!
Still think the Blazers are asking Dame and CJ to do too much  but they will have the last laugh if the Whiteside gambit clicks. The star guards and Terry Stotts, to be fair, hushed a lot of skeptics like me last season -- and I do love the story of Hezonja wearing Drazen's 44
For its three upcoming exhibition games against NBA teams, @MaccabiHaifaBC is signing two NBA vets -- Norris Cole and Brandon Rush -- to play in those games against Memphis, Portland and Minnesota. Haifa has done the same previously with longtime NBA forward Josh Smith
Beat writer covering the 54-82 San Bernardino Spirit that same season for the @sbsun? A suddenly feeling rather old Moi 
Martin is expected to spend the coming season in more of an observance/fact-finding mode before taking a more hands-on role the following season. Worldwide interest in the @NBL is rising thanks in part to the presence of American prospects LaMelo Ball (@MELOD1P) and @RjHampton14
When the deal goes through, Martin would become the third American controlling a franchise in Australia's national league, joining another ex-NBA player in Matt Walsh (@NZBreakers) and Romie Chaudhari (@SEMelbPhoenix)
Kevin Martin, who averaged 17.4 PPG over a 12-season NBA career, is leading a group that is buying the @BrisbaneBullets of the @NBL in Australia, league sources say
Paul George tells @ramonashelburne at Clippers Media Day that he is out until "November-ish" after double shouler surgery
An announcement before the Bills beat the Pats: The Houston Rockets have a game tomorrow
At a middle school volleyball game ... where is @WorldWideWob with the clips of these @edersonmoraes93 saves I'm hearing about?????
Said Dinwiddie: “When I was on the phone with the league, I told them it wasn’t an assignment. And they invited me to sit down with them and explain the offering, which is what I’m going to do.”
Reached tonight by @NYTSports, Brooklyn’s @SDinwiddie_25 said he plans to meet with league officials to explain the concept further to try to change their minds on today’s ruling
The NBA has informed the Nets' Spencer Dinwiddie that he is not permitted to sell shares in his contract, the league office told @NYTSports on Friday. Full @nytimes story here WITH repaired link:
The NBA has informed the Nets' Spencer Dinwiddie that he is not permitted to use his contract as a digital investment vehicle, the league office told @NYTSports on Friday. Full @nytimes story here:
As noted here earlier this week, Kuzma is indeed finalizing his new @PUMAHoops contract that was reported here Sept. 10, industry sources confirmed today. Puma declined comment earlier this week when reached by @NYTSports
The Hawks just announced that John Collins (hip) and Kevin Huerter (knee) can only participate in training camp "within prescribed rehab limitations" and will have their statuses updated closer to the end of camp
For the 27th consecutive season, meanwhile, I regret to announce that my own dream of announcing a profound weight loss on Media Day has not materialized
The Rockets announced this morning that Nene — after the whole contract flap that saw the league deny Houston’s attempt to in essence make him a $10 million trade chip — “has re-injured an adductor that is chronic” and will thus miss Houston’s entire training camp
Let's share a take from Big Jo that no one can protest ...
The Committee of Perk ...
From the Lakers’ official press release: Kuzma will be re-evaluated after receiving an MRI when the team returns from its two exhibition games in China ...
The Lakers make it official and confirm our @NYTSports report from Tuesday that Kyle Kuzma is out indefinitely with a stress reaction in his left foot
Full @NYTSports coverage of the NBA’s new edict to teams this week mandating that players’ heights and ages are verified and submitted to the league office within a week of training camp starting —&gt;
The prospect of a neat-and-tidy game that is played in two hours -- like @FIBA has and like what soccer thrives on worldwide -- is what makes this idea worth investigating. Is one free throw better than @FIBA's 10-minute quarters? I'm leaning yes but want to see it in practice
Kobe Bryant, I'm told, held an invite-only camp for a few days in mid-August at his new facility in Thousand Oaks and had Kawhi Leonard, Paul George, Kyrie Irving and many other NBA luminaries in attendance .. including De'Aaron Fox after he parted company with @usabasketball
Promising update in Memphis: No. 2 overall pick Ja Morant has been officially cleared to participate fully in training camp after arthroscopic surgery on his right knee in June
Always catches my eye when tennis and the NBA intersect ... and league sources say that the Cavaliers are hiring Dr. Mark Kovacs -- former NCAA doubles champ who has worked with the @WTA Tour teen sensation Coco Gauff -- as the Cavs' new director of sports science
Among the players @kobebryant worked out with at his @MambaSportsHQ this summer: Orlando’s @MarkelleF —&gt;
NBA teams were notified this week that they must certify and submit the precise height and age for every player within the first week of training camp, league sources tell @NYTSports
It's Your Move with @batemanjason
The Dale 
Welcome back to Texas, @BobanMarjanovic
Agreed! Could listen to stories like this all day. When I get that Time Machine, I'm going to transport myself to, say, the 1974-75 season
Not the start to the season that the Nets wanted ...
The digital version of this week's @nytimes NBA newsletter featuring TWO simulations of the coming season  courtesy of @NBA2K and @StratOMatic --&gt;
Among a flurry of new hires, Philadelphia announces the addition of former Pacers center Roy Hibbert as a player development specialist
The injury, initially labeled "ankle soreness" last month while Kuzma was on @usabasketball duty, forced Team USA to send him home from Australia after the third-year Laker was expected to land a significant frontcourt role for Gregg Popovich
More on our AM story: The Lakers indeed expect Kyle Kuzma to miss the start of training camp as he continues to recover from a stress injury in his lower left leg, league sources say. The team will issue a formal update this week, with Kuzma's rehab said to be progressing well
All you need is an email address to subscribe to the @nytimes NBA newsletter and indeed read all about it:
In the latest @nytimes NBA newsletter that just hit inboxes worldwide: I turn to @Ronnie2K from @NBA2K along with my old friends from @StratOMatic to simulate the upcoming season (twice) and see what may happen with the Lakers, Clippers, Nets, Rockets, Warriors and, yes, Knicks
Nets GM Sean Marks says today at the team's preseason media availability that the expectation remains that Kevin Durant will miss the entire season as he recovers from a torn Achilles
Left "ankle soreness" was the official listed diagnosis in August when Kuzma was sent home from Team USA's exhibition tour in Australia
The Lakers increasingly fear Kuzma will not be ready for the start of training camp as his left foot continues to heal, league sources say. LA"s first two practices are Saturday
The more pressing concern for the Lakers, though, is Kuzma's recent foot injury that forced him to withdraw from @usabasketball duty at the @fibawc, with his recovery said to be progressing slower than hoped
All signs point to Nike declining to match Puma's lucrative multi-year offer to the Lakers' Kyle Kuzma reported here Sept. 10 ... lining up Puma to soon unveil Kuzma as its latest star endorser. @PUMAHoops declined comment when reached.
2019-20 NBA Trade Watch: 1. Andre Iguodala 2. Kevin Love 3. ???
The NBA trade deadline is Feb. 6, 2020  something tells me Memphis will get a trade offer it likes in the next 135 days
Tremendously sad day in the local basketball community ... Andre was loved all over Texas and the whole league #RIP
This should be illegal in September. It's fall! Let the kids play in breathable air 
Got two friends in this world who love SJSU as much as I love Titan Tech. Congrats to @MarcJSpearsESPN and @jcasale41 ... can only imagine winning what looks like what the great Gene Murphy used to call a Body Bag Game — games you have to play to pump $ into the program
NBA team owners today "unanimously" approved empowering the league to more strictly punish tampering, Commissioner Adam Silver announced, but specific details of the much-discussed annual "random audit" of five teams must still be hashed out
Who authorized today’s Board of Govermors meeting to clash with the @LaverCup?????
Sefolosha has been among the players working out at the Rockets' mini-camp in Las Vegas
The Rockets are signing Thabo Sefolosha, league sources say
Forty years later, 2 in the morning, one zillion percent yes Rocky II is still drop-everything viewing. @TheSlyStallone ... @TheCarlWeathers ... IMMORTALS!
How we watched hoops in the early 80s ... if we were lucky enough to get it in our market (which seemed to so rarely happen)
Thanks for FIBA's policy of using the past eight years as the basis for its computing, @usabasketball remains No. 1 in the latest world rankings ... with the new @FIBAWC champions @BaloncestoESP also holding firm at No. 2
The digital version of this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletters looks back at the @FIBAWC and how FIBA actually lost ground in its dream to get closer to the stature of soccer’s World Cup —&gt;
They better let Ionescu slip to Dallas!
Freshly dispatched to your inbox: In this week’s @nytimes NBA newsletter, after hearing so many people scoff and say “who really cares” how @usabasketball did at the @FIBAWC, we explore why this is a concern as much for FIBA as for USAB (or maybe more) ...
What Up Beck and The Beard ...
One more installment of Vintage Vardon  enjoyed a wonderful week with my fellow Yanks Abroad: @WindhorstESPN @johnschuhmann and @ByTimReynolds
It’s only proper, after a Spain/Argentina final in the @FIBAWC, to deliver Spanish coverage of Espana’s very own Redeem Team. My dispatch from China as translated by @nytimeses:
Spain was missing several top players, too, but that didn’t stop the Spaniards from avenging their 2014 World Cup flop to rout Argentina in the @FIBAWC final and establish their own Redeem Team. Dispatch from China for SportsMonday in the @nytimes:
The @FIBAWC official All-Tournament Team: Bogdan Bogdanovic, Evan Fournier, Ricky Rubio, Marc Gasol and Luis Scola ... with Rubio named tournament MVP
Spain wins the @FIBAWC in a 95-75 cruise past Argentina in the title game ... proving @MarcGasol might have had a better handle on his team as well as the field when I told him in mid-August that Spain was no longer SPAIN 
Props to the fans from Spain and Argentina that came all the way to China and landed in the title game to hopefully sing for two hours straight. Couldn’t have been easy travel ...
Also asked how aware he is that Knicks fans have been encouraged by his performances with France and want to see him get more of a shot next season, Ntilikina broke into a smile and told me: "I feel their support every day."
Ntilikina says "I'm healthy again" and that "I just have that feeling back" after getting through eight games "in a very short period." As for the Knicks, Frankie says the "whole group is very hungry for next season."
Also: Since @NYPost_Berman is not among the small pack of Yanks covering this tournament, I figured I was responsible for grappling with the masses in the mixed zone to get some post-game thoughts from @FrankLikina on his contributions to France's bronze-medal finish ...
"But friends of mine like Tobias (Harris) ... it was a great opportunity for him to just see something different and compete. I don't think they really realize how beneficial this is for their career."
Here's Fournier on Team USA's many high-profile absentees: "To be honest, when you look at James (Harden), KD and Kyrie, all these guys, they came here already. They won. It's fine. But friends of mine like Tobias (Harris) ... (1 of 2)
Some interesting post-game thoughts on a variety of subjects from Orlando's @EvanFourmizz following France's narrow victory over Australia in the third-place game here at the @FIBAWC ...
Covering this beautiful game has taken me to Mexico, Canada, Israel, Germany, Australia, England, Spain, Brazil and now China. 
Against Poland’s American coach and star American guard, @usabasketball signs off from the @FIBAWC in seventh place — and with Gregg Popovich’s defiant exit. For SportsSunday in the @nytimes:
"If you don't win, some people will want to play the blame game. There's no blame to be placed anywhere." -- @usabasketball coach Gregg Popovich after an 87-74 victory over Poland in the seventh-place game of the @FIBAWC
Team USA will play its last game in China down to one Celtic after Kemba Walker (neck) was ruled out of today's seventh-place game against Poland. Walker joins Jayson Tatum (ankle) and Marcus Smart (calf) on the sideline
Who gets the @JaMorant pull-out poster? @ChrisVernonShow or @HerringtonNBA or @espn_macmahon?
Can’t read em ... but I will definitely enjoy them #printmerd
Just seeing this news in China and I miss The Master Of The Mid-Range already. The line at Shaun’s locker was always long because all the writers wanted to hear his wisdom. Congrats on an amazing career, 34!
The story of Gregg Popovich and Sasha Djordjevic struggling as much as anyone to believe that @usabasketball and Serbia met in a fifth-place bracket game Thursday in the @FIBAWC 
The full story on the interactions between Djordjevic and Popovich and a strange night for the fallen @FIBAWC title favorites Serbia and the United States coming soon vis @NYTSports ...
Serbia’s Sasha Djordjevic did not want to curse at his postgame press conference, but he later revealed how Team USA’s Gregg Popovich actually (and jokingly) greeted him when the coaches met before tonight’s game in the fifth-place bracket: “We’re a couple of (expletive) losers”
Joe Johnson is officially a Piston, according to @ChrisBHaynes
The most essential reading on the @FIBAWC beat ... Vardon’s Diary:
After 58 straight wins, @usabasketball is forced to confront a losing streak -- two consecutive Ls for the first time since 2002 ... and no better than seventh place in the @FIBAWC after falling 94-89 to Serbia
Just remembered @BobanMarjanovic and I will be living in the same city after this @FIBAWC. Top that!
May God Help Them, indeed
No one’s smartphone typing is getting worse than age with mine. Of course, courtesy of Serbia coach Sasha Djordjevic, this is the MAY GOD HELP THEM Bowl ...
It’s USA v Serbia NOW from China ... in the May Gold Help Them Bowl from the fifth-place bracket at the @FIBAWC. This was supposed to be Sunday’s championship game — no telling what we’ll get in these circumstances
Playing for Team USA in this @FIBAWC meant you would likely only be remembered through defeat. SportsThursday column for the @nytimes from China: A quarterfinal loss to France slammed that reality home for a group of game but overmatched volunteers —&gt;
Our first @NYTSports piece on the @FRABasketball victory over @usabasketball in the quarterfinals of the @FIBAWC here in China ... with lots more to come —&gt;
USA v Serbia is going to happen ... but in the fifth-place bracket. FRANCE has stunned the Americans, 89-79, in the @FIBAWC quarterfinals
The Knicks' Frank Ntilikina has scored five big points in the fourth quarter. Rudy Gobert just rejected a Donovan Mitchell drive ... keeping Mitchell scoreless in the fourth and stuck on 29. France is less than a minute away from a momentous upset ...
Since going down 10 early in the second half, Team USA has played its best team ball of the tournament.
FIBA hoop at its funnest ...
Donovan Mitchell is feeling it inside and outside. Attacking the cup and just rattled home a 3 to get to 29 points. Gregg Popovich has gone super small to counter the Gobert Factor ... and it's working
The Donovan Mitchell Game that Team USA has been waiting for is happening. And man do they need it against a dialed-in France. Gobert and Fournier have been brilliant
Donovan Mitchell's 15-point half has kept the Americans within 45-39 at intermission ... but this game has been played on France's terms so far
Ten free-throw attempts already for Rudy Gobert as he just keeps rolling to the rim and causing problems. Gobert and Fournier have powered France into a 43-37 lead with 18.4 seconds left in the first half
Evan Fournier, like Ricky Rubio, is just a different player when he's got his national team's jersey on. He thinks he's making every shot he takes tonight in Dongguan ... France up 39-33 with 1:58 to go in the first half after a Fournier triple
Tatum in blue sweats and every other @usabasketball teammate is wearing white sweats tonight. The versatile Celtics forward is out for USA v France ... which starts now
CONFIRMED ... autocorrect equally annoying 12 hours ahead of the ET
Donovan Mitchell conformed at the morning shootaround that he has never dunked on Jazz teammate Rudy Gobert. “I’ve never tried, either,” Mitchell explained. Maybe tonight is the night here in Dongguan, China ...
The expectation, according to @joevardon, is that Tatum is out tonight and will try to return for Friday’s semifinals against Argentina — provided Team USA gets there
Team USA has not made a formal announcement on Jayson Tatum’s availability for tonight’s game against France ... but only 11 @usabasketball players are warming up with 20 minutes to go before tipoff
Analytics: For the first time in 89 days, your humble @NYTSports correspondent will cover a basketball game in one hour. And it’s a big one ...
Former NBA Executive of the Year Rod Thorn is expected to soon join the Wizards in an advisory capacity after working since 2015 as a special consultant to Bucks ownership, league sources say
Hearing some buzz from the shoe game since arriving in China: Puma is closing in on a deal to sign the Lakers’ Kyle Kuzma .. who was forced to withdraw from Team USA last month with an ankle injury
Yahoo Sources: Utah Jazz guard Mike Conley Jr. will bypass free-agency next week by not exercising “early termination option” on his $34.5 million salary for the 2020-21 season.
Yahoo Sources: Substantial faction of players and star players pushing for NBA season to start Jan. 18 — MLK Day — with a free-agency commencement of Dec. 1.
Sources: “@NBA2K 21” player ratings for Los Angeles Lakers’ starting lineup is LeBron James (98) — highest-rated player in the game — Anthony Davis (96), Danny Green (76), Kentavious Caldwell-Pope (76) and Alex Caruso (75). Rating reveals today on all 2K social platforms.
Hall of Fame guard Gary Payton reveals to @YahooSports that’s he’s ready for his next career chapter of coaching in the NBA and “The Glove” is eager to join a coaching staff: “I believe I am now ready to coach.”
Inside the night LeBron James and the Los Angeles Lakers once again became NBA champions.
I’ve been in the NBA Bubble for 105 days and tomorrow afternoon I’ll finally be greeted to these individuals. #family
LeBron James thanking his mother for giving him life.
LeBron James requesting goggles before entering the locker room to celebrate.
LeBron James won the Finals MVP award unanimously.
LeBron James wins his fourth Finals MVP award and he’s the first player in NBA history to do so with three different teams.
LeBron James and the Los Angeles Lakers are the 2019-20 NBA champions.
Jimmy Butler and the Heat spoiled the Lakers’ bubble celebration plans and how they found extra motivation for Game 5 win.
New Story: Inside why the narrative about declining NBA ratings due to social justice messaging is all wrong.
A Posted Up sitdown with @LASparks rookie Te’a Cooper who just finished her rookie season. She’s the fianc of Lakers center Dwight Howard, the only person to be in both Bubbles and she has an incredible @WNBA story. Full Interview:
Los Angeles Lakers star LeBron James is the newest Wheaties cover athlete.
Miami Heat star Bam Adebayo (neck strain) tells @YahooSports he plans to return for Game 3 of the NBA Finals on Sunday.
Yahoo Sources: Tyronn Lue is meeting with New Orleans Pelicans this afternoon, Los Angeles Clippers on Saturday and Houston Rockets on Sunday about their head coach openings.
Press Secretary announces Vice President Mike Pence and Second Lady tested negative for COVID-19 this morning.
Miami Heat guard Goran Dragic (left foot torn plantar fascia) and forward Bam Adebayo (neck strain) are both listed as doubtful for Game 2.
New Story: The moment in Game 1 that led to LeBron James telling his team to tone down the sideline antics: “Stop it. Stay locked in. This st ain’t over, man.”
Goran Dragic exited the arena without utilizing a boot and he wasn’t favoring his foot much at all.
Miami Heat guard Goran Dragic suffered a plantar tear and will be re-evaluated, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Miami Heat guard Goran Dragic is receiving an X-Ray on his left foot, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
A @YahooSports conversation with Los Angeles Lakers star Anthony Davis who is ready for his NBA Finals close-up: “I knew what I wanted. I wanted what he had,” as he pointed to LeBron James.
Such wonderful options...
Los Angeles Sparks star Candace Parker was voted the Defensive Player of the Year by media. However, she was not named to the two All-Defensive teams selected by coaches.
Court design for the 2020 NBA Finals.
In Clippers press release, says “Steve Ballmer and Doc Rivers have reached a mutual decision that Rivers will step down as head coach of the L.A. Clippers.”
LeBron James to me before Game 5. LeBron James to me after Game 5.
LeBron James and Kobe Bryant made plans to break bread after he signed in 2018. It kept being put off. In @YahooSports exclusive with LeBron, reveals questions he had for Kobe, Kobe’s text, trying to win over Laker faithful and calling game before Game 5:
Denver Nuggets got Los Angeles Lakers right where they want them. #3-1
I see ya sis. Bet on yourself!!!
Los Angeles Sparks star Candace Parker has been named the 2020 WNBA Defensive Player of the Year.
Miami Heat, Boston Celtics come to terms with the Breonna Taylor decision.
Statement from NBPA executive director @MRobertsNBPA on Breonna Taylor: “Sadly, there was no justice today for Breonna.”
How Los Angeles Lakers tossed Game 3 away and unbeknownst to viewing public, how Dwight Howard was nearly tossed in first half: “Hey, cut that out now! Are you serious? I’ve heard that twice now. Twice. Cut it out now!” a ref shouted.
Los Angeles Lakers rookie Talen Horton-Tucker was taken out by a Anthony Davis running knee: “Oh, I’m good,” he told Yahoo Sports. “That knee energized me.”
Los Angeles Lakers intend to keep JaVale McGee in starting lineup for Game 2 of the WCF against the Denver Nuggets, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
LeBron James said “It pissed me off” to only get 16 first-place votes for MVP.
Boston Celtics forward Gordon Hayward upgraded to questionable for Game 3 against the Miami Heat on Saturday.
Sources: Teams permitted to watch video footage of draft-eligible players working out provided it involves no more than 1 player, 1 coach. Teams permitted to request medical of eligible players. While medical part of Combine, this would apply to players who don't attend Combine.
Sources: Prelim schedule for 2020 NBA Draft. Sept. 21-24: Virtual interviews on videoconf. Sept. 28-Oct. 16: Medical exams (may extend to Oct. 23) in NBA team markets. Strength, agility testing, anthropometric measurement, shooting drills and Pro Day Video at team facilities.
All NBA Third Team.
All NBA Second Team.
NBA All-First Team is announced.
Yahoo Sources: A portrait inside the Los Angeles Clippers’ collapse where frustration, lack of chemistry and getting on the same page was an ongoing obstacle.
NBA announces 2019-20 All-Rookie First Team
Toronto Raptors have announced they’ve signed head coach Nick Nurse to a multi-year contract extension.
With a head coaching vacancy in Houston, expect the franchise to take a strong look at Los Angeles Clippers assistant Tyronn Lue.
A protest in The Bubble blocking bus filled with league staff and media. Waiting on sheriff to arrive.
Russell Westbrook took the court after the timeout yelling “Where he at?” as he looked for Rajon Rondo’s brother William.
Russell Westbrook getting into with a family member in attendance.
Yahoo Sources: Milwaukee Bucks star Giannis Antetokounmpo met with ownership today to discuss his future and future of the franchise.
The @NBA Bubble treated to powerful film called “One Night in Miami” directed by @ReginaKing. Movie is phenomenal and right for the times. Roles of Malcolm X, Jim Brown, Sam Cooke, Muhammad Ali perfectly played by Kingsley Ben-Adir, @TheRealEliGoree, @leslieodomjr, @AldisHodge
How Kyle Lowry finally received the flowers he deserved as the defending champion Toronto Raptors fell short to the Boston Celtics.
Eastern Conference and Western Conference schedules.
NBA concludes investigation and finds that Danuel House Jr. had a guest in his room over multiple hours on Sept. 8 and he has left the bubble.
The pool of Black “qualified” coaches are as strong as ever and if NBA teams are sincere that Black Lives Matter, then Black coaches matter too. Also a farewell to Chef Lex, Carmelo Anthony’s personal chef who left her mark inside the bubble.
Yahoo Sources: Houston Rockets guard Danuel House Jr. under investigation for potentially allowing a female COVID-19 testing official into his room.
A @YahooSports exclusive with Milwaukee Bucks star Giannis Antetokounmpo on teams waiting for him to request a trade in offseason: “That’s not happening. Some see a wall and go in another direction. I plow through it.”
Yahoo Sources: MRI on the left ankle of Los Angeles Lakers center JaVale McGee came back negative and he will play tonight against the Houston Rockets.
A powerful multilayered national anthem ritual by @Nuggets assistant coach Charles Klask that has gone unnoticed. He explained to me why he’s standing, kneeling, raising the “Black Power” fist and praying.
My @NBAonTNT report on Denver Nuggets swingman Will Barton not ruling out a return this series while rehabbing in Miami and undergoing daily COVID-19 testing.
Denver Nuggets star Nikola Jokic (right wrist) will be available to play tonight against the Los Angeles Clippers, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Los Angeles Clippers guard Patrick Beverley has been fined $25K for verbally abusing an official.
Los Angeles Lakers plan to go with their usual starting lineup in Game 2 tonight against the Houston Rockets, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Giannis Antetokounmpo is out for remainder of the game.
Milwaukee Bucks star Giannis Antetokounmpo telling coaching staff he wants to shoot his free throws.
Jimmy Butler to @YahooSports in November on perception he chose destination over winning: “Motherfuckers act like I’m not a good basketball player. Like for real. Just think about that. Like I can’t come in and make a huge difference.”
Milwaukee Bucks star Giannis Antetokounmpo says his ankle wasn’t bothering him during the game, but he walked out of the arena severely limping.
Miami Heat center Meyers Leonard says “We have the best player in this series.”
Yahoo Sources: Former NBA star Chauncey Billups is finally interested in pursuing a head coaching job and teams have begun researching his candidacy.
My @YahooSports column on how Chris Paul accelerated the Thunder’s rebuild: “When I’m in, I’m in,” Paul told Yahoo Sports. “Y’all thought I was going to ask out or something.”
Steve Nash on becoming the Nets’ next head coach in the team’s press release.
Jazz star Donovan Mitchell had contractual concerns about joining bubble, but the bubble was better for his presence: “I couldn’t let my contract get in way of the bigger picture,” told @YahooSports. “I had to rely on God. If I got hurt, it was God’s
The NBA schedule for the second round.
Growing up, we thought Georgetown was an HBCU the way legendary coach John Thompson represented that university and had us all wearing Hoya starter jackets. The Black community continues to mourn. Brutal week. RIP, coach.
NBA’s ballboys/girls wore “Black Lives Matter” shirts throughout seeding games and then suddenly abandoned them for playoffs. But after pause, the shirts are back. One reason players dubious owners will keep word and if not, they’re prepared to walk again.
Portland center Hassan Whiteside (left pinky finger dislocation) will return.
Joining @NBAonTNT’s “Inside the NBA” crew right now to discuss the historical week that was.
In another devastating blow, former Portland Trail Blazers great Clifford Robinson has passed away.
2020 sucks!!! Damn...
NBA postseason schedule for Saturday and Sunday.
Yahoo Sources: Inside the emotional 48 hours that saved the NBA and the vital role of Chris Paul, Andre Iguodala and LeBron James:
NBA statement, hoping to return to play Friday or Saturday.
Yahoo Sources: Significant source of frustration in meeting last night stemmed from players not being on the same page and emotions got the best of some. The hope from the collective was after a good night’s sleep, they could reconvene and get it to this point. Playoffs are back.
Yahoo Sources: There was a change in position from last night with LeBron James, among others, relaying it was in their best interest to finish out the season.
For @YahooSports on the players gathering to determine the fate of the season in Orlando.
Yahoo Sources: The meeting has concluded.
Yahoo Sources: The referees have just entered the meeting with the players.
The Los Angeles Lakers and Los Angeles Clippers have voted to boycott the rest of the playoffs and were the first two teams to exit the meeting, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Breaking down a historical day in the NBA on @NBAonTNT as players opt to boycott playoffs games to reprioritize spotlight on racial injustices. Full six-min version:
The Milwaukee Bucks...
The Milwaukee Bucks players will make a statement as a team outside their locker room.
One star NBA player: “We’re already here. Let’s finish what we started.”
Yahoo Sources: There’s a sizable amount of players advocating to finish the season out since sacrifices were made to enter the bubble, believing the NBA platform is a useful resource in this social climate.
All games are postponed and will be rescheduled.
Yahoo Sources: No playoff basketball today.
Los Angeles Lakers and Portland Trail Blazers are leaning toward boycotting Game 5 tonight, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Behind the scenes of the hurt, the guilt and the traumatization in the bubble as players and members of union met last night to discuss logistics of potentially boycotting games.
Yahoo Sources: Reporting with @VinceGoodwill, Milwaukee Bucks star Giannis Antetokounmpo to win Defensive Player of the Year award for the 2019-20 season.
Odds drastically slim of Portland extending series to six without Damian Lillard, but if that were to occur, the Bubble MVP would likely be unavailable the duration due to currently being unable to extend right leg, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
The sis @TaylorRooks has been asking some phenomenal questions in the bubble and procuring candid, raw responses. Her presence is invaluable.
Portland Trail Blazers say the results of an MRI of Damian Lillard's right knee were inconclusive and he will undergo a second MRI Tuesday afternoon.
Yahoo Sources: Portland star Damian Lillard is undergoing an MRI on his right knee.
Yahoo Source: Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard (knee) will not return to tonight’s game against Los Angeles Lakers.
Kyle Lowry (ankle) will not return tonight.
Yahoo Sources: Inside the tenure of Sixers head coach Brett Brown and the behind the scenes issues that led to a star walking away.
Tobias Harris checking back in the game.
Tobias Harris has returned to the bench.
Harris is able to stand up holding a towel to his left eye. He walks to the locker room.
Scary scene here as Tobias Harris lays on the ground. Complete silence in the gym.
Orlando Magic say Michael Carter-Williams (strained tendon, left foot) and Aaron Gordon (strained left hamstring) are out today against Milwaukee Bucks.
Dallas Mavericks say Luka Doni (left ankle sprain) will not return to tonight’s game.
Portland Trail Blazers say forward Zach Collins has suffered a hairline medial malleolus stress fracture of his left ankle and will miss remainder of season.
Why Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard - and other stars - will no longer hear their known favorites tracks during “road” games in restart. Last night’s DJ: “No, I won’t be playing Blow the Whistle’ tonight.”
Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard (left index finger dislocation) will not return. X-rays are negative.
The Minnesota Timberwolves will have the No. 1 pick in the 2020 NBA Draft.
LeBron James says urging people - particularly African Americans - to go to the polls is not about swaying them to a candidate. I asked who he’s endorsing for President of the United States in the upcoming election. @NBAonTNT
Portland Trail Blazers forward Zach Collins underwent an MRI on his left ankle and it revealed a Malleolar stress reaction. He will be re-evaluated in one week.
During seeding games LeBron James was asked about the team’s struggles and he made a comment saying there were things going on behind the scenes that nobody knew about. He touched on that. @NBAonTNT
Anthony Davis to @YahooSports: “Guys are sinking in the paint and daring us to make shots, and right now we’re not doing that. It’s just making it tough on everybody.” How the Lakers are shooting themselves out games and collapsing.
If you missed the 3-min version of my @NBAonTNT sitdown with LeBron James that just aired on “Inside the NBA,” here it is.
Chris Paul very candid on where his relationship stands with James Harden leading up to the Thunder meeting the Rockets tonight on @NBAonTNT: “He’s not going to hit me to tell my daughter Happy Birthday today.”
Hardest-working player in either bubble is @LASparks star @Candace_Parker. Hooping, parenting, analyst. Inside her days and who she commends for supporting @WNBA: “Kobe was an advocate for women's basketball long before people were wearing orange hoodies.”
Yahoo Sources: Indiana Pacers wing Justin Holiday is switching agents and will sign with Bernie Lee. Holiday will be a free agent this offseason. Lee also represents Miami Heat star Jimmy Butler.
My @NBAonTNT sitdown with LeBron James. Snippets to air during Lakers, Trail Blazers game tonight and the extended version on “Inside the NBA.”
My @NBAonTNT sitdown with @CP3 on facing the Rockets, his relationship with James Harden, the success of The Bubble’ and few surprise topics. Snippets to air during tonight’s slate of games with extended version on Wednesday.
After observing @Dame_Lillard during the season and restart, @CarmeloAnthony tells @YahooSports that Dame is the top player he’s played with in his NBA career. Inside how that came to be.
The Portland Trail Blazers will face the Los Angeles Lakers in the first round of the playoffs in what could be the most entertaining opening series.
CJ McCollum after hurting that shot on Ja Morant: “He can’t fking hold me.”
Lakers assiatant coach Jason Kidd and Pacers star Victor Oladipo is in atttendace at today’s play-in match between Portland and Memphis.
Dame was voted MVP unanimously, earning all 22 writers’ first-place votes.
Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard has been named the Bubble MVP.
Inside this story you’ll find information on the award Carmelo Anthony received this week, an update on the $1.5M fund Kyrie Irving put up for WNBA players who opted out and @JCrossover’s status with Nets as well as the status of his earphones:
Portland star @Dame_Lillard to @YahooSports on when traps had neutralized his play and created a narrative that he could be tamed: “That’s why I took that deep three. I wasn’t going to allow the traps to take me out of the game.”
My @NBAonTNT “walkoff” interview with @Dame_Lillard after leading his team to the play-in round following 42 points and 12 assists.
My @NBAonTNT report on how Damian Lillard was approaching this game against Brooklyn.
My @NBAonTNT report on when CJ McCollum sufferered the fracture to his back.
Dallas Mavericks forward Kristaps Porzingis (left heel contusion) will miss today’s game against the Phoenix Suns.
I felt like I was Mean Gene Okerlund in this interview. @Dame_Lillard is on a mission!!!
My @NBAonTNT report on how much the leadership of Luka Doncic has blossomed inside the bubble and why it caused a disturbance for Boban Marjanovi on one occasion.
My @NBAonTNT report on Paul George reaching out to Damian Lillard to discuss the back and forth banter that took an ugly turn once family members got involved.
Bubble Rumblings: Few coaches have asked players to refrain from fraternizing with opponents to mixed reviews, why Anthony Davis’ room is being invaded, how Pacers are learning each other through movies, Klay Thompson progressing and Mavs fighting racism.
Orlando Magic guard Terrence Ross has rejoined the bubble after negative, non-COVID-19 test results and is in quarantine protocol.
On @NBAonTNT tonight...
Orlando Magic guard Terrence Ross has left the bubble due to a personal, non-Covid-19 medical matter in which he’ll undergo off-site tests.
Yahoo Sources: NBA teams that have been mathematically eliminated on or before Aug. 12 will depart campus immediately after their final game has ended. Following game, teams will shower in designated rooms at the Coronado Springs Resort, receive meal and take team bus to airport.
Trail Blazers star @Dame_Lillard follows up a disappointing loss from last night with a 51-point outburst and a 124-121 win over Sixers this evening to remain strong in their playoff pursuit.
Golden State Warriors forward Draymond Green will be fined $50,000 for his comments regarding Phoenix Suns guard Devin Booker, sources tell Yahoo Sports.
My @NBAonTNT report on when Rajon Rondo (thumb fracture) could reenter the bubble for the Los Angeles Lakers.
Los Angeles Lakers will start Alex Caruso in place of Danny Green (hip) today against the Indiana Pacers, coach Frank Vogel says.
Damian Lillard on the antics of Patrick Beverly and Paul George down the stretch of today’s game. Lillard unloads.
An @NBAonTNT snippet of my interview with the talk-of-the-bubble being Indiana Pacers forward TJ Warren (@TonyWarrenJr). Extended version to air during today’s Lakers vs. Pacers broadcast on TNT.
Los Angeles Lakers stars LeBron James (groin) and Anthony Davis (ankle) will play today against the Indiana Pacers, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Orlando Magic guard Michael Carter-Williams (foot) and forward Aaron Gordon (hamstring) are out tonight against the Philadelphia 76ers.
This seems like ages ago...
My report on how some players are bypassing the anonymous tip hotline and going straight to the top with their complaints in the bubble.
My report on Los Angeles Clippers forward Montrezl Harrell and when he’s expected to rejoin the team in the bubble.
Los Angeles Sparks guard Te’a Cooper has been cleared to rejoin the team following two consecutive negative COVID-19 tests after receiving an inconclusive result 48 hours prior.
Expect Mavs to start Boban Marjonovic in place of Seth Curry (right leg) today.
Dallas Mavericks guard Seth Curry will be held out of today’s matchup against the Los Angeles Clippers.
The Brooklyn Nets have been fined $25,000 for failing to comply with league policies governing injury reporting.
Sources: NBA and Players Association will continue dialogue on permitting advancing teams to bring additional staff members inside the bubble.
Yahoo Sources: Teams notified they may swap out one staff member on Aug. 10 and teams who advance past first round of playoffs will be allowed to swap out a second member of their traveling party or two members if team forgoes any replacement during first swap-out period.
Release: An inconclusive result makes no conclusive determination as to whether the person does or does not have COVID-19, but is treated as a positive test. Cooper is currently in isolation.
Los Angeles Sparks announced today the team will be without Te’a Cooper for tonight’s game against the Indiana Fever due to an inconclusive result from a COVID-19 test this week.
Philadelphia 76ers star Ben Simmons, isn’t experiencing any swelling or pain in his knee, a league source tells Yahoo Sports. @PompeyOnSixers reports he’s out remainder of game versus Washington Wizards.
Memphis Grizzlies forward Jaren Jackson Jr. suffered a meniscus tear and will miss the rest of the season.
Bubble Rumbling News: Damian Lillard’s ambition, recruiting Trevor Ariza to join the bubble, the bubble cake thief Pelicans are dealing with and the contributions Wizards are getting from stars outside the bubble.
The few barbers in the bubble were handpicked by a handful of players. Kawhi Leonard chose Daniel Thomas (@Watchmykix). He gave me my first bubble cut. Produced by Jonathan Scott, I take you inside that experience.
Having known @MeyersLeonard for years, can say he doesn’t have prejudice bone in his body. He agonized, cried at times about not kneeling with teammates. His brother served in Marines, so it was a painful decision. I asked him if he still views kneeling as disrespectful to flag:
Indiana Pacers star Victor Oladipo will go through a pregame warmup before determining if he’ll play tonight against the Philadelphia 76ers, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Portland, Memphis, referees and Trail Blazers’ GM Neil Olshey kneel in peaceful protest during national anthem.
President Trump said kneeling during anthem is a sign of great disrespect’ and the game is over for me’ if players do. Pelicans guard JJ Redick to @YahooSports: I don't think anybody in the NBA cares if President Trump watches basketball'
Sacramento Kings’ forward Harrison Barnes and his wife Brittany are donating more than $200K to different nonprofits that were created by the families of victims of police brutality and gun violence.
I give you the inside scoop on what has been a month-long journey for me in the bubble. A @NBAonTNT special feature. Full Video:
Adam Silver issues statement on kneeling during national anthem: “I respect our teams’ unified act of peaceful protest for social justice and under these unique circumstances will not enforce our long-standing rule requiring standing during the playing of our national anthem.”
Utah Jazz, New Orleans Pelicans and referees kneel during the anthem as a peaceful protest method to highlight racial injustice.
Sources: Williamson will play in short quick burst, not necessarily a minutes restriction.
New Orleans Pelicans rookie Zion Williamson will play today against the Utah Jazz in the restart opener, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: NBA referees to join players in kneeling during the anthem to show their support:
The @NBA is back. I’ll be roaming the sideline for @NBAonTNT during the @utahjazz, @PelicansNBA restart opener tonight.
New Orleans Pelicans rookie Zion Williamson will be a game-time decision for Thursday’s restart opener against the Utah Jazz, coach Alvin Gentry says.
Memphis Grizzlies say guard Tyus Jones is experiencing knee soreness and will be re-evaluated in approximately one week.
Yahoo Sources: Of 344 players tested for COVID-19 since results were announced July 20, zero have come back positive.
The rebranded team is expected to play in a new arena currently being constructed on the campus of Wayne State University beginning in the 2021-22 season.
The Detroit Pistons, Phoenix Suns and the NBA G League today announced the Pistons have agreed to purchase the Northern Arizona Suns from the Phoenix Suns.
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Clippers forward Montrezl Harrell still tending to a private matter and will miss restart opener against Los Angeles Lakers. His return to bubble unknown.
For @YahooSports I take you inside the sights and sounds of LeBron James, the loudest voice in the arena.
United Talent Agency announces that @RichPaul4 of Klutch Sports has been named to its Board of Directors, effective immediately. Paul is already head of UTA Sports and is a UTA partner.
Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard will be given today’s scrimmage off against the Toronto Raptors, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Chris Paul says he’s “most proud of is our players agreed to $300 million going to social justice issues that players get an opportunity to determine where it goes.”
WNBA players will also take part in this discussion.
Chris Paul says Michelle Obama will address players in the bubble today and speak on the importantance of voting.
Los Angeles Clippers center Ivica Zubac arrived in the Orlando bubble last night and is under a two-day quarantine protocol, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Los Angeles Lakers take the court as if it’s a packed arena.
Zion Williamson upon returning to bubble: “My family and I appreciate the love, respect that everyone showed us while we dealt with a private family matter. Im excited to rejoin my team in Orlando and look forward to getting back on the court with my teammates after quarantine.”
Why @Dame_Lillard coming from the top rope with fake news?!?  Thanks @NBA for the much-needed bubble 
How the fan-less atmosphere will put a spotlight on the disengage players who typically sulk on the bench. My @YahooSports column from today’s scrimmage.
How it sounds to be announced with no fans in attendance.
Memphis Grizzlies forward Justise Winslow sufferered a hip injury and will be sidelined for remainder of the restart.
Yahoo Sources: League sent email to teams this morning urging players, coaches to wear masks during Zoom calls now that media in attendance. “We want to make sure we are staying within rules of campus and since we’re indoors and they aren’t working out, wearing masks apply here.”
Yahoo Sources: Of 346 players test players tested for COVID-19 on campus since the last announcement on July 13, zero have returned positive tests.
Yahoo Sources: NBA working with 10 local, minority-owned restaurants to discuss joining campus delivery program and associated NBA-required health and safety protocols. Also continuing to source additional restaurants and minority-owned vendors to provide catering services.
Sacramento Kings forward Marvin Bagley III received an MRI last night following an injury to his right foot during Sunday’s practice. The team is awaiting the results.
Yahoo Sources: In memo sent to owners and senior basketball operations executives who wish to join bubble, they must undergo negative PCR test authorized by FDA within 72 hours of arrival. And with coronavirus cases high in Florida, it’s recommended private air or ground travel.
It’s been three weeks since arriving inside the bubble for NBA’s Disney restart. As one of only two media members allowed in weeks before anyone else, I’ve seen it all. I detail my unique experience for @YahooSports.
My report on the bubble absence of Milwaukee Bucks guard Eric Bledsoe who told me he tested positive for Covid-19, but is symptom-free. @NBAonTNT
Hopping on with @TurnerSportsEJ, @TheJetOnTNT, @SHAQ and Chuck on @NBAonTNT to report on the latest happenings inside the bubble.
Houston Rockets star James Harden says his delay in getting to Orlando was due to “family issues.”
Join me on @NBA_Reddit on Friday at 11 a.m. ET for an AMA on life in the Bubble and the NBA's restart.
Houston Rockets star James Harden plans to participate in his first practice today from Orlando, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard has partnered with startup VIZNTM Gaming, taking equity position in the Portland-based company. VIZN Gaming’s first-in-industry UltraVRTM technology plug-&amp;-play converts the last 30 years of video games into full 360 3D Virtual Reality.
This was @Dame_Lillard’s rookie season. My second covering the league. He’s 30 today. SMH. Happy Birthday bro.
Reporting on Jimmy Butler’s quarantine practice and how LeBron James isn’t utilizing any extra resources on campus to show teammates he’s in this with them.
Joining “Inside the NBA” on @NBAonTNT right now for my latest reports on the grounds of the Walt Disney World campus.
Yahoo Sources: Denver Nuggets center Nikola Jokic has been cleared from quarantine, but he’s waiting on results of physical testing before given the green light to take the court. He will watch practice tonight.
Of the 322 players tested for Covid-19 since arriving on July 7, two players tested positive, the league announces.
Denver Nuggets guard Gary Harris, forwards Michael Porter Jr. and Torrey Craig have not made the trip to Walt Disney World, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
It’s been six days since the first batch of teams arrived on the Walt Disney campus and league sources tell Yahoo Sports that the “snitch hotline” has not been utilized...yet.
Los Angeles Lakers star Anthony Davis will wear his last name on the back of his jersey, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Portland Trail Blazers coach Terry Stotts on Jusuf Nurkic and Zach Collins practicing today: “They both looked like the way we remembered them.” Portland is a dangerous threat for this restart.
Yahoo Sources: Milwaukee Bucks sharpshooter Kyle Korver, who recently acknowledged his white privilege and vowed to educate himself more on plight of black people, will wear “Black Lives Matter” on his jersey.
Los Angeles Lakers center JaVale McGee will wear “Respect Us” on the back of his jersey as his social justice statement, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Los Angeles Clippers star Kawhi Leonard indeed arrived in Orlando last night for the restart, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Brooklyn Nets guard Jamal Crawford will wear “Equality” on the back of his jersey as his social justice statement, league sources Yahoo Sports.
Zion Williamson not only member of New Orleans Pelicans whose body has gone through a transformation during hiatus. League sources say rookie Nickeil Alexander-Walker is now 3/4 of an inch taller, Brandon Ingram added weight/strength and JJ Redick at his lowest weight since Duke.
Yahoo Sources: Denver Nuggets star Nikola Jokic arriving in Orlando in next couple of days.
Joining @TurnerSportsEJ, @TheJetOnTNT, @SHAQ and Chuck right now on Inside the NBA live from the Disney campus.
Brooklyn Nets announced the signing of guard Jamal Crawford.
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Clippers star Kawhi Leonard did not travel with team to Orlando in order to tend to a family matter. Will join team in a few days.
Los Angeles Lakers guard Danny Green: “How Many More?” Orlando Magic forward Aaron Gordon: “Freedom.”
Yahoo Sources: NBA social justice statements to be worn on back of jerseys for the restart: Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard: “How Many More?” Boston Celtics center Enes Kanter: “Freedom.” Sacramento Kings forward Marvin Bagley III: “Freedom.”
Chicago Bulls’ lead assistant Chris Fleming - an innovative offensive architect - will interview for the New York Knicks head coaching vacancy on Thursday, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Hopping on “Inside the NBA” on @NBAonTNT right now to offer my latest reports live from inside the Walt Disney bubble.
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Lakers plan to reward Avery Bradley with a ring if they win the championship: “It’s a very kind gesture on their part. Will I accept it? I’m neither here nor there about it.”
Yahoo Sources: NBA international players will have a choice to translate selected "social justice message" on their jerseys into a non-English language by still choosing from the 28 statement options. Would need to be done using English alphabet with no more than 16 characters.
WNBA announces in tests conducted of 137 players between June 28-July 5, seven players have tested positive for the coronavirus.
The restart schedule scrimmages are from July 22-28, the league announces.
Sources: Lionel Hollins - 66 - was disappointed in not being able to be on the front lines, but understands this is the right decision. This was not an age-related situation.
Los Angeles Lakers assistant coach Lionel Hollins was “red-flagged” as a health concern and will not join the team in Orlando for the NBA restart, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Nine more players have tested positive for COVID-19.
J.R. Smith will wear No. 21 for the Los Angeles Lakers, his agent @RichPaul4 of @KlutchSports tells Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: NBA unlikely to place names of police-brutality victims on players’ jerseys with a concern of adding more unnecessary pain to grieving families if loved ones are omitted.
Brooklyn Nets star Kevin Durant — who is continuing rehab on his Achilles — will not accompany the team to Orlando for the season resumption, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
The NBA restart full schedule:
Atlanta Hawks star Trae Young has just announced that he’s signing with Klutch Sports.
Miami Heat forward Andre Iguodala - who serves as NBPA First Vice President - to @YahooSports on the role of law enforcement securing the perimeter of Orlando campus, a protection measure that caused some unease by players who have been protesting police brutality.
Posted Up w/ C. Haynes: WNBA guard Renee Montgomery (@itsreneem_) on skipping season, NBA players reaching out for advice, being on that Kyrie Irving call, what she took from it and more.
NBA and NBPA announce 16 of 302 tested players tested positive for COVID-19. They will remain in self-isolation and then must be cleared by a physician.
Yahoo Sources: Atlanta Hawks star Trae Young severing ties with sports agency Octagon and will begin interviewing agents, but Klutch Sports appears the frontrunner.
Brooklyn Nets forward Nicolas Claxton underwent arthroscopic labrum repair surgery on his left shoulder and will not join the team to Orlando for the restart.
Posted Up w/ C. Haynes: The full candid hour-long conversation with Spurs guard @DejounteMurray is now available. Get to know this promising young brotha like never before. A deep, inspiring peek inside all he endured to beat the odds. :
Yahoo Sources: Atlanta Hawks star Trae Young is mulling decision on whether to remain or terminate contract with Octagon Sports. With his agent Omar Wilkes leaving for Klutch Sports, Young is considering all his options.
Posted Up with C. Haynes: Spurs guard @DejounteMurray opens up for first time on being active in streets at 11, family street ties, @JCrossover’s role getting him off the block, how “gang member” tag hurt him in draft &amp; how Spurs saw beyond his past. :
Toronto Raptors announce they will travel to Fort Myers, Florida today to prepare for the season resumption in Orlando as scheduled.
A must-read thread from my brotha @Travonne dropping knowledge on Oregon’s history towards Black people that you won’t find in your school curriculum.
Russell Westbrook will be participating virtually in the Tulsa Juneteenth Block Party, sources tell Yahoo Sports. Join the party: Stream it on Instagram: @choosetulsa Share the movement: #tulsablockparty
City of Tulsa - along with Houston Rockets star Russell Westbrook - will now host a global Juneteenth Block Party virtually as well as on-the-ground on June 20 during Donald Trump’s rally in the city that day. It’s an effort to reclaim airwaves, keep focus of weekend on freedom.
Yahoo Sources: Each team will have access to designated Disney culinary team who will help create individualized team menus, support team dietary needs, and ensure health and safety guidelines are followed. Players will receive 3 meals per day and 4 meals per day on game days.
Yahoo Sources: All individuals on campus required to wear face coverings at all times except during meals, individual rooms, when outside &amp; more than 6-ft from person, or in case of players, first row coaches, &amp; referees when engaged in b-ball-related or other training activities
Yahoo Sources: While on Orlando campus, players can receive standard deliveries (e.g., USPS, FedEX, UPS). Incoming packages will be processed, cleaned, delivered in timely manner. There will be separate process for food delivery (from approved providers) to get to receipts ASAP.
.@Dame_Lillard’s bar game  “Feel the vibe doe..like it’s Vegas we at Cosmo/House was built with my chicken like Roscoes/ When it come to hoop I’m a honcho/ They praying for my fall from the stage but I ain’t Bob Dole” : :
Yahoo Sources: Brooklyn Nets star Kyrie Irving organizes inspiring, galvanizing conference call that led to players opening up on a season restart. Irving: "If it's worth the risk to play, then let's go do it. If not, we've got options for both ways."
Yahoo Sources: Players offered different perspectives with some in favor of not returning-to-play and those citing financial ramifications as a reason for a season resumption. The WNBA players spoke on their league issues and vowed to stand in unity with the NBA players.
Yahoo Sources: The conference call led by Kyrie Irving lasted an hour and forty minutes. The Nets star let it be known he was against going to Orlando, but said he would ultimately stand with the group if they decided to play.
Yahoo Sources: Kyrie Irving led inspiring conference call centered on unity, systemic racism, investing in communities with 80-plus players that included WNBA players. Opinions were voiced, questions answered and a common theme established: Whatever we do, we’re in this together.
As @TaylorRooks, @HowardBeck reports, Brooklyn Nets star Kyrie Irving has organized a call tonight for players to discuss what position they should take. He’s of mindset that during racial tension, not returning to play should be considered, sources say.
Yahoo Sources: Significant number of players disappointed their voice wasn’t heard in decision to restart season, and others believe black players sequestered to entertain and ease league’s economic burden amid racial tension is bad optics.
Posted Up w/ C. Haynes: Nuggets forward @JeramiGrant on protesting in DC, defends uncle Horace Grant, current player who leads like MJ, concerns playing in bubble, where he’s leaning w/ player option amidst pandemic &amp; more : :
On a conference call this afternoon, the National Basketball Players Association has voted to play the resumption of 2019-20 season, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Portland preferred a 20-team return-to-play format, thus one of the reasons why they voted no to the 22-team format.
Utah Jazz guard Nigel Williams-Goss (@NigelWG5) on the grounds this evening in Salt Lake City. After this term, he has one class left at Gonzaga to earn his master’s degree in Organizational Leadership.
Dr. Valerie Williams-Goss is a white woman married to a black man and mother of Jazz guard Nigel Williams-Goss, who’s been racially profiled by cops. She pens story to @YahooSports: “White people need to step up, show outrage...support the black community”
Please VOTE!!!!!!!!!!!
Minnesota Timberwolves owner Glen Taylor to @YahooSports on tragic death of George Floyd whose neck was knelt on by since fired MPD Derek Chauvin: It’s just a shame’ and We need to do a better job.’
If Portland Trail Blazers are to resume season with no pathway to playoffs, Damian Lillard tells @YahooSports he won’t play in games: “I’m going to be sitting right on that bench.”
Golden State Warriors announce forward Kevon Looney underwent surgery yesterday at Vincera Institute in Philadelphia to repair a core muscle injury. He’s expected to be ready for start of 2020- 21 season.
When a kid, MJ visited Fresno every summer thanks to Rod Higgins’ camp. Could never afford it. I’m at Westside Boys &amp; Girls Club every day. Research Area Missed ONE day. Went home to nap after school. MJ surprised club THAT DAY &amp; took kids to camp. Don’t take naps to this day!
Yahoo Sources: Due to uncertainty of league caused by COVID-19 and NBPA being in good hands with Michele Roberts, union has suspended its search for her successor as executive director.
Yahoo Sources: NBA moving on from Spalding as the official game ball partner to Wilson, starting with the 2021-22 season.
Yahoo Sources: NBA superstars LeBron James, Chris Paul, Damian Lillard, Giannis Antetokounmpo, Russell Westbrook, Kevin Durant, Kawhi Leonard and Stephen Curry held private conference call on Monday and established united front in favor of resuming season.
Sources: Adam Silver made something clear on conference call, telling players Rudy Gobert wasn’t the first NBA player to get tested; he was the first to test positive. NBA was ahead of curve in assuring safety before virus shut country down.
Sources: Adam Silver discusses pathways, potential solutions and addresses concerns in a conference call with players. Full details of the call provided.
Yahoo Sources: Chris Paul expressed concern on behalf of players that some teams could be pressuring players to work out at the facility. Adam Silver reiterated that it’s optional and advised Paul to follow up with the league if it continues.
Yahoo Sources: Adam Silver acknowledged there would be a “series of bad options” to decide on pertaining to teams on bubble of making playoffs. He couldn’t guarantee those teams would have a chance to earn a playoff berth if hiatus extends too far out.
Yahoo Sources: On conference call with players, Adam Silver shared that Las Vegas and Orlando are options that could serve as locations for Western and Eastern conference play if season resumed. Says he’s received calls from many city officials to host season.
Portland Trail Blazers star CJ McCollum tells @YahooSports I am worried’ about the risks of teams opening facilities too soon: “I get the measures the league is taking...Is it really worth it? It’s either safe or it’s not.”
Memphis is where Jalen Green would have committed to had he not gone the G League route.
Yahoo Sources: Fresno phenom @JalenGreen - potential No. 1 pick in 2021 Draft and first high school prospect to sign with G League - agrees to deal with Upper Deck, becoming third player to sign a memorabilia contract directly out of high school (LeBron James, Dwight Howard).
Posted Up Pod: To gain perspective on @JalenGreen game-changing decision, his agent Aaron Goodwin on how they came up with the idea, how G League program will operate, minimum games he will play, affects on NCAA, NBA star he’s compared to &amp; much more. :
Sources: Sam Mitchell, David Fizdale and Brian Shaw are being considered for the Select Team head coaching job. Mitchell was Jalen Green’s AAU coach.
Yahoo Sources: NBA, G League considering using Kobe Bryant’s Mamba Sports Academy as home base to newly formed “Select Team” for elite prep stars.
Hopping on the @NBA IG account today at 3pm ET to go live with Denver Nuggets forward @Paulmillsap4. Tune in and hit us with your questions. #nbatogetherlive
In a conference call with media, NBA commissioner Adam Silver says they are in no position to make a decision on when/ if the league can resume play and it is unclear when they will be able to make such a decision.
Fresno phenom @JalenGreen making his announcement on IG Live.
G League will also provide Jalen Green with a full-ride college scholarship: “I’m still going to be able to go back to college and finish school. So, it’s not really that I’m missing out on college because I can go back and finish whenever I need to.”
Jalen Green, projected No. 1 pick in 2021 NBA Draft out of our hometown of Fresno, on why he’s bypassing college for NBA G League. My full interview with Jalen, parents, his new agent on this groundbreaking move and also the college he would have chosen:
Josh Christopher, the No. 2 ranked high school basketball player in the 2020 class, announced he’s signing with Arizona State.
Chicago Bulls announce John Paxson is moving into a new role as Senior Advisor of Basketball Operations.
Sources: Both players had issues with one another stemming from the developments of the COVID-19 positive results that they ultimately recovered from. There’s more work to be done, but the chat is a good sign they’re working on turning the page.
The phone conversation between Rudy Gobert and Donovan Mitchell occurred Saturday and it went well in the first step toward repairing their relationship, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. Gobert revealed the talks on his IG Live with @TaylorRooks.
Don’t miss this historic program. @YahooSports and @WomensSportsFdn presents #WeKeepPlaying featuring @CondoleezzaRice, @BillieJeanKing, @sabrina_i20, @CariChampion, @CarliLloyd, @Chiney321 and more today at 4pm ET.
NBA agent Eric Goodwin and Chef John Howie partner with SightLife to provide meals to hundreds of Seattle doctors, nurses, and staff at Evergreen Hospital, Overlake Hospital, Harborview Hospital, Seattle Children’s Hospital. To help: #thankshealthheros
Noordin Said - beloved security official who worked for DeMarcus Cousins, Draymond Green, Beyonc, T.I., Migos &amp; recently Rajon Rondo - died Tuesday from COVID-19. His daughter Samantha to @YahooSports on virus taking her father &amp; grandmother within hours.
Don’t miss such an inspiring, important conversation on April 11. Submit a question on Twitter or Facebook by tagging @YahooSports and @WomensSportsFdn #WeKeepPlaying
Main Trauma Center - Harborview Medical Center - Main Hospital, Montlake Campus located on UW Campus Medical Center  Main Hospital, Northwest Campus Over 1,000 staff members will benefit from the donation (Between 500- 600/per day)
NBA guard @isaiahthomas will donate food on Tuesday, April 7 and Tuesday, April 14 from local small business, Pagliacci’s Pizza, to main locations for UW Medical Center that have been greatly impacted by COVID-19.
Something for the ladies...and the fellas. C. Haynes ft. @PhonzyMusic - GAME
Our words in reflecting on the careers of Kobe Bryant, Tim Duncan and Kevin Garnett with @VinceGoodwill and @seeratsohi.
Former Houston Rockets coach Rudy Tomjanovich has been voted in to the @Hoophall Hall of Fame.
Kobe Bryant, Tim Duncan and Kevin Garnett have been voted in to the @Hoophall Hall of Fame 2020 class.
Philadelphia 76ers All-Star Joel Embiid, Managing Partner Josh Harris, and Co-Managing Partner David Blitzer contribute a combined $1.3 million to Penn Medicine for critical support of health care workers fighting COVID-19.
Posted Up w/ C. Haynes Pod: Miami Heat center @MeyersLeonard on dealing with depression/anxiety, his tumultuous Portland tenure, fulfilling calling off the court, finding himself in “Heat Culture,” how the team works out together while quarantined &amp; more.
WNBA will postpone start of training camps and tip of the regular season that was originally scheduled for May 15. A virtual WNBA Draft is still set for April 17 with top prospects participating remotely.
Houston Rockets forward P.J. Tucker creates new apparel capsule to support those impacted by COVID-19 in Houston. All sale proceeds will go to the Houston Food Bank charity.
Yahoo Sources: Portland Trail Blazers star CJ McCollum donating $170,000 to Portland, Canton communities for COVID-19 relief.
Posted Up with C. Haynes Pod: Milwaukee Bucks guard Wesley Matthews on frustration of halted season with top record in NBA, how he’s staying ready, his take on the Giannis Antentokounpo leaving narrative and much more. : :
Yahoo Sources: NBA stars Kevin Durant, Andre Drummond and Donovan Mitchell expected to compete in the 16-player NBA 2K Tournament.
Sources: Clarity, it will be a 16-player NBA 2K tournament lasting 10 days. 4-time All-Star DeMarcus Cousins among the participants.
Yahoo Sources: NBA to launch players-only NBA 2K Tournament scheduled for Friday and will be broadcast on major netowork.
Knicks say owner Jim Dolan has tested positive for coronavirus and is in self-isolation. He’s experiencing little to no symptoms and continues to oversee business operations.
Sources: The name of Big3 reality-show hoops tournament tentatively set for “Big Brother: Big3” and for an added kicker: The referees will be quarantined with the players in the same home.
Yahoo Sources: The Big3 partners with Endemol - producers of hit show Big Brother - to launch well-publicized quarantined reality hoops tournament in early May.
My apologies, y’all. Hope you can forgive me.
Posted Up Pod: Cavs guard @CollinSexton02 on the quarantine, reaction when Rudy Gobert tested positive, playing for 4th NBA coach, how team handled John Beilein’s “Thug” remark, desperately wanting to finish season &amp; more. : :
Quarantined Posted Up Pod: Lakers guard Quinn Cook - who sources say tested negative for coronavirus - on testing process, how he’s staying in shape isolated, NBA players receiving tests versus general public and more. : :
Los Angeles Lakers center JaVale McGee — who has asthma and experienced a bout with pneumonia last season — tested negative for the coronavirus, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sources: The 16-22 @thebig3 players selected would be housed in same mansion with games and the players’ daily lives captured on camera for added drama and storylines.
Yahoo Sources: The Big 3 plans to launch unprecedented 3-week quarantined tournament in April to aid fans enormous basketball appetite caused by coronavirus pandemic.
5 jobs /5 tags - High School Security Guard - Freshman Hoops Coach - Sports Talk Radio Producer - Napa Auto Parts (delivery driver) - Boston Market (carved your meat) @TheSteinLine, @JabariJYoung, @dwightjaynes, @WhitlockJason, @seeratsohi
Yahoo Sources: NBA and Players Association reach agreement to eliminate drug testing during coronavirus hiatus.
Yahoo Sources: Hornets players chose to partner as team, not individually. Amount donated by each player to fund part-time employees won’t be announced. Players wanted to avoid optics of competing, self-promotion. “We’re here as a team to make a difference during this crazy time”
Toronto Raptors release an update, saying all members of teams have tested negative for the coronavirus.
Toronto Raptors say all players tested negative for the coronavirus, but there is one still pending.
Golden State Warriors ownership, players and coaches will contribute $1 million to disaster relief fund for Chase Center employees.
Saturday Night Live has ample amount of material to work with...
The NBA will not fine or suspend Utah Jazz center Rudy Gobert for his actions leading up to testing positive for the coronavirus, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Gobert has sincerely expressed how apologetic he is and he continues to struggle mightily with the ordeal. Like he said in his post, he understands the gravity of this pandemic.
The NBA will not be fine or suspend Utah Jazz center Rudy Gobert for his actions leading up to testing positive for the coronavirus, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
NBA Commissioner Adam Silver in a message to fans says they intend to resume season if and when it becomes safe for all concerned.
In memo to teams, league prohibits group workouts from now to March 16 with a caveat: If multiple players are working out at a facility simultaneously, it’s required that players use parts of facility on individual basis (e.g., a “one player, one coach, one basket rule.”
The ACC has canceled its tournament.
The NBA announces that they have suspended the season.
President Donald Trump says the United States will suspend travel from Europe for at least 30 days beginning on Friday.
Los Angeles Lakers star LeBron James and Toronto Raptors guard Norman Powell have been named Western and Eastern Conference Players of the Week.
BREAKING NEWS: Nearly a year after gruesome leg injury, Portland Trail Blazers center Jusuf Nurkic tells Yahoo Sports he will make his season debut March 15 against the Houston Rockets: “It’s time.”
Yahoo Sources: Detroit has claimed wing Jordan McRae off waivers and guard Troy Daniels has cleared waivers.
My TNT Report: Provided an update on how Brooklyn Nets star Kevin Durant is rapidly progressing with a text message he allowed me to share on his mindset.
My TNT Report: Boston Celtics guard Marcus Smart (@smart_MS3) told me he deserves that Defensive Player of the Year award and then backs it up seconds later.
Zach Randolph will serve as captain of the Trilogy.
Former NBA star Zach Randolph — aka Z-Bo — reaches agreement to play in @thebig3 for Trilogy led by new head coach @DaTrillStak5, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Brooklyn Nets guard Kyrie Irving underwent successful arthroscopic surgery today to relieve a right shoulder impingement and will miss remainder of season.
Knicks issue statement on Spike Lee, calling his claim as a victim “laughable.” You don’t see these type of “statements” often from professional sports teams.
Sources: Inside the report, how Detroit has now turned its attention to Jordan McRae.
Yahoo Sources: MRI on ankle of Detroit Pistons star Derrick Rose came back negative and expected to miss weeks.
Phoenix Suns intend to put in a waiver claim on swingman Jordan McRae, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: The latest on Phoenix Suns forward Kelly Oubre Jr. and his diagnosed meniscus tear.
Sources: Oubre Jr. is in the process of seeking a second opinion with a specialist.
An initial exam reveals Phoenix Suns swigman Kelly Oubre Jr. has suffered a torn meniscus in his right knee, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sixers center Joel Embiid has been fined $25,000 for making an obscene gesture on the playing court and using profane language during a live television interview.
Yahoo Sports Exclusive: How Pelicans rookie @ZionWilliamson surprised teammates with a gift they’re still raving about and the fun they’re having during this playoff push: “I just wanted to do something special for them.”
Yahoo Sources: Former Sacramento Kings guard Mike Bibby has reached agreement to become Aliens’ new head coach of @thebig3. He played for Ghost Ballers last season as the team captain.
Memphis Grizzlies forward Jaren Jackson Jr. will be re-evaluated in two weeks with a knee injury.
Yahoo Sources: Joe Johnson — the reigning MVP — is returning to @thebig3 for the 2020 season to defend the Triplets’ championship.
Yahoo Sources: Free agent guard Lance Stephenson seeking return to NBA following season in China where he averaged 26.7 points, 7.4 rebounds and shot 52 percent from field. He’s willing to work out to prove his value.
Yahoo Sources: DeMarcus Cousins was informed yesterday by the Lakers that he would be waived. He plans to continue rehabbing ACL injury into the offseason.
New York Knicks forward Moe Harkless is a player teams are monitoring as a buyout target, but the plan is for both sides to finish the year out together, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Minnesota Timberwolves center Karl-Anthony Towns (wrist injury) will be re-evaluated in two weeks.
Posted Up with Chris Haynes Pod: A 2-for-1 episode of @AntDavis23 and Damian Lillard. AD reflects on trying to play after the Kobe Bryant tragedy and how they’ll honor him this season. : AD: DL :
Posted Up with C. Haynes Pod: A 2-for-1 episode featuring Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard and Lakers star Anthony Davis. AD on the lethal Hail Mary connection with LeBron James. : AD : DL :
New Posted Up with Chris Haynes Pod: A 2-for-1 featuring Trail Blazers’ @Dame_Lillard, Lakers’ @AntDavis23. All was great on surface, but Lillard wasn’t fulfilled and explains why he gave his life to God. : DL 10-min video clip:
The 2020 @thebig3 schedule is out with Gilbert Arenas expected to return to DC for the first time on July 11.
It’s an honor to be recognized by the @APSE_sportmedia. Also, congrats to my @YahooSports colleagues @PeteThamel and @CharlesRobinson. Special thank you to @JGuitarza.
Posted Up Pod with the @YahooSportsNBA team of @seeratsohi, @VinceGoodwill as we break down the good and bad of All-Star Weekend. Also, behind the scenes stories and events from Chicago.
I’m ready to play right now. @common got me amped!!!
Turner has received permission with a buyout pending.
Minnesota Timberwolves forward Evan Turner will workout for the Los Angeles Clippers today, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Posted Up Pod: Chris Childs on Patrick Ewing complaining to Van Gundy to bench him, stories of Oakley slapping folks, John Starks’ weird dinner requests, his regret after fighting Kobe Bryant, state of Knicks &amp; more. : :
Yahoo Sources: Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard underwent an MRI and it confirmed a groin strain with a 1-2 week recovery period.
New Posted Up Pod: Former Knick Chris Childs on grieving loss of Kobe Bryant &amp; never settling differences following their fight. Addressed state of Knicks, Pat Ewing’s role in his demotion &amp; never before told Knicks tales. : :
Yahoo Sources: Dame D.O.L.L.A. (groin) still intends to perform on Saturday night at United Center during All-Star Weekend.
Phoenix guard Devin Booker will replace Portland star Damian Lillard (groin) in the NBA All-Star Game.
Yahoo Sources: Damian Lillard didn’t hear a pop when he injured his groin, which is a great sign. He’ll spend All-Star Weekend recovering in preparation for a second-half playoff push.
Sources: Lillard will also remove himself from the 3-Point Contest.
Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard suffered a right groin strain (grade 1-2) and is unlikely to participate in Sunday night’s All-Star Game, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Portland star Damian Lillard to avoid fine for postgame remarks following controversial missed goaltend in Utah and team livid with unnatural play by Royce O’Neale that resulted in Afernee Simons receiving a concussion.
Orlando Magic will sign forward Gary Clark — who just completed two 10-day contracts — for the remainder of the season, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
As @CHold reports, sources say Portland players were told by officials that Damian Lillard’s layup attempt “wasn’t even close” to a goal tend. One of the most horrific no-calls you’ll ever see.
With trade deadline in past, Jamal Crawford joins the “Posted Up w/ Chris Haynes Pod” to remind teams he’s on top of his game and ready to do whatever is asked of him. A must listen/see hour conversation with @JCrossover. : :
Memphis Grizzlies do not plan to keep guard Dion Waiters with a buyout or release on the horizon, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
As @TheSteinLine reports, Lakers plan to give JR Smith a tryout in an effort to find perimeter shooting post trade deadline.
Yahoo Sources: Clippers intend to go with an extremely versatile starting lineup of Patrick Beverley, Paul George, Kawhi Leonard, Marcus Morris and Ivica Zubac.
The San Antonio Spurs did not make a deal before the deadline, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
San Antonio Spurs have informed DeMar DeRozan that he will not be moved, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sources: Cleveland also sending Detroit a future second-round pick.
Cleveland’s Brandon Knight and John Henson are being traded to Detroit for Andre Drummond, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
correction: Portland sending $2M to Atlanta. Skal will be absorbed into space.
Yahoo Sources: Atlanta sending $2 million in cash to Portland in exchange for Skal Labissiere.
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Clippers remain in hot pursuit of New York Knicks forward Marcus Morris.
The Clippers are trading Derrick Walton Jr. to the Hawks for a second round pick and $1.3 million in cash, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Houston did its due diligence on Cleveland center Tristan Thompson, but are unable to get to his number to make a trade work. If Thompson makes it past deadline, a buyout is not an option.
Brooklyn Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie drops his Mark II signature shoe on Feb. 8 and in honor of Kobe Bryant and Gigi, 100 percent of net proceeds during first nine days of sales will be donated to the MambaOnThree Fund. Purchase at
Yahoo Sources: Rich Paul has recently been hired by two Knicks: Mitchell Robinson and Allonzo Trier.
Yahoo Sources: With just under five hours left, there’s an increased likelihood Andre Drummond will remain a member of the Detroit Pistons past the trade deadline.
Yahoo Sources. The Los Angeles Lakers have ventured down all avenues — including a last Hail Mary attempt — to seek a path to Andre Iguodala, but it is becoming apparent that Miami has Memphis’ attention right now.
Multiple teams are inquiring about the availability of Los Angeles Lakers guard Alex Caruso, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
New Posted Up Pod: Free agent Jamal Crawford (@JCrossover) wants back in the NBA. My trip to Seattle at his high school where he says he just wants to help a team in any capacity. An hour with the sixth-man specialist. : :
Your 3-Point Contest participants...
Your Slam Dunk Participants...
Toronto Raptors star Pascal Siakam has accepted an invitation to compete in the Skills Challenge during All-Star Weekend, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
New York and Cleveland had been engaged in trade talks with John Henson included as part of a deal, but dialogue has since cooled, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
As we all attempt to return to some form of normalcy following the devastation of last week, it just hit me that my mans @ReggieMillerTNT said the Black Mamba was aiming to be the Caramel Cat.   I believe the story, but glad that name didn’t take off.
Yahoo Sources: Cleveland Cavaliers forward Tristan Thompson has been made available for a trade with the Feb. 6 deadline approaching.
Brooklyn Nets guard Kyrie Irving underwent an MRI on his right knee and it revealed a medial ligament sprain. He will be re-evaluated in one week.
What Damian Lillard is doing is ridiculous!!!
Yahoo Sources: Atlanta Hawks not overly concerned with Trae Young’s latest ankle sprain described as closer to a “tweak.” Barring unforeseen developments overnight, there are no plans for X-rays or MRI. But they will be cautious with their All-Star guard.
It was six years ago, the night Kobe Bryant sat with @Dame_Lillard and instilled the Mamba with a stern message. Inside the pain, emotions, regrets and coping of a tragedy in the visiting locker room of Staples Center.
Matisse Thybulle’s agent Eric Goodwin submits statement to @YahooSports on behalf of client being snubbed from Rising Stars game. Notice reference to “ASSistant coaches.”
Yahoo Sources: Sacramento Kings sharpshooter Buddy Hield accepts invitation to compete in 3-Point Contest.
With Bulls forward Wendell Carter Jr. being injured and unable to play in Rising Stars Challenge, Zion Williamson was selected as an injury replacement by the league, a source tells Yahoo Sports.
The Rising Stars Game roster...
Zion Williamson has been voted in the Rising Stars Game.
Matisse is already one of the top perimeter defenders in the league and the stats back that up. He was clearly punished because he’s not a scorer, which sends a bad message.
Philadelphia 76ers rookie Matisse Thybulle was not voted in by assistant coaches to be a participant in the Rising Stars Game, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Get better feel for why Bradley Beal is so frustrated with this All-Star snub during visit on Posted Up Pod last week. He seriously thought about jumping ship, but ultimately decided to build with team that drafted him and it seems he’s penalized for that.
Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard will compete in the 3-Point Contest next month in Chicago, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Full roster in story.
Yahoo Sources: Chris Paul and a slew of first-times in Jayson Tatum, Brandon Ingram, Donovan Mitchell and Rudy Gobert selected as 2020 All-Star reserves.
A special Kobe Bryant Posted Up Pod with the @YahooSportsNBA crew of @VinceGoodwill, @seeratsohi. We discuss his legacy, complexities, his past &amp; what he was building. FULL DISCLOSURE: With varying perspectives, we go deep beyond hoops to narrate his life.
Golden State Warriors guard Alec Burks has worn jersey No. 8, but will switch to No. 20 to honor the tragic death of Kobe Bryant who wore No. 8 and No. 24, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
My report on the scenery around Staples Center and Ara Zobayan — the pilot tragically killed in the helicopter crash with Kobe Bryant — was also Kawhi Leonard’s pilot, sources told Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: The NBA provided grieving counselors for the Los Angeles Lakers on Monday to aide in dealing with the tragic loss of Kobe Bryant. After speaking with players and members of staff, it was determined the best course of action was postponing Tuesday’s game.
The game between the Los Angeles Lakers and Los Angeles Clipppers has been postponed due to the tragic death of Kobe Bryant. It will be rescheduled at a later date.
This is truly beyond devastating. Praying for Vanessa and the family. Such a massive loss we’re all suffering through.
Can confirm legend Kobe Bryant has been tragically killed in an helicopter accident, sources told Yahoo Sports.
Posted Up Pod: Wiz star Bradley Beal on consulting with Damian Lillard before signing his extension, being with Paul George in Las Vegas when he was traded a year into deal and why his comments last week scared some fans. : :
Posted Up with Chris Haynes Pod: @WashWizards star Bradley Beal on frustration with fans voting for All-Star starters. : :
2020 Western Conference NBA All-Star starters: LeBron James, Anthony Davis, Kawhi Leonard, Luka Doncic and James Harden.
Posted Up Pod: Wiz star @RealDealBeal23 on how he mulled bolting or staying, why too much placed on rings, explains “culture change” remark, frustration with fan votes, settling differences with John Wall early on &amp; more. : :
A mini @YahooSports video essay on Philadelphia 76ers defensive rookie hound @MatisseThybulle, the true definition of a Rising Star.
Excited to announce I’ll be roaming the sidelines for @NBAonTNT’s Tuesday night games as the sideline reporter. Can’t wait to work with such talented individuals. First game: @Lakers, @LAClippers Jan. 28.
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Lakers, Philadelphia 76ers among teams that have expressed interest in trading for Detroit Pistons star Derrick Rose.
Brooklyn Nets guard Kyrie Irving will not play in today’s game against the Philadelphia 76ers.
Chandler Parsons’ attorney on the condition of his client, says he’s seriously’ injured “and potentially ending Mr. Parsons’ career as a professional athlete.”
Chandler Parsons hires Morgan &amp; Morgan after being struck by individual who’s charged with DUI, according to attorney. Parsons suffered “multiple severe and permanent injuries including a traumatic brain injury, disc herniation and torn labrum.” His return to play is unclear.
There are no plans for Kent Bazemore to pursue a buyout with the Sacramento Kings as he has a great relationship with Luke Walton and front office, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Sacramento is sending Trevor Ariza, Wendell Gabriel and Caleb Swanigan to Portland for Kent Bazemore, Anthony Tolliver and the Trail Blazers’ 2024 and 2025 second-round picks.
New York Knicks rookie RJ Barrett sprained his right ankle and X-rays were negative. He will be re-evaluated in one week.
Yahoo Sources: Memphis Grizzlies rookie Ja Morant has made his decision on whether he’ll compete in the Slam Dunk Contest.
Yahoo Sources: Atlanta and Detroit end trade talks centered on All-Star big man Andre Drummond.
Parsons will now enter the NBA’s concussion protocol.
Atlanta Hawks forward Chandler Parsons was involved in an automobile accident this afternoon following practice and has been diagnosed with a concussion and whiplash.
Marquese Chriss has signed his contract, officially rejoining the Golden State Warriors on a two-way deal, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Orlando Magic guard Josh Magette, who is on a two-way deal with his 45 days almost exhausted, will have his contract converted to a 10-day contract, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Posted Up Pod: This is my personal story on how @Warriors coach @SteveKerr secretly came through for a Fresno family grieving the murder of their brother. Full @YahooSports interview available. ITUNES: YOUTUBE:
Yahoo Sources: Dwyane Wade to accept a significant role with @CAA_Basketball agency with emphasis on a corporate consultant position around multicultural brands.
The NBA has fined Jimmy Butler $35,000 and TJ Warren $25,000 for their roles during the altercation.
New Orleans Pelicans rookie Zion Williamson has been ruled out of making his season debut Friday against the New York Knicks.
New Posted Up Pod: Warriors coach @SteveKerr on state of team, when Steph-Klay might return, vibe from KD last year, father’s assassination, untold heartfelt gesture by the Kerr family &amp; why he’ll never shut up &amp; coach. : :
The NBA has fined Bobby Portis $25,000.
My next guest on the @YahooSports Posted Up with Chris Haynes Podcast... Drops today!
Golden State Warriors coach Steve Kerr has been fined $25,000 for verbally abusing an official.
This is an incredible gesture by @TheTraeYoung
Anthony Davis was escorted out of the arena laying on the bed of a motor carrier. “I’m fine,” he told Yahoo Sports while acknowledging he’ll miss some time.
Atlanta Hawks forward Jabari Parker underwent a non-surgical procedure on his right shoulder and will be re-examined in two weeks.
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Lakers offered Anthony Davis a max contract extension this morning, but they were informed he would be bypassing in favor of entering free-agency.
Detroit Pistons announced that forward Blake Griffin underwent a successful arthroscopic debridement of his left knee and says there is no timetable set for his return.
Yahoo Sources: Already forever linked, Mavericks star Luka Doni and Hawks star Trae Young have been invited to participate in the 3-Point Contest.
Golden State Warriors will waive center Marquese Chriss, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Memphis Grizzlies standout rookie Ja Morant mulling league’s invitation to compete in the Slam Dunk Contest.
Yahoo Sources: Detroit Pistons star Blake Griffin to visit specialist in Los Angeles, considering season-ending knee surgery.
Los Angeles Clippers star Kawhi Leonard will be held out of today’s game against the New York Knicks due to knee maintenance, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
One aspect to keep in mind pertaining to the Andre Drummond trade chatter is that he’s really good friends with Trae Young.
Posted Up Pod: @Nuggets guard Will Barton (@WillTheThrillB5) who relishes being “The People’s Champ,” has raw emotions describing what it was like to be booed by home fans last year. Full hour-long conversation available. : :
Sacramento Kings forward Dewayne Dedmon has been fined $50,000 for his public trade request.
In the first All-Star ballot returns, Los Angeles Lakers reserve Alex Caruso cracked the top 10 guards.
Posted Up Pod: Know @Nuggets Will Barton (@WillTheThrillB5) like never before. How @kobebryant nearly crushed &amp; saved his career, pain of booed by own fans, why Joki’s underrated, why DEN’s legit &amp; tons of personal tales. : :
David Stern has passed away, the league announced.
Happy New Year, from out here on the West. Kick 2020’s ass!!!
Houston Rockets star James Harden (toe) and center Clint Capela (heel) plan to play tonight against Denver Nuggets, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: The representation for Marquese Chriss is in communication with league and NBPA on clarification as to why client received such a hefty fine from the Luka Doni altercation that didn’t even draw a flagrant foul during the game. Goal is to get fine reduced.
Golden State Warriors forward Marquese Chriss has been fined $35,000 for shoving Dallas Mavericks guard Luka Doni to the floor.
Yahoo Sources: NBA to launch probe into Sacramento Kings forward Dewayne Dedmon to determine if he’ll be fined for publicly stating “I would like to be traded.”
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Lakers star LeBron James (groin) will play tonight against the Portland Trail Blazers.
Veteran forward Jeff Green has cleared waivers and is now an unrestricted free agent, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Jumping on @undisputed to talk Lakers and Clippers. Wonder what take @RealSkipBayless and @ShannonSharpe will have...
Yahoo Sports Exclusive: Lakers star Anthony Davis ecstatic to be in Christmas Day marquee, details it was a year ago when he seriously started contemplating a relocation: “It was time for me to at least let the organization know where my head was at.”
Anthony Davis making it a point repeatedly to say “We gave that game away.”
Clippers forward Montrezl Harrell on the Christmas Day matchup with the Lakers and the buzz around the city. : :
Head coach Mike Malone and Denver Nuggets agreed to a two-year extension, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. His deal was set to expire after the 2020-21 season.
The Denver Nuggets and coach Mike Malone have agreed to an extension.
The full timeline on Sixers rookie Matisse Thybulle is 2-4 weeks with a right knee sprain, but there is optimism he could be cleared at the two-week re-evaluation date, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Posted Up Pod: Hour-long conversation w/ @LAClippers star @MONSTATREZZ who shared secrets to his evolution, reminisced on painful start to career, the nickname Kawhi Leonard gave him &amp; plenty more in a chat filled w/ gems. : :
Posted Up Pod: @LAClippers star (@MONSTATREZZ) reveals heartaches endured to become dominant, Rockets moving him, impact of ailing grandma, Kawhi jabbing him, free-agency, balling up scouting reports, Lakers rivalry &amp; more : :
Atlanta Hawks, tied for worst record in league at 6-24, gets John Collins back tonight in Cleveland after serving a 25-game suspension.
Brooklyn Nets swigman David Nwaba will undergo surgery tomorrow after suffering a torn right Achilles this evening, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
In midst of Hawks’ turmoil, coach Lloyd Pierce will spend his afternoon serving dinner to homeless families at Solomon’s Temple Shelter in Atlanta.
Yahoo Sources: Atlanta Hawks coach Lloyd Pierce not currently on hot seat amidst coach-player discord and turmoil in locker room, but it all could change next week.
Steve Mills and David Blatt are great friends dating back to their days playing for Princeton University.
The New York Knicks have announced former Cavs coach David Blatt as a basketball consultant.
Miami Heat suspend guard Dion Waiters again for “failure to adhere to team policies, violation of team rules and continued insubordination.”
Orlando Magic guard Markelle Fultz will not play tonight against the Los Angeles Lakers because of a stomach virus.
Posted Up Pod: Portland star @CJMcCollum goes in depth on what it’s like being criticized for interracial dating and explains what Clippers’ Patrick Patterson went through recently with his engagement announcement. : :
Season 2 of Posted Up is here. My guest is @trailblazers star @CJMcCollum, who went deep on journey to stardom, valuing time, recruiting Melo, being in constant trade rumors &amp; dealing with criticism for interracial dating. : :
Memphis Grizzlies rookie @JaMorant to Yahoo sports on how a collision with a cameraman affects his attacking mentality: “It’s tough because I know I just have to do more controlled jumps now.”
Houston Rockets’ protest has been denied by the NBA.
Memphis Grizzlies rookie Ja Morant (back soreness) will make his return tonight against the Golden State Warriors.
Former lottery pick Josh Jackson will not play for the Memphis Hustle today due to missing a team meeting, a league source tells Yahoo Sports.
Los Angeles Clippers will hold Kawhi Leonard out of tonight’s game against the Indiana Pacers with knee maintenance.
Portland Trail Blazers say forward Rodney Hood has suffered a torn Achilles.
Oklahoma City Thunder has suspended guard Deonte Burton one game for conduct detrimental to the team.
Why Carmelo Anthony won Player of the Week over James Harden and Luka Doncic and his response to Yahoo Sports of the criticism he received: I’ve come too far to start listening to that bull----':
Washington Wizards say wing C.J. miles successfully underwent surgery to repair ligament damage in his left wrist and there is no timeline for his return.
Washington Wizards center Thomas Bryant has been diagnosed with a stress reaction in his right foot and will be out for at least three weeks.
Milwaukee Bucks forward Giannis Antetokounmpo and Portland Trail Blazers forward Carmelo Anthony have been named NBA Eastern and Western Conference Players of the Week.
Memphis Grizzlies rookie Ja Morant is being listed as sidelined for a week-to-week basis with back spasms.
The New York Knicks say it is not true that the franchise offered Richard Jefferson a contract in either the summer of 2018 or 2019.
Brooklyn Nets guard Spencer Dinwiddie and Dallas Mavericks guard Luka Doni have been named Conference Players of the Week.
Los Angeles Lakers guard Rajon Rondo was fined $35,000 for failing to leave court in timley fashion, verbal abuse of an official and for making contact with an Oklahoma City Thunder player.
Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard — who sat out last two games with back spasms — will return to action tonight against the Cleveland Cavaliers, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sports Report: Brother of Russell Westbrook escorted out of Staples Center for verbal confrontation with Montrezl Harrell and for “rushing the court.”
Boston Celtics star Kemba Walker has been released from the hospital and he will be re-evaluated tomorrow.
Boston star Kemba Walker has been diagnosed with concussion-like symptoms and is being transported to the hospital for further evaluation.
Scary scene in Denver as Boston star Kemba Walker being carried out on a stretcher with an apparent neck injury after running head first into a teammate.
A league spokesman to Yahoo Sports on Los Angeles Lakers center DeMarcus Cousins who had a third-degree harassment charged dropped today: “We are reviewing the outcome of today’s proceedings.”
Yahoo Sports Exclusive: Carmelo Anthony defends Jared Dudley for criticism he received for having an NBA roster spot before him: “You can’t blame him for what I went through.”
Portland Trail Blazers new forward Carmelo Anthony will be activated for tonight’s game against the New Orleans Pelicans, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Golden State Warriors guard D’Angelo Russell will be sidelined for at least two weeks with a sprained right thumb.
Brooklyn Nets are ruling Kyrie Irving out for tonight's game against the Chicago Bulls.
Los Angeles Lakers guard Avery Bradley suffered a hairline fracture in a non-weight bearing bone and will be re-evaluated in 1 to 2 weeks.
Trail Blazers set to embark on a six-game road trip starting with San Antonio on Saturday and followed by Houston, New Orleans, Milwaukee, Cleveland, Chicago.
Damian Lillard was notified on the potential of adding Carmelo Anthony last night and he made it clear that he’s always been supportive of bringing in the future Hall-of-Famer, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. Portland searching for a boost to what has been a slow start.
New Orleans Pelicans forward Brandon Ingram will be held out of tonight's game against the Los Angeles Clippers with knee soreness and it’s a game Paul George makes his season debut.
Yahoo Sportsbook, powered by @BetMGM, launches today and New Jersey users can deposit $10 and get $100 in free bets. A @Yahoosports game-changer. 
Los Angeles Lakers star Anthony Davis (shoulder and rib soreness) will not play tonight against the Golden State Warriors, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Golden State Warriors guard Damion Lee suffered a non-displaced fracture in his right hand and will be sidelined for at least two weeks.
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Clippers star Paul George plans to make his season debut on Thursday against the New Orleans Pelicans.
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Clippers star plans to make his season debut on Thursday against the New Orleans Pelicans.
Los Angeles Clippers guard Landry Shamet will undergo an MRI on his sprained left ankle in the morning, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
A candid Yahoo Sports conversation with LeBron James on AAU culture contributing to banged up NBA players, load management and how he monitor son’s involvement: “AAU coaches don’t give a fuck.”
Los Angeles Clippers star Paul George is ruled out for Monday’s game against the Toronto Raptors.
Sources: Rondo was aiming for a return on Sunday, but he will instead partake in a workout session with a few bodies to ramp up his endurance.
Lakers guard Rajon Rondo participated in a workout today on an off day in preparation for his return, but he is not expected to make his debut on Sunday against the Raptors, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Lakers guard Rajon Rondo aims to make his season debut Sunday against the Toronto Raptors.
Clippers star Paul George (@Yg_Trece) will be on campus the same weekend of @JalenRomande’s visit as Fresno State will retire his jersey.
Reporting w/ @KP_Rivals: High School star Jalen Green (@JalenRomande) - a top 3 projected 2021 NBA Draft pick - is pushing back his commitment date until end of season and Fresno State to receive his final official visit this weekend.
NBA: “The NBA has fined the Clippers $50,000 for statements, including by head coach Doc Rivers, that were inconsistent with Leonard's health status.”
NBA: “The team has reasonably determined that Leonard is suffering from an ongoing injury to the patella tendon in his left knee and has been placed by the team at this time on an injury protocol for back-to-back games.”
Philadelphia 76ers star Ben Simmons is likely to miss the next three games with a Grade 1 AC joint sprain in his right shoulder, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Detroit Pistons forward Blake Griffin has been cleared for participation in all basketball related activities and a return to action will be monitored on a day-to-day basis, the team says.
Yahoo Sports exclusive inside the daunting task of convincing Giannis Antetokounmpo to accept some form of load management: “I was used to Jason Kidd. He was breaking us down, but I was happy about it.”
Philadelphia 76ers star Ben Simmons underwent an X-ray on his right shoulder, which came back negative and he will be further evaluated today, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Denver Nuggets swingman Will Barton to make his return to lineup tonight against the Miami Heat after being sidelined past three games with a toe injury, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Atlanta Hawks star Trae Young will return to lineup tonight against San Antonio Spurs after missing the last two games with an ankle injury, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Atlanta Hawks forward John Collins has been suspended 25 games for violating NBA's Anti-Drug policy.
Cleveland Cavaliers guard Kevin Porter Jr. has been suspended one game without pay for improperly making contact with a game official.
Bucks forward Giannis Antetokounmpo and Los Lakers forward Anthony Davis have been named the Eastern and Western Conference Players of the Week.
Jimmy Butler getting last laugh on those who criticized his decision to join Miami and reveals to Yahoo Sports that issues behind scenes led to Philadelphia departure: “Mother------s act like I’m not a good basketball player.”
Utah Jazz center Ed Davis suffered a fractured left fibula and will be re-evaluated in a month, the team says.
Yahoo Sources: Had this been the playoffs, Trae Young would be able to play tomorrow as there wasn’t major swelling. This is a huge relief for the franchise.
Atlanta Hawks guard Trae Young will not need an MRI on his sprained right ankle and will be listed as day-to-day, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
New Column: Clippers introduced Warriors to new reality at Chase Center and fans introduced to defective product: “Who in the hell are these players?”:
Sacramento Kings forward Marvin Bagley III will be out 4 to 6 weeks with a non-displaced fracture in his right thumb.
Charlotte Hornets forward Nicolas Batum fractured the middle finger on his left hand last night against Chicago and is expected to be sidelined 3 to 4 weeks, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Kawhi Leonard’s poise, LeBron James’ fitness level, Paul George’s timeline, Patrick Beverley’s challenge to media and fan warfare. Inside opening night at Staples Center.
Yahoo Sources: On Jaylen Brown’s four-year extension, he can secure $8M in incentives if he wins MVP, DPOY or makes one of three All-NBA Teams. He pockets $4M if plays 65 or more games, team wins 49 or more games and reaches second round of playoffs. Total guaranteed salary $103M
New Orleans Pelicans say Zion Williamson underwent surgery to repair a torn right meniscus and is scheduled to be sidelined 6-to-8 weeks.
Yahoo Sources: Jaylen Brown’s four-year extension with Boston does not contain a team option or player option.
Sources: No team or player option attached. Four years guranteed.
Hield gets $1 million more than what Harrison Barnes agreed to in the summer. The Kings have a nice young nucleus and are positioned to lock up their core in coming years.
Shooting guard Buddy Hield and Sacramento Kings reach agreement on an extension worth four years, $86 million, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. He has $20 million in incentives. @sam_amick first.
Detroit Pistons forward Joe Johnson was experiencing swelling on his Achilles, but tests came back clean and he’s now responding well to treatment, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Detroit Pistons intend to award forward Christian Wood with a regular season roster spot for his strong preseason play but the organization has some roster maneuvering to do, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
New Orleans rookie Zion Williamson will undergo further evaluations on right knee today and possibly tomorrow, but the organization is relieved the forward has avoided any major longterm issues, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
After Lakers embarrass Warriors and end of dynasty chatter ramps up, Stephen Curry to Yahoo Sports on how he’ll deliver for his team: “A championship is still the goal...If I wasn’t confident in myself, the critics would really bother me.”
Yahoo Sources: What Pascal Siakam, Buddy Hield, Jaylen Brown are being offered and what they’re asking for as the rookie-scale extension deadline looms.
Yahoo Sources: What Paskal Siakam, Buddy Hield, Jaylen Brown are being offered and what they’re asking for as the rookie-skale extension deadline looms.
Yahoo Sources: Portland Trail Blazers center Jusuf Nurkic is switching agents and will sign with Rich Paul of Klutch Sports Group.
Los Angeles Lakers stars LeBron James and Anthony Davis are expected to sit out tonight’s game against the Golden State Warriors, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
New Orleans Pelicans say Jrue Holiday has a left quadriceps contusion and will be held out of tonight's preseason game against the Utah Jazz.
.@ATLHawks star @TheTraeYoung to Yahoo Sports on opportunity to be an All-Star this year, why playoffs are possible, how it fuels him to remember and save tweets of critics and the Hall of Famer he worked out with to prepare for potential breakout season:
Damn!!!!
Clippers star Kawhi Leonard to Yahoo Sports on the opportunity he has to make history in his hometown:
Memphis Grizzlies say rookie Ja Morant has fully recovered from undergoing a procedure on his right knee and will fully participate in training camp.
Rapper @Jeezy is launching a sports agency called “Sports 99” and will begin representing NBA and NFL players, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Undrafted free agent forward Simi Shittu — a McDonald's All American — has agreed to a camp deal with the Chicago Bulls, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Free agent forward Marquese Chriss — 8th pick in 2016 NBA Draft — has reached an agreement on a one-year deal with the Golden State Warriors, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Philadelphia 76ers rookie Matisse Thybulle tweaked his left ankle, but it’s not severe and he’s currently cleared to participate in all workouts tomorrow, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Hosting “King Quinn Royal Run” in Fresno on Sept. 22 in honor of my brother - Robert Reynolds - who was murdered 3 years ago. After run, conducting NBA debate panel for registered participants for a chance to win an NBA 2K package. Link to register/donate:
Hall of Famer @TheSteinLine from China on the struggles Team USA faced in the World Cup.
Houston Rockets owner @TilmanJFertitta tells Yahoo Sports to expect better chemistry with Harden and Westbrook, why Chris Paul was moved, his new book &amp; heightened urgency to win now: This our window to win championship...or we won't win in next 10 years’
Detroit Pistons are waiving forward Michael Beasley, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Detroit Pistons and @thebig3 star Joe Johnson has reached an agreement on a deal, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
A @YahooSports exclusive: Lakers star Anthony Davis (@AntDavis23) reveals personal goal of winning DPOY, how he plans to challenge all teammates, what LeBron James did privately to ensure he’s the focal point and why it’s his time.
This is Tuesday in the NBA
One of the best in our biz. Learned so much from @TheSteinLine. Well deserved honor.
Proud of my bro, @JabariJYoung. Keep moving the culture upwards.
Devon Hall - a guard selected by OKlahoma City with the 53rd pick in 2018 Draft- has reached an agreement on a two-way contract with the franchise, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
“Money Ball” from the hit Dame DOLLA album titled “Big D.O.L.L.A.” will be featured in NBA2K 20.
Yahoo Sources: Portland star @Dame_Lillard extends partnership with @2K Sports, @NBA2K by reaching multi year agreement that includes in-game activations, advertising, promotions, soundtrack contributions and community engagements.
New Orleans forward Darius Miller underwent surgery to repair a ruptured right Achilles’ tendon and a timeline on his recovery will be provided at a later date, the team says.
Los Angles Lakers will waive forward Aric Holman — who’s on an Exhbit 10 contract — to make room for Dwight Howard, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sacramento Kings guard De’Aaron Fox will withdraw from Team USA to focus on upcoming season with goal of making playoffs, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Incredible courtside experience watching entertaining @thebig3 action in Miami. @icecube has something special going. Thank you!
The first-round pick was the Naismith Defensive Player of the Year winner as well as AP PAC 12 Player of the Year. Thybulle joins Zion Williamson, Ja Morant, and Darius Garland as Nike rookie signees.
Philadelphia 76ers rookie Matisse Thybulle has reached an agreement on a multi-year shoe endorsement deal with Nike, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Spending day in LA with KD: First interview in two months, Kevin Durant on choosing Brooklyn, how things ended in Golden State, who’s to blame for his injury, rehab update and untold stories.
Golden State star Draymond Green has a 15 percent trade kicker included with his new four-year, $100 million extension, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Only point guards on USA National squad are Kemba Walker and Kyle Lowry, who is recovering from thumb surgery. Fox vying for World Cup roster spot.
Sacramento Kings young star De’Aaron Fox has been promoted to the National USA Basketball roster with a good chance to make the team, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Damian Lillard and Russell Westbrook to meet for the first time since their postseason showdown on a tentatively scheduled date of Nov. 17 in Houston, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Los Angeles Clippers star Paul George is tentatively scheduled to make his return to Oklahoma City on March 3, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Free agent guard Lance Stephenson has reached a one-year, $4 million agreement with Liaoning of the Chinese Basketball Association, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Ball Hogs are waiving guard Marcus Williams (22nd pick in 2006 NBA Draft) and acquiring guard Mustapha Farrakhan, @TheBig3 sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Trilogy are waiving center Patrick O’Bryant (9th pick in 2006 NBA Draft) and acquiring forward Samardo Samuels, @TheBig3 sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Joining @RealSkipBayless, @ShannonSharpe on @FS1 now. Then catch me on @TheHerd followed by @WhitlockJason, @marcelluswiley on @SFY. Kawhi Leonard, NBA chatter galore.
New Story: A @YahooSports sitdown interview with @LAClippers two superstars, Paul George welcomes legacy building and Kawhi Leonard fires back on how he handled free agency: “If Lakers and Raptors didn’t want to wait for me, they didn’t have to.”
Yahoo Sports Exclusive: One-on-one with @LAClippers star Kawhi Leonard on Magic Johnson divulging their chat, how he felt about his plane being tracked in Toronto, on narrative he played the Lakers, Raptors and more.
The newest @LAClippers coming up for @YahooSports, @YahooSportsNBA...
USA Basketball making case that NBA players often produce career years following offseason playing for national team. But this summer of World Cup, players prioritizing staying home to get better acclimated with teammates in an upcoming season without a clear-cut title favorite.
Utah Jazz emerging star Donovan Mitchell is keeping his commitment to USA Basketball this summer, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Portland star Damian Lillard will withdraw from USA Basketball training camp and FIBA World Cup play this summer, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Washington Wizards star Bradley Beal is withdrawing from USA Basketball training camp and FIBA World Cup due to birth of his child in late August/early September, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Portland star guard CJ McCollum has withdrawn from USA Basketball training camp and FIBA World Cup to concentrate on upcoming season, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sources: A two-year, $6 million deal that will include an NBA option should he decide to return to the league. Koufos, a career average of 5.7 points, 5.0 rebounds and 0.7 blocks, will join a club freshly removed from winning its eighth EuroLeague championship
NBA veteran center Kosta Koufos has reached an agreement with EuroLeague Russian powerhouse CSKA Moscow that will make him the highest paid American in Europe next season, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Free agent seven-footer Amida Brimah has reached an agreement on a one-year deal with the Indiana Pacers, his agent Daniel Hazan of @hazansportsmgmt tells Yahoo Sports.
Sources: The playmaking guard who recently had a strong showing with the Spurs’ Summer League squad will sign a two-way contract with the Magic.
Orlando Magic and guard Josh Magette have reached an agreement on a deal, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
As a member of @NABJSports, I’m also proud to support the candidacy of @nabjprez2011 for @NABJ President. A former president who is a dedicated servant always fighting to make sure we are represented across all branches of journalism. #dontcallitacomeback
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Lakers star Anthony Davis will remove himself from USA Basketball training camp and FIBA World Cup to focus on championship quest.
Free agent big man Kosta Koufos has received preliminary interest from Detroit, Sacramento, Toronto and Milwaukee, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. The veteran, noted for his defense and rim protection, could be a later signing.
Yahoo Sources: LeBron James’ plan to gift Anthony Davis his No. 23 jersey will be postponed for a season.
NBA champion Jason Terry is exploring coaching opportunities at the collegiate and professional ranks. He is being represented by attorney/agent @ChrisPatrickJr of The Sports Law Group.
Under these terms, KD has ability to hit free-agency in 2022 at 33, the same year as LeBron James if he doesn’t pick up his option.
Brooklyn Nets’ four-year, $164 million pact with Kevin Durant is actually a 31 that contains a player option, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Boston Celtics forward Guerschon Yabusele - the team’s No. 16 pick in the 2016 NBA Draft - will be waived, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: San Antonio reaching out to other free agent wings with Marcus Morris contemplating backing out of agreement to accept New York’s offer.
Yahoo Sources: New York Knicks have a one-year, roughly $15 million offer on the table for Marcus Morris who is considering reneging on his two-year, $20 million agreement with San Antonio.
LA Lakers, Golden State, NY Knicks, OKC, Milwaukee, Detroit, Washington, Sacramento, Denver, Portland, Orlando, Atlanta, Minnesota, LA Clippers were all in attendance with over 15 European and Asian clubs.
There are approximately 12 teams attending this evening’s workout in Las Vegas featuring Amar’e Stoudemire and Monta Ellis. Among those are LA Lakers, Golden State, NY Knicks, Oklahoma City, Milwaukee, Detroit and Washington.
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Lakers intend to move LeBron James to the starting point guard position.
Free agent Jabari Parker reached and agreement with the Atlanta Hawks on a two-year, $13 million deal, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. Player option on second year.
Free agent guard Quinn Cook has reached an agreement with the Los Angeles Lakers on a two-year, $6 million deal, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Kawhi Leonard and his camp found it comical throughout the process that he was “reportedly” headed to every team but the Clippers. In the end, his small circle kept everyone guessing. And that’s what occurred: guessing.
Yahoo Sources: In a shock to many, Kawhi Leonard to join the Los Angeles Clippers.
Free agent forward Kawhi Leonard will sign with the Los Angeles Clippers, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Another earthquake...
Source: McGruder agrees to a three-year, $15 million deal.
Free agent guard Rodney McGruder has reached an agreement with the Los Angeles Clippers, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Source: One-year deal for the vet and an excellent complimentary piece to Kevin Durant and Kyrie Irving.
Free agent forward Wilson Chandler has reached an agreement with the Brooklyn Nets, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Free agent center Willie Cauley-Stein has reached an agreement with the Golden State Warriors, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. @ThompsonScribe first.
Free agent Jordan Bell has agreed to a guaranteed deal with the Minnesota Timberwolves, agents Aaron Mintz and Michael Tellem of CAA told Yahoo Sports.
One year deal at approximately $2 million.
Free agent guard Tim Frazier has agreed to a deal with the Detroit Pistons, his agent Mark Bartelstein of @PrioritySports tells Yahoo Sports.
Golden State co-chairman Joe Lacob thanks Kevin Durant for his time and says “no player will ever wear #35.”
Neil Olshey, Trail Blazers president of basketball operations, with some incredible moves this offseason. Adding Hassan Whiteside to the mix without giving up a core piece is masterful. Portland is a real championship contending force.
Free agent guard Cory Joseph has agreed to a three-year, $37 million deal with the Sacramento Kings, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Andre Iguodala was informed by Warriors early last week that he could be traded to unload salary in event Kevin Durant moved on, league sources told Yahoo Sports. Today’s trade to Memphis wasn’t a shock.
Sources: Lopez agrees to a two-year deal at the full room exception with the second year being a player option.
Brook and Robin Lopez on the same team for the first time since their days at Stanford.
Free agent center Robin Lopez has reached an agreement with the Milwaukee Bucks, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Free agent center JaVale McGee plans to meet with the Detroit Pistons on Monday, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Kawhi Leonard will not meet with teams on first day of free agency; will take his time through process.
Kawhi Leonard will not take any meetings with teams today, as he'll ramp up the process over next couple days, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
The three-year, $63 million deal Julius Randle agreed to with the New York Knicks contains a team option on the final year, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Golden State is currently meeting with Kevon Looney in Los Angeles in an attempt to re-sign the versatile big man, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
There's a possibility Kevin Durant will engage in a sign-and-trade swap with Golden State and Brooklyn, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Washington Wizards and Thomas Bryant reach agreement on a 3-year, $25 million deal, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. All three years fully guaranteed.
Yahoo Sources: Portland and Damian Lillard have reached an agreement on a four-year, $194 million supermax extension.
Free agent forward Thaddeus Young has reached an agreement with the Chicago Bulls on a three-year, $41 million deal, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Kevin Durant intends to sign with Brooklyn, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard and Neil Olshey - president of basketball operations - meeting in Oakland today to finalize a super max extension that includes a player option.
I anticipate news developments on Kevin Durant to surface on his company’s sports business “The Boardroom” IG account at some point during free agency.
The shot-blocking, lob finishing big man coming off career year averaging 12.0 points and 7.5 rebounds in 22.3 minutes with the Los Angeles Lakers.
Free agent center JaVale McGee will meet with the Houston Rockets on Sunday, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
The Milwaukee Bucks extended a qualifying offer to Malcolm Brogdon, officially making him a restricted free agent, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Boston Celtics to renounce the rights of Terry Rozier to set him free for the arrival of Kemba Walker.
Boston will renounce the rights to guard Terry Rozier - to open up a max slot for Kemba Walker - and he’ll become an unrestricted free agent, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Minnesota Timberwolves to meet with Brooklyn Nets restricted free agent D’Angelo Russell with a contingent expected to include franchise player Karl-Anthony Towns.
Minnesota Timberwolves to meet with Brooklyn Nets restricted free agent guard D’Angelo Russell at the start of free-agency, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Brooklyn Nets standout center Jarrett Allen has been invited to join Team USA's Select Team at camp in Las Vegas this summer, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Golden State extending a qualifying offer to Quinn Cook and the guard will become a restricted free agent, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Los Angeles Clippers did not extend a qualifying offer to Johnathan Motley and now the forward is an unrestricted free agent, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sacramento Kings young star guard De’Aaron Fox has been invited to join Team USA's Select Team at training camp in Las Vegas this summer, league sources tells Yahoo Sports
Yahoo Sources: Kawhi Leonard intends to meet with the Los Angeles Lakers and Los Angeles Clippers when free agency commences.
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Lakers star LeBron James gifting new teammate Anthony Davis his No. 23 jersey for the upcoming season.
Knicks forced to renounce to open up cap room. There’s mutual interest in Mudiay returning, but for now, a quality point guard hits the market coming off a career-high 14.8 points per game.
New York Knicks will also not extend a qualifying offer to Luke Kornet and he will hit unrestricted free agency, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
New York Knicks will not extend a qualifying offer to Emmanuel Mudiay, making him an unrestricted free agent, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Free agent center Enes Kanter is expected to receive interest from the Portland Trail Blazers, Los Angeles Lakers and Boston Celtics on June 30, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Toronto Raptors announce Marc Gasol has exercised his $25.6 million player option for the 2019-20 season.
Orlando Magic will pick up the $1.6 million 2019-20 team option on forward Wesley Iwundu, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Toronto Raptors star Kawhi Leonard declining $21.3 million player option to become unrestricted free agent with the Finals MVP seriously considering re-signing.
Yahoo Sources: Washington Wizards will decline $20 million team option on Jabari Parker, but there’s mutual interest in re-signing.
Pargo is a well regarded coaching prospect and still fit enough to participate in the Big 3 this summer. Portland fills a void with the departure of David Vanterpool, who received a promotion in Minnesota.
Portland Trail Blazers coach Terry Stotts is expected to add former NBA player Jannero Pargo to his coaching staff, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Mississippi State forward Aric Holman has agreed to a deal with the Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Undrafted guard Aubrey Dawkins out of UCF has agreed to terms on an Exhibit 10 deal with New Orleans, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Undrafted forward Dedric Lawson out of Kansas has committed to playing Summer League with the Golden State Warriors, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. He was the BIG 12’s top scorer (19.1) and rebounder (10.6).
Undrafted forward Dean Wade out of Kansas State has agreed to a two-way contract with the Cleveland Cavaliers, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Boston is exploring trading the 24th pick that was acquired from Philadelphia.
Get to know @MatisseThybulle, the Sixers’ new defensive specialist.
Matisse Thybulle, the senior out of Washington, didn’t work out for any teams and his stock skyrocketed. He received a promise, and it’s evident it came from Philly. He’s arguably the best perimeter defender in this draft.
Yahoo Sources: New Orleans to select Nickeil Alexander-Walker with the No. 17 pick in the 2019 NBA Draft.
Yahoo Sources: Detroit to select Sekou Doumbouya with No. 15 pick in 2019 NBA Draft.
Yahoo Sources: Atlanta to select Cam Reddish with No. 10 pick in 2019 NBA Draft.
Yahoo Sources: New Orleans to select Jaxson Hayes with No. 8 pick in the 2019 NBA Draft, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Our @YahooSports NBA Draft Show airs at 7pm ET featuring @PeteThamel, Vince Goodwill, @michellegingras, former Suns GM Ryan McDonough and Cavs PG Collin Sexton and Nets C Jarrett Allen.
As @TheSteinLine reports, Cleveland intends to go with Vanderbilt point guard Darius Garland at No. 5, sources say.
New Orleans is close to an agreement that will give Atlanta the No. 4 pick in the 2019 NBA Draft, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Anthony Davis, who could sign extension with the Lakers this offseason, will play out the 2019-20 season and enter free agency next year, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
After all the drama from months ago, Anthony Davis got what he wanted. The Lakers are positioned to make a run at multiple championships. David Griffin secures young assets to pair with arrival of Zion Williamson. Win-win for both sides.
Yahoo Sources: Sixers forward Jimmy Butler intends to decline his $19.8 million player option to test free agency.
Yale guard Trey Phills — son of the late Bobby Phills — has a workout scheduled with the Charlotte Hornets on Friday, the franchise that retired his father’s No. 13 jersey, his agent @kengestevenson tells Yahoo Sports.
Kevin Durant ruptured his Achilles and underwent successful surgery today in New York.
Yahoo Sources: Inside all Kevin Durant endured during rehab, what happened right before Game 5 and the costly aftermath that sheds light on the Warrior he truly is.
Warriors GM Bob Myers says Kevin Durant has an Achilles injury.
Golden State center Kevon Looney re-aggravated his right 1st costal cartilage non-displaced fracture injury and will not return tonight.
As @MontePooleNBCS first reported, Golden State forward Kevin Durant will make his return tonight in Game 5 against Toronto, sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Golden State star Kevin Durant is a game time decision tonight for Game 5 of The Finals against Toronto, Steve Kerr says.
Kevin Durant will be cleared to practice today, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Behind the scenes impact of Kawhi Leonard and others who have the Raptors on brink of dethroning the Warriors.
Darius Garland - out of Vanderbilt - has received his Green Room invite for the 2019 NBA Draft, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Golden State forward Kevin Durant will not play in Game 4 of the finals against Toronto.
New Column: On the Warriors’ precautionary approach to injuries and why this Raptors squad will take advantage of it.
Shaun Livingston will start in place of Klay Thompson.
Golden State star Klay Thompson will not play tonight in Game 3 of the Finals against Toronto.
We avoided a Fyre Fest situation...
Thank you to all media and all who streamed #MetroMediaJam. No (serious) injuries to report. Hope we didn’t embarrass ourselves too much. And don’t blame me for switching to the championship team. Oscar Robertson opened the door to unrestricted free-agency. Fun night! Next year.
. @QCook323 #MetroMediaJam
Golden State Warriors guard @QCook323 came out to bless the #MetroMediaJam.
Y’all can tune out now...
#MetroMediaJam
The games will also feature a color commentating crew. Here are the rosters and schedule.
: Tonight’s media basketball tournament will be on Metro by T-Mobile’s Court. Follow the hashtag #MetroMediaJam! You can check out the games at 7:15 pm PT via the livestream at @MetroByTMobile. #sponsored
Golden State star Klay Thompson expected to receive MRI on hamstring, but tells Yahoo Sports he doesn’t see himself missing Game 3. Inside his pain in the locker room.
Golden State star Klay Thompson, who suffered a hamstring injury, tells Yahoo Sports that he’ll be fine: “No, I don’t see myself missing Game 3.”
Yahoo Sources: Golden State star Kevin Durant expected to return from calf injury at midway point of NBA Finals.
NBA commissioner Adam Silver came with the jokes when asked about potential new start times for west coast teams because LeBron James is now a Laker. A brotha almost fell out his chair. NEW POSTED UP W/ HAYNES POD : :
NBA commissioner Adam Silver came with the jokes when asked about potential new start times for west coast teams because LeBron James is now a Laker. A brotha almost fell out his chair. NEW POSTED UP W/ HAYNES POD : :
NBA commissioner Adam Silver - on the Posted Up with Chris Haynes Pod - shared his thoughts on numerous topics that also included how the Anthony Davis saga was handled in New Orleans. FULL POSTED UP PODCAST: : :
NEW POSTED UP W/ HAYNES POD NBA commish Adam Silver on Finals, Lakers, fan-player behavior, Pels ordeal w/ AD, stance on marijuana use, LeBron’s impact on ratings, talking to Drake, media’s role in supermax &amp; more. : :
NBA commissioner Adam Silver is my next guest on the Posted Up with Chris Haynes Pod. Full episode drops Thursday morning.
Golden State star Kevin Durant will travel with the team to Toronto, a league source tells Yahoo Sports.
Marques Bolden of Duke will forego his remaining collegiate eligibility and remain in the 2019 NBA Draft. He will be co-repped by Rich Gray (@iamrichgray) of Gray Area Sports Group and Chris Gaston (@gastonbball) of Family First Sports Firm (@famfirstsports).
UPDATE: Received over 100 inquires for the NBA Finals media basketball tourney, but sorry I have to cap it at 40. And for the fans (AND PLAYERS) who’ve reached out demanding a visual, this event will likely be lived streamed. Working on finalizing rosters.
Uncle Dennis Speaks: Uncle of Raptors star Kawhi Leonard to Yahoo Sports on why they requested trade from Spurs, initial reluctance to go to Toronto, being vindicated, affection for city and free-agency process.
Correction: The day before Game 3.
Media members covering The Finals: I’m hosting a media basketball game the evening of June 4 in Walnut Creek, the day before Game 4. Round trip transportation, jerseys and postgame meal will be provided. DM me for more details.
Portland had a phenomenal season and a contract extension for Terry Stotts was a no-brainer. Hell of a job building a culture that’s enticing to players.
Golden State hopeful Kevin Durant and DeMarcus Cousins returns at some point during The Finals.
The All-NBA Teams:
The 2018-19 NBA All-Defensive was announced. Rudy Gobert, Paul George, Giannis Antetokounmpo, Marcus Smart and Eric Bledsoe made the first team. Jrue Holiday, Klay Thompson, Joel Embiid, Draymond Green and Kawhi Leonard rounded out the second team.
The one and only @icecube is one of our best Posted Up episode yet...Did Dr. Dre diss him on “Nuthin' but a G Thang?“ Full episode below. : :
Yahoo Sources: In building off an incredible run, Damian Lillard and Portland Trail Blazers expected to come to terms on a supermax deal in the offseason:
NEW POSTED UP POD @icecube on old beefs, if he considered joining Death Row, Dr. Dre tales, who was initially cast as Smokey, @thebig3 vision, the new Friday &amp; plenty more. Full pod available now. It’s game for free! : :
Golden State will start Alfonzo McKinnie in place of injured Andre Iguodala tonight at Portland, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Dallas forward Dwight Powell has made a decision regarding his $10.2 million player option.
THE DON @icecube on tomorrow's Posted Up! No topic off limits. Walking history book w/stories untold. Rap beefs, soured relationships, becoming a man, mogul mentality, new Friday, @thebig3 World Cup &amp; more. Subscribe  : :
Golden State forward Andre Iguodala underwent an MRI on his leg this morning and the results came back negative, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Column: How Draymond Green spoke up at halftime, convincing Steve Kerr to increase the pressure on Damian Lillard and CJ McCollum: “We know how the story ends if we let them play 1-on-1.
Golden State star Kevin Durant (calf strain) will not play in Game 2 of the WCF against Portland, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
New Column: Major adjustments on both ends of the floor are needed in order for Portland to have a chance in this series with Golden State.
From @kobebryant to Khloe Kardashian, @RealLamarOdom reveals the proudest moment of his career and it might surprise you. Check out the full episdoe on the latest Posted Up w/ C. Haynes Pod... : :
"People don't think athletes go through normal sh--, but we all do." His addiction, his accident, his family being told to say their goodbyes because he was going to die. Posted Up w/ C. Haynes Pod with @RealLamarOdom. : :
NEW POSTED UP w/C HAYNES POD @RealLamarOdom sat down to open up on his battle with addiction, his physical limitations, @thebig3, playing with @kobebryant, filming the Kardashians, playing for Donald Sterling &amp; more. : :
Joining @RealSkipBayless, @ShannonSharpe on @undisputed right now! Also catch me on @TheHerd and @SFY with @WhitlockJason, @marcelluswiley.
Portland advances to WCF for the first time since 2000. @Dame_Lillard, @CJMcCollum and company to meet Golden State. A remarkable postseason run continues.
New Story: In darkest moment of Game 6, Kevin Durant's faith in Warriors never wavered: 'We're winning this game!” he told Yahoo Sports. Inside the night that might have broken the Rockets for good.
DeMarcus Cousins screams on his way to the locker room: “I know this shit hurts” in reference to the Rockets.
Denver swingman Will Barton will not face a suspension or a fine for his altercation on Thursday with Portland guard Seth Curry, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Column: How Damian Lillard delivered a message to the entire team, sparking a must-needed Game 6 victory.
Golden State star Kevin Durant’s MRI confirmed a right calf strain and he will be re-evaluated next week. He will not travel to Houston for Game 6.
My mens @WhitlockJason, @marcelluswiley, @jimjackson419 &amp; @Darnell_Smith95 wild for this 
Golden State star Kevin Durant will undergo an MRI tomorrow on his right calf, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Kevin Durant suffered a right calf strain and will not return.
Yahoo Sources: The center of why the Lakers and Tyronn Lue walked away from each other.
Yahoo Sources: Lakers offered Tyronn Lue a three-year deal. Lue requested a five-year pact, same length issued to Luke Walton. Under Lakers’ proposal, the contract of Lue and LeBron James would have expired at the same time.
And Ja Morant (@igotgame_12) tried to come with the jokes on a brotha. Full @YahooSports Posted Up with C. Haynes Pod in audio and visual form below. : :
A Murray St. coach went looking for popcorn at a camp but found Ja Morant. The rest is history. How his life changed, the diet Ray Allen has him on &amp; stories aplenty...@igotgame_12 on latest Posted Up w/ C. Haynes Pod  : :
Yahoo Column: Inside how Chris Paul and the Rockets’ physical style is beginning to irritate the Warriors.
NEW POSTED UP POD Ja Morant (@igotgame_12) on draft prep, landing spots, still miffed about being ignored in high school, who discovered him, relationship w/AAU teammate Zion Williamson &amp; much more. Ja tells his story. : :
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Lakers and Tyronn Lue in the process of working toward agreement that would make him the franchise’s next head coach.
Boston guard Marcus Smart will play tonight against Milwaukee.
Tomorrow I introduce consensus Top 2 pick in 2019 NBA Draft - Murray State guard Ja Morant (@igotgame_12) on the Posted Up w/ C. Haynes Pod. Subscribe below to have episode waiting for you in the morning. The kid brought  : :
Toronto forward Pascal Siakam (calf) will play today in Game 4 against Philadelphia.
Yahoo Column: Stephen Curry won’t admit it, but his postgame locker room activity reveals what’s bothering him.
On this Posted Up w/ Chris Haynes Pod, @icecube dropped  gems on John Singleton, Nip, rap beef, Death Row Records, growing an empire, working with Dr. Dre, NWA days, initial cast of Friday, forming @thebig3 and much more. Drops in two weeks. Subscribe:
Check out @thebig3 2019 Draft live on CBS Sports Network at 10pm ET. I’ll be there watching with @icecube and company!
Golden State star Kevin Durant tells Yahoo Sports why he’s refueled and it’s why Houston has a problem: 'This is where this sh-- is fun  I'm just embracing it.':
Houston guard James Harden will return to tonight's game.
Houston guard Chris Paul has been fined $35,000 for aggressively approaching an official during Game 1 of the series against Golden State on Sunday.
After Game 1 between Warriors and Rockets, both teams had complaints about how stars are being officiated.
Following @Dame_Lillard’s epic Game 5 closeout performance against OKC, over six thousand pair of Dame 5s were purchased on the next day.
A Yahoo Sports visit to home of an uncensored @Dame_Lillard takes you behind scenes of the assassin's mindset — and trash talk — of his matchup against Russell Westbrook, resulting in a historic night.
Momma Dame...
Oh shit!
Incredible scene at Moda Center here in Portland as @Dame_Lillard putting together a performance for the ages. This is superstar status.
Brooklyn Nets GM Sean Marks has been suspended one game without pay and fined $25,000 for entering the referees’ locker room during post game.
Kevin Durant and JaMychal Green have had their double technical fouls rescinded.
Kevin Durant had an eventful week, but he tells Yahoo Sports he’s happy the focus has been on basketball rather than his
That @Dame_Lillard is a cold-blooded assassin!
Warriors say DeMarcus Cousins has suffered a torn left quad and will be out indefinitely. Updates on his progress will be provided when appropriate.
Yahoo Sources: There’s faint optimism DeMarcus Cousins could return for Finals, but belief is he’s lost for postseason with significant quad injury.
Clippers owner Steve Balmer to Yahoo Sports: “We’re some tough guys,” he shouted. “Physical and mental, we’re some tough guys. Damn I love our guys.”
Golden State guard Shaun Livingston (knee) will be available tonight for Game 2 against LA Clippers, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Arkansas sophomore forward Daniel Gafford, a top 20 projected 2019 NBA Draft prospect, has signed with agent Charles Briscoe of Briscoe Sports Group.
Duke freshman Zion Williamson announces on Instagram that he is declaring for the 2019 NBA Draft.
Column: Kevin Durant and the Warriors might have won Saturday, but Patrick Beverley might have helped give the field an edge in near future.
Yahoo Sources: The Lakers have reached out to Tyronn Lue regarding their head coach position and are expected to meet at some point next week.
'You can't be physical these days and it's taking away from the game of basketball.' @JohnWall brought the on the Posted Up w/ Chris Haynes Podcast.... : :
My story from Tuesday on Tyronn Lue and Monty Williams being the leading candidates to replace Luke Walton.
Lakers and coach Luke Walton have agreed to part ways.
On the newest episode of the Posted Up w/ Chris Haynes Pod, @JohnWall and I also dove into the issue of fans, and now referees, talking trash to players... : :
Full audio and video version of the latest episode of the Posted Up w/ Chris Haynes Video Podcast with Wizards star @johnwall. An hour-long conversation on hoops and life. : :
Phoenix has named James Jones as its next general manager.
NEW POSTED UP W/HAYNES POD Wizards star @JohnWall joined me on latest episode to talk about his recovery, his supermax extension, Bradley Beal's potential supermax, trade rumors, future of the team, impact of Nipsey Hussle and much more... :
Yahoo Sources: Magic Johnson recently was granted permission to fire Luke Walton amidst contemplating resignation:
Magic Johnson is still going strong with this impromptu presser, approaching close to 40 minutes of rambling.
Magic Johnson says he couldn’t stand to face Jeanie Buss to tell her personally, so he’s doing it this way. Would like to consult the team.
Magic Johnson says he likes to be free to congratulate players such as Russell Westbrook when he hit the 2020-20 mark. Says he couldn’t be himself and he hasn’t informed Jeanie Buss yet.
Magic Johnson is stepping down as Lakers’ President of Basketball Operations.
 No topic off limits for my next guest. The latest episode of the Posted Up w/ Chris Haynes Video Podcast features Wizards star @JohnWall. Drops this week!!! Subscribe:
Join me on @NBA_Reddit tomorrow at 12 p.m. PT for an AMA heading into the playoffs.
Washington Huskies wing @MatisseThybulle, who just won the 2019 Naismith Defensive Player of the Year award, gave me his thoughts on why he’s a top 3&amp;D NBA prospect.
Yahoo Sources: LaVar still calling the shots for Lakers guard Lonzo Ball and what is occurring behind the scenes.
New Orleans Pelicans star Anthony Davis has been fined $15,000 for directing an obscene gesture toward a fan, the league announced.
Murray State guard Ja Morant, a consensus Top 5 pick in upcoming NBA Draft, has signed with agent Jim Tanner of @_tandemse.
Draymond Green fined $35,000, Stephen Curry fined $25,000 and Kevin Durant fined $15,000 for their parts in criticizing an official.
Trash ass headline @FresnoBee! RIP to a real one, @NipseyHussle, from a real representative of Fresno!
Washington State senior Robert Franks has signed with agents Mike Silverman and Brandon Grier of Athlete Management Group in preparation for 2019 NBA Draft. The 6-9 forward led PAC-12 in scoring (21.6), shot 40 percent from 3-Point range and earned First Team conference honors.
Yahoo Sources: A fan in Boston banned two years for muttering n at DeMarcus Cousins during Golden State’s only visit to TD Garden. More details in video link provided.
What would you warm up to before an NBA game? @boogiecousins music choice on the latest Posted Up pod might surprise you.... : :
Come for the BSing &amp; stay for when @CedEntertainer roasted @boogiecousins, calling him ”Suge Knight of NBA.” You dont want to miss this Posted Up episode...also check out Boogie's 3rd Annual Comedy Slam in Oakland April 11.  
"If he was in a L.A. or Chicago...he would be one of the greatest players of all time." - @boogiecousins has high praise for Trail Blazers star @Dame_Lillard on this week’s Posted Up with Chris Haynes Podcast episode. : :
Golden State has suspended forward Jordan Bell one game for conduct detrimental to the team.
NEW POSTED UP POD Sat down w/ @boogiecousins to talk working way back to form, fan interactions, pending free-agency, narrative on his defense, real NBA tough guys, when he knew AD wanted out, winning a title, his comedy show &amp; plenty more... :
Portland center Jusuf Nurkic suffered a compound fracture to his left leg and will require surgery, costing him the remainder of the season.
Portland center Jusuf Nurkic just suffered a gruesome left foot injury, causing Trail Blazer and Nets players to turn away after he landed.
Warriors star DeMarcus Cousins on Posted Up w/Chris Haynes Pod on worst fan interactions: “I’ve been called n...on few occasions...When does our safety become important?” WARNING: Video clip accompanied w/story contains slurs, explicit language.
Next up on the @YahooSportsNBA Posted Up with Chris Haynes Video Podcast is lunch with @Warriors star DeMarcus Cousins (@boogiecousins). Drops early this week. This was a classic! Subscribe:
Murray State’s Ja Morant (@igotgame_12) not only stole show at NCAA tourney, but also snagged attention of another mid-major star. A @YahooSportsNBA exclusive with @StephenCurry30 on Morant’s trajectory: His transition to NBA isn't going to be difficult'
Boston guard Marcus Smart has been fined $50,000 for shoving Philadelphia center Joel Embiid.
Last call for $1,000,000! Join Best Bracket Millionaire contest on @YahooSports to win $1M for the BEST bracket #YahooBestBracket 
Do visiting teams really go out on the town in ATL before games? @TheTraeYoung says he sees the fatigue on the court on the latest Posted Up Pod. Additionally, he joins @mhdachamp, @TeeHall18 for The 559 post pod segment. : :
Hawks’ @TheTraeYoung like you’ve never seen/heard before on Posted Up Pod with cameo by Rayford, his pops. Young brought the heat on all topics, and says some of his fire came from watching @russwest44 growing up in OKC. : :
'We win championships, people will stop talking about the trade as much.' @ATLHawks @TheTraeYoung brought  on Posted Up. Why he’s ROY, Luka rivalry, effects ATL nightlife has on opponents, when he knew he was turning pro, living on his own &amp; more. :
: Up next on @YahooSportsNBA Posted Up Podcast Drops tomorrow  @mhdachamp @TeeHall18
Wood was a valued member of Bucks, but the organization was forced to make a difficult decision with Brogdon sidelined. He will have interest from other teams.
Milwaukee Bucks will sign guard Tim Frazier and waive forward Christian Wood in aftermath of Malcolm Brogdon foot injury, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Portland guard CJ McCollum to Yahoo Sports after learning he suffered a left knee strain: “God looked out for me. Could’ve been a lot worse.” Will be re-evaluated in a week.
Portland star @Dame_Lillard has surpassed LaMarcus Aldridge for second on Trail Blazers' all-time scoring list with 12,565 points. Clyde Drexler the leader at 18,040 points.
New Orleans star Anthony Davis will rest tonight against Portland.
A humbled, forthcoming, apologetic Kyrie Irving on his actions the past month: “The way I’ve handled things haven’t been perfect...I apologize.” A @YahooSports deep exclusive with the Celtics’ evolving leader.
Yahoo Sources: For the second straight year, Washington Huskies wing Matisse Thybulle has won the Pac-12 Defensive Player of the Year award. He’s six steals shy of surpassing Gary Payton for the all-time Pac-12 steals record of 321.
Toronto star Kawhi Leonard is out Sunday at Miami due to...load management
Lakers guard Lonzo Ball has a re-evaluation checkup on his ankle today and there’s strong suspicion he’ll also be ruled out the remainder of the season, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Lakers forward Brandon Ingram will miss the remainder of the season with a shoulder injury.
This was an interesting conversation with my guy @stephenasmith. #whitecastle
New Orleans guard Jrue Holiday has been diagnosed with a lower abdominal strain after undergoing an MRI and will be re-evaluated in 7-10 days.
San Joaquin Memorial guard Jalen Green - regarded as the No. 1 high school junior in the country out of Fresno - is transferring to Prolific Prep of Napa Christian for his senior season. @JalenRomande will start school next week.
Boston star Kyrie Irving will not play tonight in Sacramento with a left thigh contusion.
New Column: For one night, Celtics and Warriors switched roles and it was the champs, Kevin Durant who tilted toward turmoil in aftermath of a rout.
Yahoo Sources: Golden State intends to sign Andrew Bogut for the remainder of season after he receives letter of clearance from his Australian team:
Sacramento Kings young star De’Aaron Fox (@swipathefox) going in a new direction, hiring his longtime trainer Chris Gaston (@gastonbball) to serve as his agent. Gaston, newly certified, launching “Family First Sports Firm” and will also rep New York Knicks guard Damyean Dotson.
Toronto star Kawhi Leonard will not play tonight at Detroit due to load management.
In aftermath of two Sacramento Police officers who will not face charges for killing Stephon Clark, an unarmed black man, DeMarcus Cosuins will wear these tonight in his honor. @boogiecousins also paid for his funeral.
New Column: A playoff field with no LeBron James would lead to costly ramifications for Lakers:
Lakers star LeBron James to Yahoo Sports on teams thinking he’s a defensive liability, here’s his challenge: “Come on with it.”
"I wouldn't be the player I am today without @JohnWall." @RealDealBeal23 Check out the full Posted Up Podcast below with the @WashWizards All Star on stepping up with Wall out, @hornets All Star @KembaWalker &amp; @Ronnie2K. : :
NEW POSTED UP POD A 3-for-1 episode featuring @RealDealBeal23, @KembaWalker, @Ronnie2K. Beal talks team direction, Walker on free-agency &amp; how @Giannis_An34 is now a struggle for game designers. Watch, listen below... : :
New Story: Chris Paul, to Yahoo Sports, hasn’t forgot how Warriors snuck by: “What did Iguodala say last year? If he would have played, they would have swept us?” Paul, Rockets are putting the champs on notice again.
Houston guard James Harden has been fined $25,000 for public criticism of an official.
Yahoo Sources: Golden State star Draymond Green close to signing with Rich Paul of Klutch Sports.
Meet Washington Huskies wing Matisse Thybulle (@MatisseThybulle), the best defender and 3-D prospect in the country who is achieving monumental feats and attracting attention of NBA execs:
How will the new rotation work for the @trailblazers? @Dame_Lillard breaks down the team's latest additions in @rodneyhood &amp; @Enes_Kanter on the Posted Up pod. Kanter is set to make his first #RipCity appearance tonight vs the Nets. :
Duke forward Zion Williamson was diagnosed with a Grade 1 right knee sprain and his status is day-to-day.
Keep killing it, @JosinaAnderson!!!
.@Dame_Lillard shared a previously never-before told story about how the late @trailblazers owner, Paul Allen, helped his music career as well. Make sure to check out the full Posted Up episode below... : :
Portland’s @Dame_Lillard went deep in this wide-ranging Posted Up pod episode. Must-listen on variety of topics. And The 559 breakdown w/ @mhdachamp, @TeeHall18 immediately follows. : : Clip: Why he hasn’t requested a trade.
NEW POSTED UP POD Portland star @DamianLillard joined me to discuss his friend Anthony Davis wanting out, the real reason he hasn’t demanded a trade, reveals a never-before told story about Paul Allen &amp; much more. : :
Portland star @Dame_Lillard brought the heat. Next episode of the Posted Up podcast drops this week. #NBAAllstar2019 Subscribe:
Yahoo Sources: New Orleans star Anthony Davis (shoulder) still plans to play in Sunday’s All-Star game but it’s dependent on how he responds to treatment in coming days.
Posted Up Pod featuring @VinceGoodwill, @seeratsohi in a lively, confrontational discussion. We break down the trade deadline along with chatting about the Lakers, Celtics, Sixers, KD, Harden &amp; more. A fun, s-talking session.
Sources: Add Toronto in this group.
Rockets and Lakers among playoff-contending teams interested in services of Markieff Morris who was cleared to return to action.
Free agent forward Markieff Morris visited Dr. Watkins today in Los Angeles regarding his neck and has been cleared to play, his agent Rich Paul tells Yahoo Sports.
High-profile players I’ve spoken to over last day or so are impressed with what certain franchises have done rencently and are encouraged with the direction: Sacramento, Philadelphia, Los Angeles Clippers, New York, Brooklyn, Denver, Milwaukee, Toronto.
Detroit Pistons plan to release forward Henry Ellenson to make room for Wayne Ellington when he clears waivers, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Markieff Morris, who was recently traded to New Orleans, will likely seek second opinion on his neck injury. In early Jan., he was diagnosed with transient cervical neuropraxia and ruled out six weeks.
With this move, Boston opens up a roster spot and will survey the robust buyout market.
The New Orleans Pelicans will keep Anthony Davis past the trade deadline, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Boston trading guard Jabari Bird to Atlanta, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Los Angeles Clippers plan to waive guard Milos Teodosic, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
The initial plan for the Los Angeles Clippers is to waive forward Michael Beasley, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Marcin Gortat, who will be waived by Clippers, has interest in joining the Warriors but the defending champs plan to wait until the dust settles to get a clearer picture of what is available on the market.
Indiana Pacers will waive forward Ike Anigbogu to make room for deal completed with Houston, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sources: Shumpert to Houston, Marquese Chriss and Brandon Knight to Cleveland and Alec Burks and a second round pick to Sacramento.
Cleveland is trading Alec Burks and a second round pick to Sacramento in exchange for Iman Shumpert as part of a 3-team package that includes Houston, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Lakers forward Michael Beasley issues a statement to Yahoo Sports on the reported incident with coach Luke Walton.
Yahoo Sources: New Orleans star Anthony Davis eagerly sought to make his return last night against Indiana, but was rebuffed by management.
Golden State star Klay Thompson tells Yahoo Sports he will not participate in the 3-Point Contest in Charlotte at All-Star Weekend.
LeBron James will not play tonight against the Warriors due to load management, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Posted Up Pod Clip: Jimmy Butler says it’s OK to speak with food in my mouth: “You gotta say, F it. I don’t give a damn.’” A toast for the ages. : :
Memphis forward Omri Casspi, who will undergo surgery next week to repair a meniscus tear in right knee, will be sidelined for approximately six weeks, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Miami’s Derrick Jones Jr., as reported by @OMaroneyNBA, was originally set to participate in the event before suffering a knee injury.
Oklahoma City guard Hamidou Diallo is expected to compete in the Slam Dunk Contest at All-Star Weekend, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
And again...
Yahoo Sources: After missing nearly five weeks with a groin injury, Lakers star LeBron James plans to make his return tonight against the Clippers.
Posted Up Pod Clip: Remember the “General Soreness” memes? Jimmy Butler does. : :
Posted Up Pod Clip: Jimmy Butler on who’s the toughest player to guard in the league. : :
Posted Up Pod Clip: Jimmy Butler on the Timberwolves firing his guy, Tom Thibodeau. : :
Posted Up Pod Clip: @JimmyButler is a huge @neymarjr fan. So much, that he promptly stopped eating to bless the food and the star. : :
Snippet: Jimmy Butler explains how Joakim Noah and Derrick Rose cussing each other out shaped his aggressive, confrontational leadership style. : :
The NBA announces that New Orleans Pelicans forward Anthony Davis has been fined $50,000 for his agent Rich Paul going public with a trade request.
: Dinner, wine, and an hour of shooting the s. @JimmyButler at his finest. Full video pod here —&gt;
Yahoo Sports’ Anthony Davis coverage with teams preparing offers &amp; dynamics impacting his outlook: @VinceGoodwill on small-market factor Pels face: @KeithSmithNBA provides thorough trade breakdown primer:
: Raw, uncut and no topic off limits. @JimmyButler the next guest on the @YahooSportsNBA “Posted Up w/Chris Haynes” video podcast. A conversation over dinner and wine at Barclay Prime in Philly. Drops Tuesday! Subscribe:
Yahoo Sources: Lakers and Knicks preparing an offer to Pelicans for star Anthony Davis and why Celtics aren’t a desired preference.
Agent of former lottery pick Marquese Chriss in talks with Houston about granting client more minutes or seeking a trade. Our @YahooSportsNBA report.
Story from a month ago outlining how we got here and what Anthony Davis is looking for.
An abundance of teams will inquire about Anthony Davis. But if there doesn’t exist a legitimate chance at competing for a title, trading for him will be risky when he can opt out following the 2019-20 season.
Portland intends to rest Damian Lillard for tonight’s game against Atlanta, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Philadelphia star Jimmy Butler visits specialist for wrist injury and it’s a confirmed sprain; expected back Tuesday.
Yahoo Sources: Philadelphia star Jimmy Butler visited a specialist in LA on Friday and it confirmed a sprained right wrist. He will be out tonight at Denver and is likely to be available Tuesday in LA.
Portland Trail Blazers star Damian Lillard will compete in the 3-Point Contest at All-Star Weekend in Charlotte, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sacramento Kings guard De’Aaron Fox plans to participate in the Skills Challenge during All-Star Weekend in Charlotte, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
New York Knicks guard Emmanuel Mudiay suffered a left shoulder strain and will be sidelined for at least two weeks.
Yahoo Sources: Golden State star Stephen Curry invited to participate in 3-Point Contest at All-Star Weekend in hometown of Charlotte.
Cleveland Cavaliers say Tristan Thompson will be sidelined for approximately two weeks as a result of an updated treatment plan for his left foot.
Pacers guard Victor Oladipo ruptured the quad tendon in his right knee and will undergo season-ending surgery.
Posted Up Pod: Aaron Gordon says James Harden’s stepback is a legal move, and compares it to Fred Flintstone. : :
Joining @ColinCowherd on @TheHerd momentarily to discuss LeBron James, Russell Westbook, Klay Thompson and James Harden. Tune in.
: On Posted Up’ pod is @OrlandoMagic’s Aaron Gordon (@Double0AG). Chat about iconic dunk bout w/LaVine, how to prep for event, luring stars, debating his Top 5 rappers (50 Cent is one) &amp; more. : : Clip: The best scorer is?
: Orlando Magic forward Aaron Gordon (@Double0AG) - on the Posted Up podcast - says he’ll be in Chicago for 2020 All-Star Weekend. Episode drops Tuesday. Subscribe:
Subscribe:
This week’s Posted Up’ podcast guest is @OrlandoMagic high-flyer Aaron Gordon (@Double0AG), and he drops some news. Episode hits Tuesday. Subscribe!!!
Los Angeles Lakers guard Lonzo Ball will be out 4-6 weeks with a Grade 3 left ankle sprain.
New for @YahooSportsNBA: Behind scenes story of @boogiecousins’ season debut and what Warriors are finding out about his unusual preference.
DeMarcus Cousins on receiving applauses and cheers all night on the road: “Probably all the fakest love I’ve received in my life.”
Charlotte Hornets rookie Miles Bridges plans to compete in the Slam Dunk Contest at All Star Weekend, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Detroit Pistons forward Blake Griffin has been fined $15,000 for verbal abuse towards an official.
Yahoo Sources: Golden State center DeMarcus Cousins attempted to move up return date and why he didn’t make his debut last night against his former team, New Orleans.
The reigning Defensive Player of the Year @RudyGobert27 joins the “Posted Up” podcast. Touches on blocking dunks, trash talking, slapping cups, his All-Star case, big men in today’s NBA, his future and much more. :
: Utah Jazz center @RudyGobert27 is this week’s guest on “Posted Up” podcast. He displays personality, humor, size 19 shoes &amp; competitive fire to win in at all costs. : : Clip: On false perception that Euro League is soft.
The NBA has completed its investigation into the Patrick McCaw signing with Cleveland and ruled that based on evidence, no rules were broken.
Yahoo Sources: So far Chicago refuses to negotiate a buyout for Robin Lopez, preventing him from joining Golden State.
Next week’s “Posted Up” podcast guest:
LeBron James is progressing and is increasing on-court work and will be re-evaluated on Jan. 16.
Sacramento Kings guard De’Aaron Fox (@swipathefox) joins the “Posted Up w/ Chris Haynes” podcast. And hang around for the post pod segment. : : Clip: Fox on being perceived soft on the court for growing up with both parents.
And for the video stans, the @swipathefox podcast appearance on “Posted Up” is live for your consumption.
: New episode of “Posted Up” arrives with ever so entertaining Kings guard De’Aaron Fox (@swipathefox). He’s a must-listen. Also, The 559 post segment debuts featuring @mhdachamp, @teehall18. : Clip: On parts of predraft process being waste of time’
Golden State center DeMarcus Cousins plans to make his season debut against the Los Angeles Clippers on Jan. 18, a league source tells Yahoo Sports.
Former NBA player Gerald Henderson is joining Charlotte Hornets’ TV broadcast team for FOX Sports Southeast in what appears to be for remainder of the season, sources say.
: Sacramento Kings point guard De’Aaron Fox (@swipathefox) our next guest on the “Posted Up” pod. He’s talented, confident, astute &amp; hilarious. Drops on Monday. Subscribe: Clip: If asked to practice after a back-to-back, Fox says “I’m not showing up.”
LeBron James (strained groin) will be re-evaluated in one week and will not travel on the upcoming road trip.
Washington Wizards forward Markieff Morris will be limited to non-contact basketball activities for the next six weeks after being diagnosed with transcend cervical neuropraxia.
Posted Up Pod: Tristan Thompson on end of GS rivalry, post-Bron era, outcome in 15 if Kyrie/Love aren’t hurt, untold stories from title run, how KD changed NBA, on dust-up w/ Draymond &amp; more. : : Clip: TT critiquing wardrobe
Golden State wing Andre Iguodala has been fined $25,000 for “recklessly” throwing the ball into the spectator stands in a game against Portland over the weekend.
: Cavs big man Tristan Thompson is this week’s “Posted Up” podcast guest. :
Episode II of “Posted Up w/ Chris Haynes” podcast is available now, featuring Cleveland Cavaliers big man Tristan Thompson (@RealTristan13). :
Our next guest on @YahooSportsNBA “Posted Up w/ Chris Haynes” podcast is Tristan Thompson. I asked “The Question.” Episode drops tomorrow. Subscribe:
Our next guest on the “Posted Up w/Chris Haynes” podcast is Tristan Thompson. This episode drops tomorrow.
Sacramento Kings rookie Marvin Bagley III is progressing through a left knee bone bruise and is expected to resume full basketball activities in approximately two weeks.
Yahoo Sources: Patrick McCaw has signed his two-year, $6 million offer sheet with Cleveland, but a copy has yet to been sent to Golden State for its right to match or not.
Orlando guard Terrence Ross has been fined $25,000 by the league for throwing the ball into the stands in last night’s overtime loss to Phoenix.
Los Angeles Lakers center JaVale McGee (ill) will make the trip to Sacramento for Thursday’s game where he’ll be listed as questionable, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
LeBron James in upbeat mood, telling Yahoo Sports he wasn’t involved in preparation of tonight’s gameplan: “None. I haven’t played Golden State enough to give my input.” He credited the coaching staff.
Yahoo Sources: An initial exam on LeBron James reveals all is intact and that it’s a slight groin strain. It could have been worse.
LeBron James is headed to the locker room after taking a shot below.
”Posted Up” podcast featuring Kevin Durant. : : Snippet on how he handles critics: “Why do I have to be like Kobe, and Mike, and LeBron and Steph and Magic?”
For those who prefer a visual podcast experience, we’ve provided the full hour-long debut episode of “Posted Up” featuring Kevin Durant on our YouTube page. : Snippet: Nobody can recruit me no more.’
: The debut of “Posted Up with Chris Haynes” podcast is LIVE NOW. Our first episode features @KDTrey5. : : Video Snippet: “I just want to make sure I get as much money as I can on my next deal.”
Yahoo Sources: Los Angeles Lakers center @JaValeMcGee was hospitalized with pneumonia for three days and discharged on Saturday.
Toronto forward Kawhi Leonard (load management) will not play tonight at Philadelphia.
Yahoo Sources: LeBron James, Anthony Davis met for postgame dinner last night in LA with Lakers in driver’s seat to pair the stars together.
Only 4 days until my new podcast Posted Up’ drops. Also, come for some laughs like when my brother @mhdachamp tried to pronounce Lauri Markkanen’s name. Subscribe:
Yahoo Sources: With new year approaching, Golden State makes it clear they sill intend to match any offer sheet on holdout guard Patrick McCaw.
Snippet: Who’s the fastest player in the NBA? Kings guard De’Aaron Fox says “there’s no debate.” Full interview with @swipathefox coming soon - on my new @YahooSportsNBA podcast Posted Up’ ... Ep. 1 drops 12/24. Story: Subscribe:
University of Kentucky paid a visit to see high school phenom Jalen Green (@JalenRomande) of San Joaquin Memorial in Fresno, the No. 1 ranked junior in the country. The guard has only taken two official visits.
Kings young star De’Aaron Fox (@swipathefox) joined the @YahooSports “Posted Up w/ Chris Haynes” podcast and was . And “The 559” introduced as they’ll break down what guests had to say. Show debuts Dec. 24. Subscribe now —&gt;
New Story: After Raptors sweep season-series, Warriors star Stephen Curry tells Yahoo Sports, 'The Raptors don't get any extra points' should they meet in Finals.
Toronto center Jonas Valanciunas suffered a left thumb dislocation and will not return tonight against Golden State.
Extended video clip on Yahoo: Kevin Durant professes his love for the Bay Area with visions of statues, jerseys being retired and says he discusses with teammates what it would be like to be a legend in this area.
“Posted Up w/Chris Haynes” podcast debuts Dec. 24. Real conversations w/NBA stars, league figures &amp; my team of personalities. Snippet: KD sees big future in Bay. 3-peat or more? Subscribe to the pod &amp; look for pilot w/KD on Xmas Eve. Subscribe -&gt; #itunes
New Story: Frustration and doubt eventually turned into trust and patience. How Draymond Green got creative to stay in top form while nursing a toe injury.
Game recognize game. Glad you’re joining the @YahooSports team, @seeratsohi.
Golden State center Damian Jones underwent surgery to repair a torn left pectoral muscle and will begin rehab in six weeks.
Detroit Pistons guard Ish Smith suffered a right adductor muscle tear and will be re-evaluated in two weeks.
The death of a rivalry: Inside the last gasps of Warriors, Cavs chapter.
The NBA has fined Cleveland forward Tristan Thompson $15,000 for making an obscene gesture at a spectator in a game against Brooklyn on Monday.
Fresno State!!! #BulldogBornBulldogBred
Video Essay: What’s next for Dwight Howard and Washington Wizards.
Yahoo Sources: Washington center Dwight Howard is in surgery now to alleviate gluteal pain. Could be sidelined up to 2-3 months.
If the procedure is successful, a typical recovery timeline is 2-3 months. But Howard could return to action sooner.
Washington center Dwight Howard will undergo a surgical procedure to alleviate pain from a gluteal injury, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Toronto Raptors star Kawhi Leonard has agreed to a multiyear shoe endorsement deal with New Balance.
Golden State All-Star Draymond Green underwent an MRI on his right toe recently and the results confirmed a sprain, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. Remains day-to-day.
New Orleans forward Anthony Davis is being held out tonight against Washington with a right hip strain.
For those interested, Kevin Durant’s reaction as I break the news of his $25,000 fine right in front of him. Also, his thoughts.
Golden State star Kevin Durant tells Yahoo Sports he’s good with Draymond Green and adds the incident will have no bearing on his free agency.
Golden State forward Kevin Durant will be fined $25,000 for telling a heckling fan to “watch the fucking game and shut the fuck up” during Sunday’s loss to Dallas, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Orlando Magic forward Aaron Gordon (@Double0AG) is providing 400 Oakland-area families with turkeys and side items for a Thanksgiving meal. The food will be distributed today at New Hope Baptist Church from 11am-2pm.
Yahoo Sources: There’s growing discord between Sacramento Kings and Dave Joerger that could eventually lead to change.
Golden State forward Draymond Green will not play tomorrow night against Dallas due to his toe injury.
Yahoo Sources: What really prompted the Warriors to issue a suspension and behind the scenes of the Draymond Green, Kevin Durant relationship that’s currently in a fragile state.
Draymond Green and Kevin Durant communicating positively on their way to the arena for shootaround.
At shootaround this morning in Houston, Draymond Green — to some extent — intends to address heated exchange he had with Kevin Durant. But what’s of note: their locker stalls are positioned right next to each other. The two have already spoken.
Golden State guard Stephen Curry (groin) will be re-evaluated in 10 days.
Yahoo Sources: Golden State plans to sit Draymond Green for tonight’s game against Atlanta for his altercation with Kevin Durant.
Golden State is expected to sit Draymond Green for tonight’s game against Atlanta, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Budding @Bucks star Giannis Antetokounmpo (@Giannis_An34) tells @YahooSportsNBA it might be his time, but says he’s still chasing LeBron James and Kevin Durant.
Brooklyn’s Caris LeVert was diagnosed with a dislocated right foot and will not require surgery.
A @YahooSportsNBA exclusive: LeBron James admits he nearly cracked’ due to Lakers’ struggles before reminding himself of the long term plan.
New York Knicks forward Lance Thomas underwent arthroscopic surgery of his left knee for removal of loose bodies. He’ll be re-evaluated in four weeks.
Tyson Chandler has cleared waivers, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. He’s now free to sign with the Los Angeles Lakers.
Minnesota Timberwolves All-Star Jimmy Butler is expected to be available tonight against the Los Angeles Clippers, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Minnesota forward Jimmy Butler will not play tonight against Portland “due to precautionary rest.”
Golden State star Stephen Curry plans to fly to Portland for tonight’s game between the Trail Blazers and Lakers to watch his brother Seth play, sources close to the guard tell Yahoo Sports.
Although Jimmy Butler desires to be traded, the star tells Yahoo Sports he’s not a distraction and candidly opens up about his relationship with teammates: These are my guys...I love these mother...I don’t give a f what people think.’
New Orleans star Anthony Davis explains his reality to Yahoo Sports, and it’s why the league is paying close attention: 'I got to play almost perfect every night to give us a chance to win.'
New Orleans forward Anthony Davis (elbow sprain) is being ruled as doubtful for tonight’s matchup at Portland.
New Orleans All-Star Anthony Davis plans to play tonight against Golden State after sitting out last two games with an elbow injury, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Milwaukee Bucks will pick up the third-year option on forward D.J. Wilson, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sources: Santa Cruz will also relinquish a 2019 fourth-round pick and Erie to send over a 2019 second-round pick in the deal.
Santa Cruz Warriors have agreed to trade forward Terrence Jones to the Erie BayHawks in exchange for the rights to forward Beau Beech, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Detroit Pistons will decline the fourth-year option of forward Henry Ellenson, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. The No. 18th pick in the 2016 Draft will become an unrestricted free agent in July.
San Antonio Spurs will retire Manu Ginobili’s No. 20 jersey on March 28.
Milwaukee forward Giannis Antetokounmpo and Golden State guard Stephen Curry have been named Conference Players of the Week.
New Orleans forward Anthony Davis (elbow sprain) will not play tonight against Denver.
Yahoo Sources: Despite an abysmal 1-5 start for Washington Wizards, coach Scott Brooks is not on hot seat and the franchise expecting reinforcement this week.
Video: Ride-along shopping for clothes and sneakers in LA with fashionista P.J. Tucker of the Houston Rockets. Click on link for the full day with the defensive stalwart.
Video Premiere from @YahooSports: An off-day ride-along with @HoustonRockets fashionista P.J. Tucker in Los Angeles as we spent the day shopping for clothes and sneakers.
Column: The Lakers are finding out what the presence of LeBron James truly feels like and it’s uncomfortable at times.
Happy to have @KeithSmithNBA joining the Yahoo Sports squad.
Yahoo Sources: Philadelphia guard Ben Simmons (back) plans to make his return to action tonight against Milwaukee.
Joining @RealSkipBayless and @ShannonSharpe now on @undisputed to break down LeBron James’ performance and what’s in store for Lakers.
Yahoo Video Snippet: Los Angeles shopping with fashion extraordinaire/sneaker emperor PJ Tucker of Houston Rockets. Full ride-along interview drops this week.
Yahoo Video: NBA sends surprising message with suspensions for Lakers, Rockets brawl.
Yahoo Sources: Denver Nuggets forward Will Barton avoids hip injury and sufferers groin, core strain.
Denver swingman Will Barton underwent an MRI and it revealed a strain groin, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. His recovery timetable is still being determined.
This clip clearly shows Chris Paul was spat on, but Rajon Rondo likely making case it was unintentional since he had in a mouthguard.
Washington Wizards center Dwight Howard will not play in tonight’s season-opener against the Miami Heat, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. He still needs more practice time.
Yahoo Sports exclusive: Utah Jazz guard Donovan Mitchell is ready to up ante for the team and himself: The goal is a championship’ and I gotta get my assists up.’
New Story: With Operation Retain KD underway, Kevin Durant tells Yahoo Sports what he’s not looking for from Warriors, why free-agency questions should be shelved and what to expect if not shelved.
Warriors restricted free agent Patrick McCaw will not attend tonight’s season-opener to receive his championship ring, a league source tells Yahoo Sports.
Terrible news. Seahawks and Trail Blazers owner Paul Allen has passed away.
Yahoo Sources: Story on Larry Nance Jr. and Cleveland Cavaliers reaching agreement on a four-year, $45 million extension.
Larry Nance has reached a four-year, $45 million extension with Cleveland, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Sources: Jodie Meeks is being traded to Milwaukee. Both teams now waiting on league approval.
Milwaukee and Washington are in advanced stages on a trade in which the Bucks would receive a player and a future pick, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. In a separate move, Tim Frazier will be waived.
Free agent guard Jamal Crawford has reached an agreement with the Phoenix Suns, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Sources: Golden State star Stephen Curry will avoid suspension from season-opener against OKC after stepping on the court during what’s not being viewed an altercation.
San Antonio will waive point guard Nick Johnson, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
Yahoo Video: Insightful sitdown interview with former Suns coach @Earl_Watson on state of franchise, Ryan McDonough’s mandate to start Brandon Knight over Devin Booker, and a two-week ultimatum he was given that led to his ouster. :
NBA vet Trevor Booker returning to U.S. this week to undergo procedure on his foot, agent Jim Tanner of Tandem Sports  Entertainment (@_tandemse) tells Yahoo Sports. Booker was signed to China’s Shanxi Brave Dragons. He’s expected to recover in time to join NBA team this season.
New Story: LeBron James’ decision to migrate West with Golden State puts his Finals streak in jeopardy, but he tells Yahoo Sports “I feel like with me on the floor, I can compete versus anybody.”
Yahoo Sources: More details on what occurred during Timberwolves' practice that featured Jimmy Butler unexpectedly subbing himself in and "talking s" to front office, Karl Anthony-Towns and Andrew Wiggins.
Is this a travel, or a well executed side step by @JHarden13?
Draymond Green will not play Wednesday in Las Vegas against the Los Angeles Lakers.
San Antonio guard Dejounte Murray has suffered a torn ACL and a recovery timeline will be given at a later date.
The NBA has fined Boston’s Marcus Smart $25,000 and Cleveland’s JR Smith $15,000 for their roles in Saturday’s skirmish.
The Phoenix Suns have fired GM Ryan McDonough.
San Antonio guard Dejounte Murray will undergo an MRI on his right knee on Monday, league sources tell Yahoo Sports.
San Antonio rookie Lonnie Walker IV suffered a right medical meniscus tear and will undergo surgery on Monday.
Yahoo Sources: Timberwolves, Clippers continue to discuss a Jimmy Butler trade.
Lakers forward Michael Beasley (right rib) had an X-ray last night and it came back negative, league sources tell Yahoo Sports. He’s not expected to miss any time.
New Story: LeBron James tells Yahoo Sports why he’s embracing an accelerated pace at the age of 33 and why it’s necessary.
Joining @RealSkipBayless and @ShannonSharpe in studio on @undisputed. Then I join my guy @ColinCowherd on @TheHerd and finish it off with @WhitlockJason and my bro @marcelluswiley on @SFY. Tune in.
Yahoo! Sources: Portland guard CJ McCollum received a PRP injection in the offseason to alleviate pain and swelling in right knee.
Philadelphia forward Wilson Chandler will be sidelined 2-3 weeks with a left hamstring injury.
Classy. Best of luck to you, @YourManDevine
Yahoo! Sources: San Antonio has picked up the fourth-year option of point guard Dejounte Murray.
Sources: Trail Blazers President Chris McGowan being promoted to CEO of Paul Allen’s Vulcan Sports &amp; Entertainment - replacing Peter McLoughlin - to oversee Seahawks, Trail Blazers and all enterprises under company’s sports/entertainment umbrella. Portland role doesn’t change.
New Orleans Pelicans All-Star Anthony Davis has signed with Rich Paul of Klutch Sports Group.
Portland Trail Blazers land jersey patch sponsorship deal with @Biofreeze.
Sources: Portland Trail Blazers secure multi-year sponsorship deal with Performance Health, which will include @Biofreeze logo patch on all jerseys.
Source: Maryland assistant coach Kevin Broadus is in Fresno, CA visiting high school phenom Jalen Green (@JalenRomande). The 6-5 guard - who visited Memphis last week - is the No. 1 ranked player in the 2020 class.
ESPN Sources: Luol Deng, Los Angeles Lakers agree to buyout and the upcoming free agent expected to receive interest from contending teams.
Veteran forward Luol Dng and the Los Angeles Lakers have reached an agreement on a buyout, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Quincy Pondexter, San Antonio reach an agreement.
Free agent wing Quincy Pondexter has reached an agreement on a one-year deal with the San Antonio Spurs, league sources tell ESPN.
Sources: Exhibit 10 deal.
Free agent forward Bruno Caboclo, Houston have reach an agreement, league sources tell ESPN.
Portland Trail Blazers will face the Utah Jazz on the road in one of the five Christmas Day games, league sources tell ESPN.
My take, from The Jump, on the statements released in support of LeBron James:
The calm before the storm. @MarcJSpearsESPN on the wheels prior to the @NABJSports Task Force party in Detroit. Completely sold out. #NABJ18
Portland guard Damian Lillard has returned home from attending Team USA minicamp, league sources tell ESPN. Due to other summer commitments, it was understood he would only attend first portion of camp.
Restricted free agent Jabari Bird and Boston closing in on a two-year deal, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: San Antonio guard DeMar DeRozan withdraws from Basketball Without Borders, NBA Africa game.
Sources: DeRozan will use the time to get his affairs in order following the trade.
San Antonio guard DeMar DeRozan has withdrawn from participating in Basketball Without Borders and the NBA Africa game, sources tell ESPN.
My entire conversation with @DeMar_DeRozan.
Thoroughly enjoying this @LA_Sparks, @AtlantaDream action. Witnessing one of the best — @Candace_Parker — in the @WNBA.
Extended version airs during 10pm PT @SportsCenter.
Toronto forward Kawhi Leonard will not attend USA Basketball minicamp in Las Vegas this week, league sources tell ESPN. He will use time to prepare for transition to new team.
In his first interview since the blockbuster trade, I sat down with @DeMar_DeRozan for a revealing, setting-the-record-straight conversation that airs tonight on @SportsCenter.
Free agent forward Alex Poythress agrees to a two-way deal with the Atlanta Hawks, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Michael Beasley, Los Angeles Lakers agree to terms on a one-year, $3.5 million deal.
Sources: It’s a one-year, $3.5 million deal.
Free agent forward Micheal Beasley has reached an agreement with Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell ESPN.
A miniature clip of my conversation with @boogiecousins.
A sitdown with Warriors’ new big man @boogiecousins. Extended version airs on @SportsCenter tonight.
DeMarcus Cousins: "Just to put this out there, my favorite Warrior by far is Klay."
What hasn’t gone unnoticed by some players is how there is no statement in the Raptors’ press release thanking DeMar DeRozan for his contributions over a nine-year period.
Kawhi Leonard has no desire to play in Toronto, league source tells ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Golden State star Stephen Curry will not attend Team USA minicamp in Las Vegas next week.
ESPN Sources: Miami reaches agreement to re-sign sharpshooter Wayne Ellington.
Sources: Wayne Ellington agreed to a one-year deal for $6.2 million.
Free agent sharpshooter Wayne Ellington and Miami have reached an agreement on a deal, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Rodney Stuckey, who is seeking an NBA comeback, will host a private workout on Thursday in Las Vegas with several NBA teams in attendance.
Golden State forward Jordan Bell will miss his second consecutive Summer League contest tonight with a sore shoulder, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Damion Lee, Golden State agree to terms on a two-way contract.
Sources: Lee agreed to a two-way contract. He’s the future brother-in-law of Stephen Curry.
Free agent guard Damion Lee has reached an agreement with Golden State, league sources tell ESPN.
Golden State forward Jordan Bell will not play this afternoon against Dallas to nurse a sore left shoulder, league sources tell ESPN. It’s not expected to be a serious injury.
ESPN Sources: Free agent Brook Lopez, Milwaukee reach an agreement.
Sources: Lopez agrees to a one-year deal at the bi-annual exception.
Free agent center Brook Lopez has reached an agreement with Milwaukee, league sources tell ESPN.
DeMarcus Cousins said the Warriors’ potential is scary and he doesn’t plan to rush his return.
DeMarcus Cousins says he had a goal of being ready for training camp, but says after talking with his new team, he’ll be patient.
Nicolas Batum to ESPN on Hornets acquiring Tony Parker: “It’s a done deal.”
Free agent Kyle O’Quinn agrees to sign with Indiana on a one-year, $4.5 million deal, league source tells ESPN.
Should consider changing All-Star format to top 24 players regardless of conference since there’s no East-West.
For second consecutive day, the California NBA Summer League Classic is a sellout at Golden 1 Center. Tickets already limited for July 5th. Sacramento Kings hosting an amazing tournament in its inaugural season.
ESPN Sources: Kevon Looney, Golden State reach an agreement.
Sources: It’s a one-year, minimum deal.
Free agent forward Kevon Looney has reached an agreement to re-sign with Golden State, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Portland and New Orleans had discussed the possibility of a sign-and-trade for DeMarcus Cousins, but a road block existed since he shares the same agent as RFA Jusuf Nurkic.
ESPN Sources: DeMarcus Cousins had narrowed his choices down to Golden State and Boston.
Golden State is greedy. Damn!!!
Free agent Jose Calderon agrees to a one-year, $2.4 million deal with Detroit, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Free agent guard Tyreke Evans meeting with the Lakers today. He met with Oklahoma City last night in Los Angeles.
ESPN Sources: Los Angeles Lakers land free agent center JaVale McGee.
Sources: It’s a one-year, minimum deal to pry away the big man from Golden State.
Free agent center JaVale McGee and Los Angeles Lakers have reached an agreement on a deal, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Los Angeles Lakers agree to deals with Kentavious Caldwell-Pope and Lance Stephenson to fill out team for arrival of LeBron James.
Sources: It’s a one-year, $4.5 million deal.
Free agent Lance Stephenson has agreed to join the Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell ESPN.
Sources: KCP agreeing to a one-year, $12 million deal.
Free agent guard Kentavious Caldwell-Pope has agreed to a deal with the Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell ESPN.
As @JabariJYoung pointed out, sources say Kawhi Leonard would entertain signing longterm with Philadelphia. However, if Lakers are unable to orchestra a trade of the All-Star, it’s not a given he would sign there in summer of 19.
There’s still no trade imminent on Kawhi Leonard. His stance remains to play for one of the Los Angeles teams, sources says.
The Los Angeles Lakers had a good feeling LeBron James was coming. Things will get a little more interesting in the West.
Minnesota courting free agent Dante Cunningham, league sources tell ESPN. The veteran forward weighing his options.
ESPN Source: This meeting now scheduled for July 2nd.
Stauskas will sign a one-year, minimum deal, sources says.
Free agent guard Nik Stauskas has agreed to a deal with Portland, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Los Angeles Clippers haven’t abandoned pursuit of acquiring San Antonio Spurs’ All-Star Kawhi Leonard. He remains a high offseason priority for LAC.
ESPN Sources: Will Barton agrees to four-year, $54 million deal to remain in Denver. Also, he's expected to be promoted to starting small forward.
Free agent guard Kentavious Caldwell-Pope plans to meet with the Los Angeles Clippers on July 1, league sources tell ESPN.
Free agent guard Will Barton and Denver intends to ink a four-year, $54 million deal, league sources ESPN. He will have a player option on fourth year.
ESPN Sources: Kevin Durant intends to sign a one-and-one deal with Golden State, meaning he could test free-agency next summer.
Kevin Durant intends to sign a two-year max deal with a player option to stay with Golden State, league sources tell ESPN.
Free agent Gerald Green plans to meet with Houston in Los Angeles on July 1, league sources tell ESPN. The athletic, 3-point specialist has multiple suitors.
Sacramento will not tender a qualifying offer to forward Bruno Caboclo, league sources tell ESPN. Both sides agreed to move on. He’s now a free agent.
Once again, @QuincyPondexter hosted a fantastic basketball camp. It’s the best in Fresno. Shout out to @QCook323, @RealTJohnson, @CoachJHut and @campayne for coming through.
The former NBA player is one of Europe’s best 3-point shooters and he’s working to get back in the league.
Portland held a private workout on Wednesday for sharpshooting wing James Nunnally, league sources told ESPN.
Golden State has extended the qualifying offer to guard Patrick McCaw, making him a restricted free agent, league sources tell ESPN.
Six days before start of free-agency, JaVale McGee tells ESPN he has no desire to leave Warriors.
Houston guard James Harden wins the 2017-18 NBA MVP award.
Utah center Rudy Gobert is the 2017-18 Defensive Player of the Year.
Philadelphia guard Ben Simmons is named the 2017-18 NBA Rookie of the Year.
ESPN Sources: With Indiana declining team option on Lance Stephenson, Tyreke Evans and Will Barton are expected to be two of its free-agent targets.
ESPN Sources: Portland plans to add guard John Jenkins, a 2012 first-round pick, to its Summer League roster. There's a good chance he'll be on an NBA roster next season.
ESPN Sources: Denver forward Wilson Chandler to opt in for 2018-19 season.
Denver forward Wilson Chandler will exercise $12.8 million player option for the 2018-19 season, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Undrafted guard Jordan Howard out of Central Arkansas has agreed to play for the Golden State Warriors’ Summer League squad. He averaged 25 points last season.
ESPN Sources: Undrafted rookie guard Brandon Goodwin out of FGCU has agreed to play for Memphis Grizzlies’ Summer League team.
ESPN Sources: Undrafted rookie guard Joel Berry out of North Carolina has agreed to a deal with the Los Angeles Lakers.
ESPN Sources: Undrafted guard Marcus Foster out of Creighton has agreed to play for Sacramento Kings’ Summer League squad.
ESPN Sources: Undrafted rookie forward Gary Clark out of Cincinnati has agreed to a two-way contract with the Houston Rockets.
ESPN Sources: Undrafted rookie center Jock Landale out of Saint Mary’s has committed to playing Summer League for Atlanta Hawks. Averaged 21.1 points his senior year.
ESPN Sources: Undrafted rookie forward Duncan Robinson out of Michigan has agreed to play Summer League for the Miami Heat.
ESPN Sources: Dwight Howard, Brooklyn to negotiate buyout and the eight-time All-Star pushes back on claims that he's a bad teammate.
Dwight Howard and Brooklyn will negotiate a buyout to enter free-agency, league sources tell ESPN.
How the alter ego of lottery prospect @LonnieWalker_4 came to be Bruce Lee, and how he uses it to his advantage on the court.
ESPN Sources: Kawhi Leonard was not alone in his meeting with Gregg Popovich today in San Diego.
ESPN Sources: San Antonio forward Rudy Gay declining player option to become a free agent.
San Antonio forward Rudy Gay is declining his player option to become a free agent this summer, league sources tell ESPN.
Elijah Brown out of Oregon — son of assistant coach Mike Brown — plans to play Summer League for Golden State Warriors, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: All-Star forward Kawhi Leonard desires a trade from San Antonio.
Kawhi Leonard isn't concerned about missing out on the supermax, sources tell ESPN. There's a feeling of betrayal that at this juncture, appears irreparable.
Kawhi Leonard wants out of San Antonio, league sources tell ESPN.
Stephen Curry on securing championships: “We’re going to try to get greedy and go for some more.”
Draymond Green’s shirt for the parade...
ESPN Sources: The unknown sacrifice by Draymond Green to snag KD, his summer extension verdict and behind the scenes tales of why Golden State can’t afford to lose its emotional leader.
In an exclusive interview with the back-to-back Finals MVP, Kevin Durant tells ESPN he can see himself retiring at 35.
I didn’t play @CJMcCollum
The golden tub of Mot in the Warriors’ locker room.
Stephen Curry gets doused with champagne.
Kevin Durant is the 2018 NBA Finals MVP.
This is going to be an eventful summer.
Kevin Durant now has a triple-double of 18 points, 11 rebounds and 10 assists.
LeBron James is not starting the fourth quarter off. This could get uglier.
Healthy contingent of Golden State fans in The Q chanting “Warriors. Warriors.” This place has been muted.
Some background on an unconventional path. Good lookin’ @AlexPutterman.
Kendrick Perkins to ESPN on Kevin Durant’s Game 3 performance: “Man, KD. I want to beat him, but he’s just a mother.” That’s Perk issuing a compliment.
LeBron James said everyone knew Kevin Durant was designed for greatness: “Everyone except for Portland.”
The investigation firm: “We do not believe Mr. Colangelo established the Twitter accounts or posted content on those accounts. The evidence supports the conclusion Ms. Barbara Bottini, Mr. Colangelo’s wife, established the Twitter accounts and posted content on those accounts.”
Kevin Durant to ESPN on if felt slighted being left out Finals MVP discussion after first two games: “Not at all. That’s something I can’t control. In the end, people will remember. I’m here to play.”
Kevin Durant to ESPN on his big fourth-quarter shot: “Steph’s 3 in that quarter was the biggest shot.”
Shaun Livingston as he leaves the court: “That’s the way to take all the air out of the building.”
Kevin Durant just did that. Damn!!!
ESPN Source: Andre Iguodala was hit in his right leg, which is not the previous injured one. He will return.
Golden State wing Andre Iguodala will make his return tonight in Game 3 of The Finals against Cleveland, league sources tell ESPN. He’s missed the past six games with a knee injury.
Joining @stephenasmith on @SportsCenter at 7:10 pm ET to discuss what to expect for Game 3 of The Finals.
The check is in the mail, @Money23Green.
Steve Kerr says Andre Iguodala is upgraded to questionable for Game 3. Kerr says he’s hopeful he can go. And if not, Game 4 would be the goal.
Stephen Curry says “I agree with Bron.”
LeBron James on Donald Trump disinviting the Eagles: “I know whoever wins this series, no one wants an invite.”
ESPN Sources: Golden State forward Andre Iguodala has been pain free the last few days, eyeing a return soon.
A few Warriors disturbed by Kendrick Perkins’ reluctance to move his feet and legs as Stephen Curry backed into him.
Kevin Durant right before he walks into the locker room: “Oh, it’s still sunny outside.”
Kendrick Perkins hasn’t played a minute in this series, but he’s been a small storyline in both games thus far.
Stephen Curry and Kendrick Perkins had words face-to-face to end the third. The fourth should be interesting.
Fans are chanting “MVP” while JR Smith is at the free throw line.
JR Smith received a standing ovation by the Warriors’ crowd when introduced in the starting lineup.
LeBron James was asked if he scored 51 points with one eye: “Nah, I had some points before that.”
Tristan Thompson asked what Draymond Green said to provoke him: “I don’t remember. It was 2.6 seconds left in the game. I went and got an early shower.”
Klay Thompson (ankle) walking around Oracle gingerly with a noticeable limp. Warriors expect him to play in Game 2.
Tristan Thompson avoids suspension but is fined $25,000 for his role in altercation with Draymond Green. Huge break for Cavs.
NBA commissioner Adam Silver tells ESPN “there are no plans” to change eligibility requirements for Rookie of the Year.
Going live now
Will do a Instagram Live Q&amp;A session at 11 a.m. PT to discuss what was an unbelievable Game 1 of The Finals. Feel free to join the discussion.
Shaun Livingston to ESPN on taking that last shot in overtime that irritated the Cavs: “I’m not taking a turnover...We were still playing. No disrespect. We just play the game.”
Stephen Curry to ESPN on his verbal altercation with LeBron James: “He looked back at me (after the block) and started talking. The game was over. That’s what started it.”
Dell Curry, as he walks through the corridors: “Was that Game 1 or Game 7?”
You can’t ignore Shaun Livingston restraining Draymond Green from retaliating on Tristan Thompson with a potential punch. He might helped Green avoid a suspension.
After watching the replay of the JR Smith blunder, it’s hilarious to see LeBron James pointing, yelling for Smith to go toward their basket.
JR Smith thought the Cavs were up and tried to run the clock out. Wow.
Warriors say Klay Thompson has a left lateral leg contusion and is being re-taped. They’re hopeful he returns.
It appears Klay Thompson’s return is questionable. Sounds like a leg injury.
Klay Thompson forced to leave the game after JR Smith inadvertently takes his legs out. He is headed to the locker room.
Kevon Looney is getting the start at center for the Warriors.
Cleveland forward Kevin Love (concussion) has been cleared to play tonight in Game 1 of The Finals against Golden State.
Kevin Durant is now literally soaring in his partnership with @AlaskaAir.
Kevin Durant, Tristan Thompson had a playful exchange upon entering the arena. “You better not switch on me defensively,” KD said. TT replied, “I’m switching out every time.” “Alright,” KD stated. “I got some new sh— in my bag for you.” TT countered with, “Yeah, we’ll see.”
Kevin Durant responds to ESPN on Bryan Colangelo situation: “I ain’t got nothing to say about that. It ain’t got sh— to do with me.”
Andre Iguodala: “I’m not too far” from returning.
Andre Iguodala is being listed as out for Game 1 of The Finals and will be re-evaluated prior to Game 2.
My video essay on the Warriors’ unconventional path to their fourth straight Finals appearance:
New Story: Stephen Curry’s outburst changed the game, Draymond Green proved to be accurate about Rockets: “You live by the 3, you die by the 3.”
ESPN Sources: Golden State forward Andre Iguodala sought second opinion on his knee, still trying to find remedy.
Draymond Green to ESPN on spraining his right ankle: “I told Chelsea (trainer) during the game I rolled my ankle badly and I don’t feel a thing right now. I know it was the adrenaline. After the game, wooooo. I’ll be good though.”
Per Elias: Golden State is the first team in postseason history to win multiple elimination games in same series when trailing 10-plus points at half. Warriors trailed by 10 at halftime in Game 6, and 11 at halftime tonight.
Round 4: Golden State, Cleveland.
Going back to how dominant Golden State has been in third quarters: They have outscored Houston by 68 points in the third in this series.
Draymond Green furious with Kevin Durant, urging him to come to the ball. It’s the second time he’s got on Durant about that tonight.
Stephen Curry returns to the bench. Doesn’t appear to have suffered an injury.
Stephen Curry is headed to the locker room and the training staff is following.
My brothas @stephenasmith and @RealMikeWilbon ain’t cutting a brotha no slack on the sneakers.
When Nick Young is done with his pregame shooting, he always dribbles the ball to the locker room. A Rockets ball boy followed him to confiscate the ball, leaving Warriors’ players puzzled. “He came over here for a ball?” a confused JaVale McGee asked.
New Story: It was Klay-Day:
China Klay has arrived.
ESPN Sources: Golden State forward Andre Iguodala will miss Game 6 of the WCF. It will be his third consecutive game sidelined with a leg injury.
Draymond Green confident Warriors will survive, telling ESPN: “We'll be back here for Game 7... You'd be a fool not to believe me.”
Steve Kerr: “I feel great about where we are right now. That might sound crazy...If we settle down a little bit, we’ll be in good shape.”
That’s why Game 4 was so costly for Warriors.
Andre Iguodala to ESPN on trying to get back on the court: “Last game was the plan. Tonight was the plan. So, it’s all about timing. Just trying to get it right. Make sure I can go.”
Golden State coach Steve Kerr says Andre Iguodala will not play tonight in Game 5 or the WCF at Houston.
After speaking with a few players, they didn’t sound optimistic Andre Iguodala would be playing tonight.
Steve Kerr calls the NFL’s new anthem policy “idiotic.”
Klay Thompson is returning to the bench.
ESPN Sources: Golden State expected to insert Kevon Looney into the starting lineup for Game 4 against Houston.
Andre Iguodala will not play tonight.
Warriors were hoping it would be overturned, believing Green did not initiate mini confrontation with Trevor Ariza. Green now has three techs, four away from one-game suspension.
Golden State forward Draymond Green will not have technical foul he received in Game 3 of WCF rescinded, league sources tell ESPN.
Stephen Curry tells ESPN he was scolded by his mom for his profanity outburst, but it was the outburst the Warriors needed.
The Warriors were 7-of-11 with James Harden as primary defender. That included a combined 6-of-7 by Stephen Curry and Kevin Durant. Golden State finished 8-of-14 (6-10 contested) against Harden.
Houston’s target is Stephen Curry. And if it continues, Kevin Durant says it’s up to everyone to defensively man up.’
The Rockets shot 7-of-15 on the 23 possessions Stephen Curry was the primary defender.
Houston targeted Stephen Curry on 23 plays tonight. It’s the most in a game this postseason. He was the primary defender on 20 plays in Game 1.
Curry was seen getting his right calf-area massaged in the last timoeut huddle.
This was Stephen Curry prior to checking back in midway in the fourth.
Kevin Durant was pulled from the game with two minutes left in the third and he yelled “why” at the bench. Then Rockets go on a run and he screams “why” again.
Incredible atmosphere inside Toyota Center. This has the makings to be an epic, highlight-filled series.
Warriors have been planning for weeks to have Kevin Durant guard James Harden in this series. We’ll see how it plays out.
Golden State will start Stephen Curry, Klay Thompson, Andre Iguodala, Kevin Durant and Draymond Green for Game 1 of the WCF against Houston.
The challenge Golden State has been waiting for all season long.
ESPN Sources: Sacramento center Kosta Koufos will exercise 2018-19 player option worth $8.7 million and return to club.
Houston has been focused on Golden State all season. And now the defending champs are ready to focus on them:
ESPN Sources: One of the women is a media member.
New Story: A sleepless night and a “long-ass” 4 a.m. text message is how Draymond Green got Kevin Durant and Warriors ready for Game 4.
Stephen Curry to ESPN on Rajon Rondo appearing to swipe his foot under him while airborne: “I got no comment. If the league wants to look into it, that’s on them. We’re trying to win Game 4.”
Andre Iguodala will move back to the bench and JaVale McGee receives the start at center.
No matter the state of Cavaliers, LeBron James still owns the Raptors. Nothing’s changed.
Golden State guard Patrick McCaw is making steady progress from a spine contusion and will be re-evaluated in four weeks.
Jimmy Butler has stressed to management that he wants Crawford to remain in Minnesota, sources say.
ESPN Sources: Minnesota guard Jamal Crawford to decline player option to become an unrestricted free agent.
Stephen Curry tells ESPN when he nailed the tunnel shot before the game on his second attempt, “I knew I was going to feel it.”
ESPN Sources: Spurs All-Star forward Kawhi Leonard and advisor are in San Antonio. Leonard spent nearly six weeks in New York rehabbing his injury. For the moment, there’s no scheduled date to meet with Spurs’ brass.
Warriors guard Stephen Curry will make his postseason debut tonight for Game 2 against the Pelicans.
Stephen Curry will not be on a minutes restriction.
Steve Kerr says Stephen Curry is probable for Game 2 against New Orleans on Tuesday.
ESPN Sources: Jeff Fish has resigned from his position as director of performance and head strength and conditioning coach with the Phoenix Suns. Fish was hired last summer.
ESPN Sources: Phoenix has removed Jay Triano from consideration for its head coaching position. Triano served as the interim coach. Assistant coach Ty Corbin has been relieved of his duties.
Stephen Curry tells ESPN the plan is to make his playoff debut on Tuesday, but says it's ultimately up to the medical staff. He said he would have played tonight for 20 minuets if it was up to him.
Portland forward Evan Turner (@thekidet) is attending tonight’s game between Warriors and Pelicans. He’s good friends with Andre Iguodala.
Sources: Steve Kerr informed the team this morning that Stephen Curry would not be a go tonight. Curry says he feels great. Kerr says it’s “very likely” he plays in Game 2.
Golden State guard Stephen Curry will not make his return tonight for Game 1 against New Orleans. The team is aiming for Game 2 on Tuesday.
With David Vanterpool running the defense, Trail Blazers finished seventh in defensive efficiency. At the 104:30 mark of this Damian Lillard/CJ McCollum interview, Vanterpool joined the dinner table to discuss his innovative coaching techniques.
Orlando has been granted permission to interview Portland assistant David Vanterpool for its vacant head coach position, league sources tell ESPN.
Inside how and why Draymond Green and assistant coach Jarron Collins worked behind the scenes to get JaVale McGee unleashed.
Stephen Curry went through his first full practice today and is listed as questionable for Game 1 on Saturday against New Orleans.
How Kevin Durant and the Warriors have adjusted without Stephen Curry.
Draymond Green at his best.
According to ESPN's BPI, Golden State has an 87 percent chance to advance past New Orleans in the second round. The series will begin Saturday.
Kevin Durant tells ESPN he inadvertently liked the IG comment that was critical of Russell Westbrook as he scrolled through his timeline. "No story here,” he said.
Haven’t seen the Warriors’ locker room this somber in quite some time. Most players at their locker stalls with heads down montitoring their phones.
Portland GM Neil Olshey: "You don't take four games and overreact and diminish what you've accomplished over 82 games...I would rather trust the team that I saw over 82 games than the team I saw over four games.”
New Orleans’ superb defensive tactic of continuously trapping Damian Lillard and CJ McCollum speaks to Portland’s imbalanced roster. Upgrades desperately needed.
ESPN Sources: Golden State guard Stephen Curry will begin participating in portions of practice starting tomorrow. His re-evaluation occurred today.
Kevin Durant tells ESPN “I’m good. It’s nothing” when asked about his ankle sprain. He said “it was a quick roll. It didn’t completely turn. I’m fine.” He’s a go for Sunday.
Kevin Durant walking to the locker room without a noticeable limp, which is positive considering it appeared he tweaked that left ankle pretty good.
Steve Kerr, understandably, didn’t have it in him to speak about the wife of Gregg Popovich passing away.
Golden State center JaVale McGee is questionable for Game 3 at San Antonio with a quad contusion.
ESPN Sources: Wake Forest center Doral Moore will forgo senior season and enter NBA Draft. He plans to hire an agent soon. The 7-foot-1 prospect averaged 11.1 points, 9.4 rebounds and 2.0 blocks this past season.
Gregg Popovich sits at the podium and picks up the Gatorade bottle with a smirk: “I shouldn’t be forced to sell.”
Mark Jackson will interview for the Knicks’ head coaching position on Wednesday, league sources tell ESPN.
Utah Jazz guard Donovan Mitchell underwent an MRI on his left foot and the results came back negative, league sources tell ESPN. He will play in Game 2 on Wednesday.
ESPN Sources: San Antonio forward Kawhi Leonard still has not been cleared by his medical team. He is improving, but will continue rehabbing in New York. There is no timetable on his return, but he is being examined routinely.
Stephen Curry has made functional progress from his MCL sprain and he’ll intensify his work load. Will be re-evaluated in one week.
Golden State expected to start JaVale McGee at center for Game 1 against San Antonio, league sources tell ESPN. It would be his fourth career playoff start.
One of the top free agents off the board.
My video essay that ran on @SportsCenter featuring @rudygobert27, @spidadmitchell: How the @utahjazz exceeded everyone’s expectations but their own.
Minnesota leads Denver at the half, 62-54. Will Barton keeping his team in it with 16 points. If you're not familiar with him, your intro:
If you missed it on @SportsCenter, my extended conversation with @Sixers rookie @BenSimmons25.
Golden State forward Kevin Durant plans to decline player option and become unrestricted free-agent to restructure contract, league sources tell ESPN. Story w/ @BobbyMarks42 breaking down the options.
Donovan Mitchell to ESPN on if he believes a true rookie is only deserving of the ROY award:
Utah rookie Donovan Mitchell to ESPN on Ben Simmons’ Rookie of the Year remarks: “I really don’t care...Clearly, I’m not the one losing sleep.”
Amongst players in the association, Perk is known as the ultimate teammate and may still be the fiercest enforcer around.
Philadelphia guard Ben Simmons tells ESPN “100 percent” he’s the Rookie of the Year and when asked what rookies have caught his attention, his response: “None.”
A conversation with @Sixers rookie sensation @BenSimmons25 scheduled to air this week on @SportsCenter. R.O.Y. chatter, dueling LeBron James, future of team, his goals and much more.
Very unfortunate situation for Omri Casspi. But should the Warriors repeat, he would be offered a championship ring. Casspi has never played in the postseason.
Golden State waives forward Omri Casspi to make room for the signing of Quinn Cook. The deadline to release a player on the final year of a guaranteed deal is April 8 at 5 pm ET.
Will Barton, who turned down an extension, looking forward to free-agency: “I want to be where I can be able to showcase my entire game on a regular basis, somewhere they really believe in me and are ready for me to have a bigger role."
ESPN Sources: Golden State forward Omri Casspi underwent MRI on right ankle and initial results revealed inflammation. MRI was sent to Dr. Richard Ferkel and he observed inflammation and bone bruise on side of foot, which is preventing him from running/jumping. He’s day-to-day.
Patrick McCaw will be re-evaluated in four weeks.
ESPN Sources: Portland guard Damian Lillard (left ankle sprain) will officially be ruled out of tonight’s game at Houston.
The Thrill’ Was Almost Gone: Behind-the-scenes story of how @Nuggets’ Will Barton (@WillTheThrillB5) became one of the most interesting players who figures to have an interesting free-agency this summer.
Story w/ @MarcJSpearsESPN: Golden State and Quinn Cook finalizing multi-year deal to become team's starting point guard when postseason play opens, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Reporting w/ @MarcJSpearsESPN, Golden State and Quinn Cook have entered into serious discussions on a multi-year deal.
Golden State forward Draymond Green rolled his left ankle during Tuesday's win over Oklahoma City. He tells ESPN, "I'll be fine." The team has the day off Wednesday.
ESPN Sources: Golden State forward Omri Casspi did not make team’s two-game road trip. He stayed back in Oakland to continue treatment on his troublesome right ankle.
Dallas center Nerlens Noel and Utah forward Thabo Sefolosha have been suspended five games each for violating the Anti-Drug program.
Atlanta expected to sign Damion Lee for remainder of season, league sources tell ESPN. Lee on the verge of wrapping up two consecutive 10-day contracts.
ESPN Sources: As Patrick McCaw laid in his hospital bed last night, a familiar face gave him a visit: Steve Kerr.
ESPN Sources: Golden State guard Patrick McCaw cleared all tests, including MRI, and expectation is he’ll be released from hospital today. No official diagnosis as of now and return timetable to be determined.
Latest on Golden State guard Patrick McCaw.
ESPN Sources: Golden State guard Patrick McCaw experienced numbness upon landing, but has since regained sensation in leg. A chest X-ray came back clear. He is awaiting results of CT Scan and will also undergo an MRI.
The entire Warriors team planned to drop by the hospital tonight to visit Patrick McCaw, but they’ve just been told he’s still going through testing and they hope to catch up with him tomorrow.
Steve Kerr did not address basketball-related questions. Everybody associated with the team thinking about Patrick McCaw.
After Warriors defeat Kings 112-96, Vince Carter walks over to Steve Kerr and coaching staff to apologize further.
Warriors say guard Patrick McCaw is being transported to UC Davis for further evaluation.
Both teams are huddling together in prayer as Patrick McCaw is carried away on a stretcher.
Not a good scene here in Sacramento. Patrick McCaw is inadvertently undercut by Vince Carter and falls awkwardly to the hardwood. He has been on the floor several minutes. Stretcher is on the way.
A local reporter questions whether Steve Kerr and Warriors are being contradictory by not attending the march led by Matt Barnes in honor of Stephon Clark.
Matt Barnes and Garrett Temple. #marchforaction
Sacramento guard Garrett Temple has arrived for the rally organized by Matt Barnes in aftermath of police gunning down Stephon Clark.
Golden State guard Klay Thompson tells ESPN he will return from a fractured right thumb tonight at Sacramento. He had missed the past eight games.
ESPN Sources: Steve Kerr addressed team this morning and reiterated it is up to them if they want to attend the rally Matt Barnes has organized in aftermath of Stephon Clark murder.
ESPN Sources: Golden State Warriors not expected to attend rally organized by Matt Barnes in honor of Stephon Clark, an unarmed African-American man who was gunned down by Sacramento police.
ESPN Exclusive: Kevin Durant finally provides an explanation to his technical, ejection uptick this season.
Kevin Durant has been tossed from the game with 2.4 seconds left in the second quarter.
Troy junior wing Jordon Varnado will declare for the NBA Draft, but will not hire an agent, league sources tell ESPN. He averaged 18.0 points and 7.0 boards this past season.
Philadelphia Center Joel Embiid underwent a CT scan, which revealed an orbital fracture of his left eye. Surgery will be performed in the coming days and further updates will be provided as appropriate. He’s also been diagnosed with a concussion.
ESPN Sources: WNBA legend Tina Thompson to be inducted into Naismith Basketball Hall of Fame as part of 2018 class. She’s a 4-time champ, 9-time All-Star, 2-time Olympic gold medalist, WNBA’s second all-time leading scorer and currently associate head coach at Texas.
Portland All-Star guard Damian Lillard to miss Wednesday's game in Memphis to attend the birth of first child.
ESPN Sources: Damian Lillard will fly home for the birth of his child after just dropping 41 points and leading Portland to a win in New Orleans. He will miss Wednesday’s game at Memphis.
Golden State forward Kevin Durant (ribs) to ESPN: “You can tell them I’m playing Thursday” when Milwaukee comes to town. Tonight, Durant is missing his sixth straight game.
Steve Kerr said he’ll probably let Kevin Durant (ribs) play on Thursday against the Milwaukee Bucks.
ESPN Sources: Markelle Fultz will not be on minutes restriction, per se, but his fitness level and situation of game will dictate how much he plays.
Damian Lillard, CJ McCollum giving their candid, comedic thoughts on revealing the All-Star Draft. Full 90-minute interview -&gt;
Stephen Curry says hopefully he'll prove Steve Kerr wrong and try to get back during the first round.
Stephen Curry will address the media today at 5:15 pm PT.
New Column: Stephen Curry’s ankles — and knee — will determine if season is truly a success or not and how Quinn Cook has become the most important two-way player in the league.
Kevin Durant sustained this exact injury last season along with a tibial bone bruise. Indeed, great news for Warriors.
Stephen Curry to ESPN: “Well, at least it’s not my ankle.” He said he’s in good spirits. Walked with a minor limp, but was in a good mood, which wasn’t the case hours ago.
Kevin Durant to ESPN on Warriors health situation: “Crazy.”
ESPN Sources: Golden State guard Stephen Curry suffered an MCL sprain and will undergo an MRI on Saturday.
Stephen Curry suffered a left knee strain and will not return.
Stephen Curry limping to the locker room with what appears a left ankle sprain. He’s struggling to move.
The full conversation here.
Full 90-min conversation w/ @Dame_Lillard, @CJMcCollum ready for your viewing pleasure. Dame on recruiting Carmelo, CJ ranking journalists, debating new All-Star formats, assistant David Vanterpool joins dinner table &amp; much more never-before-seen footage.
ESPN Exclusive: For first time in his Under Armour signature line tenure, Stephen Curry will wear a mid-low sneaker when he returns from ankle injury.
Charlotte center Dwight Howard has been suspended one game for accumulating his 16th technical.
Excerpts from hour-plus conversation w/ Damian Lillard, CJ McCollum. Topics include Rockets, trades, LeBron’s next move, Dame being compared to Steph, importance of assistant David Vanterpool and more:
ESPN Sources: Reporting with @ramonashelburne that Golden State is targeting a Stephen Curry return of Friday against Atlanta:
Part II snippet of my hour-plus conversation with Portland’s Damian Lillard and CJ McCollum. With the red-hot Trail Blazers hosting Rockets on Tuesday, a stern warning was issued:
LeBron James asked if Damian Lillard is underappreciated: “Give me Damian Lillard. I’ll show you how appreciated he’ll be.”
ESPN Sources: Golden State guard Klay Thompson suffered a fractured right thumb and could miss a few weeks.
ESPN Sources: Golden State guard Klay Thompson has a fractured right thumb and will be re-evaluated next Thursday, March 22.
New Orleans will not re-sign guard Walter Lemon, Jr., league sources tell ESPN. He completed two 10-day contracts.
Memphis will not extend a second 10-day contract to guard Xavier Rathan-Mayes, league sources tell ESPN.
Stephen Curry (ankle) is out for Wednesday’s game against the Lakers, the day of his 30th birthday. He will be re-evaluated on Mar. 20.
A four-minute snippet of my conversation with Damian Lillard and CJ McCollum that ran on SC.
Part 1 of my conversation with Damian Lillard and CJ McCollum coming up now on @SportsCenter. Part 2 airs next week and then the full hour-long sitdown will be posted on ESPN’s YouTube page.
Atlanta Hawks and guard Antonius Cleveland plan to execute a multiyear deal that would guarantee his contract for the remainder of the season, league sources tell ESPN.
Atlanta Hawks are expected to sign Damion Lee of G-League’s Santa Cruz Warriors to a 10-day contract, league sources tell ESPN. Lee is engaged to the sister of Stephen Curry.
My latest: Keeping it 100 in hour-long conversation with Portland’s @Dame_Lillard and @CJMcCollum over dinner. Part 1 to air Monday on late edition of SportsCenter. A serious, bold, open, comedic discussion.
Draymond Green to ESPN on how he picked up his 15th technical: “All I said was that’s two,” in reference to two fouls called against them. His next T is an automatic one-game ejection.
Damian Lillard to ESPN after his Portland Trail Blazers defeated the Golden State Warriors, 125-108: "We're the real deal."
Change of plans, Stephen Curry will not make the trip to Portland.
Klay Thompson tells ESPN he experienced some soreness in his hip tonight, but says “I’ll be fine. It’s nothing serious.”
Stephen Curry will not return tonight.
Stephen Curry's right ankle is being re-taped and he will perform functionality tests. His return is to be determined.
Stephen Curry heads to the locker room after spraining that right ankle again.
For those who have inquired, the full hour-long conversation — and devouring of shrimp — with Kevin Durant and Michael Beasley is here for your consumption:
Golden State forward David West (arm) will not play tonight against Brooklyn, league source tells ESPN.
To my Fresno/ Central Cali folks, please support my cousin’s event. It’s for a great cause.
Two of the best in Dallas market: @JJT_Journalist and @clarencehilljr.
Stephen Curry taking the rest of the night off is being described as precautionary measure.
Stephen Curry will not return to tonight’s game against the Hawks with a tweaked right ankle.
Stephen Curry returns to the bench.
Stephen Curry is headed for the locker room, walking on his own power. It doesn’t appear to be a serious injury.
Stephen Curry appears to have mildly sprained his right ankle, the same ankle injury that kept him out much of December. He’s walking on it and being looked at by the team trainer.
And if only interested in watching the video, here you go:
My conversation with @KDTrey5 and @Michael8easley in a condensed 5-minute video, but also includes excerpts from our hour-long sitdown interview.
Tune into @SportsCenter now for brand new portion of my sitdown with Kevin Durant and Michael Beasley.
Jarell Eddie expected to sign a 10-day contract with the Chicago Bulls, league sources tell ESPN. The small forward to get the call-up from G-League’s Windy City Bulls.
Warriors had 40 students from Seat Pleasant area — Durant’s hometown — attend the African American Museum with them on Tuesday. Today, they will provide 30 tickets for additional students in same area for game against Wizards.
New Story: You think you know him, but these behind the scenes tales of Stephen Curry — the ultimate teammate, savant, leader who briefly pondered a Barack Obama team visit — takes you inside his world.
A small snippet of my hour-long sitdown with childhood friends Kevin Durant and Michael Beasley that airs Wednesday. A genuine, candid conversation over lobster and shrimp:
Golden State Warriors will celebrate their championship in D.C. today by touring the African American Museum with students from Seat Pleasant, the hometown of Kevin Durant.
Zaza Pachulia on Russell Westbrook’s claim that he intentionally tried to hurt him: “No comment. That’s childish. Come on. I’m not responding to that.”
Kevin Durant and Carmelo Anthony had to be separated.
Golden State expected to start JaVale McGee at center tonight against LA Clippers, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Reporting w/ @ramonashelburne on what Warriors plan to do in D.C. since White House invite was withdrawn’ by president Donald Trump.
Kyrie Irving on the competitive nature of this year’s All-Star Game: “The hope is that it’s only going to get better.”
I think it’s safe to say the new format and financial incentives helped in making this All-Star game a competitive bout. Stephen Curry couldn’t even see the rim in the closing seconds.
Jimmy Butler didn’t play in the first half. He participated in the final NBA game before the break and logged 41 minutes in a comeback victory over Lakers. He seems to be taking it easy tonight.
This All-Star game atmosphere has the feel of a U.S. Open.
ESPN Exclusive: Most players do not share Giannis Antetokounmpo’s perspective on allowing fans to hawk his items, but he explains why he doesn’t mind: That used to be me.’
LeBron James said there were multiple years he seriously considered entering Slam Dunk Contest, but says minor injuries occurred. The 05-06 season was a year he intended to compete in.
ESPN Sources: The revealing of the final two players selected in the inuagural NBA All-Star Draft and why it's a concern.
Stephen Curry inadvertently head-butted a team security official during his pregame warmup. Curry obviously fine. That’s why blood was being wiped off the court prior to tip off.
Steve Kerr’s powerful message on the shooting massacre in Florida.
Golden State guard Patrick McCaw suffered a small fracture in his left wrist and will be out approximately four weeks, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: John Wall and Marcin Gortat met privately to air their grievances.
Suns young star Devin Booker to ESPN.
ESPN Story: Suns' Devin Booker, Jared Dudley and coach Jay Triano weigh in on Steve Kerr's decision to give his players the keys to the timeout huddle.
Jared Dudley to ESPN on Steve Kerr allowing his players to coach. “It shows a lack of respect for an opponent, and maybe right now, we don’t deserve respect. When you keep getting beat by 40, teams won’t respect you. But it’s up to us to change that.”
Suns coach Jay Triano to ESPN: “I noticed their plays were a little better tonight,” he joked. “Nah, I didn’t have a problem with what Steve did.”
Steve Kerr on why he let his players coach tonight’s game against Phoenix.
Wonder if Paul Pierce would rather accept an Isaiah Thomas tribute video or a LeBron James team routing the Celtics before his retirement ceremony?
Sources: Could possibly play Wednesday versus Knicks, but won’t know for certain until post operation.
Washington guard Tim Frazier, who suffered a nose fracture last night against Chicago, will undergo surgery today, league sources tell ESPN.
The state of the Golden State Warriors.
Reporting w/ @NotoriousOHM. ESPN Sources: Isaiah Thomas to come off the bench when he makes his Lakers debut tonight at Dallas.
ESPN Sources: Memphis, Brandan Wright negotiating a buyout.
Brandan Wright and Memphis Grizzlies are working toward a buyout, league sources tell ESPN. He’ll be coveted by contending teams.
Golden State forward Draymond Green has been fined $50,000 for directing inappropriate language toward a game official.
Kemba Walker will be added to the All-Star game.
Memphis has kept guard Tyreke Evans, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Cleveland never approached LeBron James about waiving his no-trade clause. The team committed to righting ship with hopes of retaining James.
Isaiah Thomas’ Boston tribute video will still have to wait until next season. Lakers already visited Boston on Nov. 8.
Cleveland Cavaliers have traded Isaiah Thomas to the Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell ESPN.
Draymond Green bypassing media tonight. “Nah, I’m going to save my money.”
The Warriors have dropped three of their last four. Steve Kerr said “We’re out of whack right now...It’s been a struggle.”
Personal foul on the hardwood.
That was one of the worst calls all year!!!
The NBA has fined the Lakers $50,000 for violating the league’s anti-tampering rule. It is in response to statements regarding Bucks’ Giannis Antetokounmpo made by Magic Johnson in an interview.
ESPN Sources: Milwaukee guard Matthew Dellavedova expected to miss 3-4 weeks with ankle sprain.
Milwaukee Bucks guard Matthew Dellavedova expected to be sideline 3-4 weeks with a Grade 3 right ankle sprain, league sources tell ESPN.
If Tom Brady pull this ish off...
Denver upsets Golden State, winning 115-108. The Warriors unraveled down the stretch. They have lost two of their last three games.
ESPN Sources: Phoenix plans to suspend Marquese Chriss for one game.
Phoenix Suns plan to suspend forward Marquese Chriss for a game stemming from a verbal confrontation with an assistant coach, league sources tell ESPN.
While Golden State Warriors are being introduced to the Sacramento Kings' crowd, the jumbotron is showing the Golden Girls opening theme song.
Damian Lillard is 1 of 8 players all-time with 10,000 points and 2,500 assists in their first six seasons, joining Michael Jordan, LeBron James, Larry Bird, Nate Archibald, Pete Maravich, Dave Bing and Oscar Robertson.
ESPN Sources: Steve Kerr will not face discipline for inadvertent tweet critical of league.
Steve Kerr on his tweet referencing James Harden. He said it was meant to be a DM.
Miami guard Goran Dragic will replace Kevin Love in the All-Star Game after the forward fractured his hand on Tuesday.
ESPN Sources: LeBron James could meet with Golden State Warriors during free-agency.
WTF
Kevin Durant upon hearing about James Harden’s historical evening: “Damn. Goodness gracious.”
Steve Kerr called his team’s play “pathetic.”
Golden State suffers worst loss of season. Utah defeats defending champs 129-99. Nightlife wins tonight.
Andre Drummond will replace John Wall in the All-Star game.
Draymond Green tells ESPN he believes Boston guard Jaylen Brown should be an All-Star. With John Wall out, Adam Silver must select injury replacement.
ESPN Sources: In an attempt to increase competitive nature of NBA All-Star games, players on winning team to now pocket $100,000 each.
LA Clippers guard Lou Williams to participate in the Skills Challenge during All-Star Weekend, league sources tell ESPN.
New Story: The foundation, characters, sequences that make @StephenCurry30’s spectacular pregame routine a must-see show before the show.
If DeMarcus Cousins is not able to play in the All-Star Game, and hopefully he can, Adam Silver — not LeBron James — would pick the injury replacement.
Kevin Durant on how he heard about being the No. 1 pick and if he thought about pulling an Eli Manning.
It’s clear that LeBron James selected Kevin Durant with the first pick of the 2018 NBA All-Star Draft.
Miami Heat guard Wayne Ellington plans to participate in the 3-Point Contest at All-Star Weekend, league sources tell ESPN.
Stephen Curry tells ESPN he will not participate in 3-Point Contest this year, but says he’s not retired from the event. “Think about why,” he said. Next year it’s in Charlotte.
Draymond Green tells ESPN he has been asked to participate in the Skills Challenge. The All-Star power forward is mulling it over.
ESPN Sources: Milwaukee part ways with assistants Tim Grgurich and Eric Hughes. Both were close to Jason Kidd. Grg is legendary in coaching, skill development profession.
With Golden State getting four All-Stars, it will be the first time in NBA history that a team has had four in consecutive years.
Chris Paul, Paul George and Lou Williams appear to be All-Star snubs.
ESPN Sources: Wizards guard John Wall has been selected to be a Eastern Conference All-Star reserve.
Feel pretty good about my WC All-Star predictions from Monday.
ESPN Sources: Minnesota forward Karl-Anthony Towns has been voted in to make his first All-Star appearance as a Western Conference reserve.
ESPN Sources: Portland guard Damian Lillard has been voted in to be a Western Conference All-Star reserve.
ESPN Sources: Minnesota guard Jimmy Butler has been voted by coaches to be a Western Conference All-Star reserve.
ESPN Sources: Golden State Warriors to get four All-Stars. Draymond Green and Klay Thompson voted in by coaches as reserves.
ESPN Sources: Portland star Damian Lillard requested a private meeting with owner Paul Allen to discuss direction of franchise.
Jason Kidd tells ESPN he plans to pursue another NBA coaching gig when the opportunity presents itself: “Can’t wait to get another job.”
Far from it, my fellow journalist @JNowa23.
All three head coaches fired in-season have been black: Earl Watson, David Fizdale and Jason Kidd.
Sources: Jason Kidd hasn’t been officially told yet. Giannis Antetokounmpo is devastated.
Philadelphia 76ers center Joel Embiid and Portland Trail Blazers guard Damian Lillard have been named the NBA Eastern and Western Conference Players of the Week.
And although NBA has ditched the East-West All-Star format, if a player is injured before the game, I'm told the replacement would still come out of the conference of the injured player.
My EC All-Star Reserves: G: John Wall, Bradley Beal F: Kristaps Porzingis, Al Horford, Kevin Love WC: Victor Oladipo, Kyle Lowry My WC All-Star Reserves: G: Jimmy Butler, Russell Westbrook F: LaMarcus Aldridge, Karl-Anthony Towns, Draymond Green WC: Klay Thompson, Damian Lillard
New Story: Golden State dismisses narrative that Houston is a problem.
Shaun Livingston doing his best to keep Draymond Green calm in the huddle. Green not too happy with the shot selections.
The initial diagnosis of Jordan Bell is inflammation of the left ankle and will be re-evaluated in two weeks.
Captain Stephen Curry disappointed Draymond Green wasn’t voted an All-Star starter, says four Warriors should make it and his take on if selections should be televised.
Portland guard @Dame_Lillard tells ESPN he's looking to end two-year All-Star drought and continues to absorb multiple slights in stride: 'I feel like I should be there.'
Warriors rookie Jordan Bell is in a walking boot and will undergo an MRI on Thursday.
Draymond Green and Andre Iguodala will not play tonight at Chicago.
All this NBA mayhem on Martin Luther King Day. 
Stephen Curry to ESPN on his third-quarter dunk: “It took everything in me to get up there.”
Kevin Durant on the cold showers: “Man, they got to do something in The Q. Somebody call Bron.”
Golden State players complaining because the locker room showers don’t have any hot water. Players are coming out shivering.
After Golden State defeats Cleveland 118-108, LeBron James seeks out only Kevin Durant for an embrace before heading to the locker room.
Tyronn Lue asked why he still thinks the Cavs are the best team in the East: “Because we have the best player in the world.”
Steve Kerr on what Dr. Martin Luther King would think about today’s society: “He would be less than inspired by the leadership in our country. No doubt about that.”
ESPN Sources: Kevin Durant has initiated the process of positioning himself to own an NBA team following his playing career.
I asked Draymond Green about his pre-game routine in cold weather cities and and he confessed his love for Luther Vandross songs.
Referee Courtney Kirkland will officiate his first Warriors game since the altercation with Shaun Livingston last month. Livingston joked, “I don’t want no trouble tonight.” Expect them to embrace at some point tonight.
Stephen Curry will return to the lineup this evening at Toronto after missing the last two games with a right ankle sprain.
David West added the fan screamed “F—— you b——. You mother———“ to Klay Thompson.
Klay Thompson tells ESPN the fan called him a “b——.” He said “it was just unnecessary.”
Utah guard Rodney Hood has been fined $35,000 for slapping a cell phone out of a fan's hand.
ESPN Sources: Golden State guard Stephen Curry (ankle) will not play tonight against Milwaukee.
New Story: Draymond Green tells ESPN that Warriors should get four All-Stars in February’s game and if that occurs, history would be made.
Kevin Durant on Lou Williams: “He ordered 50-piece nuggets on us tonight.”
Steve Kerr on the Clippers coming in their building and winning by 19: “They came in and just kicked our ass.”
Stephen Curry said his ankle sprain isn’t serious and he hopes to be back Friday or Saturday. Said it’s more of a mental thing, having just came back from the same injury.
The expectation is that Kevin Durant will be on a minutes restriction tonight.
It’s the same ankle that caused Curry to miss 11 games in December.
ESPN Source: Stephen Curry sustained a sprained right ankle and will be held out of tonight’s game against the Clippers.
Kevin Durant tells ESPN its pretty special to me’ to be 25 points shy of 20,000 to become the second-youngest player to reach that mark.
I asked Dr. Dre if Detox is permanently shelved and he replied, “I’m working on a couple songs right now. We’ll see.”
Dr. Dre and Jimmy Iovine attending today’s Warriors practice.
After David West played his 1000th game on Monday, the Warriors ageless big man tells ESPN he would have retired two years ago if opted into his Indiana contract.
Steve Kerr weighs in on LaVar Ball, ESPN.
Steve Kerr called LaVar Ball the “Kardashian of the NBA.”
Kevin Durant will miss his third consecutive game tonight with a right calf strain. Golden State will host Denver.
ESPN Sources: Lakers guard Kentavious Caldwell-Pope to be released from Seal Beach Detention Center Monday morning.
ESPN Sources: Detroit plans to guarantee the contract of Eric Moreland for remainder of season. The forward received his first career start tonight.
Stephen Curry has drained 28 triples in the four games since returning from his ankle injury. He's shooting 54 percent in that span.
Stephen Curry has 40 points with four minutes left in the third quarter.
Blake Griffin suffered a concussion and will not return.
Blake Griffin rises to his feet and heads to the locker room. He was elbowed in the head by JaVale McGee.
Kevin Durant (calf) will not play this afternoon against the Clippers.
Draymond Green became the franchise leader in triple-doubles accumulated. He earned his 21st after defeating the Rockets with a line of 17 points, 14 rebounds and 10 assists.
Houston plans to waive point guard Bobby Brown, league sources tell ESPN. He’s a favorite of James Harden and Trevor Ariza. He could be brought back in future.
Rookie Jordan Bell to ESPN on the two mini altercations last night with Salah Mejri and Devin Harris in Dallas. Asked if he felt targeted from when he threw the ball off the glass and dunked it with the game already decided on Oct. 23.
Kevin Durant hurt his right calf it in the first quarter of last night’s win over Dallas and played through it.
Golden State forward Kevin Durant (calf strain) will not play tonight at Houston.
The Rockets may be obsessed with beating the Warriors, but the champs aren’t reciprocating at the moment.
ESPN Sources: Portland guard Damian Lillard will make his return tonight at Cleveland after missing the last five games with a hamstring injury.
Happy New Year from my family to yours!
LAC guard Austin Rivers (right Achilles strain) to be held out of today’s game against Charlotte, league sources tell ESPN. The expectation is he returns Tuesday for Memphis.
Stephen Curry’s spectacular, 10-triples return.
Draymond Green chose not to address media tonight after being ejected in the second quarter: “Nah, I’m going to save my money.”
Stephen Curry has a season-high eight triples. He's up to 32 points on 11-14 shooting, and 8-10 from beyond the arc in 22 minutes of play. 4:36 left in the third.
Stephen Curry with 21 points on 7-of-9 from the field, 5-of-7 from downtown and there's 1:49 remaining in the first half. He hasn't missed a beat after almost a month off.
Draymond Green is ejected after picking up his second technical of the game with 9:45 left in the second quarter.
Stephen Curry played the first eight minutes of the game and produced 7 points on 3-of-4 shooting. He had two layups and a triple from the top of the key.
What the Warriors learned without Stephen Curry.
ESPN Source: After third and final re-evaluation, Stephen Curry has been cleared to play Saturday against Memphis.
James Harden gave the game away.
Steve Kerr says it’s doubtful that Stephen Curry returns on Friday against Charlotte. Says it’s more likely he may go Saturday when Memphis comes to town.
Highly recommend attending a Santa Cruz @GLeagueWarriors game. It’s a packed, electric atmosphere. I’m pleasantly surprised.
Christmas Day edition of Run AMC podcast w/ guest Rich Paul. We talk Nerlens Noel’s contract, Eric Bledsoe’s situation, LeBron’s next move, music &amp; more.
Kevin Durant to ESPN on the Cavs’ ejection pleas: They didn’t want to win that way.’
Kevin Durant asked why he wants to guard LeBron James primarily: “I just like guarding my position. A small forward is supposed to guard a small forward.”
Now Draymond Green picks up a tech.
Kevin Durant picks up a technical for arguing that he was fouled on that 3-Pointer.
When it was time for the media to exit the Cavs' locker room, an energetic LeBron James screamed "Yeah, let's get this mother------ started." He's apparently ready for this game.
Zaza Pachulia (shoulder) and Shaun Livingston (knee) will play today against Cleveland.
Hopping on @SportsCenter momentarily to discuss Draymond Green’s injury and Nuggets snapping Warriors’ 11-game winning streak.
The X-Ray results on Draymond Green’s left elbow came back negative. He is expected to play Christmas Day against the Cleveland Cavaliers.
Draymond Green getting an X-Ray on his left elbow.
Kevin Durant emerges from the locker room singing @MonicaBrown’s “It’s just one of them days.”
Golden State was 3for-27 from beyond the arc in the loss to Denver. It’s the Warriors' worst 3-point percentage under Steve Kerr (since 2014-15).
Klay Thompson tells ESPN that if he makes the All-Star team, he will compete in the 3-Point Contest. He said, “I’ve got to win another one.”
Lonzo Ball had 24 points and was 5-of-6 from deep: “He likes to shoot against us,” said Steve Kerr. “Apparently he can’t shoot against anybody else but he shoots against us.”
Stephen Curry, for the first time since spraining his ankle, is taking the court for his routine pregame workout regimen. Steve Kerr said there’s 99.9 percent chance he’s not playing Christmas Day.
Portland All-Star guard Damian Lillard (hamstring strain), who is out tonight against Denver, also expected to miss Saturday’s game at Los Angeles Lakers as a precaution, league sources tell ESPN. The next game for Trail Blazers would be hosting Philadelphia Dec. 28.
Golden State becomes fourth team in NBA history to rack up a double-digit winning streak in five consecutive seasons.
Golden State will be without Draymond Green (shoulder), Zaza Pachulia (shoulder), Shaun Livingston (knee) and Andre Iguodala (flu-like symptoms) tonight against Memphis.
Golden State Warriors say Stephen Curry is progressing from his ankle injury, but will be re-evaluated in one week. He’ll miss the Christmas Day game against Cleveland.
ESPN Sources: Fans uttered anti-gay slurs at Portland star Damian Lillard last night in Minnesota.
Don’t know how I missed this. Will Barton, ladies and gentlemen.
Milwaukee Bucks plan to sign guard Sean Kilpatrick, league sources tell ESPN. Brooklyn released him last week to make room for Jahlil Okafor trade.
Payton II started six games for Bucks. This is not a popular move within the locker room.
Milwaukee plans to waive guard Gary Payton II in the coming days, league sources tell ESPN. His 45 days of service as a two-way player ends Monday.
Portland's @Dame_Lillard doing his best to single-handedly steal this game. He has 39 points with 4:22 left in the contest. Golden State leads 103-95.
Warriors say Nick Young suffered a concussion and will not return to tonight's game against Trail Blazers. He will enter the concussion protocol.
Nick Young, who took a shot to the head by an inadvertent clash with teammate Jordan Bell, has gone to the locker room with team trainer.
Golden State forward Draymond Green (shoulder soreness) will be held out of tonight’s game against Portland.
Golden State forward Kevin Durant and Indiana guard Victor Oladipo have been named the Western and Eastern Conference Players of the Week.
Kevin Durant and Draymond Green told in locker room that they combined for 38 points, 16 rebounds, 20 assists, 11 blocks. Green says “That’s impressive. I only had two points, but that’s impressive.”
Kevin Durant’s closest friend @RMBWilliams is our Podcast guest. He discusses how he met KD, living in OKC, why the move to The Bay, relationship with Russ and if KD would ever return to OKC. All this and more.
Stephen Curry to ESPN: "I wanted to play here at home in Charlotte, but it's better it happened now rather than later in the season."
Golden State plans to start rookie Jordan Bell tonight at Charlotte in place of Draymond Green (shoulder soreness), league sources tell ESPN.
Draymond Green (shoulder soreness) will not play tonight at Charlotte.
ESPN Sources: MRI results came back negative on Stephen Curry’s sprained right ankle. Everything is stable and intact. He will be revaluated in two weeks.
No surprise here, but league sources tell ESPN that Golden State guard Stephen Curry (right ankle sprain) will not play Wednesday at Charlotte. MRI results expected later in day.
New ESPN Story: In what is being dubbed the "LaVar Ball rule," Los Angeles Lakers enforcing a postgame policy prohibiting media to interview guests of players after games.
Appears official Courtney Kirkland walked into space of Shaun Livingston, initiating the forehead contact. Will be interesting to see how league views it.
Stephen Curry still noticeably grimacing, bothered by ring finger on shooting hand. He tells ESPN it hasn’t gotten better. “It’s not going away anytime soon. It’s something I’ll have to play through.”
Golden State says Stephen Curry (right hand contusion), Kevin Durant (sprained left ankle), David West (left lateral knee soreness) and Klay Thompson (sprained right ankle) are a go tonight at Orlando. Andre Iguodala (sore left knee) will sit it out.
Golden State now says Stephen Curry (right hand contusion), Kevin Durant (sprained left ankle), Andre Iguodala (sore left knee) and David West (left lateral knee soreness) are probable tomorrow against Orlando. Klay Thompson (sprained left ankle) is questionable.
If you’re in need of basketball comedy, a trip down memory lane.
Golden State says Stephen Curry (right hand contusion), Kevin Durant (sprained left ankle), Andre Iguodala (sore left knee), Klay Thompson (sprained left ankle) and David West (left lateral knee soreness) are questionable tomorrow against Orlando.
LaVar Ball on a “crucial” opportunity that was missed that could have defeated the Warriors.
New Story: In an exclusive ESPN interview, Stephen Curry recalls when he was once in Lonzo Ball’s shoes.
The First Commandment: Do not bring experimental dishes to the Thanksgiving table or thee shall catch these hands! Happy Thanksgiving everyone.
Kevin Durant and mother Wanda tell ESPN the focus on OKC and Russell Westbrook has gone too far.
Kevin Durant on the Russell Westbrook (non) confrontation.
Steve Kerr says his team lost focused at times and he demonstrated how.
This is a very entertaining game within the game.
Draymond Green and Russell Westbrook had a clapping contest.
Here’s how Kevin Durant was received.
Draymond Green as he’s getting ready to respond to Joel Embiid’s latest classic jab: “He’s fing hilarious. Man, I love that dude.”
Kevin Durant: “I feel good right now. I plan on playing.”
Kevin Durant arrived to the arena for shootaround about 45 minutes before his team to get some on-court work in. There’s no way he wasn’t playing tonight.
Golden State forward Kevin Durant (ankle sprain) has been upgraded to probable for tonight’s game against Oklahoma City, league source tells ESPN.
Kevin Durant on if he’ll play at OKC tomorrow night: “I don’t know. We’ll see how it feels in the morning.”
Golden State forward Kevin Durant (ankle sprain) is questionable for tomorrow night against Oklahoma City. He fully practiced today.
Stephen Curry and Kevin Durant getting shots up at St. John’s University.
X-ray results of Paul Millsap’s wrist came back negative, league sources tell ESPN. Huge relief for Denver. There was fear of a fracture.
Stephen Curry to ESPN warning those who are dangerously attempting the #CurryChallenge: 'Be very mindful of the repercussions.'
Brooklyn Nets rookie Jarrett Allen (@_bigjayy_) hosting a neat, worthwhile holiday event on Monday.
Kevin Durant (ankle sprain) tells ESPN “I’m not sure” if he’ll be able to go Wednesday at OKC: “I’m just going to take it day by day and see how it progresses.”
Steve Kerr weighs in on the Donald Trump, LaVar Ball back and forth.
Steve Kerr on Donald Trump and LaVar Ball fued: “Two people seeking attention and they’re both getting it.” Asked if it’s possible if we stop covering both.
Omri Casspi will receive the start tonight against Brooklyn in place of Kevin Durant.
Kevin Durant (ankle sprain) will be ruled as day-to-day, I’m told. Warriors’ next game is Wednesday at OKC.
Golden State Warriors forward Kevin Durant has a left ankle sprain and will not play tonight against the Brooklyn Nets.
Golden State’s epic comeback victory over Philadelphia.
Stephen Curry irritated that his quotes about meeting Boston in the Finals were taken out of context.
After allowing Sixers to score 47 in first quarter, Warriors return the favor with their own 47 total in the third. Sixers only scored 15. Golden State lead 99-89.
The Warriors start the third quarter off outscoring Sixers 33-16. Just like that, they’re only down four after facing a 22-point halftime deficit.
This speaks volumes.
Sixers put up 47 first-quarter points on the Warriors. They’re up 19 going into the second. Had a lead big as 21 at one point.
Philadelphia has jumped out on Golden State, leading 38-20 with three minutes left in the first.
Draymond Green was asked about Kyrie Irving getting it going down the stretch: “He got to the free throw line a lot. That was it. He didn’t make no shots. He got to the free throw line. Whether they were fouls or not is another discussion.”
Steve Kerr on Draymond Green getting called for a foul late on Kyrie Irving: “I just watched the tape. There was no foul. Tough call.”
Boston Celtics extends league-high winning streak to 14 with 92-88 victory over Golden State Warriors.
ESPN Source: Golden State Warriors guard Stephen Curry (right thigh contusion) will play tonight against the Boston Celtics.
Draymond Green on people who say stick to sports: “That’s funny, because people think they can speak basketball.”
At Harvard, Draymond Green was asked if he has aspirations to get into politics, but he said he doesn’t know enough about it. A student yelled, “You know more than Trump.”
Draymond Green expounds upon eliminating “owner” tag and addresses Mark Cuban at Harvard.
Most Valuable Professor? @StephenCurry30 partners with @MasterClass to teach online basketball courses and tells ESPN what students can expect.
Golden State guard Stephen Curry will be sidelined for tonight’s game against Orlando with right thigh contusion. Ruled questionable prior. Shaun Livingston to start.
WTF
A story I wrote a few years back on the tragedy and success of Warriors’ talented two-way player Quinn Cook (@QCook323):
Golden State Warriors say Stephen Curry is questionable Monday against the Orlando Magic with a right thigh contusion.
Rest In Peace to a westside Fresno coaching legend, Tone Perry. If @dbgurufresno said you’re a killer,’ you felt validated. A documentary on his life, and the many lives he touched, is warranted.
Draymond Green complimentary of Joel Embiid’s trash talking and says officials shouldn’t have gave a double T to Embiid and Kevin Durant. Says let them talk and move on.
Kevin Durant on his verbal exchange with Joel Embiid. “He talks a lot of sh. Needed some energy so I knew if threw a couple words at him, he’ll hype me up.” Says it’s nothing personal between the two.
Kevin Durant and Joel Embiid have words that draws a double technical.
Interesting pregame ritual...
Stephen Curry to ESPN on what Ben Simmons and Joel Embiid have been able to do together: "They're animals, playing at a very high level right now. It seems like they got a lot of momentum with the roster and those guys being healthy. It's great for the...
Golden State forward Andre Iguodala (rest) will be inactive for tonight's game vs. Philadelphia.
Regarding Kevin Durant’s evolution on defense, Draymond Green — in his own candid way — said we’re late to the party.
New Story: Kevin Durant opens up to ESPN on constant fears driving him to becoming a better defender, his transformation, and why he’s now playing at All-Defensive level.
On today’s “Run AMC” podcast, coach @Earl_Watson joins the show. @AminESPN, @MarcJSpearsESPN, and myself with coach for an hour. He explains what went down in Phoenix, what’s ahead for him and more. Drops in a few hours.
Kevin Durant (thigh contusion) tells ESPN he expects to play Saturday against Philadelphia.
Andre Iguodala will start in place of Kevin Durant tonight against T-Wolves.
Kevin Durant has a left thigh contusion and will not play tonight against T-Wolves.
In his first interview since the trade, Eric Bledsoe (@EBled2) tells ESPN: “I felt like with where Phoenix was headed, it was time for me to move on.”
Great pickup for Milwaukee in wide open East. Antetokounmpo, Brogdon, Bledsoe a perimeter nightmare for opposition on both ends.
Eric Bledsoe being traded the morning he intended to use Suns’ facility for the first time since being sent home. Coincidence?
Steve Kerr, again, voiced his frustration with gun laws in aftermath of Texas mass shooting.
Andre Iguodala makes great points in defending Draymond Green, David West on how a lot of people feel in 2017.
After Mark Cuban criticized Draymond Green for his “owner” Instagram post, his teammates came to his defense.
Steve Kerr apologetic for coarse language directed at official.
Kevin Durant trolling?
Stephen Curry on being called out on the new GOP tax proposal: “It was weird...But mama I made it.”
Stephen Curry suffered a left knee tweak and got it taped. He will return.
Stephen Curry having fun with the new GOP proposal, which oddly mentioned him and Steve’s Bike Shop.
Grizzlies assigning Ben McLemore to G-League affiliate Memphis Hustle, league sources tell ESPN. He’s coming off offseason foot surgery.
Sources: Warriors ecstatic about Looney’s development, but tax ramifications forced their hands. Damian Jones to have 3rd-year picked up.
Golden State will not exercise 4th-year option of Kevon Looney, league sources tell ESPN. He’ll become an unrestricted at end of season.
Draymond Green miffed about league fining him, &amp; details of an NBA GM whose hand gesture prompted an investigation.
Stephen Curry misses his first free throw of the season. He nailed 52 straight, tying his career high.
Bradley Beal fined $50,000, Draymond Green fined $25,000, Kelly Oubre Jr fined $15,000. Markieff Morris, Carrick Felix suspended one game.
Bradley Beal never got into confrontation with fan. The fan approached him spewing profanities and flipped him off twice. Beal just smiled.
Klay Thompson tells ESPN that Kelly Oubre Jr. apologized to him for what he described as a “graze to my face.”
When Draymond Green saw Kevon Looney, he screamed “Loooon.” The third-year pro had a big game.
Draymond Green greeting his teammates at the entrance of the locker room after Warriors’ huge comeback victory over Wizards.
Another note on Green-Beal scuffle, Markieff Morris and appears Carrick Felix left the bench. Morris actually played part in breaking it up.
Draymond Green, Bradley Beal tossed from game following altercation, an irate Green perplexed to why he was ejected.
An irate Draymond Green to ESPN regarding the altercation with Bradley Beal.
Draymond Green and Bradley Beal have been ejected.
Draymond Green's jersey is ripped.
Major scuffle between Draymond Green and Bradley Beal.
Steve Kerr on Al Attles bobblehead night.
ESPN Sources: The reps of Jahlil Okafor and Sixers working collaboratively to find suitable trade.
The “Run A.M.C” weekly podcast of Amin, Marc and Chris drops now!
Shaun Livingston will not play tomorrow night against Washington to attend the funeral of Devin Harris’ brother.
At 10 am PT, I’m jumping on @OTLonESPN to break down what’s going on with Phoenix and Eric Bledsoe.
Suns general manager Ryan McDonough calls out Eric Bledsoe and his agent in radio interview.
Free agent point guard Isaiah Canaan intends to sign with the Houston Rockets, league sources tell ESPN.
Stephen Curry admits to ESPN that he was 'kind of surprised' by $50,000 fine: "It's an expensive mouthpiece toss."
Draymond Green on the rookie Dennis Smith Jr. trying to dunk on him and talking trash: “That s— ain’t happening.”
When final buzzer sounded, Steve Kerr walked to Rick Carlisle to apologize for Jordan Bell’s off-the-glass dunk late in game with Ws up 24.
USA Today’s @sam_amick was first on the Curry, Iguodala fines.
Andre Iguodala fined $15,000 for yelling at ref. On Curry, league couldn’t prove he aimed to hit official with mouthpiece, thus maximum fine
ESPN Sources: Stephen Curry to be fined $50,000 for throwing his mouthpiece in direction of an official in a loss to Memphis on Saturday.
ESPN Sources: Phoenix sends Eric Bledsoe home with potential trade looming.
Rival executives anticipate that a trade is looming for Phoenix guard Eric Bledsoe.
ESPN Sources: Eric Bledsoe met with team this morning before shootaround and he was sent home. He will not play tonight against Sacramento.
Coach Earl Watson to ESPN.
Stephen Curry, Kevin Durant ejected as Golden State falls to Memphis.
Draymond Green to ESPN on state of the team, and on Stephen Curry, Kevin Durant getting ejected.
Stephen Curry tells ESPN: “I didn’t throw my mouthpiece at the ref. I got better aim than that. I threw it out of frustration.”
Stephen Curry has just been ejected for going off on the ref. Kevin Durant was given the boot as well.
Kevin Durant just blocked Tony Allen twice with only one shoe on.
Houston, among other teams, have reached out to representatives of Jameer Nelson, league sources tell ESPN.
Point guard Jameer Nelson has cleared waivers and is free to sign with any team, league sources tell ESPN.
Golden State forwards Draymond Green (knee) and Andre Iguodala (back) will both play tonight against New Orleans.
For those into pictures and videos, I’m stepping my Instagram game up.
ESPN Sources: Golden State forward Draymond Green receives good news.
Golden State forward Draymond Green underwent an MRI on his left knee and results came back negative, league sources told ESPN.
Steve Kerr on the fake, heavier-looking Klay Thompson that surfaced last night: “I thought it was the perfect metaphor for our conditioning”
Draymond Green to undergo an MRI on his left knee today, a league source tells ESPN.
Klay Thompson sporting his 2015 and 2017 championship rings after the game.
Draymond Green to ESPN: “I’ll be good. I’m fine.”
Draymond Green will not return to tonight’s game with a left knee strain.
Draymond Green hobbling, rubbing his left knee and heads for the locker room.
Durant on if hitting that shot on LeBron meant more: “If I hit that shot over Gladys Knight, I'd still be excited”
Stephen Curry’s first try on opening night.
Prayers up for @GordonHayward.
Golden State to auction autographed 2017 championship shooting shirts worn by players tonight. Proceeds go towards wildfire relief efforts.
Kevin Durant tells ESPN the shot over LeBron James in Finals was a shot he struggled with as he reflects on journey
As Golden State Warriors take court for their first shootaround of season, the first song that's being blasted is "Big Rings" by @Drake.
Golden State forward Omri Casspi (ankle) probable, forward Andre Iguodala (back strain) questionable for season opener against Houston.
Stephen Curry gives back, refurbishes outdoor and indoor basketball courts at Bushrod Community Center in Oakland.
Golden State will be without Kevin Durant (virus), Draymond Green (back strain) and Andre Iguodala (back strain) tonight against Sacramento.
49ers, A’s, Earthquakes, Giants, Raiders, Sharks &amp; Warriors have a collective donation of $450,000 to support North Bay fire relief efforts.
I asked Stephen Curry if he’s voted a captain of an All-Star team, who does he draft first? “Probably one of my teammates...”
This never gets old. @MarcJSpearsESPN.
This seems about right, @MarcJSpearsESPN. Go @Fresno_State, @FresnoStateFB.
ESPN Sources: Filed with @MarcJSpearsESPN, Golden State Warriors submit bid to host All-Star Game in brand new arena
Portland: One of best in the business, @TheNoeShow, hosting @1029TheGame's afternoon drive this week. I hop on tomorrow. Tune in for a treat
ESPN Sources: Golden State Warriors coach Steve Kerr to travel separate from team due to passport delay.
Stephen Curry to ESPN on why fame/wealth does not disqualify him from speaking out on social and racial inequality.
Sources: NBA player files $13.5 million arbitration claim against agent Andy Miller, alleging defraud.
Stephen Curry on the SI cover and how it omitted Colin Kaepernick.
Stephen Curry on Sports Illustrated cover: "That was terrible. It's capitalizing on the hoopla and the media and all that nonsense."
Correction: June 30 is the deadline.
Will Barton and Denver are in discussions on a contract extension, league sources tell ESPN. Deadline of Oct. 16 looms.
Draymond Green's (@Money23Green) powerful response to how long societal issues will remain a sports talking point.
Draymond Green explains why kneeling during the anthem doesn't equate to disrespecting military.
Steve Kerr: "I considered skipping practice to watch Spurs Media Day."
Kevin Durant, Andre Iguodala stand by NFL players in aftermath of Donald Trump's Twitter attacks.
Kevin Durant asked about Oklahoma City's addition of Carmelo Anthony. He was brief.
Nick Young on his practices with Warriors: "I found myself passing a little more than usual."
Enjoying @WNBA Finals action between @LA_Sparks and @minnesotalynx. @Candace_Parker and @MooreMaya are the truth!
Stephen Curry on Donald Trump.
Draymond Green on LeBron James calling Trump "U Bum."
Steve Kerr on Donald Trump's tweet: "Not surprising. He was going to break up with us before we broke up with him." Kerr was laughing.
Steve Kerr said Trump's comments about the NFL players protesting "is as bad as anything he's said."
Golden State Warriors release statement on Donald Trump.
Dell Curry, father of @StephenCurry30, to ESPN.
Quincy Pondexter faced heartache, betrayal and fought to live. His comeback, and what really occurred in New Orleans
Damn!
It looks like Golden State can cancel that team vote now. And, there was no hesitation from Steph.
Sources w/ @MarcJSpearsESPN: Alan Williams expected to undergo MRI tomorrow to confirm extent. He landed on foot of teammate in a workout.
Report w/@MarcJSpearsESPN. An initial evaluation reveals Phoenix forward Alan Williams suffered a partially torn meniscus, sources tell ESPN
Stephen Curry doesn't hold back on whether he'll vote to visit White House.
Draymond Green jokingly says Kevin Durant's Twitter mishap was payback considering he had a similar incident last summer.
Steve Kerr on Kevin Durant's Twitter incident: “It’s not a big deal...He knows he made a mistake...It’s not anything that concerns us."
Kerr: "I feel better. I’m not 100 percentI'm comfortable I’ll be at 100 percent at some point. As Vin Scully says, we’re all day-to-day.”
Repost: Behind scenes of how Andre Iguodala took control of his free-agency &amp; nearly signed with a conference rival.
Jumping on The 6 right now with @jemelehill and @michaelsmith to discuss the situations of KD, Melo and Embiid.
A thorough behind the scenes story on Andre Iguodala orchestrating his free-agency &amp; how Rockets nearly snagged him.
Q&amp;A with Draymond Green on being No. 10 in ESPN #NBArank, how he got there &amp; defends Carmelo: "He a'int f---ing 64"
Kevin Durant, Rich Kleiman speaking at TechCrunch on 19th, another example how enmeshed they are in Silicon Valley.
All love, sis.
Sources: Isaiah Thomas in the process of parting with representation, Excel Sports Management. To seek new agent to handle 2018 free-agency.
Wish I had followed through. Much respect, Mike. Glad you're still with us.
Fight should have continued.
ESPN Sources: Restricted free agent Nerlens Noel accepts Mavs' one-year, $4.1 million qualifying offer.
Nerlens Noel signs 1-year, $4.1 million QO to return to Mavs, league sources tell ESPN. Reported $17M "offer " was non-existent in any form.
ESPN exclusive with Kevin Durant: In choosing to embrace love, a candid KD says he's skipping a White House visit.
ESPN goes behind scenes, in studio with @Dame_Lillard as he works on star-studded sophomore album in Los Angeles.
ESPN Sources: Free agent Gerald henderson to undergo surgery on hip, could miss entire 2017-18 season.
Free agent Gerald Henderson to have surgery on hip, could potentially miss entire 2017-18 season, league sources tell ESPN. Story to come.
Golden State GM Bob Myers continues to knock out the offseasons.
ESPN Sources: JaVale McGee reaches an agreement on a one-year deal to return to the Golden State Warriors.
Free agent center JaVale McGee has agreed to re-sign with the Golden State Warriors, league sources tell ESPN.
Dan Gilbert on the Paul George trade: "I would say Indiana could have done better than they did."
ESPN Sources: LeBron James invites Derrick Rose to work out with him this week in Las Vegas along with Eric Bledsoe.
Free agent guard Isaiah Canaan will participate in a group workout for the Charlotte Hornets on Tuesday, league sources tell ESPN.
Cleveland and Golden State alone now equipped with eight of the last nine regular-season MVPs.
BJ Armstrong, Derrick Rose's agent, to ESPN on why he chose Cleveland: "He just wants to focus on winning basketball games."
Derrick Rose expected to sign his deal as early as Tuesday, sources say.
Free agent Derrick Rose has reached an agreement on a one-year, $2.1 million deal with the Cleveland Cavaliers, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: No matter the discord, the record, with or without Kyrie Irving, LeBron James not waiving his no-trade
ESPN Sources: Cleveland disturbed news about Kyrie Irving was made public out of fear it could impact trade value.
ESPN Sources: On Kyrie Irving front, Cavs were given four preferred landing spots: New York, Miami, San Antonio, Minnesota.
Derrick Rose to have face-to-face meeting with Cavaliers in coming days, league sources tell ESPN. No decision expected until next week.
ESPN Sources: Derrick Rose completed approximate 3-hour meeting with Los Angeles Lakers. Both sides felt good about it. Deliberation time.
Sources say Derrick Rose "just wants to play ball," so it appears whichever team can sell its atmosphere, defined role will have advantage.
Undrafted free agent Derek Willis out of Kentucky has agreed to a one-year deal with the Detroit Pistons, league sources tell ESPN.
My little (big) cousin. Congrats. The best is yet to come. #fresnoproud
Dynamic Bay Area duo. The Athletic is getting "Golden" scribes in @ThompsonScribe and @timkawakami.
ESPN Sources: Los Angeles Clippers to nab big man free-agent Willie Reed.
Free agent center Willie Reed has reached an agreement with the Los Angeles Clippers, league sources tell ESPN. One-year, $1.5 million pact.
ESPN Sources: Free agent Luc Mbah a Moute agrees to sign with the Houston Rockets.
Free agent Luc Mbah a Moute has reached an agreement with the Houston Rockets, league sources tell ESPN.
Get to know Harrison Gaines, agent who represents Lakers' Lonzo Ball, and learn about his connection to LaVar Ball.
ESPN Sources: Free agent Derrick Rose, Milwaukee Bucks continue dialogue.
For those interested, I'm told Kevin Durant was in on the Peyton Manning gymanistic team roast at #ESPYS2017. KD played his part well.
Jamal Crawford has cleared waivers, league sources tell ESPN. He's free to ink two-year deal with Minnesota. Could possibly sign this week.
Orlando will waive point guard CJ Watson, league sources tell ESPN.
Reporting w/ @WindhorstESPN: ESPN Sources say Jamal Crawford has agreed to sign with Minnesota upon clearing waivers
Jamal Crawford clears waivers on Monday, sources say.
Jamal Crawford intends to sign with Minnesota upon clearing waivers, league sources tell ESPN.
Jamal Crawford and Atlanta Hawks have come to terms on a buyout, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Free agent point guard Raymond Felton agree to terms with Oklahoma City.
Free agent Raymond Felton agrees to one-year deal with Oklahoma City Thunder, league sources tell ESPN.
Rudy Gay opted out of $14 million.
3-team trade involving LAC, DEN and ATL expected to be finalized today and Jamal Crawford will work on buyout soon after, sources tell ESPN.
Free agent center JaVale McGee scheduled to meet with the Sacramento Kings on Thursday, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: A tag-team effort with @MarcJSpearsESPN on Cleveland's lowball offer to Chauncey Billups.
Free-agent Gordon Hayward plans to sign with the Boston Celtics, league sources tell ESPN.
Sacramento agreeing to deals with George Hill and Zach Randolph eliminates its pursuit of Otto Porter.
Update: Cleveland, San Antonio and others inquiring. Atlanta prefers a trade.
Report w/ @MarcJSpearsESPN: ESPN sources say Golden State a frontrunner for Jamal Crawford; Nick Young still in play
Jumping on @MikeAndMike now to touch on all things free-agency.
ESPN Sources: Kevin Durant to agree to a two-year, approximately $53 million deal to re-sign with Golden State.
Going on @SportsCenter right now to talk about Kevin Durant agreeing to a pay cut of $9 million.
ESPN Sources: The second year of Kevin Durant's deal will be a player option.
ESPN Sources: Kevin Durant will agree to re-sign with Golden State on a two-year, approximately $53 million deal, league sources tell ESPN.
Sources: After two years in Euroleague, former Portland big-man Joel Freeland has engaged in talks with teams to pursue an NBA comeback.
Ben McLemore and Memphis have agreed to terms on a two-year, $10.7 million deal, league sources tell ESPN.
Sources: With Minnesota in win-now mode, renouncing Shabazz Muhammad was viewed as the best option for both sides.
In what was a tough decision, Minnesota pulls QO from Shabazz Muhammad and he's now an unrestricted free agent, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Otto Porter Jr. is scheduling meetings with two more teams and then he'll decide which offer sheet to sign.
8-time All-Star Vince Carter is scheduled to take a meeting with the Sacramento Kings on Monday, league sources tell ESPN.
With @MarcJSpearsESPN: ESPN sources say Sacramento offered the max to Washington restricted free-agent Otto Porter.
Otto Porter still has more meetings to take, but sources say the Wizards are adamant that they'll match any and all offers.
Reporting with @MarcJSpearsESPN: ESPN sources say Sacramento offered Washington restricted free-agent Otto Porter the max.
Minnesota Timberwolves and Taj Gibson agree to a two-year, $28 million deal, league sources tell ESPN.
To create adequate space, Toronto in discussions with Indiana on trading Cory Joseph, league sources tell ESPN. @MikeAScotto first.
Andre Iguodala, Golden State reach agreement on 3-year, $48 million deal to keep the super reserve in the Bay Area.
Going on @SportsCenter now to break down @andre's new deal with the Warriors.
I'm being told Iguodala's deal is closer to 3-years, $48 million.
ESPN Sources: Andre Iguodala mulling several offers, including Golden State's improved proposal.
In addition to GS's offer, Andre Iguodala deciding between multi-year deals from Houston, San Antonio, Sacramento, league sources tell ESPN.
Golden State's offer to Iguodala is three guaranteed years, sources say.
Golden State offered Andre Iguodala a 3-year, $45 million deal and he's deliberating, league sources tell ESPN. No options are attached.
Sacramento's meeting with PJ Tucker will take place in Philadelphia on Sunday, league sources tell ESPN.
Jose Calderon has agreed to a deal with Cleveland, @PrioritySports announces.
Michael Carter-Williams and Charlotte agree to one-year, $2.7 million deal, league sources tell ESPN.
Restricted free-agent sharpshooter Bojan Bogdanovic receiving serious interest from Sacramento, Denver, Atlanta, league sources tell ESPN.
Jumping on @SportsCenter now to chop it up on Warriors.
ESPN Sources: With Kevin Durant technically a free agent, teams haven't reached out to gauge his mindset knowing it would be a waste of time
The meeting between Houston Rockets and free-agent Andre Iguodala is scheduled for this morning, league sources inform ESPN.
New York and Milwaukee have inquired about the young swingman Ben McLemore, league sources tell ESPN. He's an intriguing free agent.
ESPN Sources: Shaun Livingston, Golden State reach agreement on a 3-year deal.
Golden State, Shaun Livingston reach agreement on 3-years, $24 million, league sources tell ESPN.
Sacramento Kings have scheduled a face-to-face meeting with PJ Tucker over the weekend, league sources tell ESPN.
Live from Bristol during first free-agency week and hopping on @SportsCenter now to break down the latest around the league.
Houston continues its ultra aggressive approach and has now secured a meeting with free-agent Andre Iguodala, league sources tell ESPN.
Toronto brass meeting with free-agent swingman PJ Tucker in Philadelphia at some point after midnight, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: San Antonio to land first meeting with Golden State free agent Andre Iguodala.
Soon as free-agency period begins, Andre Iguodala will meet with the San Antonio Spurs in Los Angeles, league sources tell ESPN.
Andre Iguodala doesn't have plans to meet with Golden State Warriors during free-agency period, league sources tell ESPN.
Golden State not tendering qualifying offer to James Michael McAdoo, league sources tells ESPN. Instead of restricted, he's unrestricted FA.
Los Angeles Clippers forward Luc Mbah a Moute will decline player option to test unrestricted free-agency, league sources tell ESPN.
Sacramento Kings to decline extending qualifying offer to Ben McLemore and he'll become unrestricted free agent, league sources tell ESPN.
In 12 seasons a Chris Paul team ranked in top half of league in pace twice and never ranked inside Top 5. Rockets third in pace last season.
ESPN Sources: How to weaken the Golden State Warriors? Andre Iguodala has become a targeted man.
Oklahoma City Thunder guard Russell Westbrook captures the 2016-17 Most Valuable Player award.
Golden State Warriors forward Draymond Green wins the 2016-17 Defensive Player of the Year award. @Money23Green earned this!
Milwaukee Bucks forward Giannis Antetokounmpo wins the 2016-17 Most Improved Player of the Year award.
All-Defensive Teams.
One version of potential 3-team trade involving Cleveland, Indiana, Denver, Kenneth Faried would be Cavalier-bound, league sources tell ESPN
I'm late to this, but much respect to @NHLFlyers for this genuine gesture following what this man endured.
For Kings' fans, my Q&amp;A with De'Aaron Fox (@swipathefox) last month highlighting the ultra competitor he is.
Undrafted rookie guard Antonius Cleveland of Southeast Missouri State agrees to Summer League deal with Portland, league source tells ESPN.
Undrafted rookie George de Paula (Brazil) has agreed to a free-agent deal with the Houston Rockets, league sources tell ESPN.
Undrafted rookie point guard Jeremy Senglin of Weber State will join Summer League of Brooklyn Nets, a league source tells ESPN.
Undrafted rookie Jalen Moore of Utah State will join Milwaukee Bucks Summer League squad, league sources tell ESPN.
Undrafted rookie Zak Irvin of Michigan has committed to playing Summer League with the Miami Heat, league sources tell ESPN.
Undrafted rookie Jamel Artis of Pittsburg has agreed to play Summer League with the Miami Heat, league sources tell ESPN.
Undrafted rookie P.J. Dozier out of South Carolina has agreed to a free-agent deal with the Los Angeles Lakers, league sources tell ESPN.
Undrafted guard Melo Trimble of Maryland has agreed to a free-agent deal with Philadelphia, league sources tell ESPN.
Undrafted seven-footer rookie Luke Kornet out of Vanderbilt has agreed to a two-way deal with the New York Knicks, league sources tell ESPN.
Undrafted rookie Marcus Keene of Central Michigan, country's leading scorer, to play Summer League for Washington, league source tells ESPN.
Undrafted rookie Charles Cooke out of Dayton has agreed to a free-agent contract with Minnesota, league sources tell ESPN.
Correction: Undrafted rookie Cameron Oliver out of Nevada has agreed to a free agent contract with Houston, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Minnesota attempting to secure a second round pick.
Orlando expected to select Wesley Iwundu with No. 33 pick in the NBA Draft, league sources tell ESPN.
There were 11 freshmen drafted in the lottery, the most in a single year in the Common Draft Era since 1966. Previous record was 8 in 2015.
Sacramento is trading No. 10 pick to Portland in exchange for No. 15, No. 20, sources say. Expect Trail Blazers to take Zach Collins.
Sources tell ESPN Sacramento will likely move No. 10 pick.
Los Angeles Lakers are selecting Lonzo Ball with the No. 2 pick in the draft, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Phoenix, Denver discussed trade that would feature Eric Bledsoe in exchange for Emmanuel Mudiay and No. 13 pick. Talks fluid.
Lakers guard Nick Young will decline $5.6 million player option to become an unrestricted free agent, his agent Mark Bartelstein tells ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Greg Monroe informs Milwaukee Bucks that he's exercising his player option for 2017-18 season.
Milwaukee Bucks have been notified that Greg Monroe has elected to exercise 2017-18 player option of $17 million, league sources tell ESPN.
ESPN Sources: Los Angeles Clippers surveying landscape for potential DeAndre Jordan trade.
ESPN Sources: Golden State Warriors All-Star Kevin Durant will decline player option to re-sign with champions.
When only 6-2 &amp; wear 15, no matter the shoe, looks weird. That's Dray's point, but Judas rocks the @Dame_Lillard 3s.
Draymond Green getting on LeBron James' claim that he never played on a super team. "You started the super team."
Sources: Phoenix Suns forward Marquese Chriss, Denver Nuggets wing Will Barton switch agents to sign with Aaron Goodwin of @GoodwinSports.
Kevin Durant on what it feels like to be a champion: "You just feel like a boss."
San Antonio Spurs promising rookie Dejounte Murray will work out with All-Star teammate Kawhi Leonard over summer in San Diego, I'm told.
Golden State Warriors GM Bob Myers tells ESPN there's 'no doubt' Steve Kerr will be back as the coach next season.
LeBron James was the first player to lead both teams in points, rebounds, assists, steals and blocks in a playoff series of any length.
David West said this morning was an optional shootaround, but everyone showed up. "This team is special."
Stephen Curry on this championship feeling: "We want to do it again. That's it."
Golden State Warriors forward Kevin Durant (@KDTrey5) is the 2017 NBA Finals MVP.
Golden State Warriors and Kevin Durant are the 2017 NBA champions. The goal was accomplished.
On offensive end for Warriors, getting easy shots out of sets. For Cavaliers, everything is difficult isolations. Difference down stretch.
It will be interesting to see how much gas LeBron James has left for the fourth. He's played all but one minute to this point.
Players have to be separated as tempers flare. Golden State on a massive 21-2 run.
Richard Jefferson said the Warriors are the ones who were a 73-9 team and added Kevin Durant: "The pressure is on them."
Prior to Game 5 last year, LeBron James went black mode. This year...
Steve Kerr on urgency for Game 5: "We gotta go take this game."
LeBron James said teammates informed him Warriors (Draymond) talked about celebrating at The Q and breaking out champagne. Motivated them.
Draymond on crowd: "I don't pay that much attention to anybody in Cleveland, honestly. They don't seem to be the sharpest people around."
David West on fan: "I thought he was jaw-jacking with Zaza and it was fake, man. That little motherf------ ain't go do nothing in real life"
LeBron James and Kevin Durant slap hands as they take the floor following a brief argument.
Kevin Durant, Dahntay Jones had words before heading to locker room. Jones is having an impact on this game without yet logging a minute.
The crowd's reaction was priceless when it was announced that Dahntay Jones picked up the technical.
New Story: Stephen Curry explains to ESPN why this year's NBA Finals has him playing like himself.
Andre Iguodala tells ESPN he didn't feel the kick by LeBron James.
LeBron James on if it's fair to play against a stacked Warriors team: "If I'm an owner, I'm going to try to sign everybody."
Cavaliers opted not to practice today. JR Smith, Iman Shumpert and four other teammates getting shots up prior to a film session.
Column: What Kevin Durant has brought to the Warriors' table:
Kevin Durant on being one win away from his first NBA championship: "It's not over. The job's not done."
LeBron James says this Warriors squad has the most firepower that he's ever faced.
Golden State has gone up on Cleveland 3-0. Even for LeBron James, this task will be impossible to overcome.
LeBron James was right: Kevin Durant is the difference.
Cleveland closed that first quarter off terribly.
Game 3 tonight.
Harrison Barnes scored 65 points through seven games of Finals last year. In two games of this Finals, Kevin Durant has scored 71 points.
Tyronn Lue adamant he's not changing a thing. He's confident that if Cavs execute the game plan, they'll put themselves in a good position.
LeBron James has agreed to return to his podium obligations today, I'm told.
Sources: Story behind six-year-old, never-before released hip-hop collaboration track by LeBron James, Kevin Durant.
Fans started fighting near the tunnel of where the Cavs exit. LeBron James was approaching when the altercation started.
LeBron James made sure to go over to welcome Steve Kerr back.
Steve Kerr says his intentions are to coach the rest of the Finals. Said he decided to give it a go this morning.
Steve Kerr is addressing the media. As @ramonashelburne reported, he's back.
Andre Iguodala decries racist vandalism of LeBron James' home, says wealth does not shield anyone from injustice.
ESPN Sources: Miami Heat guard Dion Waiters intends to decline player option to become an unrestricted free agent.
ESPN Sources: Free-agent to be Kyle Lowry had a meeting with DeMar DeRozan, coach Dwane Casey in Bay Area this week.
Golden State Warriors still haven't ruled out a Steve Kerr return.
The Golden State Warriors still haven't ruled out a Steve Kerr return despite the head coach unable to coach...
LeBron James was asked what stands out about the Warriors:: "K.D."
On that dunk by Andre Iguodala early in the first quarter, he was pointing at his business manager Rudy Cline-Thomas.
Kevin Durant came to play.
It's that damn time.
Mike Brown says although he hasn't spoken to Steve Kerr yet, he expects to coach Game 1 of Finals against Cavs tonight.
ESPN Sources: @ramonashelburne and myself collab on Kevin Durant willing to take less to keep roster intact.
Here's our picks.
ESPN Sources: Indiana Pacers sharpshooter C.J. Miles to decline player option and test free-agency.
Kevin Durant asked if he's thought about Warriors going 16-0. He shook his head no and said "However you get there. It doesn't matter to me"
Steve Kerr says it's unlikely he coaches Game 1 of NBA Finals, but he didn't rule it out.
Steve Kerr says as of now, he will not be coaching Game 1 of The Finals on Thursday. But he added that it's still up in the air.
Steve Kerr says he's still not ready to return. Says he still feels some of ailments. Mike Brown under the weather, thus why Kerr speaking.
Interview with Stephen Curry on Game 7 behind-the-back turnover, Kyrie Irving's dagger, &amp; motivation moving forward.
With pressure on teams to find 3-PT shooters, stock of Cal's Jabari Bird rising. Made 67/100 in Minn workout, 77/100 in Milw, 77/100 in Bos.
ESPN Sources: Lonzo Ball considering granting Philadelphia 76ers, owners of No. 3 pick, a predraft workout.
Mike Brown was asked about Tyronn Lue saying Boston is tougher to defend than Golden State: "That's his opinion. It's cute."
Former Spurs/Pelicans front office executive Jared Ralsky experiencing great success in Europe. Rising star.
Denver forward Wilson Chandler and Roc Nation have parted ways, league sources tell ESPN. Will be repped by Excel Sports.
Golden State Warriors make history en route to advancing to NBA Finals for third consecutive year.
Gregg Popovich raving about Golden State's 3-point shooting. Says he hopes the league doesn't adopt the 4-point play.
Stephen Curry (293) has now passed Kobe Bryant (292) for fifth place on the NBA's all-time playoff three-pointers list.
Golden State Warriors center Zaza Pachulia (heel) will not play tonight in Game 4 against the San Antonio Spurs.
Kawhi Leonard (ankle) will miss his third consecutive game tonight when Spurs host Warriors for Game 4 of WCF.
This a damn shame, @mikecwright.
This could be what led to the "dirty play" Curry referenced.
Kevin Durant told ESPN he didn't mean to offend with 'if you don't like it, don't watch it' remark. But stands by it
Mike Brown says Zaza Pachulia (heel) remains questionable for tonight's Game 4 against Spurs. Andre Iguodala (knee) will play.
Stephen Curry to ESPN on the dangerous blindsided screen by Dewayne Dedmon: "I feel like that was a dirty play."
Warriors center Zaza Pachulia (heel) is listed as questionable for Game 4 against Spurs on Monday.
.@sam_amick with the jab step on @ramonashelburne to create separation. But the shot...
ESPN Sources: Atlanta to meet with Chauncey Billups next week in Los Angeles to discuss general manager opening.
Atlanta Hawks to interview Chauncey Billups next week in Los Angeles for general manager opening, league sources tell ESPN.
Draymond Green asked if on the verge to meet Cleveland now that they're up 3-0: "It's not inevitable. We've lost a lead before."
Steve Kerr addressed the team at half time, I'm told. His message was to be themselves and stay locked in. Players responded well.
Spurs say David Lee (knee injury) will not return to the game.
Golden State selects seldom-used Joel Anthony.
Golden State gets to pick the free throw shooter with David Lee, who suffered an apparent knee injury, unable to take the shot.
David Lee being helped off the court. Goes right to the locker room.
Damn!
Kevin Durant when told Kawhi Leonard wasn't playing in Game 3 tonight: "What? I still don't believe it."
Warriors center Zaza Pachulia (heel) will not play tonight against Spurs. Andre Iguodala (knee) is probable.
Good read!
Stephen Curry says Zaza Pachulia can handle the criticisms coming his way: "Zaza has a thick skull."
In paying homage to Lavar Ball, Kevin Durant used me to get a jab in: "Stay in your lane," he said when I asked a follow-up. All in good fun
Draymond Green on Klay Thompson being left off the All-NBA Teams: "I think it's bullshit."
Zaza Pachulia (heel) participated in parts of practice. Andre Iguodala (knee) went through full light practice. Both questionable for Game 3
Your All-NBA Teams.
ESPN Sources: The MRI results of Golden State center Zaza Pachulia came back clean, confirming right heel contusion.
MRI results from Golden State center Zaza Pachulia came back clean, league sources tell ESPN. Confirmed a right heel contusion. Day-to-day.
Cal power forward Ivan Rabb to work out for Milwaukee Bucks on Thursday, league sources tell ESPN. The Bucks have pick No. 17.
The game was in the books long before the game was in the books. Warriors take 2-0 lead on Spurs after blowout.
Gregg Popovich said that he doesn't think his team believed they could beat Golden State tonight without Kawhi Leonard.
This simply isn't fair.
Golden State Warriors forward Andre Iguodala (knee soreness) will not play tonight against San Antonio Spurs.
ESPN Sources: Washington Wizards forward Kelly Oubre Jr. to under PRP injections to right knee.
Prior to Game 1, Spurs were 3150 in games in they had a lead of 25 or more during Popovich era (273 in regular season, 42 in playoffs).
Warriors forward Andre Iguodala (left knee soreness) questionable for Game 2 on Tuesday against Spurs. The team hasn't received MRI results.
Zaza Pachulia speaks.
Of all people, Draymond Green didn't have anything to say on Gregg Popovich calling Zaza Pachulia a dirty player.
David West asked about Gregg Popovich's remarks.
David West says Steve Kerr was "pretty active" today at practice.
David West is being prepped by the Warriors PR staff presumably about Pop's comments before he speaks to media. West just starts laughing.
5'8" Marcus Keene (@Marcus3Keene) led nation scoring 30 ppg &amp; no combine invite. Feels disrespected, out to destroy.
The incidents Pop referring to from last year involving Zaza locking up Kawhi's arm and getting into with David West
Suicide figures are up 200% since lockdown. Could 2 followers please copy and re-post this tweet? We’re trying to demonstrate that someone is always listening. Call 1-800-273-8255 (USA hotline)
As of now, the Lakers have no plans to allow fans in Staples Center for the start of the 2020-21 season, the team announced.
New story: LeBron James is searching for information regarding the shooting death of Ericka Weems, the 37-year-old sister of Cavs scout Brandon Weems, who was killed in James’ hometown of Akron, Ohio
New story: Chris Paul called Barack Obama - with LeBron, Melo, Russ and Iggy on the line - at midnight after the Bucks’ wildcat strike. The former president helped the players target achievable action to return to play with their stand making a difference
In the NBA: Dolan (NYK), Fertitta (HOU), Devos (ORL).
Vaughn would often come by the arena when the Cavs or Lakers would roll through ATL and check on me and see how I was doing and offer to help with our ESPN coverage - even when his hands were full with the Falcons. He was a good man. We’ll miss him.
One year later to the day, Daryl Morey stepped down as Rockets GM.
In an appearance on First Take today, Rajon Rondo highlighted a part of LeBron James’ success, calling Mike Mancias “the greatest trainer of all time, he’s the GOAT”
LeBron’s crowning moment, the Lakers’ final flourish and stories from the last night of the bubble w/ @malika_andrews. New story for ESPN:
The Lakers postgame party is underway in the bubble
Rob Pelinka on the passing of his friend and client, Kobe Bryant: “There were times in my hotel room down here where I would hear his voice ... Stay the course, finish the job.’ ... I know he would be a proud friend”
Frank Vogel on LeBron James: “He’s the greatest player the basketball universe has ever seen. And if you think you know (otherwise), you don’t know”
Calling Gloria James ...
LeBron James and Anthony Davis are the 1st pair of teammates to average 25 PPG on 50% FG in the same postseason in NBA history.
New story: Capping the longest season in NBA history with a dominant final flourish, the Los Angeles Lakers won it all for the first time in a decade
Hello, Shirtless J.R. It’s been awhile.
LeBron James, who is appearing in his 260th career playoff game tonight -- which passes Derek Fisher (259) for the most all-time -- has 22 points, 13 rebounds and 10 assists -- for his 28th career postseason triple-double, second only to Magic Johnson (30).
Ten years after putting up 14 points and 10 assists in a Game 7 loss to the Lakers in the 2010 NBA Finals, Rajon Rondo has 19 points on 8-for-10 shooting and three assists for the Lakers as they're less than a quarter away from winning the 2020 Finals.
Danny Green's 3-pointer with 6:50 remaining in the 1st Q was the 57th of his NBA Finals career, moving him past Robert Horry for No. 5 on the all-time Finals made 3s list.
At the start of that last LAL timeout, there was a heated exchange on the bench, ending with Kentavious Caldwell-Pope letting out a shout of frustration and leaving the bench to head towards the back. Quinn Cook went to look after him, KCP returned and is in the game now.
Frank Vogel says Anthony Davis’ right heel contusion will likely cause him to experience “soreness” in Game 6 but said that the adrenaline rush from the competition should help him push through it.
New story: Danny Green opened up about the shot he missed and the threats he’s received
More from Danny Green on the threats he and his fiance have received from "fans" since his missed shot in Game 5: "I hope they are that passionate about voting or getting justice for these people who deserve justice or get some better change along in the country"
Danny Green said that has spoken to his fiance about the death threats she has received on social media directed at her and him since Game 5. ... And I feel kind of silly sharing this news on a social media platform. Get a grip, people.
Danny Green on the 3 he missed at the end of Game 5: “It was a good look ... I’d do anything to get that shot again, trust me.” He says he rushed it a little bit, not realizing how much time was left when the ball came to his hands.
Anthony Davis (right heel contusion) is listed as probable for Game 6 on the league’s injury report.
New story: The NBA’s last two minute report for Game 5 of the Finals found Jimmy Butler’s late free throws to be legitimate
Last Two Minute Report is out for Game 5. The two calls that Frank Vogel said were “bad” were upheld by the league, however, the NBA determined the refs missed two other calls that should have gone the Lakers’ way
“I trusted him, we trusted him, and it just didn't go,” LeBron said. And so, we go to a Game 6 on Sunday.
Anthony Davis on his heel: “I’ll be fine on Sunday”
Frank Vogel said he felt like two “bad calls” put Jimmy Butler to the line late in the game.
The Heat win an NBA Finals classic in Game 5, 111-108, and extend the series to a Game 6. Jimmy Butler 35p 12r 11a 5s; Robinson 26p. For LAL: LeBron 40p on 15-for-21 shooting 13r 7a 3s; AD 28p 12r 3a 3s 3b. See you Sunday.
Anthony Davis checks back in with 8:18 to go in the 2nd Q. Miami's lead ballooned from one to 11 in the first several minutes of the quarter.
Anthony Davis has been pacing back and forth by the sideline during the quarter break. He has not gone to the back for treatment. L.A. will start the 2nd Q with him on the bench.
The Lakers take the court for Game 5: “1, 2, 3, dominate!”
So what are we calling AD’s Kobes tonight? The Larrys?
Scenes from inside the bubble - bike rides, protocol fatigue, family time, a documentary in the making and awkward hotel pairings with @malika_andrews @TimBontemps @NickFriedell
More info on the background of the uniforms here:
New story: L.A. held a 2-1 Finals lead when LeBron woke up from his pregame nap Tuesday. It wasn’t good enough, not against Miami. He texted his teammates Game 4 was a “must win” and they went out and won it, leaving the Lakers one victory from the title
LeBron James texted the Lakers after his pregame nap today and told his teammates it’s a “must-win” game. He said he considered it one of the biggest games of his career, considering what a 2-2 series against this tough Miami team would mean.
The Lakers are one win away from their 17th NBA title. They take Game 4 of the NBA Finals 102-96 over Miami to go up 3-1. LeBron 28p 12r 8a 6tos; AD 22p (including the game-sealing 3) 9r 4a 4b; KCP 15p 5a; Green 10p; Kuz 9p; Morris 9p; Rondo 2p 7r 5a 1s. MIA: Jimmy 22p 10r 9a
Kentavious Caldwell-Pope with a five-point burst to increase the Lakers' lead from 2 to 7. Two minutes left (dos minutos - it's a Miami "home" game, after all)
A double-clutch banked in 3! This game has had a bit of everything so far.
Big swing here: Morris misses a 3 that could have put LAL up by 9, then Herro comes down and hits a 3 with Morris contesting to cut the Lakers' lead to 3. Vogel calls timeout and gets into it with the refs after Butler pushed Caruso into AD, with no foul called.
Anthony Davis goes to the line for the Lakers' 6th and 7th FT attempts with 47.9 seconds left in the 3rd Q. Miami is 20-for-24 from the foul line.
Alex Caruso took a spill on his right hip right before the half. He made his way to the locker room slowly, with a grimace on his face.
LeBron James was animated in the Lakers' timeout, urging the Lakers to set stronger, more precise screens to get a body on the Heat defenders. Out of the timeout, he set a screen on Nunn that allowed Rondo to get right to the rim.
.@ShannonSharpe doesn’t seem too pleased by the Lakers right now
Jimmy Butler is 5-for-5, including a jumper at the buzzer to end the 1st Q. The rest of the Heat is 5-for-16. The Lakers lead 27-22 headed into the 2nd Q.
Jared Dudley was very vocal in this timeout as the players huddled before the coaches came in with their instructions. Dudley hasn't played much this postseason -- just 29 minutes over seven spot appearances -- but knows his role as a glue guy and a veteran voice
It's referee Zach Zarba's 17th season. Tonight's his first time as the crew chief in an NBA Finals game.
Frank Vogel says he is keeping the same starting lineup for Game 4, even with the potential return of Bam Adebayo.
Bam Adebayo getting in some work early. Game 4 tips off in less than two hours - 9 p.m. ET, ABC
New story: Coming off the Game 3 loss, LeBron says he remains “on edge” during a series no matter what the record is, while AD says that watching the tape from the loss “sucks” because he knows he didn’t play at his best
Goran Dragic, clearly devastated by the injury he’s dealing with just as he reached the pinnacle of the sport, says he find himself “asking the guy above us why it had to happen right now”
Goran Dragic says he has “no timetable” as to when he will return from his torn plantar fascia.
Bam Adebayo on his availability for Game 4: “I’m getting better ... I’m day to day. Tomorrow I could play. Tomorrow they could tell me no”
New story: L.A.’s leaders kept up their confidence after the Lakers’ first loss of the Finals. AD: “Trust me. We’ll be fine." LeBron: “We’re not concerned”
Jimmy Butler on why his 40-point triple-double doesn’t matter as much as the result: “Everybody remembers winning, that’s it.” Said he hopes he scores zero points in Game 4 and they get the win to prove his point.
Anthony Davis: “Trust me, we’ll be fine”
LeBron James: “I don’t feel like we’re concerned. We’re not concerned. We know we can play a lot better”
Markieff Morris: “When we watch film tomorrow there’s a lot of people that are going to get their ass chewed out and we’ll respond better in Game 4”
Miami wins 115-104, cut the Lakers' Finals lead to 2-1 and could get Bam Adebayo back for Game 4. Jimmy Butler 40p on 14-for-20 shooting 13a 10r 2s 2b 5tos; Olynyk 17p 7r; Herro 17p. LAL: LeBron 25p 10r 8a 2b 8tos; AD 15p 5r 3a 2s 5tos; Markieff 19p 6r; Kuz 19p.
Has become a huge part of this playoff run since the Houston series. And will be a free agent this offseason.
Heat lead 85-80 after 3Q. Jimmy Butler has been magnificent -- 30p on 11-of-15 shooting, 9r, 8a, 2s. Single-handedly giving Miami a chance to make this a series.
Whatever LeBron was chirping after the Lakers ended the quarter with a play to get Kuzma a 3 at the buzzer left Jimmy Butler staring at him and saying, "Bro ... bro ..."
The Lakers have four turnovers in the first 4 1/2 minutes of the game and Miami jumps out to a 16-8 lead.
Erik Spoelstra on Bam Adebayo and Goran Dragic sitting out Game 3: “I can see the anguish, literally, in their eyes ... they really want to be there because they love their teammates and they put their heart and soul into it”
Through LAL’s 2-0 start to the Finals, James is averaging 29 points, 11 rebounds, 9 assists and 1 steal on 55% shooting. Davis is averaging 33 points, 11.5 rebounds, 3 assists and 1.5 blocks on 63%
New video: LeBron James and Anthony Davis are dominating the Finals in a fashion not seen by a Lakers duo since Kobe Bryant and Shaquille O’Neal. So, who is Kobe and who is Shaq? My @SportsCenter essay off Game 2:
The Lakers say Danny Green was experiencing hip tightness in Game 2 and will be re-evaluated tomorrow.
Lakers go up 2-0 on the Heat thanks to a dominant night for their big two: LeBron 33p on 14-of-25 9r 9a; AD 32p on 15-of-20 14r; Rondo 16p 10a; KCP 11p on 4-of 14 4a; Kuz 11p. Butler led MIA with 25p 13a 8r.
Big Lakers contingent here tonight: Jeanie Buss, Joey Buss and Linda Rambis. Plus Rich Paul and Fara Leff of Klutch Sports - whose agency reps six Lakers players, including three starters in LeBron, AD and KCP - have made their way inside the bubble for Game 2.
Erik Spoelstra said he had to play the role of almost a “parent” in keeping Bam Adebayo &amp; Goran Dragic out of the lineup for Game 2. He said they were lobbying to play but he and the organization had to protect them from themselves and convince them sitting out is the right call
New story: On LeBron, AD, Kyrie and jealousy
LeBron James on the key to his relationship with Anthony Davis: “We’re not jealous of one another”
Jim Tucker
New video: Calling the 75-30 run the Lakers went on in Game 1 of the Finals a “run” doesn’t do it justice. It was a demonstration of domination. My @SportsCenter essay:
Lakers come back from early 13-pt deficit, win Game 1 116-98 against Miami. AD 34p 9r 5a 3b; LeBron 25p 13r 9a 1s; KCP 13p on 3-of-10 2s; Green 11p 2s 3b; Caruso 10p 4r 2a. Butler led the Heat with 23p 5a 2s; Nunn 18p on 8-of-11 off the bench. Lakers shot 15-of-38 (39.5%) from 3
Kentavious Caldwell-Pope is experiencing cramping in his chest muscle and Rajon Rondo got hit in the eye. Both are available to return, per the Lakers.
Tyler Herro had a plus/minus of -39 in 22 minutes heading into the 4th Q.
The Lakers were 5-for-32 from 3 in Game 1 of the first round of the playoffs against Portland. So far in Game 1 of the Finals, they're 11-for-17 from 3 against Miami with a couple of minutes to go in the first half.
Rajon Rondo to Danny Green going into that timeout: "Danny, stop gambling! DG, you're gambling!"
Among the guests in the Lakers' family section for Game 1: Anthony Davis Sr. He's in the front row for the first Finals game of his son's career.
President Obama dropped by the virtual fan seats. Right by Shaq and D-Wade.
Gianna Bryant
Harry Glickman
Stanley Robinson
Lee Green
Michael Ojo
Ashley James
Roger B. Brown
Eddie Sutton
Anthony Causi
Roscoe Nance
Lute Olson
John Thompson
Zelda Spoelstra
Curly Neal
Mike Storen
Marty McNeal
Fred McLeod
Jerry Sloan
Clifford Robinson
Wes Unseld
David Stern
Kobe Bryant
I’ve attempted to collect a list of individuals we lost in basketball world since Game 6 of Raptors-Warriors to Game 1 of Lakers-Heat when it tips off tonight. Please feel free to add to the thread so we can honor their memories together.
Most years at the Finals, the NBA prints an In Memoriam on the back of its Finals credentials to remember the members of the basketball community lost since the last Finals. Obviously, 2020 wasn’t like most years. (Thread)
Game 1 coming up - 9 p.m. ET, ABC
Frank Vogel says his old college coach at Kentucky, Rick Pitino, reached out with tips on attacking the Miami Heat zone leading up to Game 1 of the Finals
To get you ready ...
NBA merchandise sales from July 30 - September 28. A reminder that the league really missed Steph, KD and Kyrie this season and noteworthy to see Ja in the top 15 and no Zion.
New story: LeBron James says there would be "no extra meaning" to beating the Heat to win a championship, but Anthony Davis disagrees. If L.A. comes out victorious against Miami, AD says he would rank the title "probably second behind Cleveland" for James
Some scenes from NBA Finals Media Day
New video: LeBron James and Pat Riley are together again in the NBA Finals for the first time in six years. Only, they’re both trying to beat their former team - and each other - this time around. My essay for @SportsCenter
Tremendous.
Little did we know that the most remarkable part of the bubble was a real life Mocha Joe’s vs. Latte Larry’s situation playing out. Pretty, pret-ty, pret-tay good.
New story: Catching up with LeBron James after earning his 10th Finals appearance. What does it mean? “Right now, it don't mean s--- unless I get it done,” he told ESPN. “I got to get it done."
Props to @billoram. Came to L.A. in 2013 and was the lone Lakers beat writer to ride out the entire playoff gap during the lean years and now is covering them back in the NBA Finals.
For the uninitiated:
LeBron says the Lakers have “bigger fish to fry” in the Finals. Wonder where I’ve heard that quote before?
Lakers win 117-107, beat the Nuggets in 5 to advance to the NBA Finals for the first time since 2010. LeBron James 38p 16r 10a.
LeBron uses the spin move to get to the fadeaway to put the Lakers up 9 late. Bump.
That's 31 points, 15 boards and 10 assists for LeBron - his 27th career playoff triple-double, second only to Magic Johnson (30). If the Lakers hold on to win, it will be his 5th triple-double in a series clincher, which is also second all-time to Magic, who had 8.
Some respect from a three-time Finals foe of LeBron's as James is a win away from making the Finals for the 10th time of his career.
That's three straight takes to the hoop and three straight scores for LeBron. Meanwhile, Nikola Jokic is subbed out after picking up his third foul. Could be a crucial stretch here for Denver. L.A. up 39-36 early in the 2nd Q.
Frank Vogel says Anthony Davis has some “minor soreness” in his ankle but he is “good to go” for Game 5 tonight.
For what it’s worth, the Lakers have listed Anthony Davis (ankle) as questionable for Game 5. But earlier this afternoon Frank Vogel said Davis is “experiencing some soreness” but will be “good to go” on Saturday.
New story: What's the Lakers' mindset heading into Game 5 against the never-say-die Denver Nuggets? "Simple," Dwight Howard said. "The job is not finished."
New story: Dwight Howard had a double-double in his first start of the playoffs for the Lakers, helping L.A. go up 3-1 on Denver. "Dwight was a beast," LeBron said.
New story: With Denver surging late, LeBron had a request for his coach. He wanted to defend Jamal Murray. "LeBron asked for the assignment," Vogel said, "and obviously I granted it." For James, it was simple. "I knew it was winning time," he said.
Vogel says that “there’s always concern” with an ankle injury like Anthony Davis suffered tonight. The team will wait to see how AD responds to treatment tonight and tomorrow to get a better idea of his availability for G5. But considering he finished G4, have to think he plays.
Lakers win 114-108 to go up 3-1 on DEN (and we all know what that means). AD 34p on 10-of-15 5r 3s; LeBron 26p on 7-of-18 9r 8a; Dwight 12p on 5-of-6 11r 1s; KCP 13p; Rondo 11p 7a 5r; Kuz 10p. Nuggets: Murray 32p 8a; Grant 17p; Jokic 16p.
LeBron scored the Lakers’ first 12 points in Game 2. AD scored the Lakers’ first 10 points in Game 4.
Dwight Howard will start at center in Game 4, per the Lakers.
New story: Today is Hoopers Vote Day. People from all corners of the b-ball community - WNBA, NBA, coaches, retired players, media - are coming together to energize voters leading up to the Nov. election. You’ll see graphics like this flooding your feed
Frank Vogel says Alex Caruso has discomfort in his right wrist and Danny Green has a left finger injury. Both are listed as probable for Game 4. Caruso will receive a MRI on his wrist later today as a precaution, however.
New story: LeBron James - “I do not condone violence towards anyone — police, Black people, white people, anyone of color, anyone not of color — because that's not going to ever make this world or America what we want it to be."
Lakers lose 114-106 as Denver draws the series to 2-1. LeBron 30p on 14-of-23 11a 10r 2s 2b 6tos; AD 27p 2r; KCP 12p; Kuz 11p; Rondo 9p on 4-of-10 8a 3s 4tos. Nuggets: Murray 28p 12a 8r 2s; Jerami Grant 26p 2s; Jokic 22p 10r 5a; Monte Morris 14p.
Rajon Rondo came into the night 25th on the all-time postseason steals list with 214. His three steals in the 4th Q so far have moved him up to a tie with Kawhi Leonard for 23rd, passing Gary Payton.
New video: It was the greatest shot of Anthony Davis’ career and it evoked the memory of the greatest player in Lakers franchise history. It was AD’s Kobe moment. My essay for @SportsCenter.
What a finish.
The look of pride on Frank Vogel’s and Jared Dudley’s faces when they looked at AD after his buzzer beater tonight was pretty striking. They’ve seen him grow before their very eyes this season.
Both Rondo and Jokic called Anthony Davis the best scorer in the league after Game 2. Davis followed up 37 points in the opener with 31 points on Sunday. He's shooting 52.3% from the floor, 42.9% from 3 and 86.4% from the foul line so far in his first ever conference finals
The Lakers are 3-0 in the playoffs wearing the Black Mamba uniforms these playoffs. And it took an Anthony Davis buzzer beater to keep that up. "That's a shot that Kobe Bryant would hit," Frank Vogel said of AD's winner.
The Lakers start the 4th Q with LeBron, Caruso, Markieff, Rondo and Kuz on the court -- the lineup that was off the charts effective in the 2nd Round against Houston.
Frank Vogel says he expects LeBron James’ ankle, which he rolled in Game 1 when stepping on Jerami Grant’s foot, should be good to play on in Game 2 tomorrow.
ICYMI: LeBron James sounded off on the NBA awards voting after receiving just 16 first place votes for MVP, as compared to 85 for Giannis - “It pissed me off”
Anthony Davis: “There’s not even a question who deserves it. ... I think if you take him off our team, we definitely take a hit”
LeBron James on the MVP results: “It pissed me off.” He finished in 2nd place for the fourth time in his career.
Lakers beat the Nuggets 126-114 to go up 1-0 in the Western Conference Finals. AD 37p on 12-of-21 from the field and 12-of-15 from the line 10r 4a; LeBron 15p 12a 6r; KCP 18p; Dwight (who started the 2nd half at C) 13p 3r 2s 2b; Kuz 11p; Rondo 7p 9a 2s. LAL 11-of-26 (44%) from 3
Frank Vogel said there would be "no firm minutes restriction other than let's just be smart" for Rajon Rondo tonight. Rondo, who has been dealing with back spasms, checks in with 5:30 to go in the 1st Q.
JaVale McGee will return to the starting lineup for Game 1 of the conference finals tonight, per the Lakers.
New story: LeBron James, who knows a thing or two about coming back from down 3-1, is well aware how special this Nuggets team is that the Lakers are about to face - "The respect level is out of this world for what we have for this ballclub"
Brai-D
New video: My essay for @SportsCenter on the Denver Nuggets’ rise as the darlings of the NBA bubble
New story: Frank Vogel, with Nikola Jokic in his sights, says the Lakers will go back to being big in the conference finals. Plus, we hear from Dwight Howard on the challenges of life inside the bubble.
The sweet taste of victory, the lemon pepper taste of defeat.
Game 7.
New story: Pau Gasol and his wife, Cat, welcomed their first born, Elisabet Gianna Gasol, to the world. The bond between the Gasols and the Bryants remains strong.
The Western Conference Finals schedule is out. The Lakers will get six days off before Game 1.
With 48 seconds to go in the 4th Q, Denver is outscoring the Clippers 64-32 in the 2nd half. Just a remarkable effort from the Nuggets.
New story: The Lakers are back in the Western Conference finals for the first time since 2010, running their playoff record to 8-2 by ousting Houston in Game 5 and seem to be peaking at the right time
Sade’s “Smooth Operator” plays the Lakers off the court following their series-clinching win over Houston, just like it did after their first round clincher over Portland.
Russell Westbrook got into a shouting match with a man sitting in the Lakers' family section. The man was waving goodbye to Westbrook. "Who is that? Who is that?" Westbrook demanded to know. The man was then escorted out of his seat by security shortly after.
From @ESPNStatsInfo: LeBron James, with 26 pts, 7 reb, 7 ast tonight, has his 133rd career playoff game with 25 points, 5 rebounds &amp; 5 assists. All since 2006. Next closest player over that span is Russell Westbrook with 42.
LeBron has broken out the spin move a couple times this quarter. He was called for an offensive foul on the first, and was just send to the free throw line on the second. I took a deep dive into one of his preferred moves for ESPN:
The Lakers' once 22-point lead is down to 7. Rockets on a 17-2 run. Timeout L.A.
Hey, look who dropped by to check out Lakers-Rockets. Hi, @Rachel__Nichols 
Jared Dudley’s son, Justus, feeling it after that LeBron dunk put the Lakers up 13-2
Per the lineups submitted to the league, the Lakers are sticking with Markieff Morris in the starting lineup for Game 5
“It's like a locomotive that jumps the tracks. There's nothing you can do” - How LeBron James has incorporated a spin move into his offensive arsenal, making it one of the most effective plays in all of basketball. New feature for ESPN:
Danuel House will not be returning to the Lakers-Rockets series.
Visited the memorial earlier this year when in NYC for a game and happened to walk right up to Welles’ name. I watch The Man in the Red Bandana every September.
New story: Frank Vogel says the Lakers actually do have a Big 3 after all - LeBron, AD and their Team Defense
Lakers beat the Rockets 110-100 to go up 3-1 in the series. LAL is now 7-2 in the playoffs. Houston gave them a scare, cutting a 23-point lead down to 5. AD 29p 11r 5a 2b; LeBron 16p 15r 9a 2s; Caruso 16p; Rondo 11p 10r 7a 2s. HOU: Harden 21p on 2-of-11 shooting (16-of-20 FTs)
Talen Horton-Tucker, who had some nice moments in the seeding round, checks into Game 4 of the Western Conference semifinals in the 2nd Q. His playoff debut.
D'Antoni challenged whether Green should have been called for a foul when Rondo screened him. It was unsuccessful. As play resumed, Harden -- standing 2 feet from a ref -- looked up at the replay and, quite loudly, said, "Oh my God! That's the craziest s--- I've ever seen!"
JaVale McGee bringing his pregame ritual of playing catch with folks in the stands to the bubble
Mental health isn't a debate topic.
Markieff Morris, who started the second half of Game 3 at the 5 against Houston, will start Game 4 at the 5 also, replacing JaVale McGee, according to the Lakers. Morris played just 9 mins in LAL's Game 1 loss then averaged 9 pts and 4.5 reb in 23 mins in Games 2 and 3 - both Ws
NFL tonight. Celine? Always.
New story: After a stretch of 9 p.m. tip-off times meant not getting to sleep until 3 a.m. or later on game nights, the Lakers will get a welcome change in the schedule with Thursday’s Game 4 starting at 7
New story: Already the all-time leader in playoff scoring, LeBron James became the all-time leader in playoff wins with Tuesday’s victory over the Rockets. But it was his blocks - 4 of them in the third quarter alone - that really stood out
Tonight was LeBron James' 162nd career playoff win, moving him past Derek Fisher for the most playoff wins in NBA history.
Lakers win 112-102 to go up 2-1 on HOU. LeBron 36p on 13-of-23 7r 5a 4b; AD 26p 15r 6a; Rondo 21p 9a; Kuz 14p on 7-of-10. Rockets: Harden 33p 9a; Westbrook 30p 8r 6a.
In 49 games with the Lakers this season, including the playoffs, Rajon Rondo only had 19 pts or more twice and only had 8 assists or more nine times coming into tonight. In Game 3 vs HOU he has 19 pts on 8-for-11 shooting and 8 assists so far.
LeBron &amp; Rondo are a combined 8-for-13 from 3; Harden &amp; Gordon are a combined 5-for-13. That difference basically makes up LAL's 97-87 lead with 7:29 to go in the 4th right there.
LeBron James, with three blocked shots tonight in Game 3, passed Julius Erving for No. 12 on the all-time postseason blocks list. LeBron has seven blocks in this series so far. His most ever in a three-game span during the playoffs is nine, which he's done a few times.
Doc Rivers coming to see his son Austin Rivers and the Houston Rockets play on his L.A. Clippers off nights is one of my favorite little wrinkles of the bubble.
Lakers trail Houston 64-61 at the half. LeBron 29p on 10-of-14 (4-of-5 from 3); AD 14p 7r. Rockets: Harden 21p 6a; Westbrook 17p on 8-of-12; Covington 10p 4s.
Voting signage during Lakers-Rockets
Frank Vogel says JaVale McGee is available and won’t be on a minutes restriction. Dion Waiters is out and is day to day with a strained groin.
Anthony Davis received the second most amount of votes for the All-Defensive 1st Team, trailing only Giannis
New story with @espn_macmahon: Anthony Davis was assessed a flagrant foul after the fact for making contact with Jeff Green’s groin area in Game 2. The Rockets have had a couple other players hit below the belt these playoffs, too
The Lakers list Dion Waiters (strained groin) as doubtful for tonight's Game 3 vs. Houston.
Lakers injury update: Frank Vogel says JaVale McGee (left ankle) is questionable for Game 3. Dion Waiters (groin strain) will undergo further evaluation before the team determines his status.
New story: Playoff LeBron had only experienced Playoff Rondo as an opponent before Sunday. After Rajon’s performance in Game 2, LeBron had another label for the veteran point guard - “I mean, that's what 'Do is. He's a leader”
Lakers win 117-109, even up 2nd Rd with HOU 1-1. LeBron 28p 11r 9a 4s 2b 7tos; AD 34p 10r 4a; Markieff 16p; Kuzma 13p; Rondo 10p 9a 5s. Rockets put six players in double digits led by Harden (27p). Westbrook 10p on 4-of-15 12r 7tos.
The Lakers say that JaVale McGee is experiencing left ankle pain and will not return. He's played 8 mins and so far Dwight is a DNP-CD. They'll close this thing out with AD at center it looks like.
Lakers lead the Rockets 67-51 at the half. AD 18p 7r 3a 1b; LeBron 17p 6r 4a 2s; Markieff 14p on 5-for-5 shooting; Rondo 3p 7a 3s. HOU: Gordon 15p on 5-of-9 shooting; Harden 12p on 2-of-6 (7-of-7 FTs); House 11p on 4-of-4; Westbrook 2p on 1-of-8 8r 4tos.
The Lakers say that Dion Waiters has a pulled left groin and will not return.
Whomever did Rajon and Markieff's hair before Game 2 deserves a raise.
Rajon Rondo had six assists and three steals in six minutes in the 1st Q. Lakers lead 36-20 after one.
Markieff Morris with three 1st Q 3-pointers. He had been 3-for-13 from 3 in the playoffs coming into tonight.
It's been a sloppy start for the Lakers but you can certainly see Anthony Davis has turned it up a notch from Game 1. No feeling things out. Moving with intention when he gets the ball.
Marcus Morris Sr. getting a last minute scouting report from Marcus Morris Jr. before Clippers-Nuggets Game 2
New story: Frank Vogel and Anthony Davis both stuck by Rajon Rondo after L.A. looked out of sync in the veteran point guard’s first game action since March
New story: Houston's speed caught the Lakers off guard in Game 1. LeBron James said L.A. will be "fully aware" for Game 2
Lakers drop Game 1 to HOU, 112-97. AD 25p 14r 3s 3b; LeBron 20p 8r 7a 2b 4tos; Caruso 14p 4a; Green 10p on 4-of-12. Kuz was a -23 in 27 mins. Rockets led by Harden 36p; Westbrook 24p; Gordon 23p. LAL's 17 turnovers led to 27 pts for HOU. LAL shot 11-of-38 from 3 (28.9%)
The last thing LeBron James said in his media session yesterday to wrap up his preview thoughts on the Rockets series: "We have to be great every night in order to win, and if we’re not we’ll lose. It’s that simple.” So the Lakers got one thing right in the last 24 hours.
Frank Vogel challenged the block/charge call that went against Anthony Davis unsuccessfully. Call stands.
Lakers start the fourth with an interesting group: LeBron, Rondo, Kuz, Dwight, Markieff.
Lakers, who opened the game up 7-0, trail 63-55 at the half. LeBron 13p 5r 5a; AD 10p 4r 2b. For HOU: Harden 25p 7-of-11 shooting (9-of-11 FTs); Westbrook 11p 3a. Lakers are 5-of-17 from 3; Rockets are 9-of-21.
Rob Pelinka just started tapping his head after that LeBron dunk on Russell Westbrook. As in, LeBron dunked on his head.
I did not anticipate for James Harden calling for a clearout when LeBron picked him up in the first quarter, but I'm here for it.
There's about a dozen Lakers guests here for tonight's Game 1 against the Rockets including Savannah James -- LeBron's wife -- and Genevieve Grey McGee -- JaVale's daughter.
New story: One hundred and 78 days after last appearing in the lineup, Rajon Rondo will come off the bench in Game 1 vs Houston
Vogel says no minutes restriction for Rondo but said they will be intelligent with his work load and treat it somewhat like a rehab assignment.
Frank Vogel says that Rajon Rondo will play tonight and come off the bench. It will be his first game action since March.
Frank Vogel says Jason Kidd is experiencing “severe” back spasms and won’t be on the bench tonight for Game 1 vs Houston.
TOR-BOS Game 3 ending &gt; HOU-OKC Game 7 ending &gt; MIA-MIL Game 2 ending &gt; DEN-UTA Game 7 ending. What an absolutely wild string of games. What do you got LAC-DEN Game 1?
Lakers injury report for Game 1 vs. HOU: LeBron, AD and Rondo all probable.
Mike D’Antoni, in typical deadpan fashion, looking ahead to the Houston Rockets’ second round opponent: “We got to fly to L.A., which is tough, but other than that it’s good”
Frank Vogel says not only is the team hopeful Rajon Rondo will be in uniform Friday, he is also hopeful Rondo will be in the rotation.
New video: Murray and Mitchell - A Memoir. My SportsCenter mini essay looking back at an epic first round series from Jamal Murray and Donovan Mitchell as the two 23-year-old guards gave it their all up until the final buzzer in Game 7.
Take a bow, gentlemen.
Frank Vogel said Rajon Rondo practiced today. “He looked good. We’re hopeful to have him this series.”
As great as John Thompson was as a coach, he was also an excellent broadcaster. This sitdown interview with Kevin Garnett still blows me away. He had the rare alchemy of projecting a commanding presence, but with a gentle side. R.I.P.
Tremendous writing and perspective from Dan: “It must feel unusually powerless for the powerful -- silly and meaningless, even -- to wear the words "How many more" or "Listen to us" on the back of your jersey while another Black man takes seven bullets to his own back”
New story: LeBron and AD became the first teammates ever to both score 35 pts while shooting 70% each in a playoff game on Saturday, but their postgame comments delved more into what happened off the court the last few days than what just happened on it
After an emotional week -- felt from Kenosha to Florida -- Jacob Blake Sr. tells ESPN, "These young brothers in the NBA have motivated my family immensely." My talk with Blake Sr. on finding out about the Bucks' protest and a missed call from @kingjames
Lakers win 131-122, beat POR 4-1 to move on to a 2nd Rd date with either HOU or OKC. AD 43p on 14-for-18 9r 4a; LeBron 36p on 14-for-19 10r 10a; KCP 14p; Dwight 11p 6r. LAL shoots 14-for-36 from 3 (38.9%).
AD is 14-for-18; LeBron is 14-for-19 and the pair is two minutes away from winning their first playoff series together as teammates on the Lakers.
New story: In keeping with the initiatives settled upon between the NBA and the NBPA following player protests, the Lakers announced that Staples Center will be used as a voting center for November's election
Dion Waiters (migraine) has been cleared to play Game 5, per the Lakers.
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo will be inactive for Game 5 and Dion Waiters is dealing with a migraine and will be a gametime decision.
New story: After a couple uneasy days, LeBron James, the NBA and the NBPA will move forward with a plan for action when the playoffs resume Saturday
Danny Green says that before the Lakers began their practice today, JR Smith reminded all of the players to make sure they have registered to vote.
NBA weekend playoffs schedule announced. The Lakers play the Blazers in Game 5 at 9 p.m. ET on Saturday night.
Chris Paul, speaking today, about how a spur of the moment boycott by the Bucks allowed the entire league to come together in the last 48 hours:
A league source in the bubble tells ESPN there was “no sense of accomplishment” now that tonight’s meeting has been adjourned. Added that the feeling of “uncertainty” will remain until tomorrow’s emergency 11 a.m. ET Board of Governors meeting occurs.
Here is some context, Keith. The 2019 US population was 328m. According to rough census data, 250m were White; 44m were Black. So, for 2019, while 370 was more than 235, per capita, a Black person was 3.5x more likely to be shot/killed by police than a White person was
The Lakers issue a statement in light of today’s events:
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo is “still banged up” and is unlikely to play in Game 5. Rondo will be officially listed as doubtful.
Frank Vogel says Anthony Davis (back spasms) told him he should be good to go for Game 5 on Wednesday. The Lakers are officially listing Davis as probable.
New story: From the snakeskin print on their uni, to the 24-8 lead they jumped out to, LAL felt Kobe Bryant’s presence in Game 4. “We were able to play with uplifted spirits to honor the beautiful lives of Kobe and Gigi,” Lakers GM Rob Pelinka told ESPN.
New story: After Jacob Blake was shot repeatedly by police in Wisconsin, LeBron James opened up about the dynamic he sees between police and his community: "We are scared as Black people in America. Black men, Black women, Black kids, we are terrified"
Lakers win Game 4 135-115 on Kobe Bryant Day, go up 3-1 on Portland. LeBron 30p on 10-of-12 (4-of-5 from 3) 10a 6r; AD 18p 5r 5a 2b; Kuz 18p; Green 14p 2b; Dwight 13p 8r; KCP 12p; McGee 8p 8r 4b. LAL shoots 17-of-39 (43.6%) from 3 and assist on 29 of 49 baskets.
Anthony Davis has back spasms and will not return according to the Lakers. He has an electric stim machine around his lower back as he stands, rather than sits, by the Lakers bench.
More LeBron-Gary Trent Jr. trash talk here. As Trent was talking to the ref after that last drive by James, his conversation was interrupted by a demonstrative, "No, no sir!" from LeBron.
The Lakers are 11-for-19 from 3 here in the first half of Game 4. They lead the Blazers 80-51 at the break. A far cry from the 5-for-32 from 3 they shot in Game 1.
Scoreboard on 8/24
JR Smith has the timing of his babies down perfectly for the new @Drake
Frank Vogel: “Kobe made it cool as hell to be a Laker. For 20 years, he just had that swag about him”
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo is out tonight, as expected.
New story: The intersection for Staples Center will soon be renamed and fans will take Kobe Bryant Blvd to Chick Hearn Ct to arrive at Lakers home games
New story: The Lakers spent Kobe Bryant’s birthday doing something their late star surely would have approved of - putting extra work in on the practice court
The legend of Luka grows.
Marcus Morris with the huge 3 in OT to put the Clippers up 1 with 9 seconds left.
JR Smith: "I mean, especially as a 2 guard, if you can model your career after anybody at that wing position, it would be a Kobe person. The career, the accolades, the championships and everything else. I look up to him just as much as I look up to Jordan"
Frank Vogel says that Rajon Rondo is listed as doubtful for Game 4 after experiencing back spasms prior to Game 3.
After the Lakers went 28-for-43 from the foul line in Game 3, Frank Vogel required all of his players to make 100 free throws at Sunday’s practice.
Nike released an ad entitled “Better,” to commemorate Kobe Bryant on what would have been his 42nd birthday. It’s narrated by Kendrick Lamar and breaks down Bryant’s famed “Mamba Mentality” to its core: self actualization through constant improvement.
New story: The LeBron &amp; AD pairing had another historic night together while James hit a meaningful individual milestone - passing Tim Duncan for No. 2 on the all-time playoff wins list
Lakers win 116-108, go up 2-1 on the Blazers. LeBron 38p on 11-of-18 (4-of-8 from 3) 12r 8a 2s 8tos; AD 29p on 11-of-18 11r 8a 3b 2s; KCP 13p; Caruso 10p 7a; Dwight 5p 10r. Dame &amp; C.J. combined for 60 for POR
The Lakers went 6-for-12 from 3 in the 3rd Q after going 3-for-12 from 3 in the first half. They outscored Portland by 11 in the 3rd and take a 7-point lead into the 4th Q.
Lakers trail Portland 57-53 at the half. LAL shot 18-for-31 on FTs while POR was 8-for-8. LeBron 22p on 7-of-9 shooting 6r 3a 5tos; AD 6p on 1-of-3 5r 3a 2s 2b. Blazers: C.J. 20p; Dame 19p.
LeBron James with some rather loud trash talk to Gary Trent Jr. after he was whistled for a foul on LeBron when he'd already drawn two offensive fouls on James: "Don't start complaining now"
C.J. McCollum, hearing his brother, Errick, announce him in Portland’s starting lineup while holding C.J.’s nephew in his arms: all smiles.
Rajon Rondo is a late scratch for Game 3 because of back spasms, according to the Lakers.
We got a glimpse of the pregame intros during a sound check here at AdventHealth Arena. The Blazers had players’ family members tape intros for the starters, the way the Suns and Raptors have done down here. I’m for every team doing it. It’s delightful.
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo will be active for Game 3 tonight vs. Portland.
The Lakers, who had an off day today, list Rajon Rondo as questionable for Game 3.
New story: As if it wasn’t apparent already, Anthony Davis further solidified his place among the best teammates LeBron James has ever played with in a dominant Game 2 performance that delivered the Lakers their first playoff win in 8 years
Lakers win 111-88 to even series with POR 1-1. It was the least amount of points the Blazers scored all season. AD 31p on 13-of-21 11r; KCP 16p on 4-of-6 from 3; JR Smith 11p; LeBron 10p 7a 6r 2s 6tos; McGee 10p 8r. LAL shoots 14-of-38 on 3s (36.8%) and 9-of-10 on FTs
Anthony Davis, who shot 8-for-24 in Game 1, is 9-for-13 at halftime of Game 2. Lakers up 56-39. Their 3s still aren't all that hot (4-for-13), but better than 5-for-32 of course.
The Lakers are going with AD at the 5 and Kuz at the 4 here. Portland, with Whiteside and Nurkic in the game, went straight to a Kurkic postup on Kuzma. On the other end, Kuzma has launched a couple pull-ups in a row with Nurkic trying to stay in front of him on the perimeter
JR Smith, DNP-CD in Game 1, starts the 2nd Q here in Game 2. Frank Vogel's first big adjustment of the night.
Frank Vogel says he will keep the same starting lineup and that Rajon Rondo is inactive for Game 2 vs. POR
New story: What Laker lineup changes could we see in Game 2? Rajon Rondo was upgraded to questionable while Kyle Kuzma is ready and willing to step into the starting lineup should Frank Vogel shift Anthony Davis to the 5
LeBron James, who often incorporated reading a good book or two during his postseason runs of the past, posted a photo of himself cracking the spine to “The Autobiography of Malcolm X: As Told to Alex Haley” while getting in a stationary bike workout Wednesday. Great read.
Luka is loose before Game 2.
After the Lakers shot just 15.6% from 3 in Game 1, Kyle Kuzma gave his own spin on the "It's a make or miss league" NBA maxim looking ahead to Thursday's Game 2: "It’s just plain and simple, s---, we got to hit shots."
New story: The Lakers changed up MAGA messaging on Tuesday with the whole team wearing red hats that read “Make America Arrest the Cops Who Killed Breonna Taylor” to their first playoff game
The biggest team concerns from Day 2 of the playoffs: Are they real, or not? @kevinarnovitz on MIL's flat start; @espn_macmahon on Luka's turnover-ridden debut; @TimBontemps on BOS w/o Hayward; @royceyoung on HOU minus Russ; and me on LAL's missed 3s
Lakers lose Game 1 100-93 to the Blazers, who are now 8-2 in the bubble. LeBron 23p 17r 16a, goes 1-of-5 from 3 and 4-of-7 on FTs; AD 28p on 8-of-24 shooting (0-of-5 from 3); Kuz 14p on 5-of-14; Green 10p on 4-of-12. Dame had 34p to lead POR.
LeBron James has 14 pts, 13 ast and 10 reb, joining Magic Johnson as the only other Lakers player with a triple-double in his playoff debut for the franchise.
Dwight Howard picks up a double technical foul with Mario Hezonja and a double common foul with Hassan Whiteside in the span of 7 seconds. POR up 39-27 here in the 2nd Q.
... And he's on the court now. Moments before tip-off.
LeBron James was not on the floor with the Lakers for the national anthem. He also was not on the court when he was announced in the starting lineup.
Bob Iger just made his way into the Pavillion to catch his buddy Chris Paul’s first playoff game with OKC vs. the Rockets.
New story: Sunday, 8/23, would have been Kobe Bryant's 42nd birthday. Monday, 8/24, the Lakers will wear "Black Mamba" uniforms to honor the man who had Nos. 8 &amp; 24 raised to the rafters at Staples Center
A great story about Kobe during this Philly days that I hadn’t heard before.
The Lakers will wear their “Black Mamba” alternative jerseys on 8/24 for Game 4 of the first round against Portland, according to the NBA’s Lockervision website. Kobe Bryant’s wife, Vanessa, shared an image of the uniform, including a white heart patch with the No. 2 for Gigi
New story: A day before opening up the playoffs against Carmelo Anthony and the Blazers, LeBron James recalled the time he -- quite literally -- saved Melo's life
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo is medically cleared to play but said it would be “unlikely” he will play Game 1 vs. POR
Alex Caruso said Rajon Rondo was so excited to return to practice today that last night he shared a photo to the Lakers’ group text of his uniform laid out and ready for him to wear like it was the first day of school.
New story: Rajon Rondo will clear quarantine Monday, 5 weeks and one day after the team discovered his fractured R thumb in their 2nd practice of the bubble. The original timeline would have him out 6-8 weeks. It’s unclear whether he’ll be available vs POR
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo will clear quarantine tomorrow. Vogel said he is unsure when Rondo will be in uniform and available to play. He said the team will get him on the court Monday and see where he is at.
New story: Memphis guard Ja Morant played the final four games of the bubble with a fractured right thumb. The Grizzlies’ rookie phenom and rookie coach reflected on their improbable run that fell just short of the playoffs Saturday
Peja Stojakovic stepped down as the Kings’ assistant GM a day after Vlade Divac vacated the GM position.
Ja Morant says he was playing with a fractured thumb during the Grizzlies’ last four games in Orlando.
The Los Angeles Lakers' seven-year playoff drought will end Tuesday at 9 p.m. ET against the Portland Trail Blazers. LAL is 9-2 all time in playoff series against POR.
Melo with the big, um, oranges dance after that one  
Dennis Schrder played his first game back with the Thunder tonight after leaving the bubble to be with his wife for the birth of their second child. He wore a sweatshirt with his family on it for his postgame Zoom.
New story: Vlade Divac is out as Kings GM as the team will miss the postseason for the 14th straight year; Joe Dumars will be the franchise's lead decision maker in the short term, and perhaps longer
What a game. Might have only been a couple hundred people in here, but it felt as intense as games I've been to with thousands. Onto the play-in round.
With this Blazers-Nets game expected to finish sometime around midnight, the Suns will stay the night in Orlando no matter what the result of the game is, a league source tells ESPN.
Cameron Payne has 13 pts on 4-for-4 shooting in the first half of this PHX-DAL game. I wrote about him in our 5-on-5 roundup with @espn_macmahon @kpelton @TimBontemps @ProfessorDrz on our bubble thoughts so far
Lakers lose 136-122, finish out seeding round 3-5. Game 1 of No. 1-No. 8 (with POR/MEM/PHX/SAS still TBD) will likely be Tuesday. Dion 19p 5a 5tos; LeBron 17p 4a 3tos; Morris 14p on 4-of-5 3s; THT 14p; Quin 12p 4a; JR 11p. Lakers shoot 15-of-35 from 3 (44.1 pct)
Kostas Antetokounmpo and Talen Horton-Tucker with back to back dunks here in the 3rd Q against Sacramento. Nice little glimpse of the Lakers' youth, but LAL still trails the Kings by 24 in the seeding finale. The playoffs can't come soon enough.
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo has entered the bubble and will begin a four-day quarantine.
Frank Vogel says AD, KCP, Caruso and Kuzma are all out today. LeBron will play the first half. He’s starting Green, McGee, THT and Morris alongside James.
Please feel better soon, Bill.
A day after Dame Lillard dropped 61, the Clippers and Nuggets are warming up with Dame D.O.L.L.A.’s GOAT Spirit playing in AdventHealth Arena. Pretty, pret-ty, pret-tay good
There can only be two.
Kyle Kuzma was asked if playing the red-hot Blazers in the 1st Round would be the worst-case scenario of all the possible 8th seeds and said it would help test the Lakers: "I don’t think it’s worst-case scenario because we’re war ready. We’re ready to play anybody."
The Kings’ Vivek Ranadive tells ESPN the U.S. voting system needs an overhaul: “Let’s make voting as easy as ordering an Uber.” Until that reform comes, he is working to streamline the current system and formed a coalition of 20 pro sports teams to join in
New story: Dame Time is on track to extend through to the playoffs in Orlando thanks to a sublime 61-point night from the Blazers star on Tuesday
Dame Lillard relishes the moment after dropping 61 to move into sole possession of 8th place with one game to go. He is the only player in league history other than Wilt Chamberlain with three 60-plus point games in the same season.
New story: Kyle Kuzma came through in the clutch and the Lakers’ offense showed some signs of life with the playoffs fast approaching
Kuzma hit the shot, but Vogel came up with the ATO. He said he only used it once before this season, getting KCP a shot in PHX. When he coached IND, he saw ATL’s Mike Budenholzer run it with Paul Millsap and Kyle Korver and Vogel stole it for his own playbook.
Lakers beat DEN 124-121 on Kuzma's last-second 3. LeBron 29p 12a 2b; AD 27p 6r 5a 3s 2b; Kuz 25p on 11-of-16 6r 3a 2s; Green 11p on 3-of-5 from 3; Waiters 12p. Third time this season LeBron/AD/Kuz all went for 20 in the same game; LAL's gone 2-1. Lakers 14-of-29 from 3
A look inside the building at Kyle Kuzma’s game winner from up above:
New story: The NCAA champ has to win six games straight to win the tournament. The Phoenix Suns are 6-0 in the NBA's seeding tourney but coach Monty Williams says "we haven't accomplished anything." File from Orlando on another strong day for the Suns
Frank Vogel says Kyle Kuzma will start in place of KCP (ankle) against Denver tonight.
The Suns beat the Thunder 128-101 to improve to 6-0 in the bubble, led by Devin Booker's 35 points. They're a 1/2 game behind POR for the No. 9 spot. Headline writers, have at it: Scorching! Sizzling! Rising Suns! Book it!
With Russell Westbrook getting the night off, Austin Rivers went off for a career-high 41 points in a 129-112 win over the Sacramento Kings. Houston is now 4-1 in the bubble. Rivers shot 14-for-20 overall (6-of-11 from 3).
Frank Vogel says Kentavious Caldwell-Pope (ankle) will not play Monday. KCP received a MRI on the ankle that “came back clean,” but the team will give him the game off to rest it. Vogel did not say who would start in his place.
A very interesting subplot for LAL was Frank Vogel's rotation. Without Danny Green (hip) available, he started Caruso. But beyond that, he gave minutes to Cook, Dudley and THT - guys who've been with the team all year - while he gave DNP-CDs to new guys Waiters, Smith &amp; Morris
Lakers lose 116-111, drop to 2-4 in the bubble. They got LeBron's best game in ORL w/ 31p on 13-of-24 8r 7a 1to but AD's worst game in ORL (and maybe his worst as a Laker) w/ 8p on 3-of-14 8r 4a 4tos. TJ Warren dropped 39 on 15-of-22 for IND. Cook 21p. LAL shoots 13-of-39 from 3
The Lakers' bench is outscoring the Pacers' second unit 54-17. Quinn Cook is having quite the day with 21 pts on 8-for-12 shooting (including 5-for-7 from 3, tying a career high in makes from deep)
Quinn Cook has given the Lakers’ offense a much-needed shot in the arm. He has 10 pts on 4-for-7 shooting in 9 minutes. And he’s 2-for-3 from 3. LAL shot 2-for-18 from 3 as a team vs. HOU on Thursday.
A 6-7 forward from St. Vincent-St. Mary High School in Akron, Ohio just had back-to-back dunks in this Lakers-Pacers game ... with LeBron James on the bench. JaKarr Sampson with some strong early minutes for Indiana.
Frank Vogel says he will start Alex Caruso in place of Danny Green (out with a sore right hip) tonight versus Indiana.
New story: The Grizzlies got their first win of the bubble, coming back from 18 to beat OKC, a strengthened their grip on the No. 8 spot with POR hot on their heels
The Lakers’ injury report for Saturday’s game vs. IND was released. LeBron and Caruso have been upgraded to questionable.
Ok, we got you back. Your Grizzlies are taking it to the Thunder.
My man, I feel you. We could all go for a little Friday afternoon nap now and again.
The Lakers, without LeBron, Caruso and McGee for the night, lose to HOU 113-97 and fall to 2-3 in the bubble. Kuz 21p on 8-of-16 5r 3a 2s 2b; AD 17p 12r 3a; Green 10p on 5-of-7 2s; KCP 10p; Dwight 8p 15r; THT 10p on 4-of-6. LAL shoots 2-for-19 from 3 a night after going 5-for-37
We have a Talen Horton-Tucker sighting in the first half of this Lakers-Rockets game.
Frank Vogel says Alex Caruso is also out, along with LeBron James. Lakers will start AD, Kuz, KCP, Green and Quinn Cook.
As @espn_macmahon reported, no Westbrook for the Rockets tonight against the LeBron-less Lakers. As @cayleighgriffin reports, McLemore will fill in as a starter.
New story: The Lakers are sitting LeBron James out against the Rockets tonight because of a sore right groin
Lakers injury report for tonight vs. HOU: Davis- sprained right ankle- PROBABLE Morris-left hip contusion - PROBABLE Caldwell-Pope- right ribs contusion -PROBABLE Howard- sore right knee - PROBABLE Caruso-left neck muscle spasms - QUESTIONABLE James - sore right groin - OUT
New story: President Donald Trump said seeing athletes kneeling during the anthem is “disrespecting our flag” and causes him to “turn off the game.” LeBron James: “I really don’t think the basketball community are sad about losing his viewership”
The Lakers lose 105-86 to OKC, the only game all season long when they never held a lead. LeBron 19p on 7-of-19 (0-of-5 from 3) 11r 4a; AD 9p on 3-of-11 8r 5a; Waiters 14p on 5-of-13; Kuz 10p. LAL shoot 35.6% overall and 5-for-37 from 3 (13.9%). They play HOU tomorrow.
The Lakers are 20-for-60 (4-for-26 from 3) and trail OKC by 20 with two minutes left in the 3rd Q.
Kentavious Caldwell-Pope, who suffered a body blow to his side, was looked at by Lakers medical personnel during the timeout but remains on the bench. Quinn Cook subs in.
Fill in the blank: So far, the Lakers' offense in the bubble has been ______________.
Big news from the NBA &amp; NBPA, pledging $300 million towards economic empowerment in the Black community.
Frank Vogel says Rondo will begin daily testing today, now that he’s arrived in Florida to rehab. If he returns 7 consecutive negative tests, then he can re-join the bubble with a 4 day quarantine. That would have him back with the team before the start of the playoffs Aug. 17
Frank Vogel says Dwight Howard is out today vs. OKC with right knee soreness. He hopes Howard will be available tomorrow vs. HOU.
What can you do to make it feel like home 2,500 miles from L.A.? The Lakers started with what you hear. How Lawrence Tanter's iconic voice carried from Staples Center to the Orlando bubble. Story for ESPN:
New story: Rajon Rondo will be making his way closer to the bubble this week to continue his rehab in Florida
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo will travel to Florida tomorrow and spend some time outside the bubble before coming in and quarantining. No update on Rondo’s timeline. He’s about three weeks into an initial 4-6 week recovery timeframe laid out after he fractured his right thumb
Having donned a T-shirt honoring George Floyd on the day bodycam footage of his arrest surfaced, LeBron - after securing the Lakers’ most significant win in years - said that coming to the bubble has allowed players to “voice our truth” in seeking change
Lakers beat Utah 116-108 to clinch the No. 1 seed in the West, improve to 2-1 in the bubble. AD 42p 12r 4a 3s 1b; LeBron 22p on 9-of-16 9a 8r 2s 1b; Dwight 11p on 4-of-4 5r; KCP/Green combine for 18p on 8-of-14 4s; Kuzma 9p; Dion 7p 3a 2s. Mitchell led UTA w/ 33p
Alex Caruso's lower back is in obvious pain after that collision under the basket. He let out a pained shout, then swore and hit the court with his fist. He sat out the Lakers' first scrimmage in the bubble with a back contusion.
Anthony Davis: 7 shots in 35 minutes in Saturday's loss to TOR. AD in the 1st Q tonight vs. UTA: 14 shots in 12 minutes. Lakers and Jazz tied 24-24 headed into the 2nd Q.
Lakers gametime
Billy Donovan, minding his language in a gym where his voice carries with no fans, had a polite eruption after Thunder forward Mike Muscala took a hard foul: "Can we get a review?! Gosh damn!"
Hey @GWR, I know you keep track of all sorts of obscure achievements. Are these the most letters ever to appear on the back of an NBA uniform?
Those tuning into Thunder-Nuggets today won't see OKC's star sixth man, Dennis Schrder, out there. He left the bubble to be with his wife for the birth of their second child. Story for ESPN:
Billy Donovan says Terrance Ferguson is out vs. DEN (leg contusion) and Dennis Schrder is away from the team for family reasons. “It happened this morning,” Donovan said of Schrder. “At least this game, he’ll be out.” He added that Schrder was expected to leave at some point
Kind of fun: DeMar DeRozan and Rudy Gay are going through layup lines trying to mimic each other's moves/shots, incorporating a mini game of HORSE or PIG into their regular warm-up action. The English on Rudy's reverse layup game is pretty filthy.
Lakers lose 107-92 to the Raptors in an ugly one for L.A. LeBron 20p 10r 5a and a /- of -20 in 35 mins; AD 14p on 2-of-7 shooting 6r 3a 3b; Kuzma 16p off the bench. LAL shot 35.4% from field and 25% from 3. Lakers get UTA on Monday, another team that had a clunker on Saturday.
This Lakers-Raptors game is what many around the league thought the NBA restart would look like in the first couple weeks: defenses ahead of the offenses; shoddy rhythm and timing; challenges with conditioning. That said, at least it's competitive.
After trailing 13-0 to start the game, the Lakers head into the 2nd Q trailing Toronto 23-21. Kuzma scored 7 pts off the bench, continuing his strong play in the restart.
Frank Vogel says his plan going into tonight’s game against the Raptors is to find more minutes for JR Smith and Markieff Morris
Lakers assistant coach Miles Simon is here for Thunder-Jazz, getting in a little scouting even though the Lakers play a game in about five hours vs. TOR. Another example of the flex staffing happening in Orlando, with traveling party members pitching in w/ extra duties
I'd never seen this clip of Pop before. And now I hope to see it on a daily basis.
New video: James Harden and Russell Westbrook combined for 80 points Friday - the most they’ve ever scored together as teammates - in an overtime win over the Mavericks. My mini essay for SportsCenter on the Rockets’ successful restart.
Goodnight, Orlando.
This one virtual Mavs fan in the middle with the glasses reminds me of my dad trying to figure out our family Zoom calls and it’s quite distracting.
Kind of wild to think about Carmelo Anthony being out of the league considering how much a natural fit he seems to be with this Trail Blazers team.
New video: Thursday’s Lakers game included some history for the league and history for LeBron, too. My mini essay for SportsCenter.
Lakers win 103-101, to notch their first 50-win season since 2010-11. AD 34p (16-of-17 FTs) 8r 4a; LeBron 16p (6-of-19 shooting) 11r 7a, including the go-ahead score following up his own miss; Kuzma 16p 7r; Waiters 11p on 5-of-10. LAC: PG 30p; Kawhi 28p
No message on the back of LeBron’s uniform, but now his name is below his jersey number.
Bubble LeBron
Looks like LeBron got his hands on some Bigen in the bubble. No sign of grays.
Here’s a pic taken from afar. Now you can all trash my iPhone and my seats.
A group of NBA players have arrived about 20 minutes before tipoff to watch Lakers-Clippers and are sitting near midcourt. The group includes Dame Lillard, CJ McCollum, DeMar DeRozan, Carmelo Anthony and a couple others so far.
Bubble Kawhi
Bubble Zion
Hello.
Thank you, John Lewis.
Lakers-Clippers tonight. An appropriate choice for two teams that have had each other in their sights all year.
Luke Walton says Alex Len won’t play in the Kings opener against the Spurs. Richaun Holmes and Harrison Barnes will play with no minutes restriction, but Walton will monitor their energy.
An international trip gone awry. The death of a legend. A return to form in the standings. A health crisis the likes of which had not been been seen for a century. This is an inside look at the Lakers’ season that somehow, someway will restart tonight.
Different times call for different measures. LeBron James says he's doing away with his "Zero Dark Thirty-23" social media blackout down in Orlando. Story for ESPN:
New story: Anthony Davis sat out Tuesday's practice and is still experiencing discomfort in his right eye after getting poked in the face Saturday. Frank Vogel admitted there is some concern that Davis could sit Lakers-Clippers on Thursday
Frank Vogel on a Zoom call with reporters says Anthony Davis is still feeling discomfort in his right eye. Was held out of practice. They’ll evaluate him Wednesday. “There is some concern that he potentially will not play Thursday, but we’re hopeful that he does”
New video: Where do things stand for the Lakers 4 1/2 months since the NBA hiatus hit? Put together a primer in SportsCenter essay form thanks to our excellent production folks
New video: Where do things stand for the Lakers 4 1/2 months since the NBA hiatus hit? Put together a primer in SportsCenter essay form thanks to our excellent production folks
Dion Waiters on the difference between playing with LeBron James when he was 22 years old on the Cavaliers to playing with him now on the Lakers:
Frank Vogel says Anthony Davis is considered day-to-day with his right eye injury. LAL has its final scrimmage Monday against WAS and its seeding games opener in five days vs. LAC
Davis will not return, per the Lakers.
Anthony Davis is being evaluated after being poked in the right eye. The team says it is unclear whether he will return.
Frank Vogel says Alex Caruso will play Saturday. Markieff Morris will be held out until the third scrimmage. He says LeBron and AD will play a full game.
New story: Sacramento, snakebitten so far with the NBA restart, got some good news Friday
De’Aaron Fox says he’s recovered from his left ankle sprain. “I was able to get up and down the court and felt great,” he said Friday over Zoom.
Harrison Barnes is on a flight to Orlando to join the team after receiving two negative COVID-19 tests and so Sacramento Kings coach Luke Walton finally shaved his bubble beard. Barnes, meanwhile, vows to continue to grow his facial decoration until the Kings reach .500
“It’s just heart breaking, man.” LeBron James opened up on his view of racial inequality in the country today and continued to call for justice for Breonna Taylor on Thursday
LeBron James’ postgame comments are very open, personal and pointed as he discusses the state of race relations in the country. We’ll have a story up soon. James: “We’ll end this with Justice for Breonna Taylor.’ We’re going to continue to harp on that”
Alex Caruso (back contusion) will sit out today’s scrimmage, per the Lakers
Frank Vogel says Markieff Morris has only done some light shooting since clearing quarantine and will not play against the Mavericks.
Lakers coach Frank Vogel says LAL is starting LeBron, AD, JaVale, Green and KCP in Avery Bradley’s spot for the scrimmage vs DAL. Says LeBron and AD will only play the first half.
All you sneakerheads scrutinizing images from Orlando like it was the Zapruder film were right: LeBron James has been wearing the latest sneaker in his Nike line, the LeBron 18
Markieff Morris has cleared quarantine, according to the Lakers, and can rejoin team activities
Good morning, Los Angeles. The Lakers play an NBA scrimmage against the Mavericks in eight hours.
More and more players have steered their answers towards Breonna Taylor and social justice issues during media sessions in the bubble. @ProHoopsWriters has reached out to @TheNBPA about finding regular opportunities for those discussions. Story for ESPN:
Sacramento Kings guard De'Aaron Fox has returned to on-court, non-basketball activities as he continues to recover from a sprained left ankle sustained in training camp. He is ruled out of today's scrimmage vs. Miami.
Hello, old friend.
Spectrum Center, the Charlotte Hornets home arena, will serve as an early voting site in the upcoming 2020 elections, it was announced today. The Hornets join other NBA teams in the Hawks, Pistons, Bucks and Kings in pledging use of their facilities to thwart voter suppression
Frank Vogel, speaking about the Lakers coaching staff's commitment to social justice: "We fully, fully, fully support the Black Lives Matter movement and I feel like we as a country has never been in a position of strength to affect change that we’re in right now."
Alex Caruso: "Anything today that you ask of basketball, I’m just going to respond with, We need justice for Breonna Taylor.’ ... It’s such an important time in the world &amp; in a lot of our lives, to be able to create change &amp; impact change &amp; start getting justice for Breonna"
Kyle Kuzma says he will have his last name on his jersey in ORL. He says he doesn’t feel the need to do it to prove his activism, citing his community efforts in Flint, Mich. and also “didn’t like how it wasn’t creative.” He would have considered a personal message, if allowed
New story: The Lakers were a league-best 26-6 on the road before the hiatus. Now they'll resume the season 2,500 miles from home. Anthony Davis' bubble approach? "Just kind of treat it as an away-game routine"
Danny Green had on quite the intricate mask for Tuesday’s media availability.
Anthony Davis, on a Zoom call with reporters Tuesday, said the NBA hiatus didn’t cause him to change his approach on waiting until the offseason to decide on where he wants to play in the future: “It hasn’t crossed my mind within this three-month, four-month break.”
Kings center Richaun Holmes hung a punching bag in his hotel room for the 10-day additional quarantine, according to Sacramento coach Luke Walton
The only thing in the NBA that changes more often than what the Hawks uniforms look like is who the Cavs head coach is.
Lakers forward Markieff Morris is scheduled to arrive in Orlando today, per a league source. He will then have to clear quarantine.
New story: With the NBA announcing awards voting only accounting for games played through March 11, LeBron James made his case Monday. "As far as the MVP race, I think that I've shown what I'm capable of doing"
Lakers coach Frank Vogel says Dwight Howard's been part of the same information sessions about the coronavirus as the rest of the team. "Everybody has to make personal choices with this," Vogel said. Story for ESPN on Howard's reluctance to #maskup
Sacramento Kings center Alex Len said he first tested positive for COVID-19 on June 22nd and then tested positive for 24 straight days before he eventually returned two negative tests and was able to join his the team in Orlando.
More tough news for the Sacramento Kings, who’ve already had four guys test positive for COVID, another player unintentionally break the bubble perimeter and their star player sprain his ankle.
LeBron James in a video conference call with reporters: “Everyone keeps asking me How is the bubble?’ or How is it going?’ and I just say It’s 2020. Nothing is normal in 2020 ... It’s 2020. It’s different from the vision of 20/20. It’s not that clear.”
Dwight Howard's already made headlines with his exploits inside the bubble, while simultaneously having very real concerns back home. The Lakers center detailed how he will use the rest of salary this season -- some $700,000 -- for positive social change
Stand by your men: Lakers coach Frank Vogel endorses LeBron, AD for NBA rewards even without seedling games being considered
Frank Vogel: “Nobody impacts winning more than LeBron James. I do believe that he should be MVP this year.” He added that he thinks Anthony Davis should win DPOY. And, given the stipulation that he can’t vote for himself, Brad Stevens is his COY.
New story: Dwight Howard says he was caught not wearing a mask around the bubble by someone who called in the campus hotline on him. Lakers coach Frank Vogel: "We all should be wearing masks"
Dion Waiters says he will wear “Black Lives Matter” on the back of his uniform in Orlando: “Just because basketball is back we can’t forget about the most important thing that went on this year”
It will be open to the public from October 24 to November 3, leading up to the presidential election. The facility use comes at no cost for the county and those who come to the vote center will have access to free parking close to the arena. (3 of 3)
It's the largest vote center in Sacramento County history, with the extra space allowing for social distancing practices while voters use the facility. (2 of 3)
The Sacramento Kings, who committed to giving employees a paid day off on election days, announced Friday that the Golden 1 Center will serve as a voting center this fall where voters can register and cast their ballots. (1 of 3)
Rajon Rondo had successful surgery on his fractured right thumb on Wednesday, according to the Lakers. His timeline to return to full basketball activities remains at 6-to-8 weeks.
Frank Vogel on the idea of him and Rob Pelinka chipping in more in ORL: "I didn’t see any readily available cones so I stood off of one elbow, he stood off of the other elbow and the players had to run around us. We served as cones during practice, which was new for both of us."
Which led to today’s questions about Markieff Morris. According to a league source, Morris has an excused absence from Orlando and is expected to join the team soon.
The content is great and being consumed voraciously by fans, but those same fans are checking who is shown and who isn’t
There's a Catch-22 playing out with the Lakers right now. Frank Vogel says he wants to protect players' privacy, so won't comment on their practice performance. The team, however, isn't allowing media into practice and are sharing in-house video/photos on their platforms
Kentavious Caldwell-Pope, like teammates LeBron James and Anthony Davis, says he will have his surname on the back of his uniform in Orlando
Story on the Kings’ rough restart updated with quotes from Buddy Hield after his first practice post coronavirus: “I wouldn’t do nothing different”
Put this on his gravestone: In the middle of one of the worst years in American history, this man hit a 3-pointer worth $1,000,000"
With Alex Len (COVID-19) and Richaun Holmes (added quarantine) both unable to practice with SAC, Kings coach Luke Walton described his center depth: “The only bigs we have right now are Marvin and Harry.” Somebody needs to make a T-shirt.
Luke Walton, on a Zoom call with reporters, on the team still being w/o Harrison Barnes and Alex Len, who both tested positive for COVID-19: “We have to prepare as if we’re not going to have either one of those guys.” Added that the Kings remain hopeful they will be ORL bound
Harrison Barnes announced he tested positive for COVID-19, making him the 4th Sacramento player to have it. That, combined with Richaun Holmes accidentally breaking the bubble, has led to an uneasy time for the Kings in Orlando so far. ESPN story:
Lakers coach Frank Vogel is counting on a Rajon Rondo return this postseason and deems Avery Bradley's spot in the starting lineup an "open competition" with KCP being the front runner
Frank Vogel on a Zoom call with reporters offered some optimism regarding Rajon Rondo’s thumb injury: “We are confident that he’ll be able to get back and be a major factor for us in our playoff run”
The Lakers say Rondo fractured his right thumb. He will undergo surgery and is expected to return to full basketball activities in six to eight weeks.
Lakers guard Rajon Rondo suffered a "significant" hand injury during practice on Sunday evening, sources told me and @malika_andrews. Rondo, 34, underwent medical evaluation on his hand and thumb, sources said, and the severity of the injury should be known Monday morning
AD will stick with “Davis” on the back of his uniform to honor his family in Orlando
Buddy Hield and Jabari Parker - who previously tested positive for COVID-19 - are now Orlando and beginning quarantine, Sacramento coach Luke Walton said on a Zoom call. They must return two negative tests before they can rejoin the Kings on the court.
Anthony Davis, on a Zoom call, on the DJ that was provided for players to listen to last night: “Dwight (Howard) told me he was the only one there”
Kings guard De’Aron Fox tells reporters over Zoom he will wear “Anti-Racist” on the back of his jersey.
The Kings’ Marvin Bagley tells reporters on a Zoom call he will have “Freedom” on the back of his jersey: “Until African Americans have an even playing field, we’re not free”
Dwight Howard and Danny Green did not practice with the group Saturday, a league source told ESPN. @billoram reported that there was a “glitch” with their testing and both players are expected to join the team for practice Sunday.
Four months to the day that the NBA went on hiatus, the Lakers returned to practice in Orlando on Saturday. The latest on Dwight's whereabouts, JaVale's confidence in the bubble and LeBron's choice to forgo a message on the back of his uniform:
“I had a couple things in mind but I wasn’t part of that process and that’s OK”
“I commend anyone that decides to put something on the back of their jersey. It’s just something that didn’t seriously resonate with my mission, with my goal. I would have loved to have a say so on what would have went on the back of my jersey. ...
LeBron James said on a Zoom call that he won’t be putting any of the NBA’s approved messages on the back of his jersey in Orlando. He said he had a couple ideas in mind that he might have gone with, but wasn’t consulted.
The Sacramento Kings’ Richaun Holmes during a Zoom session from the bubble today: “I’ve seen complaints about the food, I’ve been good down here. I would just say, thank y’all for the food”
The 10-year anniversary of The Decision also means it’s the 10-year anniversary of The Letter. Back in 2014, LeBron addressed overcoming it to play for Dan Gilbert’s team again, saying the decision came down to “progress over pride”
I second this. Zubin is a pro’s pro
Dwight Howard's bounce-back season will continue in Orlando, the place where his NBA career started. The Lakers center told CNN he'll be joining his team's pursuit of the championship and donating his salary in the process
Dwight Howard on @donlemon Monday night: “I feel like we have a great opportinuty, the Lakers do, for winning the title this year ... Yes, I will be joining my team in Orlando.” He says he will donate the salary he earns in the bubble to the charity Breathe Again.
New story: JR Smith spoke to reporters Monday on being out of basketball for 20 months, his relationship with LeBron and his anticipated role with the Lakers
Also on a video conference call with reporters, Vogel raved about JR Smith’s initial workouts. “His nickname is Swish’ for a reason. ... He’s a big-time shot maker. And he looks like he’s in terrific physical condition”
Lakers coach Frank Vogel said Lionel Hollins “accepted the medical recommendation” to not travel to Orlando with the team. Before the evaluation, Vogel said, Hollins intended to be part of the Lakers’ traveling party.
Players, coaches and executives around the league have voiced all their varying concerns with the NBA restart. The Lakers, seemingly, have had every issue swirling around in this moment take root in their roster in some form or fashion. Our ESPN story:
New story: Last week, the Lakers lost a player and this week the Lakers lost a coach as they put together their travel party for the Orlando restart
Yahoo's @ChrisBHaynes was first with the report on Hollins.
Lakers assistant Lionel Hollins was deemed a higher-risk individual due to underlying medical conditions, a league source told ESPN. He will not be present in Orlando but will continue to be an essential member of the team and participate on coach Frank Vogel’s staff remotely.
New story: A “100 percent” healthy Anthony Davis sees the NBA’s hiatus as nothing but a boost for the Lakers’ championship chances
Frank Vogel, on a video conference call today, said it was a “miserable” experience making cuts to the Lakers’ normal traveling party to meet the 36-person requirement for ORL. He said the Lakers went heavy on medical staff and a full 17-man roster, leaving out some coaches
Anthony Davis, on a Zoom call with reporters, on his view of the Lakers’ championship chances today versus how he looked at it in March before the hiatus: “If anything, our chances got higher ... We’re all rested”
Mich. Secretary of State, Jocelyn Benson, plus coaches Lloyd Pierce &amp; David Fizdale have teamed w/ More Than A Vote in wake of the news that the Henry Ford Detroit Pistons Performance Center &amp; State Farm Arena in ATL will both serve as large-scale voting facilities in November
Dwight Howard remains in his Atlanta-area home, satisfying the league's quarantine and testing protocol, a league source told ESPN. The Lakers, who fly from L.A. to Orlando on July 9, hope their back-up center will eventually join them in Florida
Frank Vogel on a Zoom call reporters says that the Lakers “don’t have any intention” of replacing Dwight Howard’s roster spot on their team they have to submit to the NBA by today’s July 1 deadline.
Kings coach Luke Walton, on a Zoom call with reporters, on his message to his team while looking ahead to Orlando: “No judgment, no pressure on players - or staff - if they opt out of going.”
From the “hmm, I did not know that” files: JR Smith, who officially signed with the Lakers today, ranks 4th all-time in 3-pointers made during the NBA Finals
Lakers GM Rob Pelinka: "I think Orlando itself is going to be as much of a mental test as it is a physical test just because of the extraordinary circumstances there." ESPN story on the Lakers looking to handle the mental toll of the bubble
He added: "To think we get to be a part of the NBA community and the incredibly powerful platform that community has to usher in change agents for needed change is exciting."
He said one scene in Harriet (featuring Oprah) prompted a discussion on voter suppression. "That led to a conversation about what LeBron is doing with 'More Than a Vote' and how change can be made by bringing racial equality to the voting booths and eliminating injustices there"
"I just feel so proud how the players’ voices can help us learn and lead and impact change," he continued. "I do think Orlando will be a big part of that, continuing to amplify that voice."
Rob Pelinka said he attended a Black Lives Matter protest with his wife, son and daughter. They later watched the movies Selma, Harriet, 42 and Just Mercy and discussed them over family dinners. "It's been a journey," he said.
Rob Pelinka says @kaj33 recently led Lakers players in an “illuminating” forum to discuss injustice and inequality
Rob Pelinka says Dwight Howard is another player with an “extenuating circumstance” - beyond Avery Bradley - after the mother of one of his children passed away recently. The team continues to stay in touch with him and is hopeful he will be with them in Orlando
I don’t know about you, but I could use a little @BoeheimsArmy right about now. Excited to see TBT back.
Battle of L.A. in Orlando on the first day of games July 30th
Lakers two-way forward Devontae Cacok was named to both the All-NBA G League First Team and the G League All Rookie Team after averaging 19.4 points (65.9 FG%), 11.9 rebounds and 1.1 steals in 23.9 minutes per game for the South Bay Lakers
Lakers players and staff were tested for the coronavirus at the Lakers practice facility in El Segundo today, sources told ESPN. Tests were administered while subjects were in their cars: nose and throat swabs and blood sample drawn. Results expected in 24 hours.
In the 24 hrs leading up to the Kentucky primary, LeBron's @morethanavote: - Launched - Added Patrick Mahomes to the cause - Released a mission video - Revealed partners in When We All Vote, Election Protection &amp; Fair Fight Action
Lakers governor Jeanie Buss received a letter in the mail including racial and misogynistic epithets and decided to share it on Instagram. Why? "So that everyone can see the hate is real and living out there," she wrote.
When the Lakers new director of racial inequity &amp; action, Dr. Karida Brown, spoke to the team before being hired, her key question was this: Is the Lakers a non-racist organization or an anti-racist organization?
Weeks after condemning "racism, bigotry, violence and prejudice in all its forms" the Lakers announced a pair of moves - observing Juneteenth and hiring a director of racial equity - to aid in their mission to spur positive social change. ESPN story:
Here is a list of the charitable contributions the Lakers will make tomorrow in conjunction with observing Juneteenth, commemorating the release of all enslaved persons in Texas - the last of the states to do so - on June 19, 1865.
Happy 50th anniversary to @6abc in Philadelphia. Grew up watching legends like @Jim_Gardner, @lisathomaslaury, @rickwilliams6, @davidmurphy6abc, @MonicaMalpass, @larrykane, @SallyAnnMosey, Rob Jennings, Vernon Odom &amp; the late, great Gary Papa. Move closer to your world, my friend
The Lakers announce they have added Dr. Karida Brown, a UCLA assistant professor in African-American studies and sociology, to their staff to help their organization create positive change in the systemic issues facing black people in this country.
In case you ever wanted to know how to clean a basketball like a pro ...
Starting June 23, players who have been working out at private gyms will be prohibited without prior NBA approval. Several Lakers, LeBron included, spent the majority of their hiatus playing on private courts rather than at the facility, where there are restrictions in place.
Prior to July 1, teams are required to have a team information session to review best practices, including detailing “behavioral modifications": curtailing habits like spitting, licking fingers, clearing your nose, touching mouthguards, sharing equipment and exchanging jerseys
According to the NBA's health &amp; safety memo, if a team deems a player "protected" - meaning, not invited to the bubble for health concerns - a physician panel will review the decision. That panel's determination will be "final, binding and unappealable."
Some of Howard’s teammates told ESPN there is still time for the team to come together as a unified front before training camp begins later this month.
Despite previously stating “No basketball 'til we get things resolved,” Dwight Howard’s agent, Charles Briscoe, tells ESPN his client has not made a decision about returning to play, keeping all of his current focus on racial injustice in this country
Spurs guard Lonnie Walker IV was sexually abused as a child, prompting him to grow out his hair to give himself a new identity after the pain. He cut his hair and opened up about the past this week, hoping others can connect to his story. Story for ESPN:
LeBron James, Jalen Rose, Skylar Diggins-Smith, Kevin Hart and others are teaming together with More Than a Vote - an initiative meant to energize voting in black communities while exposing voter suppression tactics heading into November's election
Marc asked Kyle why the Lakers will be the champs. Kuzma: "Our leadership."
"Every person in the world has something in their soul ... that they just do not want to talk about or address within themselves, whether that is body insecurities, past traumas, or whatnot. ... America’s thing that we just do not want to talk about, as a country, is race"
Talking with @KNegandhiESPN about the Lakers’ view of the NBA restart on @SportsCenter
And there it is.
With homecourt advantage out the window in an NBA bubble, some contenders are angling for an alternative leg-up, sources tell ESPN. Extra possessions, extra coaches challenges and even first dibs at picking a team hotel on site are being discussed
New story: @DaTrillStak5 spoke to @MarcJSpearsESPN about his sudden turn as a vocal leader for social change one week to the day that his friend, George Floyd, was killed while in police custody - "I didn't ask to be in this position, but I'm embracing it"
Incredibly saddened to hear about my favorite breakfast spot back home - Joe’s Place in Wayne, PA - closing. There would be some comfort in the Radnor community, I think, in establishing a landmark in its honor for Marty, Dot and all those delicious meals
The basketball writing profession lost a true character today. I remember being a pup reporter and amazed at the way Marty Mac would work a locker room, approaching whomever he pleased - even those players notorious for not speaking before games, he’d chat up with ease. RIP
New story: Jared Dudley says players will be free to go in and out of “the bubble” when the NBA resumes, but the Lakers, with championship aspirations, will keep LeBron and AD inside. “Not letting them go anywhere,” he says.
Me waiting for The Last Dance finale to start
New story: Dwight Howard opened up about the loss of Melissa Rios, the mother of his 6-year-old son, David, and sees the unexpected benefit of the NBA hiatus allowing him to be there for his family
Dwight Howard, on a video conference call with reporters, said the mother of his six-year old son died during the pandemic nearly six weeks ago. He said it’s caused him to “just be grateful for life” as he spends the NBA hiatus with his family in Georgia.
New story: The Drew League, a summertime staple in L.A., canceled its season because of coronavirus concerns. "The community is going to miss it," the pro-am baskebtall league's commissioner, Dino Smiley, told ESPN
One year ago today: Game story from Toronto after Kawhi Leonard hit the first game winning buzzer beater in NBA Game 7 history
It was great to take a trip down memory lane with a Hall of Famer like Andy and get our minds off of the current state of the world for a bit.
New story: Kevin Love described his first day back at the practice facility, complete with assistant coaches wearing masks and gloves, to ESPN - "So for me, was it weird? Yeah ... (But) getting on the court and actually shooting was pretty uplifting"
New story: Frank Vogel says if it was up to him, he would have regular season games, or even exhibition games, when and if the NBA resumes before jumping straight into the playoffs
Yeah, so about that time MJ wore the original Air Jordans for his last game at the Garden as a Bull ... My nearly decade-old conversation with Kobe about that game and other takeaways from our staff after Episodes 5 &amp; 6 of #TheLastDance
What’s it going to take to get the NBA back? @wojespn with the in-depth report on the difficult spot the league finds itself in - weighing every possible decision, scenario and consequence - as it tries to do the right thing while the hiatus persists
New story: LeBron James reaffirmed his commitment to figuring out a conclusion to the NBA season, responding to speculation that some in the league are split in their goal of resuming play
New story: LeBron James is hoping to give the high school class of 2020 a chance to feel recognized for their accomplishments with a primetime graduation special next month
The Lakers detailed what workouts will look like when the practice facility re-opens on a conference call with players Monday, sources told ESPN: temperatures taken in the parking lot, strict time schedules and even rebounders wearing gloves
New story: It's 30 years later and things are still icy between the Pistons and the Bulls. Recapping what was revealed about their rivalry in Episodes 3 &amp; 4 of "The Last Dance" on Sunday night
Mark Madsen can finally rest easy knowing that Jerry Krause plane video surfaced.
New story: Pippen wings, MJ dogs and deep dish pizza are just a few of the "Last Dance" menu items Los Angeles chef @matthewpoley came up with as a creative way to connect with customers and stay in business during the COVID-19 crisis
New story: Sneakers worn in the Finals, a championship ring once belonging to his mother and a rookie uniform are on the auction block. "We believe it is the largest collection ever in one place of Kobe Bryant memorabilia," Goldin Auctions told ESPN.
Beautiful.
Adam Silver says the NBA is “not seriously engaged yet” in discussions about a bubble-type concept to sequester essential personnel to resume the NBA season. He adds: “We know we need large-scale testing,” making clear that frontline healthcare workers should get tests first.
When H-O-R-S-E worthy shots happened in real games from MJ, Kobe, LeBron, T-Mac, Steven Adams, Blue Edwards, Krystal Thomas and Trevor Booker with @royceyoung @NickFriedell @WindhorstESPN @E_Woodyard @_Andrew_Lopez
Researching this, I was blown away looking at Kobe's minutes in the playoffs. He had 12 postseason games where he played 48 minutes or more. That number jumps to 20 when you count games where he played 47 minutes or more. When the games really mattered, he gave everything he had
New story: We ranked Kobe Bryant’s five title-winning postseason runs. He saved the best for last.
New story: On the four-year anniversary of Kobe Bryant’s last game in the NBA, Vanessa Bryant reflected on her late husband’s accomplishments in his post-playing days
Beautiful read. We cannot thank our medical professionals enough.
Wonderful read by Mike here. As someone who has lost a brother, it hit on a lot of levels. Worth your time.
New story: LeBron checked in as the NBA hiatus hit the four-week mark Wednesday, still holding out hope that the league would find a way to resume this season
New story: The 2019-20 Lakers' camaraderie was built though attending dinners, charity events, parties and road trips together. Now that rapport extends to another activity, according to Rob Pelinka -- synced up virtual workout sessions
With ESPN re-airing Ray Allen’s Game 6 shot in 2013 tonight, our @ESPNNBA staff remembered some of the other massive shots in NBA Finals history. I wrote about Kyrie’s dagger in 2016
New story: UCLA great Kareem Abdul-Jabbar donated 900 pairs of protective goggles to his school's hospital system on Tuesday and vows to source more medical materials for frontline workers as the COVID-19 crisis continues
Some good news from The Captain, @kaj33
New story: The Lakers plan to ask their top brass to agree to a 20% salary deferment, in the hopes of protecting lesser-income employees
Thanks to my Philly guy @KNegandhiESPN. Now it’s up to @Rjeff24 @NickFriedell @Rachel__Nichols @stanverrett
.@MattPark1 is hosting a watch party tonight at 7 p.m. ET to re-live Syracuse’s 2003 NCAA championship. @therealboeheim @Coach_McNamara @hdubb21 @Coach_Hopkins and others will be there and I’ll drop by to tell a couple stories, too. Here’s the link: 
"I believe having hatred and resentment is like taking poison and expecting it to hurt the other person. This is the only way to get rid of that poison. I chose to sincerely forgive. This is living it." - 30 -
In 2002, Rudy T. and Kermit Washington found peace 25 years after the incident. "If I want to dwell on hatred and resentment and self-pity and being a victim, it's just self-destructive," Rudy told @Jonathan_Feigen at the time.
Certainly a worthy Hall of Famer for his life is basketball and the example he set as a human being. We've seen other coaches in recent seasons take a leave of absence for their health. The game can feel like everything, but you can't do anything without your health.
He would take those notes and compose letters to whomever was coaching the Lakers in that decade-plus he served as a consultant -- sometimes four or five pages long -- signing each one off in perfectly scripted cursive as, "Rudy T."
When he finished out his career in pro basketball with the Lakers, he could often be found observing practice with a yellow legal pad in hand, writing down thoughts. He wanted to contribute and be a part of the team, even if he was on the outskirts compared to the head coach.
He went on to guide Hakeem Olajuwon and Co. to consecutive titles in 1994 &amp; 1995 -- embracing 3-point shooters surrounding his gem in the middle -- and delivering a timeless speech after the win in 1995.
The punch came on Dec. 9, 1977. Tomjanovich was done for the season. He was never the same after that, playing three more seasons before retiring at age 32.
It was a devastating hit. Author @JFeinsteinBooks wrote an excellent book about the incident, "The Punch," in which he reported that Tomjanovich's skull was fractured in such a way that he could taste his spinal fluid leaking into his mouth. He also had a broken nose and jaw.
As a player, Tomjanovich was a bonafide talent. A five-time All-Star who averaged north of 20 ppg four times, his career took a turn in a game against the Lakers, of all teams, in 1977 when he was punched in the face by Kermit Washington.
“It’s always been the hard road," Rudy T said around the time of his last days coaching. "It hasn’t been like a superhighway where I’m in a limo and I’m going up to the mountain. It’s like I’m in the jungle and I’ve got a machete and I’ve got to find a way through it.”
A recovering alcoholic, Rudy was open about his mental health long before it became something the league was open with the way it is today with support and resources for its players and coaches.
Both sides negotiated a buyout. Rudy was to stay on as a consultant through the 2006-07 season. He ended up staying with the organization in a consultant/scout capacity through 2016-17.
While longtime trusted Phil Jackson assistant (and Syracuse legend) Frank Hamblen stepped in, there was worry about Rudy. "The other day at practice when we saw him, he looked kind of disheveled a little bit and everybody was concerned," Kobe said at the time.
LAL played its last nine games without Kobe at that point, as he was out with a severely sprained ankle and the Lakers were treading water in his absence at 5-4
He was 56 and coming off of a bout with bladder cancer and the season took its toll. Even though the Lakers were 24-19 -- not bad considering the starting lineup was Kobe, L.O., Caron Butler, Chris Mihm and Chucky Atkins -- Rudy stepped down on Feb. 1st.
Tomjanovich signed with L.A. in 2004 to replace Phil Jackson. He was paid handsomely - $30 million over 5 years -- but was given a near impossible hand in trying to replace a legend in PJax and coach a team that just traded Shaq while appeasing a fan base that expected rings
A little Lakers-related story about Rudy Tomjanovich, the two-time championship winning head coach with the Houston Rockets who was announced as a Hall of Fame inductee today (thread):
Rob Pelinka's statement on Kobe in the HOF: "The highest of congratulations to you, dear friend. ... Now, a part of you will live in the Hall with the rest of the all-time greats, where your legend and spirit will continue to grow forever.”
Attention basketball viewers: The NBA is streaming Kobe Bryant’s 65-point game against the Portland Trail Blazers from March 16, 2007, when he dropped 33 in the 4th Q and OT combined on their Twitter, Facebook, Youtube and Twitch platforms tonight at 8 p.m. ET.
The juxtaposition of the potential fatalities and the people tweeting about the fatality count that the government’s model shows is jarring.
New story: The Lakers have seen 10 games come and go on their schedule without playing them since the NBA shut down because of the coronavirus. Still, Tuesday, they got some good news: all their players are symptom free after a two-week isolating period
Per the Lakers, their players completed the 14-day home isolation prescribed by the team and all players are currently symptom-free of COVID-19.
It’s nice when the clouds part and the Basketball Gods come shining down for a moment.
My buddy in NYC sent me these yesterday. Courts in the city are shut down and some rims have even been taken off to prevent people from playing. Necessary measure but still heavy to see.
Not the March Madness we all wanted. But let’s see if we can get some wins.
Anthony Davis is teaming up with Lineage Logistics and pledging to match donations up to $250,000 to source meals from L.A.-area restaurants to provide to regional hospital workers fighting the COVID-19 crisis. Lineage is also looking to fill 260 jobs with Staples Center workers
New story: LeBron reunited with @Rjeff24 @channingfrye &amp; @RealAClifton on Road Trippin to outline the challenges facing the league in returning to the court &amp; present an idea for a play-in round robin. Plus his training regimen, a Space Jam update and more
Legend.
Elijah Hughes, who made the All-ACC First Team in his second season with Syracuse after transferring from East Carolina, is entering the NBA Draft. All the best for the big, 6-6 scoring guard.
New story w/ @NotoriousOHM: Marcus Smart and two Lakers players testing positive brings the total number of known cases of coronavirus in the NBA to 14
The Lakers, in a statement, said the two Lakers players who tested positive for COVID-19 are currently asymptomatic, in quarantine and under care of the team's physician. The rest of the players and staff are being asked to observe self-quarantine and shelter at home guidelines.
Adam Silver tells @Rachel__Nichols on SportsCenter the NBA has discussed having some sort of one-off All-Star style game as a fundraiser/entertainment diversion during the coronavirus league suspension.
The Lakers administered testing to players only - not coaches/trainers - today, sources told ESPN. Players arrived at the test site and never left their cars during the procedure, which took a matter of minutes, involving a Q-tip being placed up their nostril to secure a culture
The Lakers statement on next steps following the revelation that four Nets players tested positive for coronavirus:
Team source confirms to ESPN that in light of the Nets news, the Lakers - who played Brooklyn in their last game before the NBA suspension - will administer coronavirus testing on their players tomorrow and the players will be played in a 14-day quarantine. @BA_Turner was first
My dad’s St. Patty’s Day message, keeping in mind social distancing: “Top of the morning to you, and the rest of the day to myself.”  
On the Lakers’ team conference call today to discuss protocol during the coronavirus spread, players were instructed to only work out at either the practice facility or their home gym, for safety reasons, sources told ESPN. And players are expected to check in with the team daily
30 events in the next month between scheduled games for the pro teams, the NCAA tournament and concerts figures to be well north of a $5 million commitment for the arena workers
Jeremy Lin, who already pledged $150,000 to fight the coronavirus in China, will donate an additional $150,000 to the United States Fund for UNICEF. He quoted Tupac in his announcement: "You see the old way wasn't working so it's on us to do what we gotta do, to survive"
New story: @kevinlove has pledged $100,000 to aid displaced arena workers during the NBA's suspension in response to coronavirus. The Cavaliers, Mavericks and Hawks owners have made similar vows. "My hope is that others will step up," Love told ESPN
On the Lakers team conference call this afternoon players were told they can coordinate individual 1-on-1 workout time at the team's facility whenever they feel comfortable, sources tell ESPN. The team will slot times based on interest so players do not come in contact.
There is no practice or meeting scheduled tomorrow for the Lakers players, per a team spokesperson. Players are welcome to come in to the practice facility for treatment, however. Lakers team employees have been asked to work from home.
Stocking up on some essentials at the grocery store and the line that extends halfway around the store includes Clippers forward JaMychal Green a few spots ahead of me.
Lakers players are still waiting on word from the team for the next steps to follow during the NBA suspension, sources tell ESPN. Players learned of the league’s hiatus on Twitter, and then communicated on their group chat, sources said.
LeBron James (sore left groin), Alex Caruso (left hand contusion), Anthony Davis (sore left elbow) are all probable Thursday vs. Houston. Dwight Howard (upset stomach) is available.
Lakers lose to the Nets, 104-102, when Anthony Davis' potential game-winning 3 doesn't fall at the buzzer. LeBron 29p 12r 9a; AD 26p 8r 2a; Kuz 14p on 6-of-9 5r; Bradley 10p. BKN was led by Dinwiddie (23p 7a); LeVert (22p 7r).
Lakers coach Frank Vogel, when asked if the team is providing preemptive Coronavirus testing for its players and employees says “no one has asked and to my knowledge, we’ve not offered that”
Vogel on NBA games with no fans: “It looks like it is a possibility and we’ll just cross that bridge when we come to it. Probably a week ago I would have guessed that it would be very unlikely, but as the concern grows, it looks more and more like it might be a possibility”
Lakers injury report for Tuesday against Brooklyn
New story: A big weekend in L.A. had some on the Lakers talking like they went from contenders to favorites for the title
Frank Vogel: “I believe in Rondo. I always feel good about Rondo out there ... He was huge ... He led the charge”
Lakers go 2-0 in their biggest weekend of the season, beating the Bucks on Friday and the Clippers on Sunday, 112-103. LeBron 28p 9a 7r 2b; AD 30p 8r 2a 2s; Bradley 24p on 6-of-12 from 3; Kuz 8p 10r; KCP 9p. LAC: PG 31p 6r; Kawhi 27p; Harrell 20p 8r
High-level hoops today.
With 2:44 remaining in the 1st Q, the Lakers &amp; Clippers have a tied score, 20-20, and are tied in technical fouls with one tech for Avery Bradley and one for Lou Williams. It's another loud one here at Staples Center. Even though it's a Clipper "home" game, the crowd seems 50-50
New story: Frank Vogel says he will look to “manufacture” practice time for Dion Waiters to get the guard up to speed
Frank Vogel said the Lakers had an educational meeting with their team doctor on Saturday to discuss the coronavirus, but said it was it was covering the basics such as washing their hands and limiting contact with others.
Frank Vogel says “it’s probably going to be a few games” before Dion Waiters gets in for the Lakers. Mentions that he didn’t play much with Miami this season so he needs sometime. So no Dion on Sunday against the Clippers.
New video: With Anthony Davis saddled with foul trouble and Giannis Antetokounmpo rolling, LeBron James switched onto the reigning MVP. The decision changed the game and might have changed the MVP race. My mini essay for SportsCenter
Lakers beat the Bucks 113-103 to improve to 48-13. LeBron 37p on 12-of-21 shooting 8r 7a 3s; AD 30p 9r 2b; Kuz 11p on 3-of-11 8r; JaVale 5p 11r. For MIL: Giannis 32p 12r 6a. The Lakers play the Clippers on Sunday. Should be a fun one.
A win against the Milwaukee Bucks tonight will clinch the Los Angeles Lakers their first playoff berth since 2013.
Dion Waiters will wear No. 18 for the Lakers.
Dion Waiters will participate in pregame shooting drills at Staples Center tonight but there’s no plan to play him against the Bucks, sources tell ESPN. The Lakers intend to take their time with Waiters’ integration so he can get up to speed.
The Lakers announce the Dion Waiters signing
New story: Ahead of Friday’s MVP showdown between Giannis and LeBron, the Lakers say James’ leadership should give him the edge for the award
Following up here: The contract has not been inked yet, but an agreement has been reached to have Waiters join the team on a minimum contract and fill their final open roster spot.
The Los Angeles Lakers have signed guard Dion Waiters for the remainder of the season, league sources confirm to ESPN. Waiters had a strong workout this week and the team hopes he can be a consistent shot maker off the bench. The Athletic first reported the agreement.
LeBron James on if he’ll have any message for the Lakers going into Friday’s game against the No. 1 Bucks led by reigning MVP Giannis Antetokounmpo: “What’s known doesn’t need to be said”
What Gerry really wants to say is that we wouldn’t have won 10 f—ing games without Elijah this year. Not 10.
New story: Anthony Davis was dominant Tuesday and Frank Vogel said it was merely a glimpse of what we'll see out of the Lakers star big man come playoff time
A night after Lakers owner Jeanie Buss said she understood why Dwight Howard left LAL as a free agent in 2013 because, “we hired a coach (in Mike D’Antoni) that didn’t respect his game and wasn’t going to put him in a position to succeed,” Howard took the high road.
Lakers win 120-107, beat PHI to improve to 47-13 with 22 games left to play. AD 37p on 13-of-19 13r 2a 4s 2b; LeBron 22p 14a 7r 2b; Dwight 11p on 4-of-4; Avery 10p 5r 3a 2s; KCP 10p; Rondo 8p 3a; Kuz 7p 5r 18 in 20 mins. Big weekend ahead: Bucks on Friday; Clippers on Sunday.
Alex Caruso (sore right hamstring) is out tonight vs. PHI
New story: LeBron-Zion Part 2 lived up to its billing
Lakers beat the Pelicans 122-114 to sweep season series vs. New Orleans 4-0 and improve to 46-13 overall. LeBron 34p 13a 12r 2s (13th trip-dub); Kuz 20p 4r; KCP 12p 3s; Green 10p; Morris 10p; AB 10p; JaVale 8p 6b; Dwight 8p 6r. NOP: Zion 35p on 12-of-16; Lonzo 19p 9r 9a
The Los Angeles Lakers will work out free agent guard Dion Waiters on Monday, sources tell me and @wojespn. Waiters has career averages of 13.2 points and 2.8 assists in Cleveland, OKC and Miami. LAL opened up a roster spot by waiving guard Troy Daniels on Sunday.
Anthony Davis (sore right knee) and Alex Caruso (sore right hamstring) are out vs. NOP, per the Lakers. Danny Green (hip) will play.
Lakers injury report for Sunday vs. Pelicans is out. Anthony Davis is listed as questionable with a sore right knee. Alex Caruso (sore right hamstring) is also questionable. Danny Green, who missed Saturday’s game because of a sore hip, is listed as probable.
New story: Ja Morant calls LeBron James “big bro.” LeBron calls Ja a “special kid.” After Morant and the Grizzlies beat L.A., LeBron said the next wave of stars in Ja, Zion, Tatum, Trae and Luka have the league in a “very good place”
In potential 1st Rd preview, Lakers lose 105-88 to Memphis, see their 7-game win streak snapped by a Grizz team coming into Saturday having lost 5 in a row. LeBron 19p (2-of-8 3s) 10a 8r 5tos; AD 15p 9r 4a 2b; KCP 11p; Kuz 10p. MEM: Ja Morant 27p 14a 6r; Brooks 24p; Jonas 22p 20r
Markieff Morris making his presence known here in his third game with the Lakers, picking up a technical foul for getting into Dillon Brooks' face when he didn't appreciate Brooks' contact with Dwight Howard.
Dwight Howard, ladies and gentlemen.
A fan in Memphis hand painted these sneakers and passed them on to Jared Dudley as he was heading to the locker room so he could hand them off to LeBron James as a gift.
LeBron James - In. Anthony Davis - In. Danny Green - Out. Alex Caruso joins the starters in place of Green.
Lakers status update for Saturday in Memphis: LeBron James (groin) is questionable; Danny Green (hip) is doubtful; Anthony Davis (elbow) is probable.
New story: With LeBron out Thursday, the Lakers showed out and gave a glimpse of what they might be capable of in the moments James rests as the season goes on
Anthony Davis: "There’s still a lot that we can get better at and that’s a scary thing for teams and good thing for us that we’re not playing our best at all times and we’re still able to get wins."
Lakers beat the Warriors 116-86 to extend their win streak to 7 and improve to 45-12 (and 2-1 w/o LeBron). AD 23p 6r; Kuz 18p 3r 3a; Dwight 13p 9r; Rondo 12p 6a; JaVale 12p 6r; Bradley 12p.
Draymond Green picks up two technical fouls midway through the second quarter and gets to go home early.
Anthony Davis will play tonight vs GSW per Frank Vogel. Rajon Rondo will get the start in LeBron James’ place, he’s out with a sore groin.
Weeks ago a station manager at @ESPNLosAngeles told me I had mail. I assumed it was a promo from a team so wasn’t quick to retrieve it. Finally opened it and was blown away. Bill didn’t leave a return address. I hope someone in Traverse City can find him and thank him for me.
LeBron James will miss Thursday's game against the Golden State Warriors with a sore groin, the team announced Wednesday.
Lakers beat Pelicans 118-109 to improve to 44-12, stretch win streak to 6 games. LeBron season high 40p on 17-of-27 shooting 8r 6a; AD 21p on 6-of-21 14r 6b; Green 17p 5-of-9 from 3; KCP 15p; Kuz 9p; Caruso 8p 8a and a 20 in 17 mins. NOP: B.I. 34p; Zion 29p; Lonzo 10p 8r 8a
The arena is still buzzing from that between the legs feed from Caruso to LeBron that LeBron finished with a dunk over Josh Hart. Wow.
You never know what’s going to happen at a Lakers game ...
New story: LeBron James on Vanessa Bryant - “How strong and how bold and how powerful Vanessa is. To stand up there the way she did, to give that speech the way she gave that speech. I commend her”
Former Laker DeMarcus Cousins is on the practice floor getting up shots this morning. His roster replacement, Markieff Morris, just addressed L.A. media for the first time.
Shaquille O’Neal mentioned the time he reminded Kobe Bryant there is no “I” in “team.” Bryant had a retort. “I know, but there’s a M-E’ in that motherf—er.”
Saw Beyonc perform with Destiny’s Child during the 2001 NBA Finals in Philadelphia when Kobe Bryant and the Lakers played the Sixers. Now she leads off Bryant’s Celebration of Life in L.A. with XO and Halo. Life is a trip, man.
New story: While the Lakers sailed through the sky that fateful Jan. 26 afternoon, the world below them changed forever more. An account of what happened on the plane during a flight they will never forget
Got to love the 72-year-old Larry David still making masterpieces halfway into season 10 of a show he started 20 years ago when he already had critical acclaim and immense wealth.
New story: LeBron lifted the Lakers late to cap a charged day harkening back to Lakers-Celtics lore
The Lakers make the Morris addition official. DeMarcus Cousins is waived to create the roster spot.
Lakers win 114-112 in another nail biter vs. Boston, improve to 43-12. AD 32p 13r 2b; LeBron 29p 9a 8r; Kuz 16p 4r; Dwight 10p 7r; Rondo 4p 5a 5s. Jayson Tatum tied a career high with 41p for BOS. Zion comes to town Tuesday
Bill Russell breaking Lakers-Celtics lines for Kobe.
New video: Ten years after they last locked horns in the NBA Finals, the Lakers and Celtics are back atop the NBA. My mini essay for SportsCenter
From last night: Anthony Davis opened up the post All-Star stretch run with a 7-block performance leaving his team singing his defensive praises once again
Vogel on BOS: "I think they have a very legitimate chance of competing for the title, particularly coming out of the East. ... They're a team this year that is showing to be greater than the sum of their parts, and when you have that element to it, you absolutely are a contender"
Frank Vogel says Anthony Davis (bruised right calf) is probable for Sunday vs. Boston. Davis participated in the walkthrough Saturday. “He should be good to go,” Vogel said.
Whomever is responsible for JaVale McGee’s social media edits this season is doing a bang-up job. This Alex Caruso/Billy Hoyle mashup posted by McGee tonight was great.
Lakers beat Memphis 117-105 to come out of the All-Star break with a W and improve to 42-12. LeBron 32p on 11-of-12 FTs 7a 3r 2b; AD 28p 13r 7b 4a; Bradley 14p 5r 3s; KCP 12p 5r; Caruso 9p and was a 22 in 23 mins; Green 3p 3r 3a 3s 2b and 25 in 25 mins.
The Lakers say it is a bruised right calf for Anthony Davis.
Anthony Davis checks back into the game a few minutes into the 2nd Q after missing most of the 1st Q from what appeared to be a knee to his leg.
DeMarcus Cousins just arrived at Staples Center and hugged a couple staffers on his way into the Lakers locker room.
A soul-baring read from Ben Gordon. Certainly worth your time to better understand the human condition. Impressed by Ben for opening up and my thoughts are with him.
New story: Could DeMarcus Cousins be the Lakers’ late-season addition? He seems to think so. Cousins addressed his vision for his role, his offseason injury and his off-court troubles on the All the Smoke’ podcast
Receieved an email re: the relaunch of Big Baller Brand The revamped website only features photos of LaVar and LiAngelo Ball - none of Lonzo or LaMelo. But it does sell various colorways of the ZO2.19 sneakers for $179 - the kicks he stopped wearing
Can certainly say the league did right by Kobe after watching last night. ... And all due respect to Kawhi, CP3 would have gotten my vote for MVP.
Aaron Gordon’s the most impressive two-time runner up since John Adams.
The NBA All-Star Game Kobe Bryant MVP Award. Kobe was named an All-Star 18 times and played in 15 All-Star Games, winning MVP four times - tied with Bob Pettit for the most ever.
Missed dunks that aren’t in an actual dunk contest are somehow way more fun to watch.
Taking a break south of the border over All-Star and just happened to get a Kobe room upon check-in.
Ticket information for the Kobe Bryant memorial was released by the Lakers today:
New story: The Lakers went into the break increasing their lead over Denver to 4 games, but LeBron says rather than talking about the big picture goal of the No. 1 seed in the West, L.A. has found it success this season by trying to conquer the moment
The LeBron James Family Foundation announced Wednesday that it is partnering with Kent State University to offer four years tuition (and one year of room and board paid for) to qualifying students from his I Promise School. LeBron: “It’s probably the best thing I’ve ever done”
Lakers win in Denver 120-116 in OT, improve to 41-12 at the All-Star break. LeBron 32p on 15-of-29 14a 12r; AD 33p on 12-of-23 10r 2b 2s; Dwight 14p 11r; Caruso 10p on 4-of-5 6r 4a; Bradley 10p; KCP 9p 4s.
New video: My sitdown with Anthony Davis for SportsCenter. We cover heading home to Chicago for All-Star, Kobe, what it's really like playing with LeBron, his unfortunate injury diagnosis after his fall against the Knicks and much more
LeBron on Tokyo: "My name is in the hat &amp; it’s always predicated on: one; my body, how my body is feeling at the end of the season - I hope to make a long playoff run. And then where my mind is &amp; then where my family’s head is. So, it’s a lot of factors but my name is in the hat"
Lakers beat the Suns 125-100, improve to 40-12. AD 25p 10r 5a; Rondo 23p on 9-of-13 shooting (4-of-5 from 3) 6a; LeBron 17p 9a 8r 8tos; Dwight 14p on 6-of-6 15r; KCP 13p; Bradley 12p; Kuz 9p 8r 2b.
Monty Williams says Deandre Ayton will not play vs. the Lakers tonight.
Spike Lee’s Oscars fit honoring Kobe Bryant
New story: LeBron on that double clutch reverse dunk vs. Houston - “Ever see the movie 'The 6th Man' Kobe came down, put himself in my body and gave me that dunk on that break."
Lakers beat the Warriors 125-120 after nearly letting a 21-point lead slip away late, improve to 39-12. AD 27p on 9-of-14 10r 4a 3s; LeBron 22p 11a 8r; Bradley 21p on 7-of-11 (5-of-7 from 3); Kuz 12p 6a 3s; Dwight 12p 8r; Rondo 11p 4a; Green 10p.
T-shirts being distributed for tonight’s Lakers-Warriors game, complete with what a Kobe NBA logo could look like
New story: After a quiet trade deadline, the Lakers might have showed their next move by Darren Collison joining Jeanie Buss at the game Thursday night
Darren Collison on his night at Staples Center: "Just watching the game. Ain't nothing to it. Got the best seats in the house."
Darren Collison is sitting with Jeanie Buss at the Lakers game tonight.
The Lakers say Anthony Davis has a sprained right index finger. X-rays taken at halftime were negative.
LeBron James selects Anthony Davis with his first pick in the All-Star draft, to the surprise of no one. LeBron goes with Kawhi No. 2. A look at the Lakers team that might have been in Chicago.
The memorial for Kobe Bryant, Gianna Bryant and the other victims of the Calabasas crash has been set for Feb. 24 (2/24) at Staples Center
The trade deadline came and went for the Lakers without a deal. They have a full 15-man roster, but will survey the buyout market to see if anyone becomes available worth waiving a current player in order to acquire him. Darren Collison is also a free agent PG they'll look at.
LeBron spoke at shootaround alongside AD after completing his All-Star draft earlier this morning: "For viewer purposes only, I can't tell you who I picked. We sit here as one right now, but we could be as two later on when the draft comes out. We'll see what happens"
LeBron on MIA trading for @andre: "I saw it and I was like, 'OK.' I think it makes them a better team because of his championship DNA, you add that to that championship culture down there. So it helps them right away ... I know that 'Dre is happy to be suiting it back up"
The Lakers inquired about Dennis Schrder as they look to fortify the PG position leading up to the trade deadline, sources told ESPN. The conversation did not go very far, as OKC -- currently the No. 7 seed in the West -- were not looking to move him without a hefty return.
New story: With emotions still raw, a reflective Dwight Howard opened up about what the loss of Kobe Bryant means to him and how Kobe's death will impact how he plans to live the rest of his life
Kyle Kuzma when asked what he's learned from hearing his name in trade rumors over the years: "I mean, shoot, Kob’ used to always tell me, If they’re not talking about you, then you should be worried.’ And I’m the talk of the town, so"
LeBron hit five 3s in a row in 3 minutes in the 4th Q so I asked him about the research that suggests the “Hot Hand” is a myth LeBron: "I guarantee the analytics person or people have never ever been in the zone in their lives"
Dwight Howard says prior to the accident he got word that Kobe Bryant was indeed going to come to Chicago to join him in the dunk contest to help him on a dunk. Dwight says it’s “heartbreaking” that he never got the chance to tell him how much he appreciated him.
Lakers win 129-102, beat Spurs to improve to 38-11. LeBron 36p on 6-of-9 from 3 9a 7r; AD 18p on 8-of-12 5r; Kuz 18p on 7-of-11 12r; Dwight 12p 11r; JaVale 14p on 5-of-7. Fans chant "Ko-be! Ko-be!" as the final buzzer sounds.
New story: The Lakers are walking the delicate line of continuing to honor Kobe Bryant while attempting to return to business as usual this week with the NBA trade deadline looming Thursday
The bracelet LeBron wore to Lakers practice Monday.
The league came to LeBron James with the idea about the All-Star jerseys being No. 2 for Gigi and No. 24 for Kobe. LeBron chose to have his team wear No. 2, he says, because Gianna makes him think about his own daughter, Zhuri.
New decals on the court at the Lakers practice facility
Did not need that Google commercial after this week. Man.
LeBron James will be featured in a Super Bowl ad for GMC today, introducing the HUMMER EV, the electric version of the car he drove in high school that caused so much controversy surrounding his eligibility.
New story: Luke Walton walked through Staples Center’s hallways this week and couldn’t help but picture Kobe’s family in his mind’s eye. He’s been tucking his son to bed at night with YouTube clips of Kobe as he mourns his friend and teammate
Avery Bradley says the Lakers have started saying “1-2-3 Mamba!” when breaking their huddles. On the Lakers scoring 81 in the first half, he says it shows the Lakers have an angel with them.
Lakers beat the Kings 129-113 to improve to 37-11, scoring 81 first half points in their first win in a world without Kobe Bryant. LeBron 15p 11a 10r (11th triple-double of the season); AD 21p on 9 shots; Bradley 19p (5-of-9 from 3); KCP 15p; Rondo 13p 8a; Caruso 13p; Kuz 12p
81 first-half points for the Lakers.
The Lakers are up 44-22 after 1Q in Sacto. Avery Bradley has 16p on 6-of-8 shooting.
Sacramento remembers Kobe Bryant
By skipping college, Kobe missed out on a lot of drinking games. Luke Walton recalled first teaching him how to play quarters on a road trip. "He was awful at it," Walton said. "Kobe being Kobe, we kept hanging out and playing and he's over there at a side table just practicing"
Kings assistant coaches Lindsey Harding and Rico Hines
LeBron splashing some deep 3s pregame, much to the delight of Lakers fans in Sacramento
Shout out to Lawrence Tanter. That’s it. That’s the tweet.
Not sure which former Laker I was more surprised to see postgame at Staples Center: Elgin Baylor or Lance Stephenson
The Lakers lose an emotional return to the basketball court, 127-119, in the the first game since the Calabasas crash. Dame Lillard dropped 48p 9r 10a. AD 37p 15r 6a; LeBron 22p 10a 8r; Kuz 17p 15r; Bradley 10p 5r; Usher 1,000,000 tears caused.
After a trying week for the entire Lakers team, Frank Vogel has now played every player on the active roster this game and we still have 8 minutes to go in the 2nd Q.
LeBron is breaking out the double-wide wristband on his forearm like Kobe wore. Man, does that bring me back to my high school team.
LeBron James ends his pregame address: “In the words of Kobe Bryant, Mamba out.’ But in the words of us, Not forgotten.’ Live on, brother.”
Courtside.
Four hours to tip-off.
The Original Pantry Cafe - 9th &amp; Figueroa
NBA All-Star Weekend to pay its respects to Kobe and Gianna Bryant
LeBron James wore an unreleased pair of Kobe’s signature Nike sneakers to shootaround Friday. They’re called the “Big Stage/Parades” and are inspired by the Kobe 5s that Bryant wore in the 2010 Finals and subsequent championship parade. (h/t @NickDePaula)
Frank Vogel says the Lakers coaching staff will all wear Kobe Bryant’s signature sneakers on the bench tonight.
New video: How do you look back at a legend when so many want to believe he’s still here? What do you do bring memories to life when nine tragic deaths are on everyone’s minds? Examining the emotions behind Friday’s game in my mini essay for SportsCenter
New story: Rob Pelinka shared some thoughts about Kobe Bryant on Thursday, detailing the relationship they shared that melded business, friendship and family together
Rob Pelinka’s statement on Kobe Bryant:
Frank Vogel was the lone representative for the Lakers to speak after today’s practice. His message was the team is getting lost in the work in preparation for Friday’s game as their form of group therapy.
Derek Fisher, who entered the league as a Lakers rookie alongside Kobe Bryant in 1996, is at Lakers practice, observing the action from a balcony above the court alongside Kurt Rambis
Metta World Peace visited the memorial outside the Lakers practice facility in El Segundo this morning and spent time with several fans as they shared Kobe Bryant memories
The new NBA All-Star format is reminiscent of @thetournament’s “Elam Ending”
The Lakers are warming up as a team outside the facility while the coaches toss a football around
Vanessa Bryant made her first public statements since the tragedy today on Instagram. Her words are as beautiful as they are graceful. She finishes her post by directing where people can go to help the families of the other victims of the crash and how they can honor Gianna.
New story: Frank Vogel spoke on behalf of the Lakers on Wednesday and says his team is as close as ever as they mourn the untimely death of Kobe Bryant
New story: Quinn Cook is changing his uniform from No. 2 to No. 28 to honor both Kobe Bryant and his daughter, Gianna
LeBron sneaks in the penalty kick past AD
LeBron, AD and a couple Nike executives are getting a morning workout before Lakers practice on the soccer field across from the Lakers practice facility. Athletic trainer Mike Mancias is putting them through their paces.
Woke up thinking about this ...
New story: The Lakers gathered for lunch Tuesday and it turned into a cathartic Kobe story time, sources tell ESPN, complete with a toast of vino for the Mamba
Kobe’s name echoing outside Staples Center
Kobe’s last game playing in the ESPN offices as a crowd gathers to watch on screens outside at L.A. Live
L.A. Live
And another one on the opposite side of the freeway.
Scenes from the Kobe and Gigi Bryant memorial outside the Lakers practice facility in El Segundo, Calif.
On the I-405 N
Statement from the Lakers: The Los Angeles Lakers would like to thank all of you for the tremendous outpouring of support and condolences. This is a very difficult time for all of us. We continue to support the Bryant family and will share more information as it is available.
Tomorrow's Lakers-Clippers game has been postponed and will be rescheduled at a later date, the league announced.
Kobe Bryant wasn’t just a Lakers player, he was a 20-year Laker employee that had many relationships with other Laker employees. As such, the team has brought in grief counselors to the office today to provide comfort and guidance in both group and 1-on-1 sessions, per a source
Lakers lose 108-91, fall to 36-10 and finish the Grammys road trip 3-2. LeBron 29p 7r 8a 8tos (passed Kobe for 3rd on all-time scoring list); AD 31p 7r 2s 5tos. PHI: Ben Simmons 28p on 12-of-15 10r 8a 4s 5tos; Tobias 29p 8r. Sixers finish the game on a 15-3 run to close it out.
New story: LeBron passed Kobe for 3rd on the all-time scoring list Saturday. "He helped me before he even knew of me because of what he was able to do (as a prep to pros success story)," James said of Bryant in the days leading up to the feat.
Technology.
Frank Vogel says McGee has shown improvement since Thursday but hasn’t been eating much so is “depleted.” He believes McGee will be able to play when they return to L.A. and says this isn’t a pneumonia situation like last year.
The Lakers say that JaVale McGee will miss his second straight game with flu-like symptoms.
With the trade deadline coming up on Feb. 6th, LeBron was asked if the Lakers are "one piece away" from cementing their championship contender status. LeBron's answer was both confident, and savvy, preserving team chemistry by not suggesting weakness: "We have enough right now"
Lakers win 128-113 in BKN to improve to 36-9 overall and 3-1 on their 5-game Grammys road trip that ends Saturday in Philly. LeBron 27p 12r 10a to log his 10th triple-double of the season; AD 16p 11r; Dwight 14p 12r; Green 14p 4-of-7 on 3s; Kuz 16p; KCP 11p; Rondo 7p 10a.
Interesting night for the Lakers' coaching staff in Brooklyn. A win over the Nets will clinch them All-Star coaching duties for the West (hat tip @kylegoon). Which would have to give some extra satisfaction to the two former Nets coaches on their staff in Kidd and Hollins
The Lakers say JaVale McGee is out tonight with flu-like symptoms.
.@QCook323 from the bench. It’s good.
The Lakers say that Anthony Davis is questionable for tonight’s game in Brooklyn, his first b2b since returning from his bruised backside. Kyle Kuzma (sore left ankle) and Rajon Rondo (fractured right ring finger) are both probable.
New story: Anthony Davis told ESPN doesn’t have a relationship with Zion over a silly misunderstanding, but he’d welcome one. With their shared history as No. 1 picks in New Orleans, he’s watching — and rooting for — the Pelicans rookie
New story: The NBA didn’t ask Dwight to be in the dunk contest, he asked them. And now he wants Lakers fans to ask Kobe to help him out in Chicago
Dwight Howard says he wants to get Kobe Bryant to join him in the dunk contest. He wants Laker Nation to make it happen.
Lakers win 100-92, improve to 35-9. LeBron ups his all-time record at MSG to 20-8. AD 28p 5r 5a 2b; LeBron 21p 6r 5a 5s; KCP 13p; Kuz 10p 7r 2b; Dwight 5p 12r 3b.
New story: From tear-jerking tributes, to Hall of Fame attendees, to behind-the-scene stories, to even a few dirty jokes, David Stern's memorial on Tuesday presented the full measure of the man
New story: The Lakers’ 32-point loss Monday was the most lopsided regular season result in the Lakers-Celtics rivalry in more than 50 years
Lakers take their biggest L of the season, fall 139-107 to the Celtics and drop to 34-9. LeBron 15p on 5-of-12 13a; AD 9p 4r 2b 5 fouls in 22 mins; Rondo 13p; Kuz 13p; Dwight 9p 10r; JaVale 18p 5r 3b. LAL shoots 7-for-26 from 3; BOS shoots 16-for-34 from 3.
Rajon Rondo will return to the lineup tonight vs. Boston
Vogel got his NBA start in Boston, working in the video department for Rick Pitino. He was young, but not this young (this is a shot from when he appeared on David Letterman as a kid)
Frank Vogel says Anthony Davis’ minutes restriction will be set at 28 tonight against the Celtics.
Lakers-Celtics backdrops compete ahead of the two teams
Got to love the season premiere of Curb echoing @DGreen_14’s reaction to LeBron’s pregame chalk toss
The Lakers say Anthony Davis is available tonplay tonight and will return from a five-game absence against Boston.
The Lakers say Anthony Davis and Rajon Rondo remain questionable for Monday’s game in Boston.
New story: With Russell Westbrook rolling, Rajon Rondo put on his coaching hat and challenged Kyle Kuzma to guard him. It worked and L.A. kept up their winning ways, improving to 4-1 since Anthony Davis went out
Lakers beat the Rockets 124-115 to improve to 34-8. LeBron 31p 12a, left the court to MVP chants from the Houston crowd; Kuzma 23p 8r (10p in 4th Q); KCP 20p; Green 20p; Dwight 6p 10r; JaVale 9p 8r. Boston up next on Monday.
Lakers fans taking over here in Houston in the 4th Q
The Lakers say Kyle Kuzma had his left ankle re-taped in the locker room and is available to return.
Kyle Kuzma is heading back to the Lakers locker room with the trainer. He appeared to tweak the same left ankle that was an issue for him since the summer time.
Lakers star big man Anthony Davis will not play Saturday in Houston, missing his fifth straight game as he continues to recover from a hard fall on his backside against the Knicks
The Lakers say that Rajon Rondo (fractured right ring finger) is out tonight. Alex Caruso has been upgraded from probable to available to play. Anthony Davis remains questionable.
New story: After a four-game absence following a tough fall against New York, Anthony Davis will make a gametime decision regarding his return for the Lakers prime time ABC matchup in Houston on Saturday, a league source tells ESPN
The league released the best selling individual jersey and team merchandise sales through the first couple months of the season. Jayson Tatum was the surprise for me.
Caruso is listed as probable for HOU. He went through concussion testing which came back neagative. He still has neck soreness. Rondo practiced and he is questionable. AD did not participate in the group practice but went through an individual workout. He’s questionable
Anthony Davis doing some light full court drills at practice Friday.
Alex Caruso has moved up to 4th in All-Star balloting for Western Conference guards with four days left to vote. Maybe it’s the headband. As he says, “it’s got super powers.”
After notching his second career triple-double while beating the Lakers on their home court Wednesday, a reinvigorated @MarkelleF tells ESPN: "It just gives me more fire ... I'm never going to stop. I'm going to keep working until I can't play no more"
Lakers lose 119-118 to ORL, see their undefeated 22-0 mark against sub-.500 teams snapped. LeBron 19p 19a (ties career high in assists); Quinn Cook 22p; Troy Daniels 17p; KCP 17p; Dwight 9p 16r; JaVale 14p on 7-of-7 9r; Green 11p. LAL hits the midway point of the season 33-8.
It's Quinn Cook's world right now.
Alex Caruso is out for the rest of the game after being elbowed in the mouth in the first quarter. He underwent a concussion evaluation that was inconclusive, per the Lakers. He'll be re-evaluated tomorrow.
Story from yesterday on Anthony Davis taking a patient approach in his return from last week’s scary fall. He’ll miss his fourth straight game today vs ORL
This photo of @KendrickPerkins’ son, whose nickname is “Stone,” beasting on the basketball court is fantastic
Quinn James
New story: Kevin Love says the Lakers could 'do something special' this year. Tristan Thompson says it's a 'championship-or-bust year' for L.A. Those two would know from their time playing alongside LeBron.
Lakers come back from 14 and win their 9th straight, beat CLE 128-99, to improve to 33-7. LeBron 31p on 12-of-16 8a (passes Isiah for 8th all-time in assists); Dwight 21p on 9-of-11 15r; Avery 12p; Kuz 11p; Caruso 10p 6a; Green 10p. LAL has 9 turnovers to the Cavs' 20.
New story: Anthony Davis missed his 3rd straight game Monday vs. CLE; Rajon Rondo is expected to miss 4-5 days with a fractured right ring finger, league source told ESPN
Anthony Davis is out tonight per the Lakers and Rajon Rondo had a MRI today which revealed a non-displaced volar plate avulsion fracture of the right ring finger. He is also out tonight and his status will be day-to-day.
The Lakers have LeBron James (flu) and Avery Bradley (flu) listed as probable for tonight vs. Cleveland and Anthony Davis (bruised buttocks) and Rajon Rondo (strained right ring finger) listed as questionable.
AD was as animated as I’ve ever seen him talking about the NFL playoffs in the locker room in OKC last night. Full fan mode.
New story: With LeBron and AD out, a new big two emerged for the night in Rondo and Kuz for L.A. as the Lakers extended their winning streak to eight games in OKC
The Lakers got to their hotel in OKC around 3 a.m. local time late last night after flying from Dallas. Rajon Rondo said a group of 6 or 7 of the guys stayed up talking about ball until about 5 in the morning -- including him and Kuzma. Then they combined for 57 pts vs. OKC.
The Lakers say that Rajon Rondo suffered a strained fourth finger on his right hand and postgame X-rays came back negative. Rondo had the hand wrapped postgame and said he hurt the knuckle area of his finger. He is considered day-to-day.
It's not an exaggeration to call this the win of the season for the Lakers. No LeBron. No AD. Playing the 2nd night of a b2b on the road against a sizzling hot OKC team. And L.A. beat the Thunder 125-110 to win their 8th straight and improve to 32-7. Kuz 36p; Rondo 21p 12r 8a
The Lakers are up 32 points on the road against a Thunder team that had won 11 of their last 13 coming into Saturday. LAL is 12-for-15 from 3. Kuzma has 23. Rondo has 21. There's still 9 minutes remaining in the 3rd Q. Oh, and LeBron, AD and Danny Green are in street clothes.
Lakers lead 73-49 at the half. Kyle Kuzma has 23 pts on 9-for-13 shooting (3-for-4 from 3).
Friday night in Dallas, without AD, the Lakers put up 45 pts in the 1st Q. Tonight in OKC, without AD and LeBron, the Lakers put up 41 pts in the 1st Q. They lead 41-19. Kuzma 14p on 5-of-6; Rondo 12p on 6-of-8.
Dwight Howard picking up the slack in LeBron James’ absence.
Anthony Davis is out, per the Lakers.
Frank Vogel says that Anthony Davis, who is working out right now, is a game time decision. If he can’t play, then Kyle Kuzma will start. Rajon Rondo will start for LeBron James; KCP will start for Danny Green.
Mood.
Per the Lakers, LeBron James (illness/flu-like symptoms) and Danny Green (sore right hip) are out vs OKC tonight. Anthony Davis remains questionable.
Friday saw LeBron pass MJ for 4th in all-time FGM, pass Artis for 50th in all-time rebounds and he's three away from passing Isiah for 8th in all-time assists. Vogel: "(He's) going to be setting milestones every few games for the rest of his career"
LAL, playing without AD, beat DAL 129-114 to win their 7th straight and improve to 31-7. LeBron 35p 16r 7a and passed MJ for 4th on all-time FGM list; Kuzma season-high 26p 6r; Rondo 10p 3a; Dwight 10p 6r. LAL scored 79p in the 1st half, their highest scoring half of the season
Luka’s jersey ripped down the chest.
The Anthony Davis-less Lakers lead 45-27 after 1Q here in Dallas. It’s the most points they’ve scored in any quarter this season.
We have good seats here in Dallas, so I can tell you what Dwight Howard thought about that flagrant 1 call on him: “I got a flagrant foul for that? That’s crazy, man.”
Frank Vogel has no update yet on Anthony Davis’ status for Saturday in OKC. He says Avery Bradley is still feeling under the weather and they will have to monitor his energy level, but he’ll play. He added LeBron is feeling better and will play.
LAL has promoted Rob Pelinka, adding VP of Basketball Operations to his GM title. Jeanie Buss: “His strong leadership skills, as well as his commitment to building a winning culture, both on and off the court, have brought us one step closer to being a championship-caliber team”
The Lakers say that Anthony Davis is out for tonight’s game vs. Dallas.
Avery Bradley left practice with a fever but will still make the trip. He is questionable for DAL. LeBron James was limited in practice with flu-like symptoms but he is probable. AD remains questionable.
Anthony Davis remains questionable for the Dallas game. He watched film and watched practice Thursday. Frank Vogel says Kyle Kuzma will start if Davis sits out Friday.
LeBron James has pulled ahead to No. 1 in fan voting in the second round of All-Star returns. Alex Caruso and Tacko Fall kept climbing, too.
The NBA announced Bobby Portis was fined $25,000 for "recklessly making contact above the shoulders of an airborne shooter" in Kentavious Caldwell-Pope in yesterday's game. Portis publicly apologized for the hit on Twitter today and maintains he was only making a play on the ball
The Lakers say that the MRI for Davis revealed a gluteus maximus contusion. He will be listed as questionable for the game at Dallas. He will travel.
New story: Bobby Portis says it wasn’t intentional. LeBron James says it wasn’t a basketball play. Kentavious Caldwell-Pope took a licking and kept on ticking. And the Lakers and KCP survived a physical night against the Knicks
New story: “Who said it would be easy?” LeBron asked when pondering a potential stretch without Anthony Davis. Reporting from a scary night in Laker Land that ultimately could have been worse
Dwight Howard threw some kryptonite on any ideas he'd be making a Superman return to the dunk contest in Chicago next month: "I don't know where you guys are getting this information from. I never said I was doing the dunk contest."
When talking about the Lakers' needed next-man-up mentality in Anthony Davis' potential absence, Alex Caruso referenced this scene from 'Remember the Titans.' Look at AC Fresh, already helping Frank Vogel find motivating clips for the next film session:
LeBron said he asked AD if he could do anything for him. Davis’ response: “You got to win for me.”
LeBron James on Anthony Davis: “We hope he’ll be fine, which we believe, he’ll be fine”
The Lakers say the MRI will occur tonight, not tomorrow. Davis was greeted in the postgame locker room by his teammates and left the arena before speaking to reporters.
Anthony Davis was able to walk in the player tunnel at Staples Center as the initial shock of the fall wore off, a source tells ESPN. The plan is for Davis to undergo an MRI on Wednesday. He is expected to miss the upcoming road trip in DAL &amp; OKC to stay back and rehab.
Lakers beat NYK 117-87 for their 6th straight win but this will feel pretty empty for fans until more is known about AD's injury. LeBron 31p 6-of-12 3s &amp; 7-of-7 FTs 5r 5a; Kuz 16p 6r; KCP 15p 3-of-4 3s; Bradley 12p; Green 11p; Rondo 8p 10a; Dwight 8p 1-of-1 3s 13r 5b.
The Lakers are officially calling Davis' injury a sacral contusion -- which is located above the tailbone. The team reiterated that X-rays were negative. Davis will not return to the game.
X-rays on Anthony Davis' lower back came back negative, according to his agent Rich Paul. Davis, is sore though, per Paul.
Anthony Davis gingerly walks off the court on his own after taking a scary fall on his lower back/tailbone. He was on the floor for several minutes being attended to by Lakers medical staff.
Bobby Portis clocked Kentavious Caldwell-Pope across the noggin, knocking KCP's headband off and sending the Lakers guard sprawling to the floor. After an official's review, Portis was assessed a flagrant 2 foul and ejected.
LeBron James will play against the Knicks, per the Lakers.
Frank Vogel says LeBron remains a game time decision. He will meet with team doctors at the arena prior to tip-off.
From shootaround: Avery Bradley (ankle) is in and the team is “hopeful” LeBron James (illness) is in against the Knicks tonight
New story: You might see Anthony Davis in the dunk contest in his hometown Chicago next month ... helping out Dwight Howard with one of his dunks
Can confirm that Anthony Davis will enter this summer as an unrestricted free agent after his agent, Rich Paul of Klutch Sports, informed the Lakers that Davis would not be signing the four-year, $146 million extension the team offered him Tuesday morning, @ChrisBHaynes was 1st.
Despite his recent string of impressive lob dunks, you'll never see Anthony Davis in the dunk contest. Not even in his hometown of Chicago. AD: "that’s not me. In-game dunker only. The stuff I see Dwight (Howard) do and all these other guys -- Zach LaVine -- I can’t do that. No."
Frank Vogel says LeBron James is under the weather and the team wanted him to go home ASAP after shootaround to rest up. He expects LeBron will play vs NYK tonight
Avery Bradley says he will play tonight vs NYK. He credits the training staff for getting him through his right ankle sprain quickly.
New story: Dwight Howard’s contract will become fully guaranteed Tuesday, sources tell ESPN, a mere formality in his improbable, yet incredible comeback season with the Lakers
New story: JaVale McGee on the personality of the Lakers after they blocked 20 shots Sunday - "We're a hard-nosed team. We dunk everything. We don't let things come to the rim. We block shots. That's what we do."
New story: Frank Vogel said Avery Bradley wanted to go back in after rolling his right ankle Sunday, says the team will learn more by seeing how the ankle responds Monday
Lakers beat Detroit 106-99 to improve to 29-7. LeBron 21p 14r 11a (9th trip-dub of season); Anthony Davis 24p 11r 8b; Caruso 13p 3a; Dwight 11p 9r 5b; KCP 10p; JaVale 9p 6b 3r. Lakers swat 20 blocks as a team, one off the franchise record for a game.
That's a lot of dimp.
Avery Bradley is out for the rest of the game with a right ankle sprain, per the Lakers. He had X-rays taken that came back negative.
KCP had his left ankle re-taped and is available to return, per the Lakers.
Kentavious Caldwell-Pope already had to leave the game to go back to the locker room with an apparent ankle injury. Now Avery Bradley, after rolling is right ankle on a fastbreak, is doing the same. KCP greeted him in the tunnel.
Kyle Kuzma was asked about the NBA trade deadline coming up right around the corner on Feb. 6 and he said his first two years in the league prepared him on how to handle it.
Alex Caruso’s gear is _________.
New story: From being "force fed" in New Orleans to a "no stress" showing five weeks later, Anthony Davis is growing in the Lakers' offense and his old team felt the results
Lakers beat the Pelicans 123-113 for their 4th straight win, improve to 28-7. AD 46p on 15-of-21 shooting 13r (his 5th 40-plus pt game this season); Green 25p on 9-of-14 5r 5a; LeBron 17p 15a; Kuz 10p.
Frank Vogel at shootaround this morning: "We want to dominate. We want to kill everybody we play." After 1Q, Lakers up 42-30 on New Orleans, shooting 60.9% from the field and 66.7% from 3 (6-for-9).
Alex Caruso (sore right calf) is out tonight vs. NOP, per Frank Vogel
What a finish for Syracuse women hoops, taking down undefeated Florida State with a perfect inbounds play at the buzzer. Bravo 
We're going to reflect on the life and career of David Stern on The Jump today. Tune in at noon PT/3 p.m. ET to celebrate the man.
A couple early thoughts: 1. Luka (!) 2. Kyrie’s production/demeanor has little correlation to his popularity 3. The front court voting in the West is a glimpse into Laker/Clipper dynamics in L.A. 4. Tacko (!!)
The NBA's MVP award is named after one former commish. The title trophy is named after another. What about David Stern? LeBron James: "Either if it’s an award, or, I don’t know, a day? During the course of an NBA season, there’s David Stern Day? .. We can figure it out"
LAL wins its 3rd straight with a 117-107 victory over PHX to improve to 27-7. They were gangbusters in the 1st half and busted in the 2nd though, allowing a 36-point lead to dwindle to just 7. LeBron 31p 13r 12a (8th trip-double of the season); AD 26p 10r; Bradley 18p; Kuz 19p
Alex Caruso played 4 minutes in the first half and hasn't played since. The Lakers say he's out for the rest of the game with tightness in his right calf. He had his right leg heavily wrapped in the locker room before the game.
The Lakers' 43 pts in the 1st Q against PHX were the most they've scored in any quarter this season. They lead 43-17. They shot 70.4 pct; the Suns shot 26.1 pct.
This is some kind of show the Lakers are putting on to start the new year. Sweet fancy Moses.
The Lakers have started the game 11-for-11 against the Suns. Anthony Davis is 4-for-4 to lead the way. LAL up 25-12 on PHX midway through the 1st Q.
Staples Center honored late NBA commissioner David Stern before tipoff.
Lakers owner Jeanie Buss on the death of former NBA commissioner David Stern:
Suns coach Monty Williams, who worked closely with late NBA commissioner David Stern when Stern was shepherding the New Orleans franchise and Williams was the coach, spoke extensively about Stern’s impact. “He built the NBA. What else can you say? He literally built the NBA”
A giant in the game. Took the NBA to heights few imagined it could reach.
Take a bow, Garrison Mathews. What a game. Reminds me of how Anthony Morrow burst on the scene out of nowhere with GSW.
New story: A staunch defensive effort against the league’s No. 1 offense has the Lakers back on track heading into the New Year
Lakers win 108-95 over DAL, improve to 26-7. AD 23p on 8-of-12 9r; LeBron 13p on 3-of-10 13a 6r; KCP 19p on 4-of-5 from 3; Dwight 15p on 6-of-7; JaVale 11p on 5-of-6; Danny 10p. L.A. holds Dallas to 36 pct shooting and 46 pts less than the Mavs scored last night vs. GSW
Tim Hardaway Jr. tweaked his left hamstring earlier in the 1st Q. The Mavericks say he will not return.
Lakers coach Frank Vogel says LeBron James (groin/elbow) and Anthony Davis (shoulder) will both play versus Dallas on Sunday
New story: Kyle Kuzma is back and says he’s ready to deliver the consistent bench scoring punch LA has lacked this season
The Lakers get Dallas on the 2nd night of a b2b Sunday. Their big guns expect to suit up. LeBron (groin/elbow): "As long as this ice takes care of its business and I wake up comfortably and healthy, yeah." AD (shoulder): "Hopefully. That’s the plan."
The referee’s explanation for the Anthony Tolliver-LeBron James foul call in the 2nd Q:
Lakers win 128-120 in Portland to snap 4-game losing streak and improve to 25-7. Kuzma 24p in 30 mins; LeBron 21p 16a (ties season high) 7r 2s 1to; AD 20p 9r 5a 2s; Rondo 15p on 6-of-8; KCP 13p; Dwight 11p 8r 4b; Caruso 9p 3a 2s. Season high 72 bench points for LAL
Kentavious Caldwell-Pope is having a very solid season for the Lakers. He really took off once Avery Bradley got injured and has kept his production up once Bradley came back and pushed him to the second unit again. He has 13 points tonight -- all in the 2nd half.
Lakers run a similar full-court inbounds play that they worked to perfection in OKC. This time it's AD as the receiver instead of LeBron. KCP finishes both plays with a 3. LAL up 103-95 heading into the 4th Q.
Anthony Davis was hunched over holding his right shoulder as the Blazers just hit a go-ahead 3 to put them up 86-85 after once trailing the Lakers by 13. Davis stayed in the game after a timeout.
Kyle Kuzma has 20 points on 7-for-9 shooting (3-for-5 from 3) at the half. It's the most he's scored in a half this season. L.A. leads the Blazers 71-64.
Anthony Tolliver was called for a foul on LeBron James on a fastbreak. It was difficult to see any contact in real time, but James did take a tumble on the play, landing on his right elbow. The Blazers challenged the call and the ruling was upheld. James went 1-of-2 from the line
New story: With LeBron in the lineup and the Lakers coming off a productive film session/practice Friday, Anthony Davis all but guaranteed a win Saturday vs. Portland: "I'm pretty sure we'll come out victorious in this game"
LeBron James is available to play, per the Lakers.
Frank Vogel on Friday’s film session: “I started the film session telling them I’m angry and edgy, so, just forgive me but that’s just how I am. ... We’re not happy losing that Christmas Day game and certainly not happy losing four in a row”
LeBron James (right groin contusion) remains a gametime decision Saturday against the Blazers according to Frank Vogel. He says they are “hopeful”
New story: LeBron James and Kyle Kuzma spoke after Kuzma's trainer publicly critiqued James on social media. Kuzma says his relationship with James is "more than good" as they move forward
Kuzma on his relationship with James: "I mean, it's great. When you're around people multiple years you get to know them more."
Kuzma said he has not spoken to Clint Parks about his posts. He would not say whether he would continue to work with him. "I don't know. That's a private conversation. So, that's not really a conversation to have with you guys."
Kuzma said his tweet on Dec. 27th had nothing to do with Parks' IG post. "If you follow me, you see I tweet random things all the time. It had nothing (to do with it). No correlation. I didn't even see what he said at first. ... Why would I even do that? It makes no sense."
Kyle Kuzma on his talk with LeBron about his trainer, Clint Parks: "I just told him I can't control what another man says. Obviously I don't feel that way. Everybody knows what me and Bron have a great relationship. And I left it at that."
LeBron James responds to speculation about Kyle Kuzma’s social media activity following the Lakers’ Christmas Day loss to the Clippers
The Lakers say LeBron James has a groin contusion and is questionable for Saturday at Portland. Anthony Davis (right knee soreness) is probable. Both will make the trip to Portland.
New story: LeBron aggravated a nagging groin injury - different than the one he suffered last year, however - in a Christmas Day loss to the Clips which could cause him to miss some time for rehab coming up
Lakers lose 111-106 to the Clippers, blow a 15-point lead and drop their 4th straight game. LeBron 23p on 9-of-24 (2-of-12 from 3) 10a 9r; AD 24p 6r 3a 2b; Kuzma 25p in 28 mins; KCP 13p; JaVale 2p 3r 5b; Rondo 7p on 3-of-9 5a. LAC: Kawhi 35p on 11-of-19 (5-of-7 3s) 12r 5a.
The Lakers say Kentavious Caldwell-Pope had his left ankle re-taped in the locker room and he will return.
Frank Vogel confirms that LeBron and AD will both play and the Lakers will go back to their opening night lineup of those two plus JaVale, Bradley and Green.
This is 17-year-old Corey Groves. He was diagnosed with stage four sarcoma cancer this year. As a lifelong Lakers fan living in Canada, his dying dream was to come to Staples Center and meet LeBron James. Well, that happened today for Corey at the team’s walk through. Tremendous
Although it’s been said many times, many ways, it should be a fun one at Staples Center today.
When I worked at years ago, there were whispers about reams and reams of old Bulls footage stored in the NBA Entertainment vault. It’s finally seeing the light of day. This will be appointment viewing. I cannot wait. #TheLastDance
New story: As the Lakers enter their Christmas showdown against the Clippers on a downturn, Anthony Davis says a renewed focus on defense will put things back in place
Lakers drop their 3rd straight, lose another Sunday game 128-104 to Denver. AD 32p 11r 4b 5tos; Kuzmas 16p on 7-of-15 4r 2b; Dwight 8p 7r; Caruso 8p 8-of-8 FTs; JaVale 7p 5r; Rondo 5p on 2-of-8 8a 4r. LAL goes into Wednesday's Christmas showdown at 24-6. LeBron's status TBD.
New story: LeBron's out, Kuzma's in Sunday vs. DEN
LeBron is considered day-to-day; Kuzma is on a 20-minute restriction.
LeBron James is out against the Nuggets and Kyle Kuzma and Anthony Davis are available to play, per the Lakers.
Story here from @WindhorstESPN on LeBron James being doubtful Sunday against Denver as he’s dealing with a couple injuries
New video: 12 of the Lakers last 15 games were on the road. They finished that treacherous stretch on Thursday in Milwaukee. It ended in a loss, but the time in totality showed a ton of team growth. My mini essay for SportsCenter.
New story: The Lakers made it 29 games before losing back-to-back contests this season. Now they vow to make it 53 more without letting happen again
LAL loses consecutive games for the first time all season and falls in MIL, 111-104, dropping its record to 24-5. The Lakers made a game of it after trailing by 21 in the 1st half, but 19 turnovers and 4 bench pts didn't help. AD 36p 10r 5a; LeBron 21p 12r 11a; DG 21p; KCP 18p
Lakers have pulled within 8, trailing 89-81 heading into the 4th Q. Made a dent when Giannis went out with his 4th foul. AD started out slow but now has 23p 9r 4a to Giannis' 23p 10r 6a. LeBron 16p 8r 8a. G-Hill w/ 21p off the bench for MIL
Frank Vogel just got T'd up. Seemed like it was one he wanted to change up the energy. Lakers showed a little burst here but it was starting to stagnate again.
The Lakers look as bad as they've looked all season tonight in Milwaukee and trail the Bucks 43-24 with 7:08 remaining in the 2nd Q. LAL is shooting just 9-for-30 as a team -- LeBron &amp; AD are a combined 3-for-15.
The Bucks came into tonight with the league's best defensive rating of 102 pts/100 possessions. The Lakers were fourth at 103.2. It's showing on the court. MIL is 6-for-16 to start the game; LAL is 5-for-17.
Anthony Davis is a go tonight, per the Lakers.
Frank Vogel says he will check in with Anthony Davis after his pregame workout to determine if he’ll play versus Milwaukee or not.
Anthony Davis is on the court about an hour and 45 minutes until tipoff getting loose with assistant coach Mike Penberthy
Was a labor of love to put together with the rest of our L.A.-based NBA crew @NotoriousOHM @kevinarnovitz @baxter @ramonashelburne @andrewthehan &amp; editor Jim Merritt. Wonderful images by Juan Ocampo. Please give it a look.
New story: Another Lakers loss in Indy. Different year, same story? Far from it.
Uncle Cous playfully asking Rondo’s son, “Where my money at?”
The AD-less Lakers lose 105-102 to IND as Rondo's potential game-tying 3 rims out, snapping their 14-game road winning streak and dropping their record to 24-4. LeBron 20p on 8-of-20 9r 9a 5tos; Dwight 20p on 10-of-10 6r 2b; JaVale 10p 8r 3b; Bradley 13p; Caruso 11p; KCP 10p
The look on Rajon’s son’s face is the best.
The Lakers say that Anthony Davis (ankle) is out tonight vs. IND.
Lakers coach Frank Vogel says that Anthony Davis will be a gametime decision in Indiana tonight. Kyle Kuzma (ankle) is out.
The league announces that LeBron James is the Western Conference player of the week. He averaged 28.3 points on 50.7 pct shooting, 11.0 rebounds, 9.7 assists, 1.3 steals and 1.0 block and the Lakers went 3-0. Anthony Davis won the award last week.
Anthony Davis, who turned his right ankle late in Sunday’s win over Atlanta, is “trying to play” in Tuesday’s game in IND, a league source tells ESPN. He’s approaching his treatment with the goal of being in the lineup as the Lakers try for their 15th straight road win.
New story: Sunday came with a win and a warning for the Lakers. Frank Vogel: “If we play that in the next two games, the way we did tonight, we'll leave with a loss”
Lamar Odom is here in Atlanta and made his way by the Lakers locker room with a message for the crowd standing by: “Getting ready for the parade already”
Lakers win 101-96 to improve to 24-3. On the plus side, they held ATL to just 96 pts on 36 pct shooting. But it was a sloppy one overall. LeBron 32p 13r 7a 3b; AD (with a turned ankle) 27p 13r 2b - including a big one on Young late; Rondo 11p 7r 5a 2s; KCP 11p.
Frank Vogel says everybody but Kyle Kuzma is available to play today for the Lakers and both Avery Bradley and Rajon Rondo will have their playing time restriction increased to 25 games.
LeBron James, speaking with @Rachel__Nichols at halftime of his son’s game in Ohio twice mentioned how he plans to play Sunday against Atlanta. So the elbow, just as he described it last night, appears to be fine.
The Lakers list LeBron James as questionable for Sunday’s game in Atlanta with a sore right elbow. He hit it on the floor afte colliding with Jimmy Butler on the final play Friday. In his 17th year he has played in all 26 games for the Lakers.
My SportsCenter mini essay on the Lakers’ growing culture of accountability being on full display in Miami on Friday
New story: LeBron is celebrating Bronny’s game against his alma mater, St. Vincent-St. Mary, with a mini reunion with his high school classmates as the Lakers star calls the event a “come-full-circle” type of moment in his life
Just a bonkers season he’s having.
New story: The Lakers’ improved culture of accountability was on full display Friday as LeBron’s teammates got on him at halftime and he responded by leading L.A. to its 13th straight road win
Lakers snap the Heat's perfect 11-0 home record while extending their road winning streak to 13 straight, beat Miami 113-110. They now sit at 23-3. AD 33p 10r 3b; LeBron 28p 12a 9r 8tos; KCP 15p 4a; JaVale 9p 10r 5b; Avery 10p 3r; Dwight 4p 8r 15 pair of AirPods Pro
Lakers down 41-32 early in the 2nd Q here in Miami. LeBron scored 51 here last year in his first game at AmericanAirlines Arena as a Laker. Not the same story so far tonight: 2-for-8 from the field with 7 turnovers already.
Kyle Kuzma tells ESPN his left ankle sprain is totally unrelated to the stress reaction he suffered this summer. He says the extra rest is starting to help it improve and is hopeful to be able to return to the court at some time this trip.
Dwight Howard gifted the Lakers sets of AirPods Pro in the pregame locker room in Miami, placing a pair on each player’s seat.
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo (hamstring) is a go for the Heat game.
Perfection.
Kyle Kuzma (left ankle) remains out for the Heat game. Frank Vogel said Kuzma underwent a precautionary MRI which confirmed the ankle sprain. Vogel said Kuzma hasn’t been able to “get over the hump” with the ankle injury and the team wants to give him as much time needed to heal
New story: The Lakers might have disagreed with Jared Dudley’s ejection Tuesday but they were impressed by his protective instincts nonetheless
New story: An introspective Dwight Howard opened up about the bitterness he once felt about his Orlando exit as he continues to find peace with his past this season
Lakers win an ugly one 96-87 in ORL to go to 22-3. LeBron James 25p 11r 10a (his 6th triple-double of the season); AD 16p on 6-of-20 12r 6a 2b; KCP 15p on 4-of-7 from 3; Dudley 9p (before being ejected); McGee 8p 4r; Green 8p 5r; Caruso 7p 4r
The Lakers’ lead is down to 57-55 with 7:27 left in the 3rd Q. The Magic (43.1%) are now shooting better from the field than L.A. is (41.1%).
The Lakers shot just 10-for-28 in the 1st Q but still lead Orlando 26-9. The Magic shot 4-for-21 with 5 turnovers.
New story: Kyle Kuzma’s up and down start to the season continues to be challenging as he’ll sit Tuesday vs ORL to rest his sprained left ankle
Some more context on Kuzma: It’s the ankle injury he suffered against WAS. The medical staff wants to hold him out to allow it to fully heal. He’ll be day to day moving forward.
The Lakers say that Kyle Kuzma is out tonight with a left ankle sprain. Rajon Rondo (hamstring) is questionable. Avery Bradley, who’s been out with a hairline fracture in his right leg, is probable to return.
New story: As the Lakers begin a five game road trip tonight in ORL, here’s a look at their last five games - an early-season test they passed with flying colors
New video: I sat down with LeBron at an event to announce his partnership with @calm on Monday to discuss how his mental approach to the game changed after the loss to the Mavericks in 2011
Anthony Davis was named the NBA player of the week for the Western Conference. He averaged 35.0 points (.633 FG%), 8.0 rebounds, 2.5 assists, 2.0 blocks and 1.8 steals and the Lakers went 4-0, with victories over Denver, Utah, Portland and Minnesota.
New story: Anthony Davis had a 50-piece “for the ages” as the Lakers keep finding new ways to look dominant this season
Lakers win 142-125 to improve to 21-3. Anthony Davis 50p on 20-of-29 (10-of-10 FTs) 7r 6a; LeBron 32p on 6-of-8 3s 13a; Caruso 16p; Danny Green 12p 8r; Dwight (on his 34th birthday) 8p 6r. LAL embarks on a 5-game road trip through ORL, MIA, ATL, IND and MIL next.
Meanwhile, while AD is dominating, LeBron's put up 32 pts and 13 assists while shooting 6-for-8 from 3.
There's the 50-piece for AD. He's 20-for-29 from the field and 10-for-10 from the free throw line.
This game's had a little bit of everything ... including Lizzo pulling up her dress to show off her thong when Staples Center showed her on the jumbotron while the Laker Girls danced a routine to her song "Juice"
Anthony Davis has 42 pts on 18-for-24 shooting through three quarters. It's season high and the third time he's hit 40-plus this season. And he's coming off 39 pts last game.
LeBron James has 4 fouls with 2:27 to go in the 1st half. He's only been whistled for 4 fouls or more one other time all season -- when he had 5 in the Lakers' OT win in Dallas last month.
The team also honored him with a moment of silence. He was a season ticket holder since 1972.
Longtime Lakers season ticket holder and former record exec, Joe Smith, recently passed away at the age of 91. His family and friends are honoring him at tonight’s Lakers game.
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo is out tonight against Minnesota because of hamstring soreness.
Enjoying @MikeTrudell’s pxp call of the South Bay Lakers game on @SpectrumSN. Conversational and informative. Talented guy. (Yes, I’m watching a little G League action on a Saturday night. I swear I have a life.)
Avery Bradley has been cleared for full contact after having the hairline fracture in his right leg re-evaluated today. He is out tomorrow vs. MIN and is considered day to day after that, per the Lakers.
New story: LeBron and Melo matched up for the 34th time of their careers Friday only the pause that came between this one and their 33rd meeting as Anthony twisted in the NBA winds made it a little more meaningful
2014-15 Cavs vibes right here. With everybody included, at that. L.A. flying home with a 20-3 record, tied with the Bucks for the league’s best mark.
Lakers win 136-113 to improve to 20-3 and 11-0 away from Staples Center. Anthony Davis 39p 9r 2a 3b 2s; LeBron 31p (4-of-9 from 3) 8a 7r; Kuzma 15p; JaVale 13p 2b; Dwight 5p 10r; Troy Daniels 9p (3-of-5 from 3). LAL gets MIN at home Sun. before going back on the road for 5 games
Terry Stotts understandably lost his cool and was T'd up twice by the refs and ejected for his reaction.
Anthony Davis took a tumble after the ref called a foul on Kent Bazemore with AD going in for a transition score, even though it looked like AD pushed KB off. After the foul AD got his legs tangled with Bazemore and spilled into the courtside seats, hitting his head.
Lakers say that Rajon Rondo has a left hamstring strain and will not return.
96 Sonics forever.
Avery Bradley will have the hairline fracture in his right leg re-evaluated Saturday when the Lakers return to Los Angeles. Bradley told ESPN that if he’s cleared, he plans to return to the lineup by Dec. 13 at Miami.
Anthony Davis’ case for DPOY: 1st in NBA in blocks  1st in rim protection pct 2nd in opponent FG% as primary defender LAL 5th in defensive rating Game-winning defensive plays vs. SAC, NOP And a whole heap of anecdotal support from AD’s teammates
New story: Beyond the numbers and highlight reel rejections, Anthony Davis' play for DPOY is rooted in the belief his presence instills in the Lakers. "When you have that type of guy by your side," Vogel says, "it gives you a whole new level of confidence"
New story: Yes, yes, even LeBron himself admitted it was a travel
Lakers win 121-96 in Utah to improve to 19-3. A lot to like in this one for LAL playing on the 2nd night of a b2b. AD 26p 6r 3b; LeBron 20p 12a; Rondo 14p 12a 8r 2s; KCP 14p on 5-of-8; Kuzma 13p 4s. Lakers bench outscores Utah bench 47-19.
Dwight Howard came into the night 6-for-64 for his career from 3 (and 0-for-1 on the season -- he was subbed out last night when he missed). Tonight he just hit one from the wing in the 4th Q of this dominant night for LAL here in UTA and the Lakers bench went nuts celebrating
New story: From an IV at the half to dominant D at the end, Anthony Davis and the Lakers put together one of their most impressive nights of the season Tuesday in Denver
Frank Vogel says AD received IV fluids at halftime.
Lakers beat the Nuggets 105-96 to improve to 18-3. AD 25p 10r; LeBron 25p 9a 6r; Rondo 11p 6a 6r; Dwight 13p 6r 2b; Green 5p 7r 3a 3s. Jokic held to 13p on 4-of-12 8a. LAL still undefeated away from Staples Center this season - 9-0. LeBron heard "MVP" chants from DEN crowd
This slayed me.
Frank Vogel on Anthony Davis’ defense: “I think he can and will win Defensive Player of the Year this season”
A very good deed for a very necessary cause.
Frank Vogel was named the Western Conference Coach of the Month for October and November by the NBA, as he guided LAL to a 17-2 start which tied a franchise record through 19 games. He becomes the first Lakers coach to earn COM honors since Mike D’Antoni in 2013
New story: After the Lakers’ first loss they won 7 straight. After their second, they won 10 in a row. What will happen after their third as the schedule gets tough? AD says they want to avoid consecutive losses all season long
Lakers lose to DAL 114-100, snapping their 10-game win streak. AD 27p 10r 2b; LeBron 25p (0-for-5 from 3) 9r 8a 4s; Caruso 10p 4r. LAL shoots 26% (7-of-27) from 3 as a team and is outscored by 17p in the 2nd half. Doncic: 27p 10a 9r
A couple of L.A. sports dignitaries
The Mavs open up the 3rd Q on a 22-5 run - with 10 of those pts coming from Luka. Lakers call timeout, trailing DAL by 14 pts.
Was billed as the LeBron-Luka show, instead we're getting a dominant Anthony Davis. He has 12 of his 20 pts in the 2nd Q and is punishing Dallas at the rim.
A young kid just participated in a timeout promotion at Staples where he got to shoot around on the court. The kid's dad shot his shot and asked Denzel to take a photo with his son. Denzel obliged and imparted some advice to the kid - "Get good grades" - as he patted his back
Classy move.
This place got loud when AD just went to the line. Real loud. He goes 1 for 2.
Anthony Davis is checking back in with 7:41 to go in the 4th Q. Lakers trail 95-91. Were once down by 16.
The Lakers say that Anthony Davis is questionable to return with a sore right elbow.
Anthony Davis is starting the 4th Q on the bench as he receives medical attention on his right arm.
Another Laker hits the deck after another collision with Josh Hart. This time it's AD as the 3rd Q ends. He is favoring his right arm/elbow. LAL trails NOP 89-79. Davis has 36 pts on 14-for-28 shooting. He's already tied for the most shots he's taken as a Laker w/ a Q to go.
Lakers trail 64-54 at the half. AD has 27 pts on 10-for-19; Jrue has 25 pts on 10-for-15.
LeBron checked back in the game.
LeBron James collided with Pelicans guard Josh Hart with 6:09 remaining in the second quarter and subbed himself out, favoring his left knee. We'll monitor. He hasn't gone back to the locker room for treatment.
Anthony Davis scored 14 pts on 5-for-11 shooting in the 1st Q but the Lakers trail 38-25 as the Pelicans went 9-for-11 from 3.
Arcade Fire’s Win Butler and his son are courtside and showing their support for Anthony Davis
Dwight Howard announced to the visitor’s locker room in New Orleans “AD’s back!” then played “Tunechi’s Back” by Lil Wayne on the team’s traveling speaker system.
New story: Frank got blown out; Danny Green had one of the worst games of his career; LeBron scored 38 points in 30 minutes; Dwight had his highest scoring game as a Laker; Rondo got his revenge. How the Lakers' "reunion game" experiences are informing AD
Some interesting perspective on the Lakers’ roster construction at the tail end of this sit down.
New story: Over the last 5 games the Lakers are waking up from the outside - shooting 43% from 3 and 47% on open 3s - which was a major struggle for last year’s team
Lakers win 114-104 to improve to 15-2. LeBron 33p on 4-of-7 from 3 13a; AD 17p 12r 6a; KCP 14p on 5-of-7; Rondo 13p on 3-of-3 from 3; Troy Daniels 11p on 3-of-3 from 3; Kuzma 10p. LAL gets one half of strong defense and one game of hot shooting. Getting closer to 48 mins.
New story: The Lakers got the win to secure their best start in more than a decade but were left crying foul about LeBron’s lack of free throws on Saturday
Lakers beat Grizzlies 109-108 to improve to 14-2, the best 16-game start to LeBron's career (the '16-17 Cavs were 13-3). LeBron 30p 6r 4a 2s; AD 22p 4r 5b 3s; Rondo 14p 6a 2s; KCP 12p; Dwight 10p 9r. Rookie Ja Morant had 26p 6a for MEM. LAL gets SAS Monday.
New story: Rajon Rondo says he has no regrets for how he conducted himself after getting a flagrant foul 2 ejection in OKC on Friday
Rajon Rondo says he has no regrets for what he said to referee Ed Malloy. Rondo says that Malloy was “disrespectful” by pointing at his face when he was giving out the flagrant 2 foul punishment. Rondo says as a repeat “felon” for past disciplinary incidents, he was a target
Frank Vogel says Alex Caruso is our against MEM with a calf strain. He had been dealing with it and re-aggravated it against OKC. He’s considered day-to-day moving forward.
The NBA is fining Rondo for the run-in with Schroder and subsequent behavior
New story: Through his first 479 career games, Anthony Davis had zero 4-point plays. Tonight, in his 480th game, he had two. On AD finding his outside stroke at the urging of his coaches and teammates
Lakers win 130-127 to improve to 13-2. Monster night for AD with 33p 11r 7a going 4-of-7 from 3 and 11-of-11 on FTs; LeBron 23p 14a 6r game-saving steal; KCP 17p on 4-of-5 from 3 5r; Green 14p; Dwight 10p 7r; Kuzma 10p on 4-of-6 2b; Rondo 8p 4a; JaVale 8p 7r. MEM tomorrow.
Anthony Davis converts the 4-point play to put L.A. up 5 with less than 3 minutes remaining. His four 3-pointers tonight are a season high. He's also tied a season high with 7 assists.
Rajon Rondo, who earlier in the game earned a double tech along with Dennis Schroder for jawing at each other on the sideline, was just ejected for receiving a flagrant 2 foul for lifting his leg up between Schroder's legs into his downtown business district.
Per the Lakers: With 13 assists tonight, LeBron James has 10 or more assists in seven consecutive games, the longest streak of his career and the longest by a Lakers player since Magic Johnson had 10 straight in 1990-91.
Some strong offensive numbers for the Lakers so far. They have five players in double digits (and seven with 8 pts or more), are shooting 57.4% overall (and 63.2% from 3) and have picked up assists on 24 of 31 baskets. They lead OKC by 9 early in the 3rd Q.
F. Vogel says that DeMarcus Cousins’ criminal charges that were dropped today have “definitely been present in my mind but it’s really a legal matter and I’m not really allowed to comment on it further than that.” He added that the team is still “hopeful” Cousins plays in 19-20
Another one you got to read from my man Ohm.
He preferred the nickname “Big Game Kuz” as a nod to the bespectacled star @JamesWorthy42
Kyle Kuzma says he tried to persuade the medical staff to clear him to return to the OKC game after he was scratched in the eye. “God gave me two eyes for a reason,” he says. He expects to play Friday.
The Lakers say that Avery Bradley will be re-evaluated the day after Thanksgiving once the team has returned from its 4-game road trip. Also, Alex Caruso (right calf strain) is probable for Friday in OKC.
Goggle Kuz.
30 for 30: LeBron James now has a triple-double against every NBA team
The Lakers say additional testing confirmed the right eye abrasion for Kyle Kuzma. He is expected to practice Thursday and play Friday in OKC.
Kyle Kuzma will undergo further testing on his right eye abrasion either tonight or tomorrow, per the team. The Lakers say an update on his status will be provided tomorrow.
Lakers fans looking at the standings like:
LeBron James with 22 pts, 11 reb, 10 ast tonight becomes the first player in NBA history with a triple-double against 30 different teams.
The Lakers say that Kyle Kuzma got poked in the right eye and is questionable to return
Interesting look for some hoops watching.
The “City Edition” uniforms for the Lakers this season are inspired by Shaquille O’Neal - the M.D.E. on the white vertical piping stands for “Most Dominant Ever”
Reminds me of the old Jump Start comic strip in the funny pages.
New story: Game, blouses. Dave Chappelle graced the Lakers practice court Monday
Quinn Cook working with Dave Chappelle on his stepback game. Another day in Laker Land.
Pregame Sunday Vogel said of AD's lower shot totals of late, "It’s something I have to do better at." When informed of FV's statement postgame, Davis said, "Hey man, we’re winning. I don’t really care about any of that. ... I’m not worried about shots, I’m worried about winning"
New story: With Kobe making a rare Staples Center appearance Sunday, LeBron hoped the show the Lakers put on will give Bryant a reason to come back soon
Lakers improve to 11-2, beating ATL 122-101. LeBron 33p 12a 7r; AD 14p on 5-of-14 5a 5b; Kuz 17p 5r; Rondo 15p 3a; KCP 13p on 6-of-8; Caruso 11p on 5-of-7; Green 11p 7r; Dwight 9r 3b. LAL hosts OKC on Tuesday.
Big night for the Lakers' reserves with three players in double digits -- Kuz, Rondo, Caruso -- as LAL's bench is outscoring ATL's second unit 41-25.
Watch him pass then read about him passing:
Dwight's reaction to Danny Green's putback dunk was an all-timer.
My favorite sportswriter of all time. R.I.P. to a legend.
The last 2 minute report for Kings-Lakers included one missed call - the league says LeBron James should have been called for an offensive foul for elbowing Harrison Barnes when Barnes was called for the foul that put LeBron on the line for the go-ahead FTs. Final play was clean
New story: LeBron stole the show, AD saved the game and the Lakers kept right on rolling
We had a philosophical Dwight Howard in the locker room tonight: "I sit down and I meditate a lot and one of the things I came up with is if you put your pride to the side and you let love lead the way, great things happen."
Game-saving defensive play by Anthony Davis. Lakers improve to 10-2.
Here's the dunk.
Wow. LeBron James just unleashed his best dunk as a Laker allll overrrr Bjelica.
Hate that this isn’t the first time I’ve been at a game when the arena had a moment of silence to reflect on a school shooting.
Kentavious Caldwell-Pope will start in place of Avery Bradley tonight. Frank Vogel said that he could try different players in that position for the duration of Bradley's absence.
Free agent guard JR Smith is here at Lakers-Kings tonight sitting courtside.
Very interesting read here on Bill Russell accepting his Hall of Fame ring decades after being inducted. A true legend in the game, as principled off the court as he was powerful on it
New story: Anthony Davis is planning on coming back tonight, but recognizes the instinct by the team to protect him
With Carmelo Anthony coming back to the NBA, LeBron James was asked if he's thought how the end of his career will look: "Not really. Not the way I feel right now. Me and Tom Brady are one in the same. We’re going to play until we can’t walk no more."
Lakers say that Avery Bradley has a hairline fracture in a non-weight bearing bone of his right leg (on the fibular head). He will be re-evaluated in 1 to 2 weeks, and further medical updates will be provided at that time. The injury was discovered with a MRI yesterday.
New story: Dime King? Looking at LeBron James' case for capturing his first assists title of his 17-year career as he shifts to point guard for the Lakers
The Lakers say X-rays on Kentavious Caldwell-Pope’s left ankle came back negative. He felt pain on the inside of his ankle when he planted going in for a late score. He’ll be re-evaluated tomorrow.
Lakers win 120-94 to improve to 10-2. LeBron 23p 12a 6r; Kuzma 22p 5r; McGee 18p 17r; Dwight 15p 8r; Cook 10p. LAL shoots 53.9% (45% from 3) and holds GSW to 40.4% (25.7% from 3).
Frank Vogel says Kyle Kuzma will start in Anthony Davis’ place and the Lakers expect to have AD back playing on Friday.
New story: Anthony Davis played through another injury Tuesday and left LeBron crediting his grit as a tone setter for the 2019-20 Lakers
Lakers win 123-115 to improve to 8-2. AD 24p 12r 4a 2s 1b; LeBron 19p 11a 7r; Kuzma 23p on 9-of-16; Green 14p; Dwight 12p 9r 1b; JaVale 11p on 5-of-5. L.A. hosts the 2-9 Warriors on Wednesday.
Very big night for Kyle Kuzma here. He got hot in the 1st Q to keep it a game and got hot again here in the 4th to give L.A. some breathing room with a buck thirty left.
The Lakers say Anthony Davis took a shot to the ribs in the 1st Q. That's why he went to the locker room. After getting taped up, he's back in the game.
Anthony Davis has returned to the Lakers bench in uniform and just informed the coaching staff he is OK to check back in.
Anthony Davis is headed to the locker room with a member of the Lakers' medical staff in between the 3rd and 4th Qs here.
Lakers trail 29-26 after 1Q, cutting into the Suns' once 9-point lead thanks to 13 pts from Kuzma on 5-for-7 shooting.
Rondo has not been medically cleared for b2bs yet, per the team.
Vogel added that Rondo will not play Wednesday vs. Golden State on the second night of the back-to-back.
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo will play and come off the bench tonight on a 15 minute restriction. Troy Daniels is also available to play but Vogel says he will likely only use him in a pinch.
Monty Williams, wary of tampering, didn’t want to talk too much about his relationship with his former player, Anthony Davis: “All I’ll say about Anthony is I really care about him. ... If I get fined for that, too freaking bad.”
After shootaround Rajon Rondo’s status has been upgraded to probable, per the Lakers. Troy Daniels is still questionable.
Frank Vogel says he’s hopeful Rajon Rondo makes his season debut in Phoenix tonight.
New story: Anthony Davis details his shoulder soreness while Rajon Rondo says Kevin Durant’s injury caused him to be patient with his own recovery
From the Lakers: The MRI on Troy Daniels’ left knee was negative. He will be listed as questionable with a sore left knee Tuesday in Phoenix and his status will be day-to-day.
The Lakers have clarified Troy Daniels’ injury and say it’s actually his left knee, not his right knee that he tweaked. MRI results still pending.
Rajon Rondo says he backed off trying to rush back from his injury when it was compared to Kevin Durant’s calf injury that led to a torn Achilles last postseason. He says mentally he feels good to return but will continue to be patient for prompts from his body.
The Lakers say Troy Daniels tweaked his R knee during practice and will undergo a precautionary MRI. It is unclear if he will make the trip to Phoenix. Rajon Rondo went through 5-on-5 and is questionable for PHX. Anthony Davis (R shoulder) practiced and is probable for Tuesday
New story: Anthony Davis admitted he is still managing some shoulder discomfort on the same night the Lakers saw their win streak snapped at seven thanks to poor transition defense
The Lakers' 7-game win streak is snapped, falling to a depleted Raptors team 113-104. AD 27p 8r 4b 3a 2s; LeBron 13p on 5-of-15 15a 13r; Kuzma 15p; Daniels 11p; JaVale 10p; Green 0p on 0-of-5. TOR: Siakam 24p 11r; VanVleet 23p 10a; Boucher 15p on 7-of-11.
Lakers-Raptors on a Sunday night in L.A. We had a pretty memorable one of these a few years back.
New story: Load management? Not for LeBron James. He tells ESPN: “I'm healthy, I play. I probably got a good 45 years to not play basketball (when I’m retired)."
LeBron James checks out with 25 pts (4-for-7 from 3), 6 ast, 4 reb in 36 minutes, putting an end to his triple-double streak, but the Lakers will beat the Heat tonight to extend their win streak to 7.
Avery Bradley will play and will start according to Frank Vogel.
Frank Vogel says Avery Bradley is questionable for Friday but Bradley says he is confident he’ll be able to play.
Cuse is back today.
New story: The Lakers ran their win streak to six thanks to an unlikely 4th Q lineup
Anthony Davis was asked what he thought about his CHI comments getting so much attention: "It’s a basketball city. You know, they’re looking for their guy. That’s all I’ll really say about it, I mean it ain't really much. They’re a good young team right now. They’re all right."
Lakers come back from 19 points and outscore the Bulls 38-19 in the 4th Q to go 3-0 on their road trip and improve to 6-1 overall. LeBron James 30p 11a 10r; Cook 17p; Kuzma 15p (11 in 4th Q); AD 15p 7r 3b; JaVale 10p 6r 2b; Dwight 6p 6r.
This is what happened the first time Dwight Howard played in Chicago as a Laker Tonight he has even less shot attempts than he crowed about back then, but has been masterful in this win. What a difference.
LeBron James is up to 30p on 10-of-18, 10r, 9a. One more dime will secure his 3rd straight triple-double.
Kuzma and Dwight leading the way. The comeback happened with LeBron and AD on the bench.
Quinn Cook needed a night like tonight. Came into the game shooting 35.3% (21.4% from 3) and has 12 pts on 4-for-7 (2-for-3 from 3) so far, including the go-ahead 3 here early in the 4th Q after LAL has been playing from behind all game.
Kyle Kuzma showing some signs of life. He has 7 pts on 3-for-4 shooting in the 4th Q and L.A. has cut the deficit from 13 to 4 with 9:13 left to play.
Call it a trap game at the end of a road trip or call it a young, hungry opponent, but the Lakers were straight up bad in the first half and trail the Bulls 65-48. L.A. is shooting 41.3% and has 11 turnovers leading to 17 Chicago points.
DeMarcus Cousins is wearing a full sweatsuit with a blazer on the Lakers' bench tonight. I mean, the sweatsuit is Kith and all, but I've never seen that look before.
Frank Vogel says Avery Bradley and Rajon Rondo are both out tonight vs. CHI.
Anthony Davis says he never said he considered going to Chicago next summer. He said he is focused on winning a championship with the Lakers, everyone is aware he’ll be a free agent and “we’ll see where it goes.”
New story: The Lakers look dominant on defense and LeBron is right there in the mix on that end of the floor
KCP started the season 0-of-9. He's 16-of-33 since. "Last night I had a long talk with myself just about being aggressive and just playing free out there," he said Sunday. "I cleared my mind and my heart just found the love of the game again. I just had fun out there tonight."
The Lakers say that X-rays on Bradley’s leg came back negative. His status is day to day.
Frank Vogel said Avery Bradley exited after getting kicked near his right knee but he will be “fine.”
Lakers improve to 5-1, win 103-96 in San Antonio. AD 25p 11r 4b; LeBron 21p 13a 11r 2s; Bradley 16p before leaving w/ R leg injury; KCP 14p on 5-for-9; Dwight 14p on 7-for-7 13r 2b.
The Lakers say that Avery Bradley will not return with a lower right leg injury. A further update will be provided postgame.
Lakers' once 19-point lead is cut to 5 heading into the 4th as Rudy Gay got a buzzer-beating 3 to go.
Precise, methodical night for the Lakers on offense so far. LeBron has 10 assists and keep finding AD in open space where Davis is converting (19 pts on 8-of-13). Throw in some strong play from role players in Bradley, Howard and KCP and easy to see why Lakers are up 19 on SAS
The Spurs out here trying to flip Snoop.
Frank Vogel says the Lakers are sticking with the same starting lineup they’ve used in their 4 straight wins. Still no Rondo available. Vogel says the two biggest areas he wants to see improvement in are slow starts and rebounding.
New story: Luka vs. LeBron wasn't just entertaining. It was historic.
Now he’s holding a mic in the media scrum with AD
Dez Bryant is visiting the Lakers’ locker room.
LeBron-Luka in the playoffs, please.
Overtime.
New story: A historic night for Anthony Davis led the Lakers to their best start to a season in nearly a decade on Tuesday
Anthony Davis was also displaced from his Bel Air home for a night because of the Getty Fire with a precautionary evacuation. He returned home today and then had his big night against the Grizzlies.
Anthony Davis jammed his shoulder late in Sunday’s win over CHA, getting caught on the rim during a failed dunk attempt. A league source told ESPN that Davis experienced tightness in the days that followed but was cleared by the Lakers medical staff to play.
Welp, LeBron James just did a Taco Tuesday yell to the crowd around him while sitting on the bench at the end of this blowout and the entire arena has now broken out a "Ta-co Tues-day!" chant.
Anthony Davis has 40 points and 20 rebounds and is 26-for-27 from the foul line. Lakers up 88-67 heading into the 4th Q.
Maybe all the Lakers should try kinesio tape on their shoulders. Anthony Davis has 36 points and 19 rebounds and we still got a minute to go in the 3rd Q.
Anthony Davis had 16 points on 4-for-13 shooting (8-for-9 FTs) and 9 reb in the 1st Q. Then he went to the locker room to get his right shoulder re-taped and is expected to return (per @LakersReporter).
The Lakers say Anthony Davis is playing tonight vs. MEM.
Clearly @LoJoMedia was correct in reporting Sunday there was reason for concern with Anthony Davis’ shoulder.
Frank Vogel says Anthony Davis has soreness in his shoulder and is testing it out pregame. Vogel said AD might not play, but expects him to in all likelihood. Davis was not listed on the injury report released by the team.
New story: LeBron James could see the Getty Fire raging from the roof of his Brentwood, Calif. home shortly before his family had to evacuate 2 a.m. Monday morning
Hearing that LeBron James has sent a taco truck to feed lunch to the first responders fighting the Getty Fire today at their base camp. James, this morning, had this to say about their efforts: "It’s an amazing job what they do and their commitment with what’s going on right now"
Frank Vogel says it’s a possibility that Kyle Kuzma will make his season debut during the Lakers’ upcoming three-game road trip through Dallas, San Antonio and Chicago.
LeBron said he and his family tried 3 hotels in the dead of the night after being evacuated because of the Getty Fire before eventually settling on a 4th. He repeatedly thanked the first responders for the work they’re doing to limit the damage, citing bravery and commitment
The Lakers had one of their “Genius Talk” series today with magician David Blaine in lieu of practice. More info on the series here from @NotoriousOHM
New story: Dwight Howard, after going 8-for-8 from the field in a Lakers win, has seemingly found a home again in Los Angeles. “I end up coming back to the best team, the best city in the world, so I'm very thankful”
Anthony Davis has had two sequences tonight where he scored on one end and immediately got a block on defense the next possession. We need a name for this. Scorjection? One and none? Poick?
New story: Frank Vogel is keeping the door open for a potential DeMarcus Cousins return
Anthony Davis is showing off it all early on here - stroked two 3s, stripped the ball right from T. Rozier, stuffed M. Williams, whipped passes around, hit the boards -- and received his first "MVP! MVP!" chant from the Laker crowd. He has 16p on 6-of-8, 5r, 2b, 1a, 1s after 1Q
Frank Vogel says the Lakers haven’t closed the door on DeMarcus Cousins returning at some point this season.
Building a narrative this compelling centered around shooting drills at a mundane practice is yet another way in which Chick was the best of the best.
Rajon Rondo underwent a precautionary MRI Saturday which confirmed a mild strain of his right calf, per the Lakers. He remains day to day. He participated in ball handling drills after shootaround today.
Standstill shooting for DeMarcus Cousins after practice
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo is out tonight: “He’s still experiencing some discomfort and we’re going to be cautious”
Frank Vogel says “I envision us closing a lot of games” with Anthony Davis playing the 5.
This is such a class move by Kevin. So happy to see the Cavs honor Fred and @BethHMcLeod this way.
What a great experience for @NewhouseSU students to anchor the halftime report for the @Cuse_MBB game on the @espn app. Great job @jahop23 &amp; @cooperkboardman
New story: When Anthony Davis was introduced as a Laker he declared "I don't really like playing the 5." On Friday he did so -- willingly -- against UTA's 7-foot-1 back-to-back Defensive Player of the Year and sparked LAL to the win
LeBron’s kicks tonight are a “red carpet” edition of the LeBron 17 (right). The shoe was inspired in part by the LeBron 7 (left) the first shoe in his line designed by Jason Petrie who continues to shepherd his signature kicks.
Danny Green was handed the mic before the game to address the Lakers fans before the home opener: "We promise to work hard on and off the court this season ... and we'll do better than last year. Go Lakers."
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo is out tonight vs UTA.
Frank Vogel says Rajon Rondo remains questionable for tonight’s Jazz game, but even if Rondo can play, he would come off the bench vs. Utah.
More on Rondo as the starting point guard: LAL always planned for him to start a number of games at PG, sources said. It might be as few as 10 games, though. There will still be plenty of time with LeBron as the primary ball handler, just not him as the exclusive starting PG.
New story: The LeBron at point experiment didn't last long; the Lakers are turning back to Rajon Rondo to play PG
Vogel says that when Rondo is indeed back there will be “a lot of games where he’s our starting point guard.” Said he would likely fill Avery Bradley’s spot.
Frank Vogel said Rajon Rondo (calf) had a strong practice Thursday but his availability for Friday’s Jazz game will depend on how Rondo’s body responds tomorrow.
New story: Yes, the Lakers posted up a ton in their opening night loss, but their efficiency rate with it would have led the league last season. Plus: Frank Vogel sees a big role for Rajon Rondo this year
Frank Vogel says that Kyle Kuzma is ruled out Friday. Rajon Rondo remains questionable but Vogel made a point to say how big of a role he expects Rondo to plat this season - in the 25-30 minute per game range.
New video: Lou Williams, fresh off scoring 21 points off the bench, delves into the “heavyweight fight” that was opening night in L.A.
Fascinating listen. A lot of honesty here.
Lakers bench is getting outscored 56-17. Lou Williams has 21p on 8-for-13 and 6a.
New story w/ @WindhorstESPN: The ripple effects of the NBA's predicament with China continued to be felt on opening night in Los Angeles
Kawhi Leonard is locked in. Hit his last 6 straight field goal attempts. All sorts of fadeaways and difficult angles.
LeBron is listening to “Example” by Curren$y on repeat in the pregame locker room. Sampling of the lyrics: “Global domination ruling my thoughts ... Never let 'em play you”
These T-shirts, approximately 13,000 of them, were printed and hauled out to downtown L.A. in a moving van and are currently being handed out on the streets surrounding Staples Center for free, hours before Lakers-Clippers tips off
Trotting this story out there again for those who might have missed it or want something to pass the time until tip-off: The story how Anthony Davis landed in L.A. to give LeBron and the Lakers a shot at redemption
New story: LeBron, AD look back at their Kawhi recruitment as the Lakers and Clippers get set to tip off the 2019-20 season
LeBron James was asked if the "whole China controversy" was behind the Lakers heading into opening night. "Tonight is the only thing that matters," he said.
LeBron James downplayed an extra layer to tonight's Lakers-Clippers game at Staples Center: Ty Lue, who was offered the Lakers job before the deal fell through, coaching against him. "I’m happy that he’s just back in the league and he’s a great coach," James said.
LeBron be like
Lakers previous listed heights on the left, new official heights for 2019-20 (without sneakers) on the right. LeBron James ; Anthony Davis, Kyle Kuzma, Dwight Howard, DeMarcus Cousins, Kentavious Caldwell-Pope, Quinn Cook, Jared Dudley 
Lakers say that Rondo (sore calf) is questionable, Caruso (bruised pelvis) is probable and Cook is available however Vogel said he would be congnizant of Cook’s workload. As for other players’ minutes, Vogel said he’ll treat it like a midseason game - no restrictions.
New story: Kyle Kuzma says he is "optimistic" about how his rehab has progressed but he'll still be ruled out opening night against the Clips, per Frank Vogel
Frank Vogel officially rules Kyle Kuzma our for the season opener while LeBron James lets loose during a shooting contest against Anthony Davis off camera.
The Lakers say that Alex Caruso underwent additional testing and it confirmed he has a bone contusion (pelvis) and his status is day-to-day.
The Lakers close out the preseason 3-3. Regular season opener is Tuesday against the Los Angeles Clippers. Been waiting 3 1/2 months for this game, what's 4 more days?
Alex Caruso took a tumble in the 1st Q and was diagnosed with a bone contusion, pelvis. He's ruled out for the rest of the nights. X-rays taken at the Chase Center here in SF were negative. He will undergo further testing when the team gets back to L.A. this weekend.
The Lakers are resting LeBron, AD, Dwight, JaVale, Danny Green, Avery Bradley, Rondo and Quinn Cook tonight vs GSW per Frank Vogel.
Hate to break it to you all, but it wasn’t a trick play by JaVale last night. ...
Vogel says he’ll sit LeBron and AD for Friday’s preseason finale in GSW.
Still making $4.99 million/year from the Lakers for the next three years. That’s the way to do retirement!
The Lakers announce they have waived Reggie Hearn and signed Marcus Allen to a training camp contract.
New story: L.A. routed GSW in AD's (preseason) debut as a Laker at Staples Center and the win got him and LeBron hoping they can make it easy for one another this season
New video: Postgame chat with LeBron James and Anthony Davis crashes the conversation
New video: My SportsCenter mini essay on the Lakers’ offseason (complete with animation from our talented graphics folks)
Will put a smile on your face.
New story: Six days, two games and whole lot of uncertainty caused by one deleted tweet. A trip to China with LeBron, the Lakers and the NBA
The Lakers announce they have waived David Stockton and signed Reggie Hearn to a training camp deal. Hearn is a six-year G League veteran out of Northwestern.
The Lakers announce that Anthony Davis is considered day-to-day with his sprained right thumb. The season opener vs. LAC is in 8 days.
Vogel says that in addition to LeBron and AD, Danny Green, Rajon Rondo and Avery Bradley will rest tonight.
Kyle Kuzma has been cleared for non-contact practice, according to Frank Vogel.
LeBron James and Anthony Davis are both officially out for Monday's preseason game vs. GSW. It's Frank Vogel's decision to rest them.
Zion.
New story: The Lakers wrapped up their China trip 0-2 but there was a time when it was questionable the games would even be played
The Lakers say Anthony Davis has a sprained right thumb and will not return.
Anthony Davis has returned to the Lakers' bench with a ice pack wrapped around his right thumb. Waiting on a status update for him for the rest of the game.
Goosebumps.
A little pregame jumper work for Kyle Kuzma.
The Lakers take the court in Shenzhen.
Only consistent Lakers starters all three preseason games are LeBron and AD.
Lakers injury report: Troy Daniels (sprained left knee) OUT; Jared Dudley (sore right quad) OUT; Quinn Cook (sore left calf) OUT; Kosta Antetokounmpo (right ankle sprain) AVAILABLE
The Lakers' injury report has Quinn Cook (left calf), Jared Dudley (right quad) and Kostas Antetokounmpo (right ankle) as questionable to play against the Nets in Shenzhen, China tonight.
New story: Media availability is being shut down for the rest of the China Games. This time it’s the NBA’s decision.
(2 of 2): “We have decided not to hold media availability for our teams for the remainder of our trip in China. They have been placed into a complicated and unprecedented situation while abroad and we believe it would be unfair to ask them to address these matters in real time.”
(1 of 2): There will no more media availability in China with the Nets and Lakers and it’s the NBA’s decision, not the Chinese government’s. The league’s statement:
The Lakers lose to the Nets 114-111 with Kentavious Caldwell-Pope's potential game-tying 3 missing the mark. The last couple minutes where pretty lively here with fans getting into it, hoping for an overtime session.
New story: Dispatch from Shanghai where all the uncertainty surrounding NBA-China relations was temporarily set aside for an actual basketball game between the Lakers and Nets
Kyrie Irving's preseason debut was cut short. He'll play just one minute here after re-aggravating the facial fracture he suffered in an offseason pickup game leading up to training camp.
For L.A. residents, the Lakers-Nets game is on live right now on Spectrum. John Ireland and Mychal Thompson are calling the game from their studios in El Segundo.
LeBron James is announced in the starting lineup in Shanghai.
Lakers starters - Rajon Rondo, Kentavious Caldwell Pope, Dwight Howard, Anthony Davis and LeBron James.
We were about an hour and 45 minutes to tip when LeBron James took the court to a smattering of cheers. The arena is only about 10-20 percent full so far.
Kyrie Irving, who has been recovering from a collision suffered before training camp, will play against the Lakers tonight, per a league source.
Lakers injury report: Quinn Cook has been upgraded to probable with his calf soreness.
We’re 3  hours away from tip and as of now the game is on, however, the NBA says one stipulation going into the night is there will be no media availability of any kind for either team - at the behest of the Chinese government. Adam Silver will also not hold a presser.
Game on.
An NBA spokesman just announced that given the fluidity of the situation, today’s media availability has been postponed
The Lakers &amp; Nets will address the media in Shanghai 4 hours from now. Since the NBA touched down in China, 2 NBA Cares events have been canceled by the Chinese government, several Chinese celebrities have backed out of appearances around the games as have corp. sponsors.
New story: Anthony Davis has a new life with the Los Angeles Lakers. A look inside how it all went down and how L.A. is already fitting AD just fine
New story: LeBron and AD clicked from the start in their preseason debut, leaving some marveling at what could come next. “It looks like a fantasy team or something,” said D’Angelo Russell.
Lakers second-half starters: KCP, Troy Daniels, Caruso, JaVale, Devontae Cacok
Still working some kinks out on the Chase Center scoreboard
After 12 minutes of action - Anthony Davis: 7-for-11; Golden State Warriors: 9-for-27
Anthony Davis’ 1st Q for the Lakers: 17 pts on 7-for-11 shooting, 7 reb. LAL up 33-20.
LeBron back in the headband for the 2019-20 preseason opener
Lakers starters per Vogel: LeBron, Bradley, Green, AD, JaVale.
Lakers injury report for Saturday vs GSW: Cousins-rehabilitation, right knee- OUT Kuzma - stress reaction, left ankle- OUT Horton-Tucker - stress reaction, right foot - OUT Dudley - sore right quad - OUT Antetokounmpo- right ankle sprain - OUT Cook- sore left calf - OUT
New digs for Steve Kerr’s pregame press conference. As he took his seat in front of the huge LED screen he quipped, “Fancy, huh?”
HoodAD
Frank Vogel says Anthony Davis And LeBron James should be a go in the preseason opener in GSW on Saturday.
New story: The Lakers practiced a late-game situation Thursday with LeBron at point and AD at center as LeBron lauded the different lineup packages LAL can employ this season
LeBron responds with a game-tying 3, then Rondo gets fouled on the other end with 0.5 seconds left
Cookies for Danny Green.
New story: Frank Vogel likes what he sees at center from Dwight Howard &amp; JaVale McGee through the first few days of camp as DeMarcus Cousins rehabilitates on the sidelines
Jared Dudley (knee tendinitis) did not practice for the Lakers on Tuesday. LeBron James and Anthony Davis did practice but were both held out of the controlled scrimmage by coach Frank Vogel.
Here's what LeBron James had to say about California governor Gavin Newsom signing the Fair Pay for Play Act on his show, The Shop:
LeBron James and Jared Dudley were held out of the first practice Monday of the scheduled two-a-day. Frank Vogel said that Dudley had been dealing with some knee soreness over the weekend. James wore a compression sleeve on his right calf at Sunday’s practice.
A lesson from Frank Vogel on the importance of defending without fouling ...
New story: LeBron and AD's five-man unit dominated so thoroughly Sunday that Vogel pulled LeBron to rest before the end of the day's scrimmages. The Lakers coach plans to limit LeBron in the preseason when he can
Frank Vogel says he tried out a starting five of LeBron, AD, Dwight, KCP and Avery Bradley today. He said the LeBron-AD group "had their way" with the second unit and Bradley has been the surprise star through two days of camp that everybody is talking about.
New story: Smash mouth basketball? Lakers coach Frank Vogel started camp by preaching defense and physicality. (I said yep, what a concept)
First glimpse of Lakers scrimmage in Day 1: LeBron, AD, Danny Green, JaVale &amp; Rondo vs. Caruso, KCP, Dudley, Dwight &amp; Daniels.
New story: The Lakers are back and trying to get ahead of the scrutiny that’s sure to come by preaching togetherness from Day 1
More sneaker stuff: LeBron James wore a Laker color way of the LeBron 7 today. They were the first in his line designed by Jason Petrie, whom he continues to work with, and also have a full length max air cushion, like the new LeBron 17 does.
Kyle Kuzma, formerly a Nike athlete, wore these Puma Rhude Alterarion kicks to media day
LeBron on if he’ll play in the 2020 Olympics: “I don’t know. I would love to. ... I will address that at some point.” Says he plans to speak to Gregg Popovich at some point to discuss the team.
LeBron James: “Staples Center is the biggest winner of the summer ... Staples Center is the place to be ... Maybe even Sierra Canyon (his son’s high school) can go there to play a game”
A very honest Rob Pelinka says that a huge factor in the Lakers feeling comfortable with bringing Dwight Howard back for a second stint was Dwight “putting his money where his mouth is” by agreeing to prove himself on a non-guaranteed contract.
Frank Vogel on his relationship with Jason Kidd so far: “A 10 out of 10”
Rob Pelinka says “right now” DeMarcus Cousins is a member of the Lakers roster and the team will follow the league’s lead when it comes to making further decisions when the results of the investigation into Cousins’ alleged domestic violence incident are determined.
Pelinka: “When the starting point for your roster is two of the best players in the universe, that’s a really good starting point.” Vogel: “We have the ability to reach the ultimate prize”
Pelinka on Kuzma: “We have a lot of hope ... There’s a lot of good signs with the healing that’s taken place”
Rob Pelinka says the theme for the Lakers season is one thing: “The 15 guys in our locker room. Our biggest opponent is in the mirror ... This is about us and about what we can accomplish this year”
The Lakers announce that Kyle Kuzma will be out until at least mid October with a foot injury.
Tune in! (Hopefully after an Eagles win)
This letter was signed by virtually every major player agent. One notable name absent was Rich Paul of Klutch Sports, sources told ESPN.
A lot to unpack here.
With a couple weeks remaining until training camp, wanted to welcome @E_Woodyard &amp; @_Andrew_Lopez to the @ESPNNBA team. Glad to have you aboard and even more glad to have a reason to share this ridiculous photoshop of Eric with a perm.
U.S. Say It Ain’t So. Gutty performance overall from Team USA throughout the World Cup. Need the big guns back for the Olympics, however.
Joe Johnson is in Detroit today for his workout for the Pistons, sources told ESPN.
Can’t tell you how many times I ran into Fred McLeod in a Marriott lounge on the road and we’d dive into conversation about hoops. His passion and knowledge not only about the Cavs, but the entire NBA, was simply tremendous. We’ll miss you, Fred.
FIBA (and here is a link:
USA-Japan is tipping off in the FINA World Cup. You can watch it now on ESPN #companyman #itiswaytooearly
New story: Dwight Howard spoke about being a Laker again today. Didn't think I'd be typing that sentence six years ago.
Kids, practice your free throws.
New story: Joe Johnson has workouts scheduled with DET, MIL &amp; BKN, league sources told ESPN, as he hopes to use his successful BIG3 stint to get him back in the NBA
Story filed to ESPN to go up shortly: Joe Johnson, fresh off an MVP and championship trophy in the BIG3, will travel to Detroit, Milwaukee and Brooklyn for workouts next week to try to get back into the league, sources told ESPN.
This is perfect execution for a throwback reveal.
Worlds collide. Good on @RajonRondo
Download all five episodes of this. Right now. And sit back and be enthralled. I’m two episodes in and imagine I’ll binge listen to the rest tonight. Great work by @ramonashelburne and the @30for30 team.
Congrats to @ToddKap. Can’t wait for this one.
Brooklyn Nets signee Kevin Durant - while wearing a brace to stabilize his leg following Achilles surgery - addressed Team USA before practice in El Segundo on Thursday, a source told ESPN.
Lakers sign another player to an Exhibit 10 deal, per source
Free agent guard Jodie Meeks, fresh off a championship with the Raptors, has drawn interest from the Clippers and Hornets, league sources tell ESPN. A career 37.3 percent 3-point shooter, he shot 44.4 percent from 3 in spot duty with Toronto.
The Lakers announce that Nina Hsieh has been promoted.
Well done.
LeBron responding to the @JonRothstein report that the NCAA is changing its rules for agent certification, with Rich Paul an apparent motivation
Congrats, Ryen. You had a hell of a ride at ESPN. Be proud. Looking forward to more of your two-man pods with Bill. Quickly became a favorite listen of mine.
Kuz’s flow is rowdy.
Congrats to the Ohio St. bunch (Carmen’s Crew) for taking down Overseas Elite. A TBT giant goes down.
David Griffin came on The Jump today to discuss his comments about LeBron James in a recent SI story. Here he explains what caused him to say LeBron was a “different animal” when it came to winning following the 16 chip
New story: On the fallout from David Griffin’s comments to @SInow about LeBron with background on the pair’s relationship then and now
Today’s monologue from The Jump. Brought to you by a little @veniceball inspiration.
Check out The Jump today at 12 p.m. PT. I’m in the hosting chair (oh yes, @Rachel__Nichols I promise to not burn down the place) with @ramonashelburne @malika_andrews and special guest @CarisLeVert on later! Tune in.
LAL made its coaching staff under Frank Vogel official: Jason Kidd, Lionel Hollins, Phil Handy, Miles Simon, Mike Penberthy, Quinton Crawford (assistant coaches); Greg St. Jean (player development/advance scout); Dru Anthrop (head video coordinator/PD); Jon Pastorek (asst. VC/PD)
New story: Anthony Davis tells @SarahSpain that a championship continues to drive him, echoing the title talk that Rob Pelinka and the Lakers have embraced
Yo. I can’t handle these Elam Endings. Jordan Crawford, you earned your honorary degree. 
7 p.m. ET on ESPN 2. Cannot wait. Let’s get it, fellas.
I don’t ask for much. Can we get Melo back on USA Basketball this summer?
Lakers are hiring a former guard from the Kobe-Shaq days, Mike Penberthy, as a shooting coach, according to league sources. “Good to be back,” Penberthy told ESPN. Penberthy worked for the Pelicans last season in the same role.
Great listen. Was particularly tickled to hear that Mike still has a set in his playbook named after Nick Young from their time together with the Lakers (no, the play is not having a player throw his hands up in celebration and turning away before the ball goes through the hoop)
Troy Daniels says he received calls from both Rob Pelinka and Anthony Davis about coming to LAL, picking them over interest from GSW and OKC. It helped, he thinks, that he once poured in 29 pts in a double OT win (including a game tying 3 in OT) over NOP when he played for MEM
ICYMI: On Anthony Davis' first day with the Lakers, as the franchise coming off the worst stretch in its history dared to dream once again
Anthony Davis on the Lakers chances with all the movement in the NBA this offseason: “I’ll put our roster up against anybody.”
LeBron is present and off to the side for AD’s presser.
Rob Pelinka introduces Anthony Davis as “the most dominant young basketball player in the world”
Anthony Davis, with his Instagram handle that includes his old No. 23, announces he’ll wear No. 3 for the Lakers this season
Rob Pelinka just quoted one of LeBron’s favorite sayings on a conference call with reporters when comparing this year’s approach to free agency vs. last year’s: “The greatest teacher in life is experience”
Run it back.
New story: Danny Green went inside his 5 day wait during free agency "that seemed like 5 months" as he spoke in an official capacity for the first time as a Laker
Danny Green, on a conference call with reporters, said he "checked in with (Kawhi Leonard) all the time" during the moratorium and still had no clue what Kawhi was going to do. He said the Paul George trade came as a complete surprise to him.
The Lakers will introduce Anthony Davis on Saturday. And LeBron will be a part of it.
Both signed to Exhibit 10 contracts.
The summer league crowd loves itself some Tacko Fall (also, his free throw form is a lane violation waiting to happen)
New story: Mike Conley on Utah's championship aspirations - "We'll be there at the end of the year knocking on the door"
LeBron stopped the Thunder from winning the title in 2012. The Thunder got him back and then some by convincing Paul George to sign there in 2018 and then facilitating the PG to the Clippers deal tonight, sealing Kawhi’s pick of LAC over LAL and TOR.
Hoping this means I don’t have to go on the road for the holidays. Lakers-Clippers on ABC on Christmas Day makes a lot of sense.
With the Lakers signing Danny Green after Kawhi Leonard chose the Clippers, expect the team to have conversations with some of the players on one-year deals from last year’s team — Rajon Rondo, JaVale McGee, Kentavious Caldwell Pope — as they explore ways to fill out the roster
Felt it in Los Angeles too. My entire apartment shook for a good 10 seconds.
Troy Daniels and the Lakers have come to an agreement on a one-year, $2.1 million contract, his agent Mark Bartelstein confirmed to ESPN. The Athletic had it first. The 6-4 SG is a 40 pct 3-pt shooter in 6 seasons in the league.
Hell of a day for @Chiney321. Drops a near double-double in a 25-point win for the Sparks (checking her phone at halftime for free agency news) and then crosses the street to chop it up on The Jump
As we wait on news on what the Lakers brass has been doing since 3 p.m., a league source told ESPN that the team - ever wary of tampering - expressed on Saturday they had a meeting planned with a "unicorn." Kawhi Leonard, clearly, is LA's top target by a mile.
Lakers free agent guard Reggie Bullock has a free agency meeting planned with the Knicks in Los Angeles on Sunday night, sources told ESPN. The six-year vet is a career 39 pct 3-point shooter.
He was a name you’d hear often as a Laker target should they split up their cap space for 2-3 guys.
After the Lakers finished summer league practice today, LeBron James and Kyle Kuzma - the only two Lakers currently under contract with the team - are going through drills together with Frank Vogel and Rob Pelinka observing from the sidelines.
Talen Horton-Tucker will not play in the Lakers’ California Classic games in Sacramento, per the team. He is dealing with a stress reaction in his right foot which was discovered at the combine. He will be re-evaluated in Las Vegas during summer league.
The Lakers might have been hurt from a New Orleans deal with CP3 when the team didn’t have an owner, but did well for themselves this time around in a N.O. deal for AD by roping in a team that doesn’t have a team president
Can confirm LA Times report that the Lakers will extend qualifying offers to Alex Caruso and Johnathan Williams. LAL will be challenged with filling out the roster with young players after the AD trade. Caruso, in particular, has a lot of fans in the organization.
So long to a giant. Enjoy the B-side, Bob.
Giannis Antetokounmpo just gave a poignant, moving, MVP speech that left a crowd of hundreds so attentive you could hear a pin drop ... in his second language. Another impressive feat for a guy who’s had a hell of a year.
Money talks. The NBA finally stepped in to penalize the Knicks for them banning the NYDN from their media events.
The Lakers paid $2.2 million to Orlando last night for the No. 46 pick they used on Talen Horton-Tucker, league sources tell ESPN. The Lakers’ $5.6 million cash considerations budget will be reset on July 1 for 2019-20.
The Lakers still had the No. 4 pick during the combine and no 2nd rounders so their interviews were focused on lottery talent (2 of 2)
Talen Horton-Tucker wasn’t a blind pick for the Lakers’ front office. Rob Pelinka attended the Klutch pro day at LMU and spoke to the Iowa State product there. However, there was no workout specifically for the Lakers, nor did the Lakers speak to him at the combine (1 of 2)
Talen Horton-Tucker says he didn’t work out for the Lakers and didn’t even meet with them at the combine before being picked by them tonight. As a fellow Klutch Sports client he says he’s already met with LeBron James and Anthony Davis, however.
The Lakers are trading a future pick and cash considerations to the Orlando Magic for No. 46 tonight, league source confirms. The Athletic first with the acquisition.
Struck me that Michael Jordan's Hall of Fame speech in 2009 led to him being mocked relentlessly for crying. Tonight, with the NBA affecting hearts and minds being the progressive league that it is for the last decade, Zion Williamson is celebrated for his tears on draft night.
New story: A confident Darius Garland touts his draft stock to ESPN after undergoing private work outs for several high lottery teams in LA this week
Can go back to December to get LeBron's reaction to the Anthony Davis trade: "That would be amazing, like, duh. That would be incredible."
Your Finals MVP, courtesy of a random contestant on The Great British Bake Off:
Klay Thompson. Un-freaking-real.
If they are both going to keep playing this well, we need 7 more quarters of this please.
KD provides a post-surgery update:
Lakers minority owner weighs in on the incident involving the Warriors minority owner, Mark Stevens. The league punished Stevens with a $500,000 fine and one year ban for shoving Kyle Lowry in Game 3.
New story: The Mavs owner, in L.A. on a speaking engagement, checks in on the state of the Lakers and says the NBA should prioritize TV scheduling over live attendance concerns
Let’s rally behind KOC here, NBA world.
It’s that time ...
Four preseason games against the Warriors.
Can’t wait until Thursday.
The Minnesota Timberwolves turned over Ryan Saunders’ coaching staff on Tuesday night, league sources told ESPN. They parted ways with Ed Pinckney, Larry Greer, Jerry Sichting, John Lucas Jr. and Dice Yoshimoto. They retained Malik Allen.
Five straight Finals. Hell of a team.
This, to me, was the best thing Frank Vogel said at his introductory press conference. On point.
New story: Rob Pelinka says that free agents should look at the Lakers as a team that can win a championship next season
Frank Vogel: “The perception of our organization is very different from the reality that I’ve experienced in my time here ... There’s a positive vibe with our team right now”
Rob Pelinka says Jeanie Buss has eliminated the position that Magic Johnson held, adding that it was only created specifically for Magic.
LeBron James is here for the Vogel presser standing in the back of the gym with Josh Hart.
Magic Johnson on @FirstTake says that the Lakers too targets in free agency should be Kawhi Leonard and Kyrie Irving.
His father, Bernie, has been a consultant to the Cleveland front office for years.
Wow. Joins the likes of Chris Andersen and OJ Mayo receiving the league’s harshest penalty.
.@Mike_Schmitz has the Lakers’ best selection being Darius Garland at No. 4. Garland also happens to be repped by Rich Paul of Klutch Sports, like LeBron James
A tanned Kuz is a lucky Kuz.
Cavs fans react to the 5th pick
That Aladdin/Steph Curry commercial came on here at the Cavs’ lottery party and, on cue, the crowd started booing heartily. And then when David Griffin was introduced as the Pelicans’ representative? Big cheers.
New story: The Sixers closed a wild postseason run and opened the door to a summer with potential for major change
An emotional Joel Embiid was comforted by players from both teams after Game 7. He played 45 minutes and put up 21 &amp; 11. Kawhi Leonard’s 41 points in 43 minutes were just enough to edge the Raptors past Philadelphia and into the Eastern Conference finals.
From @ESPNStatsInfo: The 22 minutes and 18 seconds that Joel Embiid played in the 1st half tonight in Toronto was the most he's ever played in any half in his career. Clearly this is a huge moment for him and this Sixers franchise, worth testing his limits for.
Huge ovation for Jose Calderon here in the 2nd Q, who is sitting courtside for Game 7. One of the classiest guys I've ever covered.
The Sixers started 0-for-9 from the field and Joel Embiid is currently 2-for-9 but the Raptors are only shooting 23.1 pct as a team in the meantime (1-for-10 from 3) and lead by just 4 early in the 2nd Q.
Zach asks Ben the questions we've all been wondering.
A "never underestimate the heart of a champion" type performance by the Dubs in Houston of all places. That's cold blooded.
What didn’t make the pod: The two Philly bros who bellied up to press row with their Yuenglings in hand in the 4th Q of Game 6 to chat up Zach and I. Bold move. Respect.
New video: Mini for SportsCenter on the Sixers forcing Game 7 with Joel Embiid looking like he found something again
New story: Embiid showed flashes of his old self and the Sixers kept their season alive by forcing a Game 7
Eagles dog mask  1, 2, 3, 4, 5 Sixers  A little slice of Philly pro sports heaven
Who would have thought Joel Embiid would be 1-for-8 in the first half and the Sixers would be up 58-43?
Brett Brown: “I feel like Game 5 is a thousand years ago.” And he didn’t even cover the Lue-Lakers fiasco yesterday like some of us.
Ty Lue and his reps turned down the Lakers’ offer Tuesday, per league sources. LAL regrouped with an offer in the range of 3 years, $18 million today. Lue’s side pulled out of negotiations. Lue’s camp seeking 5 year deal with salary commensurate with championship resume
New story: Everything that could go wrong for the Sixers on Tuesday did and now their once promising season is on the brink of ending early
How this should have played out ...
Stopped myself from mentioning Cuse's 2017 win over the Tigers. Took a lot of restraint.
Philadelphia's All-Stars tonight: Joel Embiid 5 pts on 2-for-6 shooting, 4 turnovers, 2 fouls; Ben Simmons 5 pts on 2-for-4 shooting, 3 turnovers, 3 fouls. The Sixers trail by 21 points at the half.
Sixers in trouble here. Raptors getting whatever they want on offense in the second quarter, open up a 12-point lead.
Serge Ibaka just took an inadvertent Kawhi elbow to the forehead and is heading to the locker room with a towel on his face sopping up the blood.
Embiid and Siakam both playing tonight, as expected.
Brett Brown says that there is no update on Joel Embiid’s condition. So the big man will be a gametime decision.
New video: A mini SportsCenter essay on the Sixers finding themselves asking the same question tonight that they’ve asked for much of the postseason - Will Joel Embiid be able to play?
Totally want to incorporate a “You stuck it, baby!” into my postgame questions tonight in Toronto.
The Sixers say Joel Embiid is listed as probable with an upper respiratory infection. He did not attend shootaround and is resting back at the hotel.
Brought to you from an auxiliary press room hidden in the halls of Wells Fargo Center. Thanks for the conversation, Adrian.
When the 76ers go back on the road to TOR, it won’t be w/ just the players and coaches in tow. They pack a portable training room and set it up on the opponents’ court, the only team in the league to do so. My story on the funky feature of Philly’s culture
New story: After scoring just 11 points in the Sixers' Game 4 loss while battling the flu Sunday, Joel Embiid said "I'm just not myself," while Jimmy Butler vowed to keep backing the big man
Pascal Siakam joined the Raptors on the court for their pregame layup lines.
JJ Redick on the Ben Simmons-Kyle Lowry tangle in Game 3: “It looked like he intentionally put his butt in (Ben’s) face. That was weird.”
New story: Joel Embiid’s healthy Game 3 against Toronto has his coach thinking he has the best player in the series and Jimmy Butler thinking he’s playing with the “best player in the world”
Joel Embiid's night is going to be finished here with 33 pts on 9-for-18 shooting (3-of-4 3s; 12-of-13 FTs), 10 reb, 3 ast, 5 blk (and one crazy windmill dunk) in 28 minutes. He had 28 pts total in Games 1 &amp; 2.
Kyle Lowry hip checked James Ennis III out of bounds with no call and now the Philly fans are going rabid after the flagrant 1 call on Pascal Siakam for tripping his Cameroonian pal Joel Embiid. Sixers up 14 w/ 10:05 to play.
Had an NBA assistant coach text me during the 3rd Q: "Kawhi is a savage." Pretty much. He has been dominant. Brought Raptors back from down 18 to make it a game again.
The Sixers don't have much of a bench to speak of, so perhaps that's part of the reason why his contributions have been so noticeable, that said James Ennis III is having a nice postseason. Has a nose for the ball and makes plays on both ends.
There are no holes in Kawhi Leonard's game. He's been remarkable this series.
Get this man a color commentator gig, stat.
JJ Redick got a bloody lip from Danny Green in Game 1 of this series. Tonight he just took a Serge Ibaka shot to the face. Ibaka called for a Flagrant 1 after an official's review.
Philly showing out tonight. As my man @KNegandhiESPN said, this is the most important game yet of The Process and the fans are ready for it.
Mike Scott (right foot) says he’ll play Game 3: “It feels good. Let’s take it for a spin”
New story: Sixers practice update where Joel Embiid vows to stay patient, Mike Scott is on the mend and Jimmy Butler reluctantly embraces the 3
I enjoy this Brett Brownism: Says both teams trying to corral the loose ball on a late possession in Game 2 was like trying to pick up an orange seed.
Mike Scott is playing a full court game of 3-on-3 with Boban Marjanovic and T.J. McConnell against coaches after 76ers practice Wednesday. He also participated in the rest of practice as he continues to overcome a right heel contusion/plantar fasciitis that kept him out Games 1-2
New video: Interviewing Joel Embiid on the court after Game 2 where he says he told Jimmy Butler to carry the Sixers since he was playing sick
New story: Jimmy Butler went from 10 pts in Game 1 to 30 in Game 2 while Kawhi Leonard went from 45 pts in Game 1 to 35 in Game 2 and we have a 1-1 series heading back to Philadelphia
Brett Brown on Jimmy Butler in Game 2: “This was James Butler. That was the adult in the gym ... He was an incredible rock ... He was a stud”
Brett Brown says Joel Embiid received IV fluids before Game 2.
The Sixers say that Greg Monroe (L ankle sprain) will not return.
Sixers up 51-38 at the half despite Joel Embiid only taking one shot. Butler 13p 7r; Ennis III 12p off the bench; Redick 9p. Toronto paced by Kawhi's 15p 3r 2s. The Raptors scored more in the 1st Q of Game 1 than they did in the first half of Game 2.
After giving up 17 points apiece to Kawhi and Pascal in the 1st Q of Game 1, the Sixers held TOR to 17 points as a team in the 1st Q of Game 2. PHI leads 26-17. Raptors shooting 29.2 pct (including 1-for-8 from 3). Ben Simmons has been all over Leonard on the defensive end.
The Sixers say Joel Embiid is available to play Game 2.
Joel Embiid just joined his teammates on the court for warmups.
The Sixers took the court for their pregame warmups without Joel Embiid. We await his status with about 20 minutes to go until tipoff.
Brett Brown says that Joel Embiid (gastrointeritis) is a gametime decision and Amir Johnson has been added to the active roster in case Embiid can not play.
Good read from Jackie MacMullan to get you ready for the moment that is Sixers-Raptors Game 2 tonight:
Joel Embiid (gastroenteritis) missed shootaround Monday. He is listed as probable for Game 2, per the Sixers.
Arya is Mario with a star x 1,000,000
New story: Kawhi Leonard was up to 45 points in the waning minutes of Game 1 Saturday - 50 was in play. He says he wishes he was taken out sooner. The Raptors had the win in hand and that’s all that mattered to him
Drake, walking out of the arena tonight after a Raptors win, tells some gathered fans, “What about the Michael Rubin curse? Nobody wants to talk about that? The Michael Rubin curse.” Rubin is a limited partner in the Sixers.
50 piece for KD one night, 40 piece for Kawhi the next. And a Game 7 later on this evening. What a time to be alive.
Some high-level hoops here in Toronto. Raptors lead 61-52 at the half. Kawhi 27p on 10-of-14 7r; Pascal 22p on 9-of-11; Lowry 5p 6a. For PHI: Embiid 12p on 4-of-13 7r; Tobias 12p 8r 5a; Simmons 10p on 5-of-6 6r. Sixers have 8 turnovers, Raptors only have 3.
The Sixers shoot 59.1 percent in the 1st Q and go 4-for-7 from 3 ... yet still trail Toronto 39-31 heading into the 2nd Q. Kawhi 17p; Pascal 17p.
R.J. Barrett is in Toronto for Game 1 of Sixers-Raptors.
New story: Reps from both sides of the PHI-TOR playoff series -- Sixers co-owner Michael Rubin and Raptors global ambassador Drake -- went to social media to support Meek Mill, whose request to travel to Toronto for Game 1 was denied
New story: Joel Embiid vows to play more against TOR than the 25 mins he averaged against BKN but warned his left knee soreness is "going to be there at least all playoffs" as Philly continues to manage it
Sixers forward Mike Scott is in a walking boot at shootaround Saturday in Toronto. He is dealing with a right heel injury.
The NBA and the Sacramento Kings announce a joint investigation into sexual assault allegations against Luke Walton:
The schedule is out. Sixers-Raptors Game 1 is Saturday in Toronto.
Sheesh.
Four ejections: Jonah Bolden, Greg Monroe for PHI; Rodions Kurucs, Dzanan Musa for BKN
With the Sixers up 27 points and 1:50 away from advancing to the 2nd Round, we have some pushing and shoving out here with Jonah Bolden, Rodians Kurucs, Greg Monroe, etc.
Sixers say Mike Scott has a right heel contusion and will not return tonight.
Joel Embiid throws down a hammer dunk along the baseline and points at Rondae Hollis-Jefferson - a friend of his - who failed to stop him. Embiid picks up a T.
Sixers outscored the Nets 51-23 in the 3rd Q of Game 2 to mark their arrival on this series. They're outscoring them 30-6 in the 1st Q of Game 5 to mark the Nets' exit on the playoffs.
Sixers up 12-0 to start Game 5. Nets start the night 0-for-8 from the field.
Game 5.
Sixers make their sponsored NovaCare Injury report pregame over the P.A.: “There are no injuries.” Crowd cheers. Closeout game Joel Embiid, step right up.
Statement from attorney Garo Mardirossian, who will conduct a press conference with his client, Kelli Tennant, in Los Angeles in about an hour from now:
New story: Jason Kidd interviewed with Rob Pelinka and Kurt Rambis for the Lakers' head coaching vacancy on Monday, league sources told ESPN
New story: With the Sixers heading into a potential closeout game against a Nets team still smarting from how the officiating has gone, Brett Brown is trying to keep his track for Game 5
Joel Embiid on Charles Barkley’s suggestion he take up swimming as a low impact way to keep his conditioning up: “I’m scared of water. I don’t know how to swim”
The NBA announced that Nets GM Sean Marks is suspended for Game 5 of the Sixers series (and docked one game’s pay) and fined $25,000 for entering the referees’ locker room after Game 4
New story: Eleven of the 12 shots Joel Embiid attempted in the 4th Q of Game 4 were inside. "Just trying to live in the paint," he said. Added Tobias Harris: "We just had to let him go eat out there."
New story: After the Sixers took Game 4 in Brooklyn to go up 3-1, D'Angelo Russell said the Nets are "going to handle (the officiating) in our own ways" moving forward
New video: JJ Redick on the Sixers coming back from down 7 with 5 minutes to go to take a 3-1 series lead, “We all just kept saying during timeouts, We’re going to win this game, we’re going to win this game’ over and over again and sometimes you have to manifest that”
Joel Embiid asked about being up 3-1 said the Sixers don’t want to be like the Warriors three years ago. Jimmy Butler, sitting next to Embiid at the podium as the big man was cracking up, got up and exited stage right. “Welp, that’s my f—ing cue,” Butler quipped.
Seeing Joel Embiid dominate on one leg really makes you wonder about the NBA eliminating the center position from the All-Star ballot. I get the whole positionless basketball thing and the relatively weak 5 men leaguewide in 2012, but, man.
Have a feeling Embiid's flagrant 1 from today could be rescinded by Secaucus. He made a play on the ball.
Jared Dudley-Ben Simmons entering into Raja Bell-Kobe Bryant, DeShawn Stevenson-LeBron James territory for top notch entertaining playoff series foils.
Got to say, the Nets fans are bringing it today. It's loud in here.
Sitting next to @ZachLowe_NBA for Sixers-Nets and he's watching the game live and also on his laptop simultaneously through his secret portal as I peek over his shoulder.
Watched this clip yesterday and then Caris LeVert breaks out the behind the back assist to Jarrett Allen under the basket in the first quarter here against the Sixers.
Lineup change for Brooklyn starting Caris LeVert and Jared Dudley. Kurucs and Carroll to the bench.
Joel Embiid is playing and starting Game 4, according to the Sixers.
Brett Brown, unsurprisingly, calls Joel Embiid a gametime decision. “I’m able to absorb whatever the news is, I have a Plan A and Plan B,” Brown said.
New story: With Joel Embiid's status downgraded to doubtful for Game 4, Sixers coach Brett Brown says, "It's always best to plan that you don't have him and be really surprised and happy when you do"
Joel Embiid, in Ugg slides, getting up shots at Sixers practice
Meeting will take place at a hotel in Orange County, in proximity to Pelinka’s Newport Beach home
New story: With Joel Embiid out, Ben Simmons more than made up for his absence in a dominant Game 3 win in Brooklyn
The Sixers, without Embiid, are 9-for-18 from 3 tonight and have a 15-point 3rd Q lead. In the series opener, they shot 3-for-25 from 3 and lost.
New story: Joel Embiid, out for Game 3, reiterated his apology to Jarrett Allen and said he probably should have been ejected for his elbow to the Nets center's face in Game 2
"I try to help us win the series and eliminate them. So whatever, whatever I can do. But it’s hard. I just got to keep pushing it and see how I do." (2 of 2)
Embiid, pregame, speaking about his health: "It’s tough. That’s what tendinitis is all about. And some days you got your days and some other days is different. So even in the games that I play I just try to go out there and try to play for these guys ... (1 of 2)
The Sixers say that Joel Embiid is out with left knee soreness. Greg Monroe will start.
Joel Embiid just got to the Sixers locker room in street clothes 65 minutes before tipoff. We’ll wait on his official status.
Brett Brown says, “same old, same old,” that Joel Embiid will be a gametime decision for Game 3.
Kenny Atkinson on being mindful of playing with more physicality, but sticking to the team identity in Game 3: “We’re not going to become the Detroit Piston Bad Boys - is that what they called them? Or the Broad Street Bullies.”
Ben Simmons smirked when asked about Jared Dudley calling him an “average” player in the half court: “It’s coming from Jared Dudley ...”
New story: Sixers players lauded the bombastic Brett Brown that addressed them at halftime of Game 2, but the Philly coach says he’ll pick and choose his spots to breathe fire like that in the future
Jared Dudley told reporters that he will play in Game 3 against Philadelphia. A strained calf kept him out of Game 2 after he had a big impact in the Nets’ Game 1 win.
New story: Sixers players credited coach Brett Brown’s halftime message that hit home before they romped the Nets in Game 2
Impressive 3rd quarter for the Sixers, but man, what a special night for Kevin Harlan, the fast food god.
The Sixers win 145-123 to knot their series with Brooklyn 1-1. It's the most points in playoff history for the Sixers' franchise and the most points scored in a non-overtime playoff game since the Celtics scored 157 on the Knicks in 1990.
The Sixers outscored the Nets 51-23 in the 3rd Q. Oh my.
The Sixers have outscored the Nets 21-2 in the first 4 minutes of the 3rd Q to build a 20-point lead.
Quick 8-0 run by Joel Embiid to start the 2nd half gives the Sixers some breathing room.
Sixers say Joel Embiid, James Ennis III (on a 12-minute restriction) and Jonah Bolden will play. Nets say that Jared Dudley is out.
We’re about 55 minutes to tip-off and Embiid is on the court going through a full speed workout without a brace.
Brett Brown says Joel Embiid is a game time decision. So, we wait.
New story: Update from 76ers practice where Jimmy said the Sixers are fortunate, Amir apologized to the team and Ben said he needs to be more aggressive when BKN tries to defend him with “Dudley and the other kid”
The injury report that Brett Brown referred to earlier in the afternoon has been released. Joel Embiid is officially questionable for Game 2 with left knee soreness
Is it dusty in here?
Brett Brown would not provide any update on Joel Embiid, but said the team would release a statement at 5 p.m. today on Embiid’a status.
Mood.
New column: On the suddenly tough spot the Sixers find themselves after Game 1, with so much riding on this postseason run
The Sixers’ playoff balloons being hauled away in a giant trash bin feels pretty accurate to describe what we saw today.
Amir Johnson released a statement apologizing to the Sixers for having his cell phone on the bench and GM Elton Brand released a statement saying the Sixers have fined Johnson for his actions. Johnson did not mention his daughter in his statement.
Joel Embiid says that Amir Johnson had his phone on the bench because he was checking on his daughter. “She’s extremely sick,” Embiid said.
The Sixers drop Game 1 to Brooklyn 111-102. D'Angelo 26p, LeVert 23p. For PHI: Jimmy 36p, Embiid 22p (on 5-of-15) 15r 5b. Philly fans booed them off the court at the end of the 1st, end of the 3rd and the final buzzer.
Philly fans flocking to the exits down 109-96 with 3:08 to go in the 4th.
Just like the end of the 1st Q, the Philly faithful boo the Sixers off the court at the end of the 3rd. They trail 93-82 heading into the 4th.
Jimmy Butler buzzer-beating 3 cuts the Sixers' deficit to 62-54 at the half. Butler has been money for PHI with 23p 6r so far. BKN is paced by LeVert's 16p off the bench.
Jared Dudley is a small ball 5 in the 2019 playoffs. What a long strange journey it's been for the pride of Boston College.
Sixers trail 31-22 at the end of the 1st Q and the boo birds are out here in Philly. BKN is 5-for-8 from 3 while PHI is 0-for-9 from deep -- with Embiid going 0-for-4 from the outside so far.
Sixers GM Elton Brand says the Lakers or any other team hasn’t reached out about Monty Williams yet but, “I’m sure they will.” Brand says they will “honor” the request to speak to Williams should it come, citing the other PHI assistants (Pierce, Lange) that recently got HC gigs
Brett Brown says Joel Embiid will be a gametime decision for Game 1 vs BKN.
Joel Embiid is on the court with a bulky brace on his left leg, getting up shots before Game 1
ICYMI: On the challenges Luke Walton faced in his final season with the Lakers and the emergence of Rob Pelinka calling the shots (w/ @NotoriousOHM)
New story reported w/ @NotoriousOHM: On the final days of Luke Walton in Laker Land, an ending the coach seemed doomed to go through
Rob Pelinka issued this statement on behalf of the Lakers: “We would like to thank Luke for his dedicated service over the last three years. We wish Luke and his family the best of luck moving forward.” When Magic Johnson resigned, it was Jeanie Buss issuing the statement.
The Lakers announced they have fired Luke Walton.
Excited for my guy @RobMacNBA. His book comes out Oct. 1 available on Making The Cuse proud.
New story: Lakers players were candid in reflecting on what went wrong with the season in the rearview
New video: My SportsCenter essay on the fallout from Magic Johnson’s shocking decision to step down from the Lakers
JaVale McGee says the pressure of playing for the Lakers is overrated: “Anybody who wouldn’t want to take advantage of this opportunity for fear of the spotlight is childish”
Tyson Chandler: “I know I definitely want to play one more year ... I know next year will be it”
The Lakers fired athletic trainer Marco Nuez on Weds, sources told ESPN. Nuez joined LAL as an asst trainer in 08-09 &amp; ascended to the head position in 16, succeeding Gary Vitti. LAL players had missed 212 games due to injury in 18-19, 9th most in the NBA, per Spotrac
Lonzo Ball when asked about Kevin Durant's "toxic" comments about playing with LeBron said, "It was a dream come true to me ... He was like a big brother"
Lonzo Ball says his ankle is "finally starting to show some good progress," and he expects to be back playing in a couple weeks.
If there is one player on the entire Lakers' roster who truly "gets it," it's Kyle Kuzma. If his outlook on the season and what was gained, what was lost and why is shared throughout the Lakers locker room, the team will get back on the right track.
Kyle Kuzma said Magic Johnson's "don't baby them" comments about the young core after the trade deadline was accepted by him and his teammates, saying how much goes into the business side of the game as a professional: "It’s accurate in the grand scheme of things"
Josh Hart, who approached his media session on crutches as he recovers from a right knee procedure, said as a whole the Lakers suffered "injuries that you couldn’t really prevent." He went on to praise the LAL medical staff for their professionalism and care.
Lakers rookie Moe Wagner on the drama of the Lakers' season: "I got to be honest, I play basketball and that's my job ... I just do my thing and hoop"
New story w/ @NotoriousOHM: Magic Johnson stepped down as Lakers president Tuesday, capping a truly disappointing season with a shocking conclusion
Perfectly appropriate cap to a truly bizarre day in Laker Land? Adam Levine celebrating his 40th birthday with an 11 p.m. pickup game on the Staples Center court.
The Lakers season ends on a buzzer beating loss. I believe fitting is the word. Mo "How Could You Be So" Harkless hits the finisher from the corner to win it for Portland, 104-101. The summer should be a doozy.
Lakers statement:
I stood next to Kobe Bryant when he cried at his locker after the torn Achilles. I just stood next to Magic Johnson as he cried after stepping down as Lakers president. Today was more shocking. This is more than a job, obviously, for everyone involved. The Lakers are reality TV.
This press conference is 35 minutes and counting. ...
When Magic Johnson was asked about his opinion of both Luke Walton and Rob Pelinka keeping their jobs, he declined to answer and said those decisions have to be made by Jeanie Buss.
End of the day, Magic Johnson claims he has too much love for Jeanie Buss to hurt someone she loves in Luke Walton. A high-stakes basketball version of the Gift of the Magi. Stunning.
Magic Johnson is acknowledging media members, broadcasters and Staples Center employees by name as he looks out at the crowd around him.
Magic Johnson did not endorse anyone to fill his position but said Jeanie Buss will undoubtedly field dozens of phone calls from interested parties.
Magic Johnson has cried, he’s laughed. He’s speaking completely off the cuff and taking any and all questions. A remarkable day in Lakers history.
Magic Johnson said he will return to community work and reaching out to players around the league to help in their development: “I’m a free bird and I can’t be handcuffed ... This is a good day.”
Magic Johnson says the decision was not over Luke Walton’s job status. He says making this announcement, which, Jeanie Buss isn’t aware of yet, is a “monkey off my back.”
Magic Johnson says that his position doesn’t allow him to be a statesman of the game of basketball. He says he wants to go back to his wonderful life away from this position. “I was happier when I wasn’t the president (of the Lakers)”
Magic Johnson: “(Jeanie) doesn’t know I’m standing here.”
Magic Johnson is conducting an impromptu press conference and just stepped down as Lakers president. He said he loves Jeanie Buss like a sister.
Luke Walton asked before Game 82 if he has any anxiety about his future with the Lakers: “No. No anxiety. ... But call me later tonight and maybe that answer will be different”
Lakers beat the Jazz 113-109 to improve to 37-44 with one game left. They have managed to win 6 of their last 9 games down the stretch. Good: Caruso 18p 11a. Better: Jemerrio Jones 5p 16r 5a in first NBA start at SG. Best: KCP 32p 6r 6a. Tuesday vs. POR closes it out.
Duke's Cam Reddish is sitting courtside at Staples Center with Rich Paul of Klutch Sports for this Lakers-Jazz game.
This is great.
Alex Caruso is up to 32 points on 10-for-19 shooting (5-for-7 from 3) and 7-for-7 from the foul line. Heck of a week for him that started Sunday with 23 points in a win in New Orleans.
Alex Caruso just went full gyration on his Lance air guitar impression. He's up to 22 pts 10 reb 5 ast. He's really proven himself as a legit rotation NBA player the last couple weeks.
Lakers lose 108-90, fall to 35-44. Three more games left. J. Williams 17p 13r; JaVale 8p 13r; Rondo 12p 4r; Muscala 11p 6r; Caruso 9p 6a 5r. Cousins led GSW w/ 21p 10r.
A Lakers courtside season ticket holder looking to get Klay Thompson’s attention tonight. He’s made similar overtures for LeBron and Paul George in the past.
New story: With one week to go in the regular season, Lakers owner Jeanie Buss opened up on the state of her team, her coach and her relationship with her front office in an interview with @SBRadio
OKC sent in mass subs with 1:04 remaining and up 119-103. Westbrook waved off Felton though. He had 20 pts, 21, reb, 18 reb. Sure enough, with 39.5 seconds left, he had grabbed two more boards. 20 pts, 21 ast, 20 reb -- 1st since Wilt w/ the Hugh Downs/Barbara Walters Special
Russell Westbrook: 20 pts, 20 ast, 17 reb ... 3:20 remaining in the 4th Q
Adams started the 2nd half at center for the Thunder.
Adams stayed in the game to shoot FTs but was just subbed out and immediately went to the back with OKC personnel.
Steven Adams is snapping his hand by his ear drum and telling the Thunder trainer, "I can't hear" after taking that inadvertent shot to the head by Moe Wagner.
Russell Westbrook has 10 first quarter assists, 7 rebounds and 0 points. OKC up 30-23 on LAL with 1:29 remaining.
Luke Walton says Kyle Kuzma (left foot tendinitis) is out against OKC
New story: Luke Walton explained the decision to shut LeBron James down for the remainder of the season
It's the Alex Caruso Show. The guard on the two-way contract has 20 pts on 6-for-9 shooting, four assists, four steals and just took a charge. He is a 17 in 23 minutes so far tonight and the Lakers are up 16 on the Pelicans in the final minute of the 3rd Q.
With Jemerrio Jones wearing No. 10 for the Lakers, he becomes the third guy to wear that number this year, following Svi Mykhailiuk and Scott Machado.
Kuzma says he is out.
Luke Walton says Kyle Kuzma is doubtful vs. NOP because of tendinitis in his left foot. Walton says Moe Wagner will start if Kuzma can’t play.
New story: LeBron James' first season with the Los Angeles Lakers is over
With LeBron James’ season officially ending Saturday, reposting yesterday’s story detailing everything that went wrong for him and the Lakers in the first year of their union
With the Lakers winning the final three games LeBron James suited up for in 2018-19, L.A. finished with a 28-27 record in the 55 games played in his first season with the franchise.
Lakers statement: “After consulting with our team doctors and medical staff, we have decided to hold LeBron out of games for the remainder of the season. This decision will allow his groin to fully heal, and is best for the future success of both LeBron and the Lakers.”
We ain’t going nowhere.
New story: Rajon Rondo tells ESPN he "absolutely" wants to return to the Lakers next season -- "I mean, the only way we can go from here is up"
Lakers win 129-115 over CHA, getting to play a bit of a spoiler role for former LAL GM Mitch Kupchak's Hornets who came into the game riding a 4-game win streak &amp; fighting for the playoffs. LeBron 27p 9a; Rondo 17a; KCP 25p; Kuz 20p; Lance 14p 13r; McGee 10p 9r; J-Will 13p
New story: The lost year of LeBron and the Lakers - an inside look at what went wrong in LeBron's first season in L.A. (many thanks to @andrewthehan &amp; @cristinadaglas for their editorial touch on this one)
The Lakers announce Josh Hart underwent a successful ultrasonic debridement procedure on his right knee patellar tendon on Thursday. He will not play the rest of the season. His recovery is expected to take approximately 12 weeks.
LeBron James stayed back in LA to rehab, per Luke Walton. He added that Lance Stephenson and Mike Muscala will be available.
Upon further review, Green merely stumbled (because Lance stepped on his foot). But still, the moment was pretty damn fun.
Lance Stephenson just made Jeff Green fall to the ground with his crossover, nailed the pull-up J and caused the Lakers' bench to collectively lose their mind in a spell of hysteria akin to Oracle Arena reacting to Vince Carter's dunk contest win back in 2000. Fun stuff.
New story: What's left to play for when you're a Laker not making the playoffs? Respecting the basketball gods
Another update: Mike Muscala is out and Lance Stephenson is available
Reggie Bullock is out with right plantar fasciitis. And Josh Hart (right knee) is also out.
That game was an all timer. One for the pantheon as my man Dave Blatt would say.
The Lakers day LeBron will play Sunday vs SAC ... And now back to the Duke game
This.
Zion Williamson’s career will be best off if he is drafted by ...
New story: After only failing to make the postseason 5 times in the first 65 years of their franchise’s existence, the Lakers have now missed the playoffs 6 straight years
What a photo.
Josh Hart is out tonight with knee soreness for the BKN game. The Lakers say that Hart is going to soon consult with team doctors as well as outside medical personnel to determine the best course of action to manage his knee tendinitis for the rest of the season.
He replaces Andre Ingram on the roster.
Trust the Kiwi. Great story by Woj on the Eastern Conference’s other radical rebuild in recent years.
Lakers lose 115-101 to MIL, fall to 31-40. KCP 35p on 8-of-14 from 3; Kuzma 17p on 4-of-17 5r 3a; Rondo 13p 10a 6r; Bullock 13p on 3-of-3 from 3. Middleton led the Bucks w/ 30p 10r 5a; Lopez 28p 9r; Mirotic 23p; Bledsoe 14p 8r 7a. LAL shot 38.4 pct overall (but 82.6 pct on FTs)
New story: Kobe Bryant met with Liu Zhe -- the fan who recovered Kobe's stolen high school jersey and returned it to the school after it was missing for 2 years -- on his recent trip to China
On the short list of wackiest stories I've ever covered.
LeBron James is out tonight with a sore left groin per the Lakers.
New story: It was a new low for LeBron and the Lakers on Sunday in New York
Alex Caruso on the shot he took from Allonzo Trier: “I don’t think it was intentional. My face just happened to be where his elbow was”
Mario Hezonja blocks LeBron James' potential game winning shot in the lane at the buzzer and the Knicks sweep the season series over the Lakers. This LAL season keeps finding new lows.
New video: My SportsCenter essay on the crummy current state of the Lakers and Knicks and their shared silver lining
After a career-high 10 assists last game, Kyle Kuzma continues to approach this game in distributor mode. He only has 1 assist so far but he's been looking to playmake through passing more than shooting in the early going today.
Sure enough, Kobe Bryant met up with Liu Zhe - the fan who returned Kobe’s stolen high school jersey to Lower Merion - during his visit to China for the FIBA World Cup draw
New story: Details on Brandon Ingram’s procedure that removed a blood clot and will allow him to return in 3-4 months. “He’s in good spirits and Brandon’s going to make a full recovery,” Ingram’s agent, Jeff Schwartz, told ESPN.
There can only be one.
Lakers lose 111-97, fall to 31-38. Were missing a lot of guys tonight (LeBron, BI, Zo, Hart, Lance, Tyson) and missed a lot of shots tonight too (6-for-25 from 3). Detroit was paced by Drummond's 19p 23r.
(Nah, just playing, we made it back across the border. Tipoff in 20 minutes! )
I broke my cardinal rule of beat traveling: book the earliest flight out on the second day of a back to back. If it’s canceled, you got the most chances to rebook and still make it. Tried to get cute and steal some extra sleep with the 11:47 a.m. departure. What a disaster.
LeBron sitting out 2nd night of b2b. Lakers have two remaining b2bs this season.
"It helps if you got a lot of shooters, 3-pt makers. But you’re not going to outscore GSW in a 7-gm series.,, The only way you’re going to be able to do it is get defensive stops &amp; I think we had that type of roster when we were healthy as far as guys that take pride defensively"
Rondo on if the playmaker/D roster made sense; "We still didn’t have a full deck this year so you can’t really throw out that philosophy and say it didn’t work. Championships are won defensively. It’s a miss-make league. You can’t control, obviously, the shots you make. ...
LAL has shot 34.8% on wide open 3s (defender 6 or more feet away) this season, worst in the NBA (per Second Spectrum). Was LAL's lack of shooting a concern coming into the year? Rondo: ""Obviously the game has changed. So it was obviously a concern, but that’s not in my control"
Lakers lose 111-98 in TOR, fall to 31-37. LeBron 29p 6a 4r; Caruso 16p 5r 5a; Rondo 13p 8a; JaVale 9p 9r; Kyle Kuzma's 7-point night on 3-for-11 shooting snaps his streak of 24 straight games in double digit scoring.
Toronto closes the 2nd Q on a 14-2 run with LeBron James on the bench, takes a 65-54 lead into halftime.
Alex Caruso making the most of his opportunity here: 14 pts on 5-for-5 shooting and 2 assists in 11 mins in the 1st half so far.
A Kobe fanatic in China purchased the stolen jersey for $2,000. When he realized what he had, he returned it for free. Why? “What I did was my 'mamba mentality,’” he told ESPN.
New story: More than two years after it was stolen from a display case at Lower Merion High School and following a trip halfway around the world and back, Kobe Bryant's high school uniform has been returned.
New story: With the Lakers all but out of playoff contention, LeBron James claims there will be better times ahead in his L.A. tenure - "(Last year) won't be the last time I'll be in the postseason"
Lakers win 123-107 over Chicago to snap a five-game losing streak, improve to 31-36. LeBron 36p 10r 4a in 33 mins; KCP 24p on 7-of-11 6r; Kuzma 21p 5r 4a; JaVale 10p 11r; Rondo 14p 10a. LAL shoots 54.7/39.4/80 pct as a team.
Andre Ingram checks into the game late in the 3rd Q with the Lakers up 98-84 and a significant portion of the crowd here in Chicago -- many of them wearing Lakers jerseys, but certainly some wearing Bulls gear -- showed their appreciation for the journeyman with a standing o
The Lakers have bounced back from an early 20-point deficit to jump ahead 66-64 in the 3rd Q here in Chicago. LeBron James has 22 pts and 9 reb in 21 mins.
The Lakers trail the 19-49 Chicago Bulls, who are missing Zach LaVine, 34-16 after 1Q. In the words of Micheal Ray Richardson: The ship be sinking.
"I'm not going to call Utah a racist state, but there is racism everywhere in this country and it kind of just shows where we are as a society what we still have to go through and players have to hear derogatory things about their ethnicity and whatnot. It's very saddening."
Q: Have you heard stuff like that directed at your teammates? A: "No. I have not. But it's very unfortunate, to say the least, what happens. ...
Q: Do you feel safe? A: "I feel safe (on the bench). I don't ever think a fan is going to run up and sock me in the face ... But, it's kind of tough, the world that we live in today that some players don't feel as safe physically or mentally, especially in Russ's case (Monday)."
Q: In your two years in the NBA have you been subject to similar fan treatment? A: "I've never had nothing crazy (directed towards me). Of course people always say ignorant things but, for me, no. I've never really had issues with fans or anybody in my time in the league."
"Nobody is going to say crazy things to who they cheer for."
"My experience in Utah was great. I never had any issues. Obviously I didn't play for the Jazz, but a lot of Jazz fans are University of Utah fans. It's pretty much the same (fans). But I definitely see how it could be different just because you're playing for the opposing team"
Kyle Kuzma played college ball at the University of Utah in Salt Lake City. He offered his perspective on the Russell Westbrook incident with the Jazz fan in a brief chat with ESPN today. (thread)
The Lakers say that Kyle Kuzma is available to play against Chicago tonight.
A pointed but fair look at the state of the Lakers.
Lakers lose 120-107 to BOS, drop their 5th straight game to fall to 30-36. LeBron 30p 12a 10r in 28 mins; Wagner 22p 6r; J. Williams 18p 10r. Celtics led by Kyrie 30p 7r 5a
The Lakers’ Air Band Cam getting fans to imitate Lance Stephenson’s air guitar featured Micheal Jackson’s “Beat It” as the musician accompaniment most of the season. Since “Leaving Neverland” aired, they’ve switched to Chuck Berry’s “Johnny B. Goode” and Nirvana
Lakers trail Boston 25-24 after 1Q. Lebron 8p on 4-of-5; JaVale 4p 4r; Rondo 2p 4a 3r. Horford leads BOS with 8p 4r.
Lonzo Ball's rookie season ended after he played 52 games. His second season ends after he played 47. That's 99 out of a possible 164.
Luke Walton says Kyle Kuzma (ankle) will not play against the Celtics.
Luke Walton says it’s possible that Lonzo Ball misses the remainder of the season. Walton says Ball is not close to a return. He hasn’t done anything outside of dribbling drills and standstill shooting after injuring his ankle on Jan. 19. Ball will be re-evaluated tomorrow.
New show within the show on The Jump: Agree to Disagree with SVG
New story: LeBron James’ work load will be monitored for the remainder of the regular season
ICYMI: Catching up 1-on-1 with LeBron James last night on his relationship (or lack thereof) with MJ, whom he shares his achievements with and what was going through his mind when he hid his head in a towel following his historic hoop
New story: Rajon Rondo won't be fined for sitting removed from the bench late in Wednesday's Denver loss; he tells ESPN of the Lakers' close to the season - "We're going to play the right way and play with pride"
“I want to congratulate LeBron on achieving another great milestone during his amazing career,” Michael Jordan relayed in a statement issued to ESPN on Thursday after James passed him for 4th place on the all-time scoring list last night.
The Lakers are mounting a comeback on the West's No. 2 team, Denver, here on the backs of Alex Caruso, Moe Wagner and Johnathan Williams. LAL's cut a 23-point deficit down to just 2 with 10 minutes to go in the 4th Q.
New story: The Lakers can now count all four of the NBA's top 4 scorers of all time to have worn their uniform after LeBron passed MJ on Wednesday
No. 23 passes No. 23
LeBron in a pair of 16s tonight that bring to mind the Air Jordan III White Cements. He’s 13 points away from passing Jordan for 4th on the all-time scoring list.
Lance Stephenson (toe) is available to play tonight vs. Denver, per the Lakers.
New story: With the playoffs seemingly out of reach, will the Lakers shut LeBron James down? “That would take a lot of convincing ...” James told ESPN. “Unless I’m hurt, I’m not sitting games."
Josh Hart: “We’re probably the most criticized team in the NBA. ... If that doesn’t motivate you (to compete), nothing will”
The Lakers say that X-rays on Kyle Kuzma’s right ankle came back negative.
Luke Walton says Kyle Kuzma is going to receive X-rays on his right ankle.
The Lakers lose to the Clippers, 113-105, in a game they absolutely had to have and fall to 30-34, 6 games behind LAC for the 8th and final playoff spot with 18 games left. Tonight pretty much summed up the season for LAL: missed 3s, injuries and ultimately, disappointment.
Boos raining down here at Staples Center as LeBron James turns the ball over and Lou Williams scores a layup to put the Clippers up 12 with 10:17 remaining. Season pretty much on the line here.
New video: My SportsCenter essay on the state of the Lakers with less than a quarter of the season left in LeBron’s inaugural L.A. campaign. It ain’t pretty.
Brandon Ingram is out tonight with a sore right shoulder, per the Lakers.
Luke Walton says Brandon Ingram is questionable for tonight with discomfort in his shoulder.
The Lakers say that Lance Stephenson (sprained toe) is out and Tyson Chandler (neck stiffness) is questionable tonight vs LAC
New story: Sorting through the wreckage after the Lakers’ season plummeted to a new low
The Lakers certainly made their mistakes tonight, but the locker room was livid that this call went against them at a crucial juncture.
The Lakers fall to 30-33, losing to the NBA's worst team, the Phoenix Suns, 118-109 in a game where PHX controlled the action all night. LAL shoots 32 pct from 3 and 65 pct from the foul line in a game Luke Walton said "we have to win" pregame.
The Lakers are employing the roll-the-ball inbounds strategy to save clock on their comeback with 10 minutes left in the fourth quarter. It's that bad right now.
The Lakers are 12 minutes away from losing to a Suns team that came into tonight 39 games under .500. LAL trails PHX 95-78 heading into the 4th Q.
The Phoenix Suns are playing Garth Brooks' "I got friends in low places" during the timeout, which I think is a really nice show of solidarity to their opponent, the Los Angeles Lakers.
The Lakers trail the 12-51 Suns by a score of 33-26 after 1Q. LeBron 7p 5a. Ayton leads PHX with 9p 3r. Suns are shooting 13-for-19 (68.4 pct).
New story: A collapse down the stretch left the Lakers reeling from blowing a double-digit second half lead for the 7th time this season
Lakers pushed the Bucks but a game-ending 15-2 run by MIL hands LAL the 131-120 loss, drops Lakers to 30-32. Ingram 31p 8r; LeBron 31p 10a 7r; Rondo 20p (4-of-12 from 3) 9a 8r. MIL was led by Eric Bledsoe who signed a $70 million extension in the afternoon then had 31p 9r 5a
Back-to-back Laker home games with a halfcourt shot hit. Wednesday it was worth $100k, tonight $25k because the pot reset after Wednesday. The $75k discrepancy didn’t keep dude from breaking out the Lance air guitar though.
Yes, the Lakers should have absolutely re-signed Brook Lopez last summer instead of going for Michael Beasley. But then we all wouldn't have gotten the chance to see Brandon Ingram dunk all over Lopez tonight. My word.
Lakers are 4-for-13 to start the game. Seven of those shots have been 3s by Rajon Rondo. He's made one of them. The Bucks are daring him to shoot and he's obliging.
One of the best guys around.
More entertaining than this year’s slam dunk contest.
The Lakers have upgraded Lance Stephenson from out to questionable for tonight with his sprained second toe on his left foot.
Did @BarackObama crossover @CP3 in a pickup game? I did not hear a denial @jimmyfallon via @YouTube
This is going to be incredible!
Long time coming, Congratulations Kim!
Dr. George Rutherford, a professor of epidemiology at UCSF who has reviewed the Warriors plans said this, “I don't think anybody else could do anything more than they've done. This is as close to making it as close to perfect a plan as I've seen for anything reopening."
Lacob believes that by spring the volume of production these types of tests will sufficiently scaled up to meet the type of demand the team would need to pull off this plan 2-3 times a week. Fans would get tested at drive up centers around the Bay Area, or on site.
The Warriors plan hinges on the use of rapid PCR tests, done by shallow nasal swab, which can return results in 15 minutes. Currently only 3 companies have earned FDA approval to make them. And they ain’t cheap—approximately $150-200 a test. Fans would also have to wear masks.
Lacob says, “I not only want to get this done and show the world how we can do it now, I'm willing to spend the money to do it. This is a serious, serious problem. It cannot go on for multiple years ... because if this were to go on for several years, the NBA is no more.”
For eight months Warriors owner Joe Lacob has worked on a secret project, “Operation Dub Nation:” safely return fans amidst the pandemic. The team is prepared to spend $30 million to test 10,000 on game days with a rapid test that’s 99 percent accurate.
This is an amazing story
You are a legend, Claire. I was privileged to work with you and hope we’ll see each other at a ballpark soon.
Also, the Georgia Senate race in which @WNBA players publicly endorsed @ReverendWarnock over @AtlantaDream owner, Senator Kelly Loeffler and 20 other candidates, is headed to a runoff that could determine control of the Senate.
The @ATLHawks told me 40,000 people voted at State Farm Arena. When you look at the slim margins in Georgia &amp; other battleground states, easy to see how much voting at NBA arenas, spurred by LeBron’s @morethanavote mattered
I have turned off the TV, but this all nighter in Wisconsin is too riveting to turn off! #ElectionNight thanks to the @journalsentinel for covering so deeply!
Last week @malika_andrews and I wrote about early voting centers at sports arenas. In Atlanta, for example, the Hawks are expecting 50-60k people to cast their ballots at State Farm Arena
Athletes calling for change and creating change are different, and this moment -- with widespread social unrest, economic insecurity caused by the pandemic &amp; a racially charged election-- created an entirely new challenge. Story w/ @Malika_andrews
On Tuesday, a grand jury in Cleveland indicted Burkman and Wohl on eight counts of telecommunications fraud and seven counts of bribery in connection with 8,000 calls placed to residents in Cleveland and East Cleveland.
Michigan's attorney general then launched a multistate investigation, which led to felony charges being filed against two Republican operatives, Jack Burkman and Jacob Wohl, on election law and conspiracy crimes that could bring up to 24 years in prison if they are convicted.
“People knew it was false. They knew they were being targeted. And we were able to quickly get the word out," Benson said. "Because we've got the backing of our most influential athletes backing us up and telling people what to do if they got a phone call."
Soon, Benson's office was flooded with calls and emails from people who had been targeted by the false robocall. Ultimately she ascertained that 85,000 calls had gone out around the country.
LeBron James then retweeted Benson and a @morethanavote post, which stated: "They'll use every trick in the book to try to stop us from voting but we won't fall for the okey-doke. If you're in Detroit, fight back and report mess like this to elections@michigan.gov."
Michigan Sec of State Jocelyn Benson tweeted the robocall "was targeting Detroit voters using racially charged stereotypes and false information to deter voting by mail" and called it "an unconscionable, indefensible, blatant attempt to lie to citizens about their right to vote.”
"Don't be finessed into giving your private information to the man," the call stated. “Stay safe and beware of vote by mail."
In May people began receiving a robocall from a woman who suggested police will use information from mail-in voting to track down voters, credit card companies will use their personal info to collect outstanding debts and the CDC will use it to administer mandatory vaccines.
What the work behind political change looks like for LeBron James and the star athletes from @morethanavote
Rivers and Morey worked together in Boston &amp; have been friends ever since.
This is fantastic, too
This is fantastic
Wow. @RyanQualtrics is 40!
Here are the totals, by sport: MLB: $15,181,761 Rep  $5,184,604 Dem; NBA: $8,372,300 Rep  $2,641,487 Dem ; NHL: $7,087,116 Rep  $1,726,733 Dem; NFL: $5,032,470 Rep  $873,500 Dem; WNBA: $1,338,459 Rep  $1,634,153 Dem
American professional sports owners contributed nearly $47 million in federal elections since 2015, according to research by ESPN in partnership with FiveThirtyEight, including $10 million to Republican causes and $1.9 million to Democratic causes so far in the 2020 election.
Which political candidates and causes do sports owners donate to? Fascinating research here.
Something tells me they will have an extra celebration for JT when the coast is clear.
Kirk Gibson is narrating the @Dodgers win essay on @SportsCenter right now. Chills!
This story with Justin Turner underscores just how amazing it is the NBA and MLB both were able to finish their season amidst the pandemic. But more importantly, it’s a reminder how dangerous and contagious this virus is.
Now that’s a hell of a way to celebrate. Nasal swabs for everyone!
Do everything Vin tells you always
Only thing better would’ve been to hear Vin on the call
I still can’t get over how good Cody Bellinger is defensively as a centerfielder and a first baseman. Those are two very different skill sets.
Sometimes the best moves are the ones you don’t make #WhattheSnell
Why take Snell out?
Chris Taylor flubbed the transfer on that last play. But he recovered quickly and made a good throw to his cutoff man. Dodgers should have gotten an easy out at the plate, save for Will Smith missing the swipe tag. Both plays happened because Dodgers got ahead of themselves
I don’t really know what just happened there.
Mask up!
Three Little League coaches didn’t want @mookiebetts on their team so his mom took all the other rejected kids, formed a team and coached them herself. Now that’s a mom! Great story here from @jorgecastillo
Skip past the Machado jersey... there’s a @TheVinScully gem waiting for you
Fantastic defensive play by Albies and D’Arnaud there. In hoops we’d say that high bounce off the pitchers mound was right in his pocket
I learn so much about pitching when I listen to John Smoltz. His set up of the guts it took Anderson to throw that full count change up to Taylor was so good.
Legend
Hell of a run!
That said. Tampa was the best team in the AL all year. They absolutely deserve this World Series berth. Fun team to watch, too.
The Astros were so close. It’s like they we’re missing that one extra thing.
Today is a day that reminds me why baseball is wonderful. I watched and couldn’t stand to watch both games. So much drama at every turn, just from the games. No fluff. And we do it all again tomorrow with elimination games in each league!
Still my favorite follow
Winner
Is that a fist pump from the Fresh Prince?
I can’t watch anymore of this. Call me if the Dodgers start showing any signs of life.
This is really good. Think different.
I know we’re all going to fixate on Kershaw failing to ace this, but the Dodgers had 3 hits all night. 3 HITS! That’s not winning a playoff game against a team as good as the Braves on any night.
Not even a question: @kenleyjansen74
I can’t tell you how much I learned just by listening to him on Sunday Night Baseball games over the years.
Hahahaha @ACFresh21
I know sports are just a past time. That there are far more serious things going on in the world. But in this time of extreme social isolation, the things that bring us together are more important than ever.
To my colleagues who went wire to wire in the Bubble, or even just half the time, I salute you. I can only imagine how difficult that was.
A couple final thoughts. Every time I’ve done an interview with a player or coach or executive in the NBA Bubble, I try to thank them for sacrificing so much time away from home to complete this season amidst these unprecedented circumstances.
On James, for whom he has been critical in the past, Phil said: “It looks like LeBron's taken a little bit of the Michael Jordan-Kobe Bryant, 'We'll show them who we really are by our strength and our temperament.’”
Caught up with Phil Jackson for this one. He rarely gives interviews, but made an exception to congratulate @JeanieBuss @KingJames AD Frank Vogel and Rob Pelinka on winning the Lakers first title in a decade.
This is really advanced championship winning advice right here.
I’m pretty sure I heard @JeanieBuss tell Lakers fans to wait until it was safe to celebrate. Listen to her, people.
If the championship in Cleveland made good on LeBron James' promise to his hometown, this championship made good on the promise of his basketball journey.
Buss wore a burgundy blazer &amp; a crisp white shirt, but the collar was open enough to see a gold chain around her neck, with the signature of her late father, Dr. Jerry Buss. Then she did what her father taught her: Cede the spotlight to the players by letting them grab it first.
“That is what families do for each other," Buss said. "Lift each other up when they feel like they can't go on."
“We've all been challenged so much in 2020," Lakers Governor Jeanie Buss told ESPN. "It really takes your breath away." And so it is fitting that the NBA champions of 2020 are the team that held together the tightest.
Moments after winning the NBA championship, LeBron James said athletes must continue to keep pushing against social injustice and voter suppression. Here's the new message from @morethanavote, delivered by @SkyDigg4 'Season over, work is not'
Where does @JimmyButler get that extra edge from? You have to look at the road he's travelled to get here.
Oh my!
Danny Green missed his Steve Kerr/Paxson moment 
It should be noted Executive of the Year is voted on by executives from all 30 teams, not the media. Like the other NBA awards it was conducted before the season restarted in Orlando.
Here’s the full voting for NBA Executive of the Year, which was won LA Clippers Lawrence Frank. OKCs Sam Presti finished second. Miami’s Pat Riley finished third. Lakers’ Rob Pelinka finished 7th &amp; got one first place vote
She’s almost got a little Kirk Gibson in 88 fist pump!
If you would have told me 10 years ago I’d have the honor of giving one of my idols, Jackie Mac, a birthday present live in @AroundtheHorn I wouldn’t have believed you.
But Davis continues to make good on Bryant's faith in him throughout these playoffs. After he scored 32 points on 15-of-20 shooting and grabbed 14 rebounds in the Lakers' 124-114 Game 2 win over the Miami Heat on Friday, the Lakers are just two wins away from their 17th NBA title
It took a long time for Davis to decide he needed that challenge. Then it took a series of trade negotiations with the New Orleans Pelicans for the Lakers to finally fulfill his wish in the last offseason.
Bryant was always bracingly clear on recruiting. The player worthy of taking the torch from him and leading the Lakers would need no sales pitch. He'd want that challenge. If Bryant had to convince him in a free-agent meeting, the player wasn't right for the job.
There was never an ulterior motive to Bryant's mentorship, Davis' father said, never a recruiting pitch to join the Lakers. Bryant simply recognized a young player yearning to be great and wanted to nurture that. He did that with several players in the latter part of his career.
When Anthony Davis went to the 2012 Olympics, Kobe Bryant told his father, “'Mr. Davis, I got your boy with me. I'm taking the young fella under my wing. He's going everywhere I go.' And that's what he did. Wherever Kobe went, Anthony went.'”
This is TWO! Happy birthday Daniel! One day we’ll explain why we are wearing masks in these photos. For now I’m just glad you think it’s a different form of peek-a-boo!
The beautiful mind of @andre Iguodala is like a long-exposure photograph. He sees every bit of light coming into the camera. Most people can't hold that much in their head, then act decisively at precisely the right moment. Iguodala is a genius at it.
You should’ve seen the look Kershaw just gave Roberts, for even thinking about taking him out.
Gentry was previously an associate head coach on Rivers bench in LA, before he went to GS and then NOLA
Embiid and Doc spoke today before Rivers was hired. They’ve known each other since a Basketball without Borders trip to Senegal a few years ago.
Ouch
He was not happy with the way Crowder grabbed &amp; almost hurt his shoulder on that loose ball
They let Celtics into the Lakers crowd?
Yes!
Over the course of about 10 days Ballmer and Rivers had multiple lengthy phone conversations about the future, sources said. And ultimately, Rivers didn't feel comfortable continuing as coach without Ballmer's full support.
Employees were urged to present new ideas &amp; evidence to support them. So when Ballmer and Rivers began discussing what had gone wrong, sources said that instinct is what led Ballmer to question whether a new way of looking at the team, or a new voice, is what the Clippers needed.
But those close to Ballmer knew it was only a matter of time before he put his stamp on the franchise. He made his fortune as a tech entrepreneur by constantly looking to innovate. And once he'd learned the ropes as an NBA owner, he brought that culture to the Clippers.
When he bought the team in 2014, Ballmer made a point of saying he would take his time to learn and study the organization before making any big moves. His most memorable change the first few seasons probably was creating a mascot for the team, Chuck the Condor.
His voice had become one of the most powerful in all of sports. And after three other Black head coaches had been fired this year, it was hard to conceive that Rivers would be the fourth. Behind the scenes, though, no one knew where Ballmer would land.
Doc Rivers, the man who led the franchise and the league through the scandal over Donald Sterling's racist remarks. Doc Rivers, the Black coach whom Chris Paul had called to address the league's players on Aug. 26, when the NBA paused to grapple with social justice issues.
Even when he publicly took responsibility for the Clippers' failure, few within the organization or around the league suspected Rivers would take the fall. This was Doc Rivers, the coach who had brought a credibility the franchise had never had before with his arrival in 2013.
It was lost on no one that the Clippers' official release said Steve Ballmer and coach Doc Rivers had reached a mutual decision that Rivers would step down. This was between them. Story with @NotoriousOHM on why their long arranged marriage ended.
My copy just arrived! Digging in soon as the Finals end!
I am only listed first here because we taped first. @OsheaJacksonJr is the headliner 
Yes! @DwyaneWade
“Finish your breakfast” 
If 2020 has taught us or reminded us of anything, it is that nothing is promised. Not even a basketball season.
Everyone: It is not witty to tweet that Denver has em right where they want em now.
Anthony Davis hasn’t had great rebounding games the last two nights but those last two offensive boards should count for 10 in the stat sheet.
That’s something Bean would do
I wish I was a little bit taller... I wish I was a baller... but I do get to participate in #HoopersVote day! So there  Go register! Go vote! @RockTheVote
In softball we had a saying: If you hesitate go back. He should’ve been taking that in rhythm. Not after thinking about it.
It’s the altitude, I’m telling u.
I know there’s no home court advantage in the Bubble, but it really feels like a Denver home game. They’re getting so many contributions from role players, while many of the Lakers role players have been bad.
Great points here, Rachel.
This man would know
Over Jokic!!! What a shot
Congratulations to @jasonmhehir @MikeTollin @esteep Curtis Polk Connor Schell, Andy Thompson, Gregg Winik, @Libbygeist and the whole @30for30 crew!
Duncan Robinson doing a live interview with @Rachel__Nichols while planking is something I have not seen before.
You can debate my vote or all of our votes all you want. Debate is good. But today I’ve seen on social media are personal attacks on the right of some of my colleagues, like @MariaTaylor or @TaylorRooks who know the league better than anyone.
Taking a team that had missed the playoffs six years in a row to the No 1 seed. Stabilizing a franchise in disarray after Magic stepped down. Playing point guard at age 35, leading league in assists, plus wins over the Bucks and Clippers as a closing argument
What I really meant is I tend to look at the totality of a player’s season in voting for MVP. Not just stats, although statistics can be a great measure. This year for me, the totality of LeBron’s season earned my vote.
I learned a few weeks ago why @TonyReali docks us points on @AroundtheHorn for using the word narrative talking about voting. It’s an oversimplification that writers tend to use as a crutch when they explain things.
Some voters prefer statistical based arguments. Some vote for who they think the best player is. Sometimes it’s best player on best team. Some are swayed by leadership. Each year, each vote is different. But if you have a broad cross section that should even out.
A word about awards voting. The NBA goes to great lengths to get a broad cross section of voters who all have different criteria for voting. That is intentional. You want a broad cross section of broadcasters, beat writers, columnists, radio play by play guys, former players.
“It was about Dwight proving to himself he was ready for this role," said Howard's agent, Charles Briscoe. "He'd lost pretty much everything. He felt like if he wanted to get anything back, he needed to start from the bottom and work his way back."
To prove it, he came up with the idea of a non-guaranteed contract that would give the Lakers the ability to cut bait at any time, thereby holding him accountable for his play and actions.
In meeting after meeting with Lakers general manager Rob Pelinka, coaches Frank Vogel and Jason Kidd and teammates LeBron James, Anthony Davis and Rajon Rondo, Howard assured them he would do whatever the team needed this season.
Last series @DwightHoward was a socially distant cheerleader. In the Lakers Game 1 win over the Nuggets, he was everything he told the Lakers he’d be last summer.
Those offensive fouls correspond with Dwight Howard checking into the game and being extra physical with Jokic.
And then he delivered the message: “We understand that things happen. We're not pointing the finger at anybody, and we're going to stay down with you," James' agent Rich Paul, who attended the dinner, recalled. “We're committed to you and we'll come out of this on top.“
James told Buss he'd long been an admirer of her late father, Dr. Jerry Buss, and how he ran the NBA's glamour franchise. He was displaying an understanding and appreciation for Lakers history that both surprised and touched Buss, according to a close associate of hers.
Last March, when things were going very poorly for the Lakers. @KingJames and @JeanieBuss found time on an off night to have dinner in Beverly Hills. This was not something James had done with other team owners. But he had something important to say:
Really glad Malika shared this. #itgetsbetter
This is well put @WindhorstESPN
Definitely
The Lakers won that series, then the NBA Finals—in Orlando.
The last time the Nuggets played in the Conference Finals (2009) was also against the Lakers.
At some point we will all pivot from the excruciating collapse of the cursed Clippers and appreciate what the Nuggets have done here. Tremendous accomplishment. But for now I’m still stunned.
This is stunning. Almost worse than Houston in 2015 when they legitimately were dealing with tons of injuries.
I did not think Kawhi would let this happen. That’s way too much to put on him. But that’s how much respect he’s earned as a playoff performer after last year.
Excellent use of “agog”
That should be EACH of their lines, not combined.
Never, never, never count a team with nothing to lose out. Denver is reminding everyone of that now. Let’s see how this finishes 
In 2006, when the Lakers went up 3-1 on the Suns, we all started working on stories for the first ever Hallway Series with the Lakers and Clippers at Staples Center. Then the Suns came back, those stories were scrapped and we all learned a lesson.
We’re about to find out.
That Clippers team wasn’t nearly as good as this one, however. Expectations not nearly as high then. Still, there is a Game 7 to go.
Same thing happened a few years ago against Houston, in the first year after Donald Sterling was vanquished
What, you thought it would be easy for the Clippers to advance to their first-ever Conference Finals?
They may have come up short again, but as JVG noted during the broadcast, when were they ever better than the Warriors? The NBA needs more teams to go for it, not endless rebuilds
This year competing meant challenging the two LA teams and Houston went for it again, taking big swings with trades for Westbrook &amp; Covington and going pure small ball by trading away Capela.
Here’s what I wanna say about the Harden-D’Antoni-Morey era Rockets. They went for it. In an era where several teams seemed to want to wait out the Golden State dynasty. Houston constantly took big swings, trying to challenge them. We should respect that.
If the Lakers hold on here, it will be their first trip to the Conference Finals in A DECADE. Or, since 2010 when they beat the Celtics in the NBA Finals.
Ha! Front row, too!!
Zach wrote this before the Lakers-Rockets series and it’s gonna be even more relevant if Houston can’t get things going in Game 5.
That’s some high level praise @Raptors
Definitely a legit title defense.
For a team that’s made it here with great execution, tough to see the Raptors with missed box out and broken offensive set at the end of a Game 7
I need to know the story behind this one @S10Bird @MONSTATREZZ
This is a great breakdown of the Rockets woes last night.
In a cruel bit of irony, the Lakers are beating Mike D'Antoni and the Rockets at their own game.
AND 1 STRIP FOR 3 AGAIN LOB TO THEIS. I CANT FORM SENTENCES FULL.
One of the letters shared with the AJC included a threat if she doesn’t sell the Atlanta Dream, the WNBA franchise she is co-owner of.
Whooooooa
Get ready for more of this as teams try to reckon with the unknowns of next season.
The Houston Rockets are not exactly who we thought they were.
Wright Thompson could write about the phone book and I’d read it. He could read the phone book and I’d listen. So when he reports and reads a podcast on horse racing, you really should dive in.
Agreed. I’m not sure we even have a bubble w/out the leadership of players like @CP3 @andre @Klow7
That was a better ending than Game of Thrones
That was a worse ending than Game of Thrones.
Even the refs were laughing at this one
I asked his mom Elisabeth this, too. And she said she never worried how much time he devoted to hoops, because those attributes would pay off in whatever career he chose.
This was one of the first questions I asked him.
If anyone on Twitter messes with Vin I am blocking you forever
“That was the biggest transformation for me. It's a compass. And after that, I didn't give it a thought about the impostor syndrome."
"I had a big, six-week reflection on my purpose in this profession. And I really connected with this idea that my purpose was just to serve and help guys like Duncan achieve their dreams and to be able to help our organization develop teams and a culture that we believe in.”
Spoelstra didn't figure it out until the summer after James left the Heat in 2014. He went to Hawaii to rest and clear his head. It had been an incredible four years, but it had also been draining. Every part of him had been tested.
Spo told Robinson, “My first probably two or three years as a head coach, I really battled and struggled with that. I didn't feel like I was ready or necessarily that I belonged."
Spo believed he could space the floor for the Heat offense. But it wasn't going to work unless he could get him to stop questioning whether he deserved to be in the role. "You can't have that kind of clutter when you're out there to be a sniper. You have to have a clear mind."
Last fall, as he was wrapping his head around the idea of starting for the Heat, Duncan Robinson asked Erik Spoelstra if he’d ever heard of Imposter Syndrome? The coach smiled and nodded back at him. “Heard of it?” Spo asked. “I lived it.'"
Duncan Robinson wasn’t even a good high school player. Now he’s one of the best 3-point shooters in the league. Here’s how he went from Division III to the NBA, and how Heat coach Erik Spoelstra helped him believe he belonged.
That Marcus Smart behind the back play reminds me of Derek Jeter’s famous flip
We miss him too!
This was a really good column.
In other words, the Bucks strike and subsequent postponements in 5 major sports have had no effect yet on the Wisconsin state legislature.
Last week, the Bucks went on strike to put pressure on Wisconsin lawmakers to vote on police reform bills that have been on their desks for two months. This week, the legislature reconvened for a special session, but still did not vote on the bills.
If Jimmy’s gonna hit shots like that...
This thread is what I needed today
A life well lived. But man, not enough. RIP.
This is how protest turns to action. @Jack9Flaherty saw the Dodgers open their stadium to voting. He approached @morethanavote to make it happen in StL. Which of course started with @LloydPierceLP and @KingJames in Atlanta
Enjoyed this one very much. I think even @minakimes would approve
Mike Woodson back with the Knicks!
The WNBA has dedicated its season to Say Her Name, and yet there is one team owner, they’ve gone out of their way not to mention by name anymore. I’ll let @S10Bird @Layshiac @E_Williams_1 @itsreneem_ explain why.
My incredible colleagues @malika_andrews @ZachLowe_NBA @wojespn @MarcJSpears and I put this together late last night, about the day the NBA stopped. What comes next is anyone’s guess.
At one point during the Bucks call with Wisconsin state lawmakers, a video coordinator went to go get a whiteboard. They were literally taking notes, and formulating a plan as they went. And it was about to ripple through the entire. sports world.
That police reform legislation was introduced on June 20. It has not been voted on yet.
Here’s the Police Reform Bill the Bucks discussed today on their call with Lt Governor Mandela Barnes.
Barnes told them that the most important thing they could press for, is "for action at every level of government." Wisconsin Governor Tony Evers has called a special session of the State Legislature and urged lawmakers to vote on a legislative package that includes police reform
Wisconsin Lieutenant Governor Mandela Barnes said of his meeting with the Milwaukee Bucks. "They just wanted to know what they could do," Barnes said. "They wanted something tangible that they could do in the short and long term. They wanted the walk out to be Step 1."
Important to note. The NBA release says all three Game 5s will be rescheduled.
Bucks ownership weighing in
An emotional LeBron James talking about how terrifying being Black in America is after the shooting of Jacob Blake tonight. “We are terrified,” he said more than once. Terrified.
Kawhi showing so much faith in Morris Sr there. Those are the kind of unselfish plays that winning teams make.
I saw LeBron make that spin move last night. Wow, Luka
That was a pretty darn good play with 0.2 left. Luka was like a QB, lofting a pass to a receiver into the back corner of the end zone, where only he could catch it (on the far side of the rim)
I could go for many more of these Doncic-Kawhi battles over the years.
LeBron James has made his arrival to the 2020 postseason
Rajon Rondo was a late scratch with back spasms according to @CassidyHubbarth
So Charles Barkley tells a story about having to get Dr J a newspaper first thing in the morning when he got hazed. @SHAQ laughs. Someone once wanted him to get their bags as a rookie. “I don’t do that. I’m the franchise player.” 
Noooooo
More like daring him to keep settling for midrange shots.
The last time there was this much debate over the top of the draft was probably 2013. And man, that draft class is interesting seven years later.
The biggest note there is that the NBAs No.1 goal is to have fans in arenas next year. Just stating that is a big deal. Also: pushing back the season from December 1, starts taking the Olympics off the table.
Adam Silver tells @Rachel__Nichols that a Dec 1 start to next season is feeling “a little bit early to me.” Because “our No. 1 goal is to get fans back into our arenas.” If it’s pushed back, and it increases the likelihood of fans in arenas, “that’s what we’d be targeting.”
The mystery of LaMelo Ball. So good. By @TimKeownESPN
You thought the Lakers 5-32 from 3 was bad tonight? Their transition offense might have been worse. According to @ESPNStatsInfo and @SecondSpectrum LA was just 7-26 in transition. The 19 misses are the most since SS started tracking that data in 2013-14
Wow, Chuck.
The Lakers were the worst 3-point shooting team in the bubble. Not all that shocking they’d go 5-32 from 3 tonight. Maybe time to do something else?
Dame knows. “Caris is cold”
What a game
up to you, Bill. Thank you for writing this and reminding everyone of how serious this can be.
Time to re-rank after that Luka assist.
So many fascinating possibilities here.
This is why everyone loves @sportsiren ! 
And his chin was never the same.
Senator @KLoeffler issued this response: “This is just more proof that the out of control cancel culture wants to shut out anyone who disagrees with them. It’s clear that the league is more concerned with playing politics than basketball, and I stand by what I wrote in June.”
“I'm not some political strategist, but what I do know is that voting is important,” Bird said. “So, what a great way for us to get the word out about this man, and hopefully put him in Senate. And, if he's in Senate, you know who's not. And I'll just leave it at that."
Seattle’s @S10Bird came up with the idea. She told ESPN that participation was voluntary for all players but she expected a lot of players will do so today and tomorrow.
Last month Loeffler wrote a letter to WNBA commissioner Cathy Engelbert objecting to the league's promotion of Black Lives Matter -- which is painted on the courts where the league is holding its return -- and instead advocating for teams to add American flags to jerseys.
Elizabeth Williams, a forward on the Dream, told ESPN "for effective change to happen, there has to be policy changes. And so if we're going to sit here and talk about wanting justice reform, part of that is making sure that we have officials in office that understand that."
WNBA players are T-shirts to games this week to support Rev. Raphael Warnock, who is challenging Atlanta Dream co-owner Kelly Loeffler (R-Ga.) for her Senate seat.
Then hits a clutch 3!
Yep. Lakers shot a season-low 35.4 percent from the field.
If the Raptors hold on here, it would be their 11th straight win over the Lakers. LAL’s last win vs Toronto was in 2014.
This game is why it would shock no one if the Raptors came out of the Eastern Conference again.
This is how @YasielPuig introduced himself to Dodger fans, too
“He's become like the team-spirit animal. ...Nurk plays with his emotions on his sleeve. I use the tennis analogy: Dame and CJ are Bjorn Borg. They're quiet assassins. Nurk is more Jimmy Connors or John McEnroe." —Portland President of Basketball Operations Neil Olshey.
I never want to see the play where @bosnianbeast27 broke his leg again. He says he’s watched it 1000 times, trying to understand why it happened. But also, to appreciate how far he’s come.
Are the fans in the virtual seats leaving early?
Now that’s some investigative reporting @JaredSGreenberg “The league stocked the lake with fish so the players would be sure to catch some!”
This fourth meeting between the teams is the game that was postponed (January 28) following Kobe Bryant’s death. Originally it was rescheduled for April 9.
This is not good.
Right up there with Scottie Pippen’s “The Mailman doesn’t deliver on Sunday’s” in the annals of tremendous smack talk
Enjoy baseball while you can...
Sources: Clippers' Lou Williams investigated by NBA about actions while on leave. Story with @BobbyMarks42 and @NotoriousOHM
This is from April of this year on @ROSGO21 show “WYD?”
Lou Williams tweeted a photo Friday of a man named, Paul G. Willams, with the caption "Long Live Pops,." Sources said Williams told NBA investigators that he attended a viewing for Williams which ended around 6 p.m. on Thursday, then went to Magic City to pick up dinner.
In the case of the Lakers Alex Caruso, who was weighing whether to attend his sister's 100-person wedding in Texas, sources said the re-quarantining process would likely have been 10 or even 14 days due to the high-risk nature of the event.
However, as @ZachLowe_NBA recently noted, that re-quarantining time could be extended up to 10 days if the league's outside infectious disease specialists recommends it.
As per NBA protocol, Williams was tested for coronavirus each day that he was away from campus, a source told ESPN. Players are subject to a minimum four day quarantine when they leave campus on an excused absence.
Sources told ESPN that Williams has been interviewed by NBA security about his whereabouts while he was away from campus, and told them he did go to the Magic City gentleman’s club for a short time on Thursday night
Williams was photographed at an Atlanta gentleman’s club on Thursday night by the rapper Jack Harlow, who quickly deleted the post from his Instagram story. Harlow tweeted on Friday, “That was an old pic of me and Lou. I was just reminiscing cuz I miss him.”
Reporting with @BobbyMarks42: The NBA is investigating what Los Angeles Clippers guard Lou Williams did while on an excused absence from the Orlando campus, so it can assess the length of his re-quarantining process, multiple sources told ESPN on Saturday.
I’m binging it now too. Can’t get over how manufactured the legend of Bela is.
Best of luck to an awesome guy, boss, editor &amp; leader. I’m forever thankful you and @ericneel called and asked me to interview all those years ago.
Just listened to the Episode about the 96 Olympics and am stunned to learn: The US would have won on @Dmoceanu vaults, but the tape delayed broadcast never even noted it. Listen to this entire series from @alyroe @Bonnie_D_Ford and @30for30
This is delightful. I do wish @MeyersLeonard would have been able to bring his dog though.
Glad to hear you’re OK, Taylor. This highlights the potential issue with false positives that we’ve seen in other sports (like boxing). But also shows how the NBA has planned for such issues and seems like a relatively quick resolution.
Sorry guys, I accidentally gave this guy control of Twitter for a bit. It’s fixed now, right?
I’ve listened to the first 3 episodes of the new season of @30for30 podcasts season and it’s engrossing. Incredible job by @alyroe @Bonnie_D_Ford reporting on the Karolyi empire
How about some slides, Ben?
A lot to unpack here, all of it troubling.
Stanford has funded 36 sports—which is a lot—whose athletes make up 12 percent of the student population. It’s hard to sustain those levels in the best of times. And we’re obviously in very tough times.
This is very sad news for all the student athletes and coaches involved.
This is going to be powerful @alyroe @Bonnie_D_Ford @julialhenderson @RealMamboNYC @mdhoddinott
Yep. Breonna’s lawyer told me @angel_35 was the one who originally reached out.
To clarify. Throughout the season, the WNBA will recognize and honor victims of police brutality and racial violence. The messaging on the special jerseys will be of Breonna Taylor #SayHerName
“Breonna’s mom (Tamika Palmer) was very honored the players wanted to do this in honor of Breonna and all the other women killed in police custody,” Baker said. “And also that proceeds from the sales of the jerseys will go to the Breonna Taylor Foundation”
Lonita Baker, an attorney for Breonna Taylor’s family, said she first heard from Las Vegas Aces star, Angel McCoughtrey, who played collegiately at the University if Louisville and Terri Jackson, the executive director of the WNBPA
“Black Lives Matter” will be featured prominently on the court. Also: a social justice council will be created to address inequality, implicit bias and systemic racism.
Among the ways the WNBA and its union will promote social justice when its season starts: Jerseys with names of women killed by police or in racial violence; warm up shirts that say “Black Lives Matter” on the front and “Say Her Name” on the front. Story with @ZachLowe_NBA
I thought fireworks shows were cancelled this year.
Sliwa is a Man of Mystery!
If you want to watch —and then not be able to look away— go to the @ESPNLosAngeles live stream on Twitter, Facebook, YouTube or Twitch.
Get yourself a teammate like @Candace_Parker Here’s her 30th birthday message to @LA_Sparks teammate @Nnemkadi30
I am nauseous just thinking about this &amp; I have to do the play by play.
In 2020, internet sleuths would’ve gotten a hold of those flight plans...
 @WindhorstESPN “Although James said on The Decision broadcast that only a handful of people knew his choice, pilots for his private plane had filed a flight plan to Miami, and rooms were booked for James alongside Bosh's group at the W”
Story with @ZachLowe_NBA on the NBA and NBPA’s plan to paint 'Black Lives Matter' on courts in Orlando
Reporting with @ZachLowe_NBA : The NBA is planning to paint Black Lives Matter on the court inside both sidelines in the arenas it will use at the Walt Disney World Resort when it resumes the 2019-20 season late next month, league sources told ESPN.
Bye, Karen.
In response to a question about concerns of rising COVID-19 rates in Florida, Adam Silver says the NBA is working with Disney in expanding testing of workers —or anyone else—who might come in contact with those in the bubble.
Adam Silver on a conference call just now, “We can’t sit on the sidelines indefinitely. We must adapt...We believe it will be safer on our campus than off it. But this is not business as usual.”
Virtual concerts and halftime performances ... and tap-to-cheer programs where fans can light up the seats in an arena from afar.
Five years in the making. But so apropos of the moment and movement.
Definitely checking this out.
After seeing @ArashMarkazi terrifying video from Vegas’ opening I’m so glad to hear this.
This
“I feel like we are the true champions in 2017. It should be us, we got cheated. But if we're going to play (The Astros) this year, I'm not going to throw at them. That's not cool. I don't wish anybody to do that, to throw at people. Just play them and try to be my best.”
On his heart condition &amp; COVID-19, Kenley Jansen said, “I don't want to live my life in fear of something. I'm going to be cautious, make sure I wash my hands, if I'm in a clubhouse, just keep my distance. But health-wise I think I'm fine, I feel great, thank God.”
“Honestly, I could throw in the game tomorrow. I never shut it down. If you put me in a competition tomorrow, for sure I’d be ready.” — Dodgers closer @kenleyjansen74
Early career mentors:@GaryParrishCBS @ThompsonScribe @BrianDohn247 @VinnyBonsignore @bykaren @reallisa @BillPlaschke @janiscarr @ElliottTeaford @jillpainter @BeverlyNBCLA @HowardBeck and Scott Wolf were always so awesome and generous with time and advice.
The bubble environment is going to be so hard on families and those with childcare responsibilities. I hope Trevor hears nothing but support for this decision.
The NBA protocols call for secondary testing to confirm positive Covid-19 results.
You can still go ahead and get dressed up all fancy for the @ESPYs tonight if you want. Or—you can watch them from home in your shorts like the rest if us. Either way, watch.
NBA Hall of Famer Wayne Embry wants players to use their voices for protests by continuing to play
The @TheNBPA says it will invest in causes that support police accountability, social activism, voter rights and economic development. It is also studying ways “Players competing in Orlando can effectively continue their advocacy on the national stage occasioned by the games.”
Obviously there should be varying degrees of discipline for different violations. Forgetting to wash hands or wear a mask isn’t as serious as leaving campus. But still a wide range here.
Another thing I’ve heard a lot recently, especially from players, is the need for uniform punishment for violating protocols in the NBA bubble. No special treatment. The document released by the NBA tonight outlines discipline ranging from a warning to suspension or removal.
There’s a delicate balance of allowing those inside the NBA bubble to self-regulate and monitor (which requires a lot of collective trust) so that harsher surveillance isn’t necessary. An anonymous tip line allows for self-regulation/but could hurt trust.
The NBA will set up an anonymous tip line to report violations of health &amp; safety protocols in the bubble. That’s important, but I can see the downside, too.
I love how Disneyfied this is: All persons in the NBA bubble must continue to wear a Disney MagicBand at all times! Those are gonna be collector’s items one day.
To minimize interactions within the NBA bubble, housekeeping staff at Disney will service rooms ONCE A WEEK wearing PPE. Disney will assign staff not only to a specific property, but to a specific floor or set of floors! We gonna find out who the messy/neat people are quick 
Very Interesting
Also, daily DJs? Lawn games? Movie screenings? This NBA bubble is like summer camp. With... masks &amp; social distancing of course.
Maybe it’s because I’ve been quarantined at home for three months but these NBA bubble marketing materials are activating my wanderlust. I mean, look at that salad! Disney’s Wild Africa trek? Fun!
Just saw an @ESPYS commercial highlighting this incredible speech from @DwyaneWade @carmeloanthony @KingJames and @CP3 in 2016. Their words ring even more true today, which is why this conversation must continue.
“Does playing again harm a movement that we absolutely embrace? Can our play highlight, encourage &amp; enhance this movement? That's what (players are) talking about. They're not fighting about it; they're talking about it." —NBPA’s Michele Roberts
Who knew Perk had handles like this?
This is some next level shade @ScottiePippen 
Whoa!
Saying Brees/Saban are “the reason you have your job” is the new “get back in the kitchen.” Not only trying to discount what was a thoughtful, strong opinion from Maria. But dismissing her right to even have one. I’m glad she does, and was so good at expressing it. #ImWithHer
Statement from @ATLHawks owner Tony Ressler.
Atlanta Hawks owner Tony Ressler lost his brother to COVID-19. He’s tried to share what he’s learned about the virus to the league.
Alvin Gentry: “At the end of the day, they're the league. They're going to make the choice. I think it's unfair if that's what they're doing. I understand the risk that I'm taking if I do get it. But hell, I want to be with my team and do my job. That's what they hired me for."
It’s a small world after all. And relationships matter. Here’s how the bonds between Adam Silver, Chris Paul, Michele Roberts and Bob Iger helped the NBA find its way back.
Pelicans coach Alvin Gentry on Adam Silver's remark on @NBAonTNT that "certain coaches" might not be on the bench when play resumes. "That doesn't make sense. How can I coach that way? " Gentry, who is 65, says he doesn't think older coaches "should be singled out."
Viva Mask Vegas!
I vote “Under the Dome!”
There will be an abundance of testing. But social distancing rules still apply.
Lot of questions about why 22 teams over 30 in the NBA bubble in Orlando? There’s a lot more people involved with 30 teams. Each person added, is more risk.
Nursery rhymes have to wait when our @StanfordSball group text gets humming  here’s who you should vote on ESPN’s Greatest of All-Time team!
“As athletes we’re judged in a merit based world... by our performance, not on our pigmentation.”
In internal memo, NBA's Adam Silver says racism, police brutality 'cannot be ignored'.
Regardless of how many teams are invited, one thing the players have continuously stressed is that they don’t want to go straight to the playoffs. They need time to shake the rust off both for competitive reasons and injury risk.
Why six games? Because historically teams haven’t been able to come back from more than five games with this amount of games remaining on the schedule.
Among the four plans discussed on the Board of Governors call today was one in which teams that are within six games of a playoff spot would be invited to compete in regular season games, then a play-in tourney for the final playoff spots, sources told ESPN.
The coolest thing is happening right now. The NCAA softball feed is showing @StanfordSball World Series debut in 2001 on its Facebook live feed. Best sports experience of my life!
I remember this game like it was yesterday! And yes, I definitely thought it was out when @jessmendoza hit that line drive.
What would life inside the NBA bubble look like? There’s growing support for a plan that would allow for limited family members to join players later in the playoffs. Story with @wojespn
Peak quarantine story here: George Hill playing Sudoku waiting for his wildebeests to wake up.
Sources: Dodgers to implement salary cuts to avoid furloughs or layoffs - via @ESPN App
ESPN’s @Alden_Gonzalez reported Tuesday that the Oakland A’s will furlough almost all of their amateur and professional scouts and about three-quarters of their player development employees. That’s on par with the furloughs announced by Los Angeles Angels of Anaheim on May 19.
The Associated Press previously reported that the Dodgers are projected to lose $232 million this year, making them the second-hardest hit team in the league behind the New York Yankees, who are projected to lose $312 million, due to the pandemic.
Employees were told the salary cuts which will range from 0-35 percent or more for top executives--are being made to save jobs and prevent furloughs, sources said. Only those making over $75,000 will be effected, with the highest paid employees absorbing the largest pay cuts.
The Los Angeles Dodgers informed their full-time employees in a Zoom call Tuesday afternoon that they will not impose furloughs or layoffs due to the coronavirus pandemic, but instead will begin a system of tiered salary cuts beginning on June 1st, sources told ESPN.
Damn. Terrible news. Chris has been a delight for all of us in LA for decades. RIP.
NBPA's Michele Roberts says players really want to play, need level of certainty
This from Woj yesterday is full of information on the issues that still need to be addressed as the NBA tries to return.
NBA in talks to resume play at Disney's ESPN Wide World of Sports Complex
Here’s the full quote from NBA spokesman Mike Bass on negotiations with Disney.
The NBA has entered into exploratory conversations with the Walt Disney Corporation about restarting the remainder of its season at Disney’s ESPN Wide World of Sports Complex in Orlando, Florida in late July, NBA spokesperson Mike Bass said Saturday.
How close are we to live sports? Where the world's biggest leagues stand right now
This is the essential MJ to me. Total self-belief. And... why he thinks he’d win 7. Who’s to doubt him after that last game?
We need @Andy to host a “Last Dance” Reunion show!
Fifty-niiiiiiiiiiine !!!???? @TonyReali #lifegoals
Five-word acceptance speech for @30for30 @TheWebbyAwards win! (With quite a bit of help from my son, Daniel )
Wright Thompson wrote, what I consider, one of the best profiles of all time when MJ turned 50. Today he totally reframes Michael Jordan, by looking at how his family’s story shaped his character.
What was Jerry Reinsdorf’s biggest takeaway from The Last Dance, “Can there be any doubt that Michael Jordan was the greatest player of all time? I mean, I don't want to hear anybody ever again ask about Michael versus LeBron.”
Later on, Phil Jackson tried to bury the hatchet with Jerry Krause. First through Reinsdorf and then at Tex Winter’s HOF induction. Krause wasn’t interested. Here’s a bit of why the wounds were so deep.
Reinsdorf said, “I know in Episode 10, Jordan says, 'They all would've come back for one year.' But there's not a chance in the world that Scottie Pippen would've come back on a one-year contract when he knew he could get a much bigger contract someplace else."
Did The Last Dance really have to be The Last Dance? Chicago Bulls owner Jerry Reinsdorf says, “The thing nobody wants to remember. During the lockout, Michael was screwing around with a cigar cutter, and cut his finger. He couldn't have played that year."
I need to know who those five guys who delivered Michael’s pizza were and what they did to it. Come on Reddit...
As we approach the final weekend of the Last Dance (btw, who wants to stay in 1998 with me?)... a look back at why footage from the Bulls final championship season sat in a vault for two decades, and what finally convinced MJ to give the green light.
Sorry to hear this. A bunch of us @JulieFoudy @sam_ponder @DeniseWhite_EAG @jaimemaggio @marionjones @ginaparadiso got to meet her on a project way back when. What a firecracker! Truly an icon in the industry
Re-reading @PhilJackson11 “Eleven Rings” before tomorrow night’s finale of “The Last Dance.” This gonna be good 
Don’t know what I love more. “The Way to make the Jazz sing the blues” title, or the “For Your Information “ label on the side. @PhilJackson11 really was one of a kind.
This is amazing
Fascinating look at how years of relationship building between Adam Silver and the NBA’s players is helping the league work towards a return.
After working with city, county, and state officials the Lakers are planning to re-open their practice facility tomorrow for voluntary, socially distanced workouts in accordance with NBA protocols, sources told ESPN.
Really enjoyed this. I need to know which Chicagoan sent the cake though
This is really well done
Love this line from @ZachLowe_NBA on @ScottiePippen “Pippen's on-ball impact wavered, but he mattered every second he was on the floor. He was like an electrical current humming in the background.”
The Miami Heat were able to open their practice facility today, according to sources. 12 players went in for voluntary, socially distanced workouts.
So @30for30 cleaned up in awards for #TheGracies. Along with Sterling Affairs, big ups to @julialhenderson Bonnie Ford and Caroline Waterlow! PS: Does this mean I get to meet @reitcatou from my favorite show Working Moms? I promise I’ll be cool.
Any writer who has been badly aggregated or had aggressive headlines slapped on their stories can relate.
What’s that you say about the Glove defending MJ in the Finals?
All week @otlonespn is examining what it might be like, if and when, sports return. Today I joined @ryansmithtv to discuss what life might be like for NBA players if the league comes back.
Very interesting stuff here from @JeffPassan on baseball’s return. Lot of hurdles to clear —local governments, testing, players union, but its big for baseball to at least put forth a plan. You can’t steer a boat if it’s not moving...
I get why the MLB All Star Game In LA could be cancelled. But wouldn’t it be cool if that was how the season kicked off?
Oh ...
Frank always gets me, man.
I’ll go with Ray.
Power outage at my house, but it’s always sunny in LA!
This is a big development. Testing—specifically rapid testing—is critical to any escalation of basketball activities. Until now, the league has held back until they were assured they weren’t using tests needed by others. If those assurances are forthcoming, that’s a big step
GM Bob Myers says Warriors will be 'good partners' if season resumes
NBPA Executive Director Michele Roberts on players who don’t feel comfortable returning until there’s a vaccine or treatment for Covid-19.
NBPA Executive Director Michele Roberts explains why the idea of a strict bubble has never been popular with players. “Are we going to arm guards around the hotel?That sounds like incarceration to me."
The Sacramento Kings say they intend to re-open for voluntary individual socially distanced workouts on Monday in accordance with this order, from local health officials, and NBA guidelines. First team in California to do so.
Voting that year took place at McDonald’s, right?
Reminder that this is all fluid as teams work with public health officials on safety protocols.
On the issue of re-opening NBA practice facilities, one GM said, “This is by no means ramping up towards something. It’s more about mental health than anything at this point.”
Friday is also the first day the NBA has permitted teams to re-open practice facilities for voluntary socially distanced workouts. Thus far only 4 teams -Portland, Cavs, Denver, Houston, are planning to reopen Fri. but several more —Heat, Hawks, Magic—are hoping to open next week
NBA Players Association Executive Director Michele Roberts and NBA commissioner Adam Silver will hold a call for all players on Friday May 8, sources told ESPN.
Vote and vote often 
Now this would be amazing
Live sports! I’m into this!
I need to pick my Korean Baseball League team. Games starting tonight at 10 on @espn with @karlravechespn on the call! Someone help me out!
What advice did MJ give Kobe? “Years from now nobody’s going to say you lost because (a teammate) had a bad attitude. They're going to say you weren't able to get it done. So, you have to figure it out. Come hell or high water, you've got to figure it out”
Kobe Bryant and Michael Jordan were protective of their friendship, knowing that if they revealed how close they were, the inevitable comparisons would begin. Only guys like Jerry West—who was friends with both—had a sense of how close they were.
When did Kobe and MJ get so close? “As early as I can remember, whenever the Lakers played the Bulls, Kobe would wait outside the tunnel for Michael to leave," said Tim Grover, who trained them both.
Yep. Definitely felt that one!
Man, this is so true and so scary to think about.
To bubble or not to bubble. Maybe that’s not the right question. Great stuff here from @TimBontemps and @WindhorstESPN
This is really beautiful
Great reporting here from @wojespn on the NBA's urgent decisions as it tries to finish this season.
Put this on your reel, @JeffPassan 
Wow. @JeffPassan with an epic @WuTangClan reference on @notthefakeSVP just now 
Just wait for next week. Episode 5 is my favorite of the entire series so far!
Lakers coach Frank Vogel called Phil Jackson the  of coaches. When he was in Indiana, he would always ask former assistant coach, Brian Shaw, “How'd you guys do it in L.A.? What would Phil do here?"
“There's this perception of him as the Zen Master. No. He's a basketball junkie. He's a diehard hooper. That's what I loved about him." —Chicago Bulls coach Jim Boylen on the three days he spent with Phil Jackson in Montana.
Phil Jackson hasn’t said much since his run with the Knicks ended. But behind the scenes, he’s been advising today’s NBA coaches. Here’s what he told Doc Rivers, Nick Nurse, Frank Vogel, Rick Carlisle, Brett Brown, Jim Boylen, Luke Walton &amp; Steve Kerr.
It might seem like Phil Jackson doesn’t have a lot of branches on his coaching tree. But there’s plenty of coaches in today’s NBA who have learned a great deal from him. Doc! Vogel! Carlisle! Nick Nurse! &amp; more. You just have to go to the mountain ...
Do the right thing Carrie!!!
This is good
Raiders gonna Raider
As we approach the end of April, good to remind folks of this Adam Silver quote from Friday.
Find somebody who keeps it as real with you as Ben Simmons’ high school coach does with him. Actually, so does his brother, his best friend, Joel Embiid and Brett Brown in this great feature from Jackie Mac.
SEABASSSSSSS!!!
Wondering what Michael Jordan was drinking in his Last Dance interviews? Apparently it was the @CincoroTequila brand he owns with @JeanieBuss And the Celtics &amp; Bucks owners. According to a note I just got, MJ prefers the extra aejo 
Love this article. So many good scenes and anecdotes ... like @BobbyMarks42 was Kobe’s draft host, when he visited the Nets? 
This is awesome #TheLastDance
ESPN is airing an encore of The Last Dance right now. I’ve already watched it twice and yet...
Can you Venmo me some gas money?
This is one of the best anecdotes!!
One of my favorite things about The Last Dance is when director @jasonmhehir hands Michael the monitor and shows him clips of other interviews. It’s a great device, that produces some of the best reactions from MJ. Just wait for what he says about ....  #nospoilers
Please also send me some stamps! #TheLastDance
MJ with a cocktail and cigar on the end table during interviews. #NBATwitter #TheLastDance
There were over 100 interviews conducted for The Last Dance. When you get the endorsement from MJ, everyone says yes.
Almost time! #TheLastDance #NBATwitter @LouMalnatis
“You couldn't capture this at 80 minutes. Even if you just focused on '97-'98, you’re not capturing the totality. You're not going to understand what Michael was about or what the Bulls were doing," —Curtis Polk, longtime Jordan business partner.
The  is not old: Michael Jordan’s daughter Jasmine told @jasonmhehir the director of the Last Dance, that when she was about to give birth, she asked her dad what he wanted to be called. Grandpa? Pops? He said, “Have him call me Michael”
Andy Thompson, NBAE Producer who shot Bulls 98, first met MJ in 91. Apparently MJ loved that Andy’s brother, Mychal Thompson, changed the spelling of his name. MJ was 10 &amp; tried writing his name that way. Mychal Jordan! Until his mom put the kibosh on it.
In 2006 Connor Schell was sent a DVD of Bulls 98 footage. He’s kept it in his office ever since, hoping to make it into a doc. In 2009, as he and @BillSimmons we’re launching @30for30 they tried again. Finally in 2016, Jordan signed on.
How did Adam Silver, then the head of NBA Entertainment, convince MJ to film the 97-98 season? He gave him the one thing that mattered—control. “Our agreement will be that neither one of us can use this footage without the other's permission," Silver said.
For two decades, footage from the Bulls “Last Dance” sat in a vault in Secaucus, NJ. Michael Jordan controlled the rights, and wasn’t ready to make a documentary. But on the day of the Cavs championship parade in 2016, he finally said yes.
I was one of the lucky few who got to preview “The Last Dance.” It is phenomenal. I hope you enjoy it as much as I did. One of the best things ESPN has done. Amazing work by director @jasonmhehir Set your DVRs Sunday, 9 pm ET on ESPN
On a conference call, NBA commissioner Adam Silver says the league is looking at data, not dates. The league is not even to a place where if A, B, C were to happen, there would be a path to return. Many “bubble like concepts” have been proposed but “we’ve only listened.”
Love this!!
New number, who this?
This just made me cry all over again.
This is fascinating
Just heartbreaking
Happy birthday to the original Ramona!
She had an emergency C-Section at 32 weeks. Then @allysonfelix walked away from Nike over its maternity leave policies, giving up a paycheck for 2 years to stand on principle. Now the Olympics are postponed &amp; tracks closed. But she’s still running
All the tracks are closed. But America’s most accomplished Olympic track star, @allysonfelix is still training with renewed purpose.
Really excited for this one. Four-time Olympian @allysonfelix will be on @SportsCenter tonight with @notthefakeSVP to talk about how the Olympic dream continues despite the postponement because of the pandemic.
I am into this!
I meant to tweet this the other day. I can't tell you how important @Granity was to @kobebryant ... He started working on these stories back when he was a player and was always telling me about it. It's everything he believed in, but written for kids.
“It's not as easy as simply writing the check," Embiid said of his $500k donation to help fund antibody research for medical workers in Philly. "It's a process to figure out the best way you feel comfortable helping."
Joel Embiid working with 76ers ownership to get antibody tests for health care workers - via @ESPN App
Philadelphia 76ers center Joel Embiid has partnered with Sixers owners Josh Harris and David Blitzer to establish a funding campaign for COVID-19 antibody testing for frontline healthcare workers through Penn Medicine, he told ESPN on Friday.
Love this story so much @ZachLowe_NBA
This is a wonderful, well-told story.
Been waiting for this one!
Can we get a rush order on this, too?
There’s been so many mergers and acquisitions in the cable industry, it’s hard to do the blow by blow on the 6-year battle over the Dodgers station. But in layman’s terms, AT&amp;T owns so much now, and is launching AT&amp;T TV, so they wanted to get the best programming on air.
There was a big push to get Dodger games on the air when Vin Scully was retiring. Didn’t happen. Then more pushes when the team was contending for the World Series. Didn’t happen. Now when there’s no games due to the global pandemic, it happens. Someone call Alanis Morrisette.
To refresh: The Dodgers own Sports Net LA. But Time Warner Cable (now Spectrum Sports) had the negotiating rights. Since 2014 the company hasn’t been able to reach deals with other cable providers so the majority of LA hasn’t been able to watch Dodgers games.
This ends one of the longest, most frustrating cable TV disputes. There’s obviously no baseball games being played for a bit, but Dodgers fans who have Direct TV and its subsidiaries will finally be able to watch their games
A bit of good news... and this is not an April Fools Day joke. A deal has been reached for Direct TV to carry the Dodgers station, SportsNet LA. It’s already broadcasting on Channel 690 this morning.
Opening Day would have been this week. Here’s former Dodgers organist Nancy Bea —A LEGEND in LA—playing “Take Me Out To The Ballgame.”
This is a fascinating look at the challenges of restarting sports
From a NYC doctor. These people are so brave. Follow the whole thread.
This is a very good idea.
KAT says his mother is “the strongest person I know” and “we’re going to rejoice when she beats this.” But she’s currently in a ventilator and medically induced coma, battling COVID-19.
This is heartbreaking.
Statement from Sixers owner after Embiid’s pledge to help workers affected by the proposed 20 percent pay cut
Embiid, who has been in self-isolation since 3/11, has been studying the best ways to help the doctors and nurses on the front lines, who are treating patients with COVID-19.
Philadelphia 76ers star @JoelEmbiid has decided to pledge $500K to COVID-19 medical relief—to help survival and protection efforts in the community. AND he’s committed to helping Sixers employees who will suffer financial hardship in light of the franchise’s salary reductions.
This is great @HarborFreight !
This!!
Did you notice the “Stay Strong Wuhan” messages at the All Star Game in Chicago last month? The NBA was trying to connect to millions of fans in lockdown in China. Now that the US is in a similar isolation, that gesture means so much more.
I’ve been following @ASlavitt reports for weeks in COVID-19 issues. He’s been amazing at analyzing this crisis and sounding alarm bells to anyone who would listen.
Lakers now plan to test a small group of coaches/staffers who had close contact with players, according to sources.
How did the NBA get to the front of the line for COVID-19 testing? They started lining up six weeks ago. Tag team story with @WindhorstESPN @ZachLowe_NBA @royceyoung @TimBontemps @BobbyMarks42 @wojespn
NBPA's Michele Roberts defends players, critical of government on virus testing
NBA spokesman Mike Bass on NBA teams receiving Coronavirus tests.
This is fantastic.
Nets played the Lakers Tuesday night before the season was cancelled and were set to play the Warriors in a fanless game on Thursday
This!
Broadcasting live from my office!
This whole thread is awesome!
Yes, @ESPNLosAngeles is still broadcasting and @LAIreland and I are on from 3-630 pm today. Both of us are doing this from home. But I’m happy to be on air, connecting to you all. Not much sports to talk, but I’ve never had a problem talking A LOT, right @VeniceMase ?
We just decided that grandma and grandpa (who are both over 65) are going to stay home and self isolate. All of us cried. But we will FaceTime all the time and send pictures every day. Probably 10 times a day. Stay home. Self isolate. #Pleaseprotectgrandparents
The CDC just recommended no gatherings of 50 people in the United States for the next 8 weeks. We can all do the math on what that means for sports leagues. But that’s the least of anyone’s concerns right now. Stay safe everyone.
The more I process this, the more I hope the NBAs decision to abruptly suspend its season goes down as a positive tipping point in our country’s efforts to confront this pandemic.
“I am humbled by the tireless efforts and care of people around the globe for those affected by COVID-19, especially my own communities of Utah and France, in addition to my appreciation for the state of Oklahoma and my care there, and of course, my Utah Jazz family,” Gobert said
This is a great idea!
College seniors whose careers just ended very abruptly take note!
Rudy Gobert on IG.
California has now limited gatherings of more than 250 people through the end of March. This includes baseball, hockey, concerts, etc.
NCAA recommends “against sporting events open to the public. We do believe sport events can take place with only essential personnel and limited family attendance”
NBA spokesman Mike Bass says:
Rajon Rondo on LeBron James, “He tried to take a charge, then he's down on the court getting the loose ball. When you got the oldest guy on the team doing that, everybody else is going to follow. The plays he makes are contagious."
LeBron James had a gym built for him on the Warner Bros lot this summer when he was filming Space Jam 2. Each morning he’d work out before filming— the first sign he had a lot to say still. This weekend was his loudest statement yet.
This !
LeBron/AD have scored 31 points at the half. Paul George/Kawhi have scored 31 points at the half. Lakers and Clippers each 2-14 from 3. Other than the Clippers bench out scoring Lakers bench 17-8, this has been a very evenly matched game so far.
It just occurred to me Dwight Howard was the Lakers center the last time LA made the playoffs, too.
This is such a compelling story
Love all these stories and photos of the female coaches in the NBA. @TheCharlotteSue @jboucek @NatalieNakase @CoachLindsayG @IrishCoachIvey @brittni__d @Finisher_11 @KarenUmlauf @Lindsey_Harding @KristiToliver @BeckyHammon
The Sixers have become, to quote GGG, “a big drama show” this year. Can they find the Process through the noise ?
This is like a scene from Mall Cop
The Leon Rose Knicks “era” starts off with a win. Appropriate use of quotes?
This would pave the way for a resolution to the expensive lawsuits between MSG and the Clippers
This really captures what a force Maura Mandt was in the sports world, and what it really took to be that.
Every time I talked to Maura she made an impression. Smart. Tough. Cared about the right things. Made big, visionary stuff happen. She’d talk to guys like Peyton, Aaron Rodgers, Kobe like a teammate. And they’d do it—because it was Maura asking. RIP
I feel like we did some good core work here 
New video tomorrow!
This is a @minakimes level reaction GIF. @TonyReali got me good!
I’m telling you....
Wow.
“As I got to know him, I wanted to be the best big brother I could be.” —Michael Jordan on Kobe
On today’s episode of ESPN Daily, @minakimes and I talk about the last month in LA, where everyone is still trying to wrap their heads around Kobe’s death.
This is harrowing
It took 24 hours for the artist, Artoon, to paint Kobe and 2 hours to paint Gigi. Around 3 or 4 in the morning he felt two gusts of wind. "I was like, 'Am I just tripping here?' I had goosebumps all over.”
Over 80 murals have been painted of Kobe around LA since his death. “I see him as a soldier of life: somebody that brought passion, to never give up, to inspire everyone, somebody that will do anything to make you a better person." —@MrBrainwash
When @OsheaJacksonJr heard the news, he sent Kobe a text that said, 'Please, please, please be there.' "I waited and waited, but it never said delivered. And I just broke. I broke right then and there."
Nearly a month has passed since Kobe died, and the finality of it is still sinking in. It's as unbelievable to read now as it was when the news broke on Jan. 26. The headline was like a cognitive break. Monday the world will try to find the right words.
I never need to see that replay of Fury licking Wilder’s blood off his neck again.
We gonna need to stop this fight pretty soon. Wilder looks really hurt.
Tyson Fury is gonna have so many diet cokes after he wins this
Good!
This !
Whoooooooooaaaaa
Yep, they fixed the All Star Game.
Kyle Lowry just tried to take what I have to assume would be the first charge in All Star Game history. 
That was the best defense I’ve ever seen in an All Star game from Giannis on LeBron just now.
Can we get @common to do the All Star introductions every year?
Jayson Tatum meme
Cue the Law &amp; Order music!
Dunk contest judge @Candace_Parker —who gave Aaron Gordon a 10—tells ESPN, “I ain’t throwing anyone under the bus .... buttttt check the score card.”
Dunk contest judge @Candace_Parker just posted this on IG. She confirmed @common account of the judges’ intending for it to be a tie (and go to judge’s choice) to ESPN
This !
If the dunk contest was tied after that last dunk, the judges could have gone to a judges choice. Essentially, each would hold up a card with who was the best dunker all night. That’s what @common says he thought was the best outcome because “They were both so good.”
Dunk contest judge @common says, “I really felt it was an even battle and we —as judges— felt the scores should be even and they should just have a judge off. We had the cards. Put your card up for who had the best dunks.”
. @common says he’d tell @Double0AG “Please come back. He really snapped. He really did an incredible job. He’s one of the greatest dunkers. His sister is mad. I need to go say something.”
Just spoke to dunk contest judge @common who tells @ESPN, “We thought it was going to be tied. We were like, This is a tie’ ...But somebody didn’t do it right. I don’t know who it is.” 
Tacko Fall says that Aaron Gordon dunk was not planned. “I was scared for my life”
My view of Tacko Fall at the Slam Dunk contest.
Kevin Garnett says, “I was never nervous playing basketball. ... I was super nervous doing TV.”
Pau Gasol tells @NBAonESPNRadio he’s hoping to play for Spain in the 2020 Olympics if he can rehab his injured foot in time. Next year in the NBA is a possibility, too.
I knew @stephenasmith was a big soap opera fan. But this is next level! You better be on your game @iamBenLyons !
WOW
From Vanessa Bryant’s IG.
Ummmm
Following up on Lakers-NYK talks. It wasn’t just Kyle Kuzma LA didn’t want to include in a deal for Marcus Morris. The Knicks also wanted Danny Green (to make the $ work) and future second round picks, per sources. Lakers decided that was too steep and walked away late.
Pretty epic showdown between the Clippers and Lakers for Marcus Morris. For the Knicks, “there’s no deal without Kuzma” and the Lakers —at this late hour— remain reluctant to part with him.
The checks will be addressed to the correct Brooks this time.
NBA trade deadline is fun for fans, business for teams. But very personal for players. Here’s @KarlTowns on his friend, @Holla_At_Rob33 being traded to Houston.
All five Lakers starters announced as “A 6-6 forward, from Lower Merion High School. In his 20th season. Kobeeeee Bryant.”
There is no moving on from a tragedy like this. There is only distance from it.
The Lakers couldn’t call anyone when they learned of the crash that killed Kobe and 8 others. There were still 3 hours to go on their flight home. All they had was each other. Here’s how everyone made it through the awful week that followed.
Public service announcement. The Lakers game won’t be shown on the screens outside Staples Center. So if you don’t have a ticket to the game, it’s encouraged to watch with family or friends so you don’t miss it. Of course, anyone is still welcome at the public memorial though
I haven’t laughed in a few days. But dammit, Mina got me with her ode to @kellyclarkson here . So good!
LeBron James and Kobe Bryant were starting to develop the close relationship they’ve always wanted.
A tuba player and drummer just showed up at the memorial here outside Staples Center !
I just need to follow the #girldad threads all day. 
Now this is something I can watch over and over.
The last time an NBA game was cancelled under such circumstances was in 2013 after the Boston Marathon bombings. Before that, you have to go back to the Kennedy assasination.
Kobe Bryant has been a part of the Lakers for 20 years. Most employees knew him well and are grieving. It was a lot to ask to come in for an event of this magnitude while things were so raw.
There have been discussions between the Lakers and the NBA since the helicopter crash that killed Kobe and 8 others about whether this game should be played. Ultimately an organization that spent the day with grief counselors just wasn’t up to putting on an NBA game.
Kobe Bryant didn't just have an iron will or unyielding confidence in himself. He believed he could bend the universe to his will. And dammit, he often did.
Heartbreaking scene here at the Mamba Sports Academy in Newbury Park where fans have come to remember Kobe Bryant
The Sheriff says a medical team evaluated the scene quickly to check for survivors. There were none. Firefighters were still putting out a quarter of an acre brush fire —made worse by magnesium—at the time.
Sheriff here says the manifest of helicopter crash that killed Kobe Bryant indicates 9 people were aboard.
Hundreds of people have shown up to the site where the helicopter carrying Kobe Bryant and 4 others crashed. The wreckage is still smoldering. Just an absolutely tragic, terrible scene.
Speaking to residents in Calabasas who heard the helicopter crash this morning that killed Kobe Bryant describing it as “a falling noise” and that you could tell “something was wrong”
See what I mean @VeniceMase @KamBrothers ! Soccer star! #15monthsold
Check out my super high tech elbow guard 
This is exceptional
Zion Williamson hit 24 3-pointers in 33 college games. He hit 4 in his NBA debut 
If Zion is gonna shoot like this....
Zion is happening
Baby Shark?
What if I told you... @julialhenderson @AdamNeuhaus @slp1313 @Libbygeist @loonus @jodyavirgan
When Kawhi Leonard and Paul George joined forces to play for the Clippers this summer, it was seen as a power move that would reshape the NBA for years to come. But there was a lot more to it for @Yg_Trece. Here’s what really brought him back home.
Paul George called to congratulate Kawhi Leonard on winning a championship and then “it took on a life of its own.” After countless text messages, phone calls and two meetings at Drake’s house , they were both home in LA. Here’s why that meant so much.
Paul George called to congratulate Kawhi Leonard on winning a championship and then “it took on a life of its own.” After countless text messages, phone calls and two meetings at Drake’s house , they were both home in LA. Here’s why that meant so much to George.
 The new WNBA deal includes “Better maternity benefits...including players receiving full salary while on maternity leave, an annual child care stipend of $5,000, and guarantee of two-bedroom apartments for players with children.” 
The sliding doors aspect to the Astro’s cheating is pretty damning, too.
Better choice than the photographer’s vest ...
That Hack-A-Giannis (61 percent on FTs this year) was interesting from the Warriors in the fourth quarter 
I’m not sure if this game says more about the Clippers or the Knicks. But New York has made this very interesting at the end
I’ve covered a few dynasties in the NBA. Most end in a whimper. Last year the Warriors all got hurt. The Spurs thoroughly beat the Heat in 2014. The 2011 Lakers got swept by the Mavs. I think it all just gets to be a lot...
And so it ends.
I’m not sure it ends well for him, either...
For some historical context here, Kuzma’s trainer, Clint Parks, previously worked with Kawhi for several years.
About to join in this broadcast  @CassidyHubbarth @NotoriousOHM Check out #HoopStreams on @espn
This is devastating. Ed was such a bright light in everything he did.  to his family.
#theresstillachance !
Important work here from @ChrisConnelly on @lizzo in advance of this week’s MNF game 
So many original, diverse voices here. Love this!
And now it’s really a football play, overturned after a long replay. Lakers win streak is on the line.
That was a football play: Rondo caught the rebound, both feet down, then spiked it off of Holiday as he fell out of bounds.
Thank you @sbjsbd ! I can’t say this enough, but @Libbygeist @AdamNeuhaus @loonus @julialhenderson and the @30for30 team really is the gold standard.
Everyone’s a stretch 4 now @Chiney321 !
This would never happen to @CaptSandyYawn ! Right @LindseyThiry ?
That’s how the Raiders lost their last game in Oakland ??!! Al is not pleased.
This was fantastic
My friend @MerrillLiz has been working on this story about Rashaan Salaam for years, making sure it was told with the compassion and depth it deserved. It was well worth it. I hope you make time to read it.
Another way of looking at it. This month alone, the Angels committed $245 over the next 7 years to Anthony Rendon and $325 million to buy Angels Stadium from the city of Anaheim.
This is larger than the 10-year, $240 million Albert Pujols contract that runs through 2021, and yet somehow that one still feels bigger.
Wow!
Fixing the Knicks is perhaps the biggest challenge in all of sports. There will always be ambitious people drawn by that siren’s call. @wojespn and I look at why it keeps dooming coaches and executives to crash up against the rocks.
We somehow worked Greek mythology and my son’s playtime into a story on the Knicks
This is a beautiful story
Remember: the weakness of next summer’s free agent class only adds to the value of mid-season trade targets, like Love.
Been waiting on this story!!
Now this I have to see!
Here’s how that whole thing with Josh Hart and Lonzo Ball on the podcast all happened ...
And on cue, Trez hits a FT to hit 30 points and Doc Rivers subs him out with Clips up big with 5 to go.
He’s gonna break that tonight if they leave him in.
Thank you @stanverrett for making my night after Stanford lost Big Game for the first time in more than a decade . CC: @Jlshobar @molly_knight
Clippers almost dared Russ to shoot that 3 last possession. Let’s see if D’Antoni cooks something else up on this ATO
If you remember, the Rockets pulled away from the Clippers after PatBev fouled out of the last game, too.
Smattering of boos for World Series MVP/Dodgers killer/Free Agent Stephen Strasburg as he’s shown on the big screen here at the Clippers game.
I would download the @moritz_weasley encouragement app! 
Let’s see!
This angle &amp; slo-mo is like Neo in the Matrix
What did Jayson Tatum just do to PG?
I blinked and the Clippers scored 10 straight points to take the lead on the Celtics late. Wow.
Whoa!
If you haven’t listened to @julialhenderson epic @30for30 podcast on Bikram yoga, please do it before you dive into the Netflix doc.
Heroism in Human Resources :)
Can’t wait to listen to this!
Los Angeles Clippers forward Kawhi Leonard will miss Monday’s game against the Oklahoma City Thunder, sources told ESPN. Leonard hasn’t played since suffering a left knee contusion in the second half of the Clippers loss to the Houston Rockets on Wednesday.
Paul George on his efficiency in his first two games back. “New shoulder. They haven’t felt this good in a long time.”
The wave has broken out here at Staples Center. Yes, the wave.
Paul George comes back in at the start of the 4th and promptly hits a 3. He’s got 37 in 19 minutes. Clippers up by 28
Paul George with 34 points in 18 minutes in his first home game for the Clippers, who are up big on the Hawks 98-79 late in the 3rd quarter.
If Spurs finish the comeback, Becky was coaching. If they lose, blame Timmy ;)
I believe what AD just did to Harrison Barnes is called a ROOF in volleyball. As in more than a block. Wow.
LeBron sink’s two FTs to give the Lakers a 99-97 lead with 5 to go. Luke Walton ATO play coming up...
LeBron and AD each switched on to defend Bogdanovic —who has been keeping Sacramento in this game— the last possession. Taking turns as defensive stoppers now
Buddy Hield was about to take his shoe off and throw it to retrieve the ball, until someone got him this broom. #HighTech
I believe there was skipping and shadow-boxing
Very interesting side of this story
Wow. That’s a terrible play by Garrett. Multiple game suspension for that, right?
She got game! Check out the behind the back dribble, too.
Jess was the best player I’ve ever seen at 16....and still is!
The Clippers play Wednesday and Thursday this week, but not again until Monday. By Kawhi sitting tonight and playing tomorrow he’ll have 3 days off before and after vs 2 and 4 if he’d have played tonight and sat Thursday.
Wow
The @DwightHoward signing is looking very good so far
I think KCP just did @Dloading “ice water in my veins” move after hitting that last 3-pointer
Wow. That’s an impressive TKO by Canelo.
Good fight between Canelo &amp; Kovalev so far. But why do I feel like neither fighter has really opened up and gone for it yet?
It’s 12:24 am ET and Canelo-Kovalev still hasn’t started. We’re they banking on Daylight Savings Time?
Perk live tweeting in full effect tonight
YES!
Notable detail: Altman is the first Cavs GM to receive an extension since Dan Gilbert bought the team in 2005.
Nice conversation between Gregg Popovich and Kawhi Leonard after the Clippers beat the Spurs tonight.
Another big game for undrafted rookie @nunnbetter_ with the @MiamiHEAT. Wondering where he came from? He was with the Santa Cruz @GLeagueWarriors last year. The Heat swooped in April 10 and signed him away.
Warriors owner Joe Lacob says tanking “is against everything we stand for.” But is defiance enough after Curry’s injury?
Steph Curry will get a CT scan on his hand before determining timeline but initial diagnosis is he’s got a broken second metacarpal in his left hand
Oh man
I mean, this is the guy who just closed out the World Series.
What a run! I don’t know if I’ve enjoyed watching a baseball team I had no previous history or connection to more than I have this Nationals team. Just a great team that delivered time and time again. Congrats @ESPN_RobKing @asolomon6 @joshbard @clintonyates #Natitude
About that no trolling thing 
This bonus episode of the Sterling Affairs might be my favorite yet. Or maybe it was just really cool to talk to @Gladwell on everything NBA, LA real estate, star power and Chutzpah! @jodyavirgan @pushkinpods
Fail
We’re gonna try this again @chiney321 (this time shoot at the basket, not the camera )
I shouldn’t be surprised but @StephenCurry30 has the perfect Silicon Valley VC analogy for the current state of the Warriors in this piece:
'You're starting from scratch' - Does Chase Center house Warriors' future or past?
The Clippers have come a long way from this  ... if you haven’t heard the Sterling Affairs yet. Here you go:
Dwight Howard revenge game?
Oof
All I wanna know is how Mina talked Tim into singing Baby Shark. It’s as endearing as you’d expect
Kawhi on spoiling the Warriors opener at Chase Center, “That’s our job.”
Steph is the face of the franchise. The Warriors just got demolished in the opener at Chase Center. Fans want to hear from him. By coming out quickly, his quotes get on the local news, make the local papers, etc. I know this is inside media stuff. But thought it’s good to explain
It’s 11 pm. Steph Curry just came out after getting treatment postgame. Warriors PR man Ray Ridder asks if he can do his postgame presser before he showers and gets dressed. Steph throws on a hoodie and faces the crowd. Why does this matter? (Cont’d)
The Clippers are doing to the Warriors tonight what the Warriors used to do to everyone.
Draymond Green just came back out of the lockeroom. No medical personnel with him.
What makes a great rivalry? Playoff games with everything at stake. The LAFC vs LA Galaxy game is huge in LA today
This was tremendous. Jeff’s long view on Astros culture and the front office’s “contempt for norms” is fascinating
#TeamJackie or #TeamBob
This is an incredible interview on the depth of the Warriors issues last season.
LaVar Ball 'restructuring' Big Baller Brand, to launch new website
Kawhi Leonard has finally arrived for his postgame presser (it’s 11:31 pm).
The hearty media folks still waiting on Kawhi’s postgame presser (note: It’s 11:18 pm)
Among the scary Clippers takeaways from tonight’s opening win over the Lakers: Doc Rivers says Lou Williams “and Kawhi are about 10 percent of learning how to play together “
The Clippers “selfies” —which cover up the Lakers/Sparks/Kings/TSwift banners at Staples Center have been replaced with this:
Being willing to drive is the ultimate test of a relationship in LA. Why that should have told you everything about Kawhi’s free agency! Fun episode with Mina (who is always fun!) on the Lakers &amp; Clippers
As if a career in journalism isn’t hard enough these days....
NY headlines write themselves after that one. “No way, Jose”
Notice how the fans get out of the way.
That was such a good at bat by DJ. Takes nerves of steel to take that 3-2 pitch after fouling off so many in a row. Then driving the ball opposite field. Big time.
The Rockets, from owner Tilman Fertitta on down, remain fully committed to contending for a title. “We’ve still got James Harden,” recently promoted GM Rafael Stone said last week. “Our goal is still to win a championship, and if you’ve got him, you’re halfway there.”
James Harden and Russell Westbrook have expressed concerns about uncertainty of Rockets’ immediate future, sources told @wojespn and me. No trade requests have been made and Harden in particular remains engaged with front office in personnel discussions.
New coach, new GM, same goal for Rockets: “We’ve still got James Harden. Our goal is still to win a championship, and if you’ve got him, you’re halfway there.”
Rafael Stone says the Rockets would like a more "optionality" in terms of being able to go big or play small. That's a Stanford Law grad's way of saying they'd like to add a center this offseason (although not necessarily a starter).
Stephen Silas on John Lucas: "To have him sitting next to me is a huge win." Their relationship goes back decades.
New Rockets coach Stephen Silas says he will make "tweaks" to Houston's offense but not major changes. "I'm not going to take away from what they did well as a group," Silas said, specifically mentioning James Harden's isos. "I'm just going to add to it and enhance it."
New Rockets GM Rafael Stone: "For the last eight years, our goal has been to win a championship because we had James Harden. We've still got James Harden. Our goal still is to win a championship."
I’d expect this kind of proposal from Daryl Morey, who was brazen enough to call Mark Cuban to inquire about Dirk’s availability after Dwight Howard chose to go to Houston over Dallas. (Cuban’s reply: “Go f— yourself, Daryl!” click) The answer from Houston will be a firm no.
Rick Carlisle on Stephen Silas: “A great hire for the Rockets. Stephen did a great job for us here in Dallas helping us get back to the playoffs. Thrilled for him and his family.”
As @Jonathan_Feigen reported, Houston has also targeted recent head coaches Nate McMillan and Jeff Hornacek.
Lucas served as the director of player development in Houston under Mike D’Antoni and could have a more prominent role under Silas. The Rockets want to build a veteran staff to assist the rookie head coach.
Source: The Rockets hope to have John Lucas return to their coaching staff under Stephen Silas. Lucas was a finalist for the head coaching job and is immensely respected throughout the organization, from ownership to the locker room.
Daryl Morey ending up in Philly surprises nobody with the Rockets. But not sure anyone anticipated it’d be this soon.
So much for Daryl Morey’s gap year
Happy for Clayton Kershaw — a great kid when I covered him at Highland Park High. Has done a ton of good with his millions and dealt with playoff heartbreak like a pro. He deserves this.
Hate to give @TimBontemps credit for anything, but his idea of the Mavs making a run at Victor Oladipo for his contract year is intriguing.
Too much spillage.
Stunned and saddened about longtime Rockets scout BJ Johnson’s death. You won’t find a friendlier person in the NBA. So many players and scouts credited Johnson for helping them find their way in the league.
Fertitta: "That’s where he always told me he wanted to end up, so I think that he’ll tell me anything, because he knows that he won’t have to face me until the Finals. We would both trade information to get there and play each other, wouldn’t we?" Morey: "I would love to."
Tilman Fertitta: "I’m going to miss Daryl. But I’m also going to pick up the phone and call his ass if I’m worried about doing something or not. If he ends up back in the league, I think that he’ll probably end up in the East Coast."
Mavs assistant Stephen Silas will have a second interview with the Rockets in Houston on Friday, sources tell @WindhorstESPN and me.
From the Rockets:
Three primary candidates remaining in Rockets' search, per source: ESPN analyst/former Knicks and Rockets head coach Jeff Van Gundy, Mavs assistant Stephen Silas and Houston assistant John Lucas
Did not need to see the close-up of Dak Prescott’s leg. Gruesome. Can’t believe how calm he was with his ankle pointing sideways.
Mavs announce that Kristaps Porzingis had surgery on his knee.
Per @ESPNStatsInfo, the list of players who have had 40-point triple-doubles in the Finals: Jerry West LeBron James Jimmy Butler
Thank you, Jimmy Butler, for refusing to allow these Finals to be boring.
Dirk gonna get a contact high sitting virtually next to Bill Walton
Per the NBA, Luka Doncic ranks second in jersey sales since the bubble began behind only LeBron James. At 21 with one playoff series under his belt, Luka is already on his way to being a face of the league.
I wonder if Barry Switzer takes credit for building the '90s Cowboys dynasty.
Shut up.
Mark Cuban confirmed that he picked up Delonte West today at a Dallas gas station and is working with West’s family to try to help the homeless former NBA player get his life back on track. First reported by @TMZ.
Really enjoyed reading this while sipping on my $1.50 medium iced coffee from Dunkin Donuts. The Heat are hilarious.
I see a lot of Kevin Garnett in Bam Adebayo’s game. Toughness, intensity, athleticism and skill is a hell of a blend for a big man.
It will be fascinating to see if Michael Porter Jr. — a brilliant talent who must be a frustrating teammate at times — can develop into a third star for Denver.
Nikola Jokic’s one-legger is such a fun shot. So funky — off his right (wrong) foot, something Dirk rarely if ever did, and he looks like he’s inbounding a soccer ball the way he releases it.
Nobody has boosted their rep in the bubble more than Jamal Murray. Dude epitomizes the cojones factor.
Pete Carroll: “See how hard it is to run for 1 yard?!”
My only nitpick is that Anthony Davis gets to be a center for All-NBA purposes but barely plays that position by his choice.
Paul George in the fourth quarters of the last three games: 14 points, 3-16 FG, 1-11 3s, 3 assists, 3 turnovers, minus-39 in 34 minutes.
The @ESPNStatsInfo slack channel isn’t pretty for Doc Rivers right about now.
Playoff P has more turnovers (5) than buckets (4) in Game 7 and just dented the side of the backboard.
Best playoff block since LeBron's chasedown on Iguodala?
Jimmy Butler is such a stud that he's gonna make drinking Michelob Ultra macho.
Marcus Smart comes up with the clutch flop, surprising nobody.
Tilman Fertitta's comments on CNBC today -- "Daryl Morey's job is safe, and I'm sure he's going to pick the right head coach." -- back up what I wrote in the wake of the Rockets' exit. They need a coach who fits with Morey's hoops philosophy -- and Houston's small-ball style.
Doc Rivers this week: “Sam Cassell should be a head coach, period. He’s got an incredibly high basketball IQ, and I just hope he gets a shot. ... When they talk about paying dues, he’s paid every due that is possible and he’s yet to get a job. So, I’m hoping that happens.”
Sources: There is mutual interest between the Rockets and Clippers assistant coach Sam Cassell. Cassell started his playing career with the two-time champion “Clutch City” Rockets.
Russell Westbrook had the worst playoff numbers (17.9 ppg, 7.0 rpg, 4.6 apg) of his career. How much were his health issues a factor?
Does James Harden want Mike D'Antoni to return to the Rockets? "Of course. Of course. Mike has done some unbelievable stuff here."
Mike D'Antoni on whether his run with the Rockets is over: "We’ll see what happens. I had four years. Hopefully it keeps going, but you just never know." He definitely wants to continue coaching, whether it's in Houston or elsewhere.
With or without Mike D'Antoni, an unrestricted free agent who will explore his options, the Rockets are likely to run it back with small ball next season.
Seems like a long time ago that the Rockets had the stingiest defense in the first round.
I asked Mike D’Antoni if the analytically-guided Rockets need to take open midrange looks that are there because the Lakers are so focused on defending the 3-point line and paint. His answer:
The Grizzlies announced that Sonia Raman has been hired as an assistant coach. She spent the last 12 years as the women’s head coach at MIT.
Why did the Rockets seem so flat through three quarters? “That’s a good question,” James Harden said.
Mike D’Antoni on what went so wrong for the Rockets in the first three quarters: “Just a lack of spirit.”
LeBron James is outrebounding the Rockets' starting lineup by himself. So is Anthony Davis.
Per @ESPNStatsInfo, the Rockets' 12 field goals made are tied for the fewest in any first half under Mike D'Antoni, regular season or playoffs.
Mike D'Antoni on whether Danuel House Jr. will be available the rest of this series: "I don't know. The investigation is going on. When they come out with their ruling, then we'll just go from there."
The NBA’s official injury report released minutes ago continues to list Danuel House Jr. as out due to “personal reasons.”
What a game. Unbelievable performance by @TimBontemps, who broke the NBA record for tweets in a game.
Kyle Lowry, cojones de aceros.
Official injury report lists Rockets F Danuel House Jr. as out for Game 4 due to personal reasons. Robert Covington (headache) is listed as questionable but said he plans to play.
To be fair, it's not like the media doesn't recognize that Tucker is an elite defender. He finished fifth among forwards in voting. Only four get All-Defense recognition -- Giannis Antetokounmpo, Anthony Davis, Kawhi Leonard and Bam Adebayo.
P.J. Tucker, who didn't make All-Defense and is eligible for an extension this offseason: "I don’t need anybody in the media to tell me I’m a good defender. I’m cool. As long as Tilman Fertitta and Daryl Morey know, that’s all that matters to me."
Mike D'Antoni says the Rockets still don't know whether Danuel House Jr. will be available for Game 4. He confirms that Robert Covington is ready to go.
Jazz VP Dennis Lindsey mentioned that lack of travel has led to an improved product in bubble. He suggests the league tries to reduce travel -- baseball-style series? -- once things go back to normal. "The players feel better, and frankly, we need to listen to the players."
Rockets are uncertain about Danuel House Jr.’s status for Game 4 but hope he will be available, per source. He missed Game 3 due to personal reasons.
Source: Rockets forward Robert Covington’s nose is not broken and he passed a concussion protocol test. He is expected to be available for Game 4.
James Harden mentioned a few times the impact of Rajon Rondo (21 points, 8-11 FG, 9 assists). Harden: "You can’t stop everything. We’ve got to stop  or try to stop  their main players and then not give their role players freebie looks and just open shots and feel-good baskets."
No real update on Robert Covington yet. "He got hit in the nose and he's bleeding pretty good," Mike D'Antoni said.
Somebody really gave Luka Doncic a first-team All-Defense vote.
The Rockets were upset that the league didn’t review a similar incident involving Chris Paul in the first round.
I learned what “obstreperous” meant today.
The Lakers basically dared Russell Westbrook to beat them in Game 2. He responded with a dud. Westbrook: "That happens. It's OK. I'm going to come back next game and be ready to go."
The Rockets probably need the superstar version of Russell Westbrook to win this series. They certainly can't afford for him to be as bad as he was tonight. He had more turnovers (7) than buckets (4-15 FG) or assists (4).
LeBron James' bald spot was even with the rim when he caught that lob.
These playoffs have been nuts for the Rockets.
That was by far the Rockets' worst defensive quarter of the season. Sloppy on both ends so far. Wonder if human nature, as Rick Carlisle refers to tendency to relax after a playoff win, is impacting Houston.
Per @ESPNStatsInfo, PJ Tucker was primary defender on Anthony Davis on 26 halfcourt possessions in Game 1. Davis didn’t score on Tucker, attempting only 1 shot and committing 2 turnovers. “That’s all you can do, is fight,” Tucker said. “We’re fighters.”
Russell Westbrook: "No extra shots. He can shoot those shots tomorrow or before the game. At least me personally, my guys know that I don’t want to give no advantage, no nothing. Let them know that we’re here. Every time they shoot the ball, we’re going to be right there."
Mike D’Antoni’s Rockets continue to be the best defensive team in the playoffs.
Rockets announce that Danuel House Jr. is out for “precautionary reasons” but not in concussion protocol.
That could be a franchise-altering failure.
This is from National Basketball Coaches Association president Rick Carlisle in response to Nuggets coach Michael Malone’s comments criticizing the NBA for not allowing coaches’ families in the bubble.
NBCA Statement: "The challenges of being away from family for so long can be overwhelming. NBCA discussions with the league office are ongoing. We will continue to work with the NBA as partners to evaluate the viability of coaches' families coming to Orlando as more teams exit."
Mike D’Antoni says Eric Gordon, the Rockets’ best perimeter defender, will be the primary defender on LeBron James. Gordon’s defense on Chris Paul down the stretch in Game 7 was an underrated key to the Rockets’ win.
Mike D’Antoni: “I’d be willing to sacrifice some journalists for my family.”
Mike D'Antoni is digging deep into his bag of granddad jokes. Which superstar will PJ Tucker have as his primary matchup? "P will be on Anthony Davis, J will be on LeBron. ... Lame joke."
Mike D'Antoni, asked if new Nets coach Steve Nash was involved in game planning as a Suns point guard: "The game plan was get it to Steve and, 'Steve, you figure it out,' so yeah, he was pretty involved."
Arguably the biggest play of James Harden's playoff career happened on the defensive end. After years of being mocked for his awful defense -- an outdated take -- Harden takes a certain satisfaction in that.
With a big smile, Russell Westbrook wraps up his zoom press conference with, "We get to go back to a campus where it's just us. No other teams, just us at the Grand Floridian." The Thunder were the only other remaining Grand Floridian guests.
Asked about the quick turnaround before facing the Lakers, Mike D'Antoni deadpanned: "Good thing we've got a young team."
James Harden's on-air self-analysis: "Offensively, I played like s---."
Just like we all expected, James Harden gets the series-saving stop on sizzling Lu Dort!
We have a Game 7 record for flops.
I'm gonna go out on a limb and say that Russell Westbrook's minutes restriction -- "in the range of 30," Mike D'Antoni said -- is out the window. He's at 27 minutes with 9:17 remaining and has carried the Rockets in the second half while James Harden's struggles continue.
If you'd have told me that James Harden would rank second in scoring among Arizona State alums, I wouldn't have guessed the Rockets would have a halftime lead.
Russell Westbrook’s limit is in the range of 30 minutes for Game 7, Mike D’Antoni said.
Doncic was fined $15,000 for throwing the ball off the legs of a game official later in Game 6.
NBA announces that Marcus Morris Sr. has been fined $35,000 for "recklessly striking Dallas Mavericks guard Luka Doni above the shoulders."
Since Chris Paul and James Harden have both publicly accused Scott Foster of being biased against them, it evens out.
Rudy Gobert: "I'm proud of the way we handled everything that happened in our team. ... I'm talking about especially Donovan and myself. To be able to come back and play the way we were able to play, even though we came short, I think it's very encouraging for the future."
Donovan Mitchell made a point to focus on social justice issues one last time before leaving the bubble. He’s been a tremendous leader on and off the floor since the season restarted.
Quin Snyder after the a gut-wrenching end to the Jazz's roller coaster of a season unlike any in NBA history: "I wish we would have won the game obviously, but I think we can be incredibly proud of the way we competed."
Grizzlies fans might have groaned as loudly as Jazz fans when Mike Conley's 3 at the buzzer rimmed out.
Rudy Gobert had a double-double in the fourth quarter (10 points, 12 rebounds) and anchored a defense that held the Nuggets to 15 points in the final 12 minutes. But that tough Nikola Jokic go-ahead hook with 27.8 seconds left will haunt Gobert.
What a series.
Jazz probably shouldn't rely on Rudy Gobert Eurostep floaters with the shot clock running down. But it worked once.
Rudy Gobert ain't ready to go home.
This hasn't been a pretty game, but no complaints about a competitive Game 7.
Rudy Gobert has more fouls (3) than rebounds (1) in the second quarter. Donovan Mitchell has more fouls (3) than points (2). Game 7 isn't going very well for the Jazz.
Alternate reality: Mavs sign Kemba Walker last summer. I was iffy on him as a long-term fit next to Luka Doncic, but I guarantee the Mavs would have had a much better record in clutch games this season.
Mike D’Antoni on James Harden’s lack of offensive involvement late in Game 6:
They at least are in some really good -- and surprising -- company. The bottom five, per @ESPNStatsInfo research: James Harden -- 2-17 (11.8%) Russell Westbrook -- 3-24 (12.5%) Chauncey Billups -- 5-20 (25.0%) Paul Pierce -- 7-26 (26.9%) Kobe Bryant -- 12-44 (27.3%)
An All-Star suggested to me that Giannis Antetokounmpo shouldn’t be the Defensive Player of the Year because he’s not a lockdown defender who shuts down other stars. The Bucks clearly need someone to take that challenge with Jimmy Butler.
CP3: “When it gets to clutch time, fourth quarter, some people are built for it, some people shy away from it.”
How much of Thunder's success closing games this series a credit to Chris Paul? "I mean, a lot of the mistakes that we’ve made in close games have been on us, to be honest," Russell Westbrook said, citing turnovers. "It’s kind of been on us, to be completely honest."
Mike D’Antoni mentioned that it’s tough for Russell Westbrook to have to chip off basically months of rust in the middle of a playoff series. Westbrook’s sloppiness really hurt the Rockets in the final minutes.
Mike D’Antoni: “We can’t play much worse. We’ll play better. ... We just weren’t sharp. Got a little careless a few times, and we paid for it.”
The Thunder, the best closing team in the NBA, outscored the Rockets 13-6 after Russell Westbrook checked in with 5:33 remaining. Off to Game 7 they go.
Chris Paul knows the rules as well as anybody. Can't air punch in protest of a call. Especially not in crunch time of an elimination game.
Jimmy Butler analysis: great game, bad facial hair.
This scorers’ duel series between Donovan Mitchell and Jamal Murray deserves a Game 7.
The presence of Luka Doncic — who one scout confidently predicts will win multiple MVPs — likely means the Mavs will have a long run at contenders. The big question: Can Kristaps Porzingis prove himself as a championship-caliber co-star?
Rick Carlisle on Luka Doncic, an elite player at 21 who his coach anticipates will get a lot better:
As Bobby lays out, the Mavs have carefully planned to be positioned to pitch a superstar in '21 free agency.
Luka Doncic on Marcus Morris Sr.'s flagrant foul: “It was a terrible play. What can I say? It’s two games in a row he did something like that. I really hoped the first game it wasn’t on purpose, but looking back on the foul this game, you know what I think."
Rick Carlisle called Luka Doncic "one of the toughest players I've ever seen in this league." Noted Doncic is a finalist for Most Improved Player after being Rookie of the Year. Carlisle expects another Luka leap next year because great players find a way to add to their games.
Kawhi Leonard has reminded us this series why he's a two-time Finals MVP. Luka Doncic has reminded us why it'd surprise nobody if he ends up earning at least a couple of those awards himself.
NBA announces $25,000 fines for PJ Tucker and Dennis Schroder stemming from their Game 5 confrontation.
It's not just about having an enforcer for Luka Doncic. Mavs know they need to be much better than the 18th-ranked defense to have a good chance to win a championship.
Richard Jefferson is absolutely right. The Mavs will look to add a tough vet or two this offseason. That's been the plan and this series has reinforced the reasoning. "We need to get some dogs," one member of the front office told me months ago.
Marcus Morris Sr. just keeps daring the NBA to suspend him.
The four Mavs starters listed as questionable are all expected to play, per Rick Carlisle.
Story with @royceyoung on the Dennis Schroder-PJ Tucker ejections, the Rockets' push for the NBA to investigate Schroder's low blow and the recent history of the league office's reactions to such incidents:
This is the play from Dennis Schroder's rookie season that resulted in a one-game suspension -- and that the Rockets want the league office to consider in its investigation of Schroder's shot to PJ Tucker's groin while fighting through a screen today.
Schroder also has a similar prior incident. He was suspended one game for a shot to DeMarcus Cousin's groin in November 2013.
Per sources, the Rockets are upset that Chris Paul was not investigated for striking Ben McLemore in the groin in Game 3, especially considering Paul's previous history of low blows. Houston wants the NBA to investigate Dennis Schroder's shot to PJ Tucker's groin.
Quite an efficient James Harden performance: 31 points, 11-15 FG, 28 in 28 minutes. Rockets take the 3-2 series lead.
This is Tyson Chandler’s first appearance in a game since guarding the inbounds pass on Bojan Bogdanovic’s buzzer-beater Feb. 9.
I believe PJ Tucker was perturbed about the placement of Dennis Schroeder’s right arm.
Mike D’Antoni says he expects Russell Westbrook to be limited to 25-28 minutes.
The Mavs are leaving the door open to Kristaps Porzingis potentially returning in the playoffs if they're able to pull off a major upset over the Clippers. Porzingis' treatment plan at this point includes PRP injections.
Rick Carlisle on Clifford Robinson, who he coached twice: "He's one of the most underrated players in the history of the league. ... Very sad day. He died far too young."
Kristaps Porzingis doesn't know yet whether he will undergo surgery to repair the torn meniscus in his right knee. The decision will be made by the Mavs' medical staff and Porzingis after they see how he responds to treatment over the upcoming weeks.
Tim Hardaway Jr. (cervical strain) has been added to the Mavs’ injury report as questionable.
Kristaps Porzingis averaged 28.5 points and 10 rebounds in two playoff games with a lateral meniscus tear in his right knee. Rick Carlisle rightfully emphasized the other day that Porzingis is "a tough guy." But Porzingis' durability has to be considered a huge concern.
Kristaps Porzingis has a meniscus tear in his right knee. Surgery is a possibility.
Rick Carlisle said Kristaps Porzingis did not practice today and is “very doubtful” for Game 6.
Russell Westbrook: “I’m excited to play, but I’m more excited to play for a cause.” He’s speaking passionately on the action the NBA is taking on social justice issues.
Mike D’Antoni on Russell Westbrook: “He’ll go through practice today, and if things are normal, we expect him to be ready to go.” D’Antoni anticipates that Westbrook will have a minutes restriction, but specifics have yet to be discussed.
Nothing exudes confidence more than wearing a T-shirt with your cartoon mug on it. Also, “The Minivan” is the NBA’s most underrated nickname.
Story on Russell Westbrook scrimmaging Thursday in preparation for his Rockets playoff debut:
Story filed to ESPN: The Houston Rockets held an instrasquad scrimmage Thursday to get All-Star guard Russell Westbrook his first full-speed 5-on-5 action since he was diagnosed with a strained right quadriceps, sources told @wojespn and I. Source: "Looked as explosive as ever."
This is the meeting we reported earlier with two players per team. Next steps aren’t just about when games start. They’re about formulating action plans to address racial injustice.
Focus of this meeting will be formulating action plans to address racial injustice issues as well as ironing out details of restarting playoffs, per source.
Sources: There will be another meeting later today with two players per team.
One concrete, productive solution that LeBron James is helping to lead: @morethanavote
With Rockets-Thunder boycotting their Game 5, Houston coach Mike D’Antoni’s scheduled pregame availability was canceled.
Rick Carlisle: "There’s no place for plays like that in our game. The league has the ability retroactively to look at that and determine whether they felt it was intentional or not. ... This is something the league’s going to have to deal with."
Rick Carlisle on Nate McMillan's firing in Indiana: "It's just shocking to me. It's very hard to comprehend. ... I don't know what the organization's philosophical reasons were, but I know Nate McMillan is one of the most respected coaches in the league."
Rick Carlisle on Kristaps Porzingis' status for Game 6: "I would like to be more optimistic than I am."
Mavs questionable for Game 6: Luka Doncic (ankle), Kristaps Porzingis (knee), Trey Burke (ankle), Dorian Finney-Smith (hips)
Rockets guard Russell Westbrook has been upgraded to questionable for today's Game 5 vs. Thunder. He has not played all series due to a strained right quad.
This play didn’t have the catastrophic effect of Zaza Pachulia’s infamous slide under Kawhi Leonard’s foot/injured ankle. But it’s the same type of closeout — something the league has made an emphasis of eliminating.
NBA reviews all fouls -- including the loose ball foul against Marcus Morris for stepping on Luka Doncic's foot/sprained ankle -- to determine if further disciplinary action is merited. Mavs also want NBA to review this uncalled landing space violation:
Luka Doncic: "He's just saying a lot of bad stuff to me all the game. I just don't want to talk to him. I just want to move on. ... I just hope it wasn't intentional. If that was intentional, that's really bad."
Carlisle: "I thought that the call was wrong, and so I was asking about it and wasn’t getting a great explanation. Then it turned into a technical and another technical. I was just standing up for my team."
Rick Carlisle: "What I saw was that Hardaway had the ball and a timeout was called by the official. My understanding in that situation is that once a shooter has the ball, a timeout cannot be called by the opposing coach." (cont.)
Luka Doncic: “I just hope it wasn’t intentional.” With eyebrows raised, he said to @townbrad: “Tell me what you think.” He said Marcus Morris Sr. talked trash all game. “I don’t want to talk to him.”
Doc Rivers: “My dad was a cop. I believe in good cops. We’re not trying to defund them and take all their money away. We’re trying to get them to protect us, just like they protect everybody else.”
Mavs down 22, setting them up to break the two-day-old franchise record for biggest playoff comeback of 21.
Never a good sign when Rick Carlisle is the closest Maverick to a 3-point shooter. As we saw in The Last Dance, Rick isn't much of a defender.
Paul George has more buckets in seven minutes (4-6 FG) than he did in Game 3 (3-16 FG) or Game 4 (3-14 FG).
Scout I talked to: "Luka destroyed you. Destroyed you! There’s no excuse for these top two-way guys. Luka is Luka, but you’re going to tell me Luka is going to take you to this point, and you two guys are perennial All-Stars? Why the hell is Marcus Morris on Luka?"
Paul George and Kawhi Leonard have been primary defenders on Luka Doncic early. It's been Marcus Morris Sr. most of the series.
Mavs F Dorian Finney-Smith, who was questionable with a left hip strain, will play tonight. He's the primary defender on Paul George.
The Nuggets have no hope against Donovan Mitchell when he's making pull-up 3s off the high pick-and-roll. And he's been knocking them down all series.
Russell Westbrook isn’t ready to return from his strained right quad yet. Rockets list him as out for tomorrow’s Game 5.
Kristaps Porzingis has been downgraded to out for tonight’s Game 5 against the Clippers.
Mavs F Dorian Finney-Smith (left hip strain/right hip soreness) added to injury report as questionable for Game 5. Kristaps Porzingis (right knee soreness) remains questionable.
Luka Legend — Sure, the kid is blazing his own path, but we can’t help but compare Luka Doncic to some of the league’s all-time greats
Donovan Mitchell's stats in last season's playoffs: 21.4 points, 3.0 assists, 4.2 turnovers, .321/.256/.727 shooting, 6.8 PER This postseason: 39.5 points, 5.8 assists, 3.0 turnovers, .563/.514/.955 shooting, 42.4 PER
Mike D'Antoni on the Rockets' 4-of-19 3-point shooting in the fourth quarter: "I thought we had our looks. We just didn't make them."
“Joel Embiid is like ... really unhappy,” is painful truth in advertisement.
ESPN story on Kristaps Porzingis' questionable status for Game 5:
Rick Carlisle: "This may be a gametime decision similar to what Luka’s was yesterday."
Mavs list Kristaps Porzingis (right knee soreness) as questionable for Game 5. We will get more info from Rick Carlisle in minutes.
Correction: This list is for multiple 50-point games in a single postseason. Wilt never did it in one series.
Per @ESPNStatsInfo, players with multiple 50-point games in a series: Michael Jordan (twice) Allen Iverson Wilt Chamberlain Donovan Mitchell
On Luka Doncic going from gametime decision to delivering one of the all-time great playoff performances:
Luka Doncic, who was called a "bitch ass white boy" by Montrezl Harrell during Game 3 confrontation: "No worries. There’s a lot of emotions on the court, especially this is playoffs. Sometimes you say things you don’t want to say. He apologized. I respect that, so no problems."
For the record, I'm too cheap to pay for a health club membership.
Kristaps Porzingis will have an MRI on his right knee today, Rick Carlisle said. Game 5 status TBD
Per Elias Sports Bureau, most points in a playoff triple-double: 51 -- Russell Westbrook 43 -- Luka Doncic, Charles Barkley and Oscar Robertson
Players to score 40 in a playoff game and win it with a buzzer-beater (per @bball_ref): Michael Jordan LeBron James Kawhi Leonard Damian Lillard And now Luka Doncic.
Regardless of OT results, what a legendary performance by Luka Doncic. From gametime decision to 36-16-12 in 41 minutes and counting.
Luka Doncic accounted for 25 points in the third quarter (scored 13, 5 assists). The Clippers had 19.
Luka Doncic and Paul George have led a stunning comeback for the Mavs.
Kristaps Porzingis was listed as probable on the injury report, but that was due to a left heel contusion. He's dealt with right knee soreness off and on this season, including missing a 10-game stretch in late December and January.
Kristaps Porzingis was a last-minute scratch for Game 4.
Luka Doncic is playing Game 4.
Rick Carlisle: “No word yet on Luka’s status for the game. He’s warming up and seeing how it feels.”
Clippers PG Patrick Beverley is out again for Game 4, per Doc Rivers.
No Russell Westbrook, James Harden fouls out with 4:07 left in OT and the Thunder were the best closing team in the NBA this season.
Another source: Swelling in the ankle is "minimal." The quick turnaround between games is an issue that could affect Doncic's Game 4 availability, but it is a mild sprain.
Source: MRI on Luka Doncic's sprained left ankle revealed "nothing alarming." He is expected to be a gametime decision for Sunday afternoon's Game 4 vs. Clippers.
Carlisle said there was an issue with the MRI machine in the bubble, so that's why they don't have those results yet. Mavs are trying to get that sorted out.
Rick Carlisle: “I believe this will be a game time-type decision.” Luka Doncic will get treatment today but will not do any work on the court.
Rick Carlisle says MRI results for Luka Doncic's ankle aren't available yet. "That will certainly have something to do with his Game 4 status, and mostly it will have to do with how he’s feeling, if he feels that he can play effectively on it."
Mavs are listing Luka Doncic (left ankle sprain) as questionable for Game 4 in the notes released by the team PR staff.
As Rick Carlisle mentioned last night, the quick turnaround from a late Friday night game to a Sunday afternoon game decreases the odds of Luka Doncic being available for Game 4. Good news: Early, pre-MRI indications are it’s a mild sprain.
This seems like an unnecessary and ill-timed shot at James Harden, an MVP who is a significant part of the Rockets’ recent defensive success.
Luka Doncic’s status for Game 4? “We’ll know more tomorrow.” MRI scheduled on sprained left ankle.
Doncic said he will have an MRI tomorrow. “And then we’ll see. We’ll know more tomorrow.”
Luka Doncic: “It’s not that bad. Honestly, I had luck that it was my left ankle. It’s not my right” that he sprained twice earlier this season.
Rick Carlisle on Luka Doncic coming back briefly in the fourth quarter: "He didn't further injure it. He just wasn't able to move the way you've got to be able to move in a playoff game."
Rick Carlisle: "Unsure of the exact severity of Luka's left ankle. ... We'll know more tomorrow. He did come back and try it obviously and wasn't moving great, so we'll see where he is come tomorrow and then Sunday morning."
Mavs make it official: Luka Doncic is done for the night.
That did not look like Luka Doncic would be back on the floor tonight. He's in obvious pain as he exits.
Players younger than Luka Doncic to have playoff triple-doubles, per a @StatHead search: Magic Johnson and LeBron James.
It looks like Luka Doncic got his left ankle re-taped. Officially available to return.
Luka Doncic hops to the locker room after twisting his left ankle. Twice missed stretches with right ankle sprains this season.
You know Paul George is struggling when he airballs the after-whistle jumper.
Luka Doncic tends to express his displeasure with referees when calls don't go his way. Needs to watch it the rest of the night after that double T.
Donovan Mitchell has scored as many points (107) in a little less than 2 3/4 games this series than he did in last year’s 5-game series vs. Rockets.
Nuggets 20, Rudy Gobert 18. Denver might need to make some defensive adjustments.
Mike Conley has that Fred VanVleet post-baby shooting stroke.
The Grizzlies have finally given up the pick they owe the Celtics from the Jeff Green deal. Five and a half years and six teams later, Green is making a significant impact in the playoffs with the Rockets.
Mike D'Antoni on if 2-0 lead buys time for Russell Westbrook's return: "If you’re down 0-2 that puts you in a different position than 2-0, but we’re going to be careful with Russ. He’s too valuable to just throw out there no matter what the situation is. He’s going to be well."
Chris Paul finished the game a minus-36.
Chris Paul's plus-minus with 5:04 remaining: minus-32
Seth Curry so far this series: 29 points, 11-20 FG, plus-43 in 59 minutes. Doc Rivers’ son-in-law is doing work off the Dallas bench.
Luka Doncic after Mavs beat the Clippers for his first NBA playoff win: “We’ve just got three left. I think we can fight with them.”
Luka Doncic has a 28-8-7 line in his first NBA playoff win. But the story of the game was the supporting cast protecting the lead when Doncic sat most of the fourth quarter in foul trouble.
That's a massive mental mistake by Luka Doncic. Can't get his fifth foul there.
Kawhi Leonard opens the fourth quarter defending Luka Doncic, something we haven't seen much.
Just your routine 22-6-7 half from a 21-year-old in his first playoff series. Only one turnover for Luka Doncic.
Kristaps Porzingis can't go post up when Luka Doncic has Ivica Zubac all alone on the perimeter.
Mavs open with a 15-2 run. Luka Doncic has scored or assisted on every point for Dallas so far.
Kristaps Porzingis is playing in tonight’s Game 2, per Rick Carlisle.
Clippers guard Patrick Beverley was added to the afternoon injury report. He’s listed as questionable for Game 2 due to a left calf strain.
I’m told that Kristaps Porzingis is dealing with irritation in his right knee but hopes to play tonight. That is not the knee with the repaired ACL, but Porzingis missed 10 games in the middle of this season due to right knee soreness.
Mavs center Kristaps Porzingis (right knee soreness) is listed as questionable for tonight’s Game 2 against the Clippers.
The Thunder obviously never should have let Jeff Green go.
That's the exact kind of uncalled foul -- landing space violation -- that the Rockets raised hell about after Game 1 of last season's series vs. Warriors.
Mike D’Antoni on Russell Westbrook’s possible availability at some point this series: “Can’t rule anything out, but don’t rule anything in.” He says Westbrook’s quad is healing, but Rockets still don’t know a timetable for his return.
Mavs took high road on Kristaps Porzingis’ ejection. KP: “I’ve just got to be smarter.” Mark Cuban didn’t comment. But Dirk Nowitzki kinda served as a team spokesman when he tweeted that it was “super soft.” LeBron was even stronger: “BOGUS AS HELL”
Mark Cuban chose not to comment on Kristaps Porzingis' ejection when contacted by ESPN.
Luka Doncic on his performance: "Terrible. I had 11 turnovers. I never had that much. I just want to win."
Luka Doncic said he appreciated Kristaps Porzingis getting his back. "I don't think it was fair to get him out of the game, especially in the playoffs."
Kristaps Porzingis: "I've just got to be smart and not let my emotions get the best of me."
Luka Doncic is the first player in NBA history to score 40 in his playoff debut, per @ESPNStatsInfo. His 11 turnovers are one shy of the playoff record held by James Harden.
Kristaps Porzingis gets tossed from his first playoff game. Agree with Jeff Van Gundy that they were "two weak technical fouls," but he's gone.
I'd guess that most 21-year-olds would be pretty rattled if they committed five turnovers in the first 2:38 of their playoff debut. Luka Doncic had 15 points, 5 rebounds and 4 assists in his next 10 minutes on the court.
A 38-point first quarter for the Mavs was highlighted by Michael Kidd-Gilchrist's first two made 3s in a Dallas uniform. Luka Doncic's first quarter of NBA playoff action was an adventure: 11 points, 2 rebounds, 3 assists, 5 turnovers, 1 injury scare.
Luka Doncic's left ankle -- which is bothering him after that slip -- is not the one that he sprained twice this season.
If the Mavs don't manage to get more shots than turnovers, they will have a hard time winning this series. #analysis
Mavs shake up the starting lineup to go big and bring Seth Curry off the bench.
Montrezl Harrell will play in Game 1 against the Mavs. “It’ll be very little, would be my guess,” Doc Rivers said. “It’s amazing, we’re using a playoff game to get a guy back in rhythm.”
This is significant — Lu Dort is the Thunder’s best bet defending James Harden.
Per a @StatHead search, Donovan Mitchell is the youngest player to score 50 in a playoff game since Michael Jordan's 63 vs. the Celtics.
This is the best August playoff game I’ve ever seen.
go all in #editbutton
“You can’t muddy the waters. You can’t just go halfway.” How regrets from Mike D’Antoni’s run with the Seven Seconds or Less Suns served as fuel for the Rockets to you all in on 6-foot-7 or less:
The Jazz made two major moves last summer to improve their chances to contend: trading for Mike Conley and signing Bojan Bogdanovic. They won't have either player when the playoffs begin.
Mike Conley left the bubble to go home for the birth of his son, the Jazz announced.
Mike D’Antoni on when Russell Westbrook might be able to play in the series against the Thunder: “I don’t think they have a specific time on it yet. Hopefully, it’s sooner than later. Obviously, we’ll have to hold serve until he gets back.”
Blazers could really use Trevor Ariza to guard Caris LeVert right about now.
The Nets just doubled Dame 55 feet from the hoop.
Dame Time started early!
Grizzlies center Jonas Valanciunas, whose previous career high was five assists, explaining how he got 12 dimes today: “They made some shots.”
Kristaps Porzingis (left heel soreness) is doubtful vs. Suns today. Rest of Mavs regulars are probable or not on injury report.
Source: TJ Warren's plantar fasciitis is "not serious" and will not prevent him from being ready for the playoffs.
Mike D'Antoni on availability of Russell Westbrook (strained right quad) to start the playoffs: “We’ll see how it responds and everything, but we all hope. We’ll just see next week. I don’t know right now.”
PJ Tucker didn’t return after getting his right hand caught in Victor Oladipo’s jersey, but Mike D’Antoni doesn’t think it’s a concern moving forward.
PJ Tucker grabbed his right ankle after getting accidentally kicked by Victor Oladipo. But Tucker stayed in the game, so Rockets can breathe a sigh of relief.
Rockets announce that Russell Westbrook had an MRI that revealed a strained right quadriceps. He will not play Friday and will be re-evaluated before the playoffs.
Rick Carlisle on Damian Lillard’s 61-point performance: “I haven’t looked at the film yet as far as whether the calls were accurate or whatever, but great players have a knack for getting the whistle to blow.”
Rick Carlisle on critical offensive foul called on Trey Burke and drawn by Damian Lillard: "The people that had the iPads said it was clearly a flop. But great players in the moment, they know how to create that situation. So, hey, if it’s a flop, maybe he’ll get fined."
That's a shooter's bounce if there's ever been one.
Per @ESPNStatsInfo, the list of players with at least 6 50-point games in a season: Wilt Chamberlain James Harden Kobe Bryant Michael Jordan Rick Barry Damian Lillard
Michael Kidd-Gilchrist's and-1 was his first bucket since Feb. 24 and only his second in a Mavs uniform.
Damian Lillard is in nothing-you-can-do-about-it mode.
Kristaps Porzingis rolling for a lob and then popping for a 3 the next possession pretty much sums up why Rick Carlisle says he’s “the future of the 5 position.”
LeBron getting one rebound in 48 minutes and deciding not to attack Bol Bol when he has him on an island in crunch time aren’t exactly indications that he feels healthy.
Anyone in the NBA bubble who gets caught not wearing a mask in public should have to watch a replay of this Mavs-Jazz fourth quarter.
Austin Rivers after career-high 41: "On this team, you try to play your role. That’s what I do. I try to play my role every game  be aggressive, be competitive  but I’m always confident in myself. I know the abilities that I have. I believe I can score with the best of them."
Austin Rivers: career-high 41 points on 20 field goal attempts.
He’s definitely no chump.
Mavericks will rest Luka Doncic, Kristaps Porzingis and Dorian Finney-Smith tomorrow vs. Jazz. Finney-Smith has been dealing with a hip strain. Doncic and Porzingis are listed as “injury recovery” for previous ailments.
Per @ESPNStatsInfo, Mavs shot 19-of-35 on potential assists by Luka Doncic. Only other Mavs with 19-assist nights: Steve Nash and Jason Kidd
Luka Doncic on this between-the-legs dime in OT: "I don't know why I did it. I just did it. I saw it, I don't know. I didn't think about it before -- right in the moment."
vs. NBA's best defense
Luka Doncic had four assists and a hockey assist in OT. Dominated with the game on the line as a driver and facilitator against the NBA's best offense.
Mavs’ clutch offense — their Achilles heel all season — has been beautiful tonight vs. top-ranked Bucks D. They’re getting clean 3 after clean 3 off Luka Doncic drive-and-kicks.
A look at Luka Doncic — his playoff past, bubble present and likely immediate future matchup with the Clippers (with @Mike_Schmitz and @ProfessorDrz)
The Grizzlies need their first win in the bubble today to avoid falling into a tie with the Trail Blazers for the West’s No.8. Ja Morant: “We can't pay attention to that, because that will lead to us trying to put pressure on us.”
Rockets are optimistic that Russell Westbrook (quad contusion) will be able to play Sunday against the Kings, per Mike D’Antoni. They’re also hopeful that Eric Gordon (sprained ankle) will return during seeding schedule.
Luka Doncic on a likely playoff matchup vs. Clippers: "They're a great team. We've always got chances, no matter what. Some people are going to count us out. We're not out."
Rick Carlisle said Clippers “went through us and jumped over us too many times.” As much as the Mavs are at an experience disadvantage, biggest concern in likely playoff matchup might be Clips’ ability to physically overwhelm them.
Jazz will sit four starters vs. Spurs tomorrow: Mike Conley (knee soreness), Rudy Gobert (rest), Donovan Mitchell (lower leg), Royce O’Neale (calf soreness)
Russell Westbrook (right quad contusion) remains listed as questionable on the official injury report, but a source said the Rockets anticipate he will sit out vs. Lakers tonight.
NBA’s best record in 2020: defending champion Toronto Raptors (26-7)
Aaron Gordon went down hard and was grabbing his left hamstring, but he’s back on his feet.
Rookies since 2000 with consecutive 30-point double-doubles, per @ESPNStatsInfo: Blake Griffin, Trae Young, Michael Porter Jr.
Russell Westbrook (right quad contusion) is questionable for Thursday’s game vs. Lakers.
I'm sure Kings fans love this from the guy the Sacramento front office decided wasn't a fit for their franchise.
Grizzlies star Jaren Jackson Jr. will miss the rest of the season.
Mavs' clutch offense woes took an afternoon off. Dallas in the five minutes of OT: 19 points, 4-7 FG, 0 turnovers
Per @ESPNStatsInfo, there have been four 30-point, 20-rebound, 10-assist games since the NBA-ABA merger. Luka Doncic's is the second this season, joining Nikola Jokic.
Mavs, trailing the Kings by 7 entering the fourth quarter, are in danger of dropping to 0-3 in the bubble with losses to the two (invited) teams with the West's worst records.
Luka Doncic was holding his left thumb and wincing after he got stripped of the ball. That’s the thumb he sprained in late February.
Mavs list Seth Curry as doubtful for Tuesday's game against the Kings due to right leg soreness.
Per @ESPNStatsInfo: Mavs have lost 13 games they led by double digits this season, including both games in the bubble. That's tied with five other teams for most double-digit leads blown in losses this season.
Mavs are now 2-10 in games decided by 3 points or less. That's the most losses in those situations in the league.
Hard to see Mavs avoiding a first-round matchup with the Clippers after stumbling to an 0-2 start in the bubble.
One of the primary reasons the Rockets are 2-0 in the bubble: dominant clutch defense. Think that's a fluke? Houston ranks third in clutch defensive rating (97.7 points allowed per 100 possessions) this season.
A briefing on the beef between Beard and the Greek Freak:
Luka Doncic: "We're a young team. We've got a lot to learn. We'll get better for sure. I know we're going to get together when it matters most, so I'm not worried about that."
Carlisle: “I’ll take full responsibility for the loss. I want to keep the pressure off the players.”
Rick Carlisle: “This is a tough loss. This is about as tough as it gets, and it just comes down to basic execution.”
Mavs scoring by quarters: 42, 43, 34, 20
Mavs: Most efficient offense in NBA history overall, No. 29 clutch offense in league this season.
Another @ESPNStatsInfo gem: The Rockets are the second team in the shot clock era (since 1954-55) to score 75 points in the first half and still trail by double digits. The other was the Nuggets (also against the Mavericks) on Jan. 14, 1983. The score: 85-75.
The 85 points by the Mavs are the most the Rockets have allowed in any half in franchise history, per @ESPNStatsInfo
Rockets score 75 in the half and are down double digits.
Last time both teams scored at least 42 in the first quarter: Rockets vs. Nuggets, Nov. 6, 1990 (@ESPNStatsInfo)
Per @ESPNStatsInfo, James Harden just had the highest-scoring quarter without a missed shot in the NBA this season. And the Rockets trail early in the second quarter.
Can the refs please get out of the way for the rest of Blazers-Grizzlies?
Donovan Mitchell fed Rudy Gobert to set up the game-winning FTs. Gobert to ESPN: “Donovan was trying to make the right play and he did. A lot of people won’t be able to probably say the things they want to say to try to break our team apart.”
The only player in the NBA to hit multiple game-winning buzzer-beaters this season: Bojan Bogdanovic, who is watching his Jazz teammates from home after undergoing season-ending wrist surgery.
Mike D'Antoni says Eric Gordon has "a little bit of swelling" and is "a little tender" in his sprained ankle. Doesn't have a specific timetable, but "everybody is saying 2 or 3 weeks. The ankle will tell you when he's ready."
Mavs-Sixers is headed to OT. Also had an official replay review in the final minute. Just what you want in the final scrimmage!!!
Luka Doncic, whose twice-sprained right ankle had plenty of time to recover, looks quick. Impressive blow-by on Tobias Harris for layup at the end of the half.
Rockets announce that Eric Gordon will not return tonight.
I think Ja Morant (22 points, 12 assists, 1 TO in 24 minutes) is ready for the real games.
All four of Donovan Mitchell’s assists in today’s win over the Nets were to Rudy Gobert. They played 22 minutes.
Mike D'Antoni: "I tried to take James Harden out with about four minutes to go, but he wouldn;t have it. He wanted to play and win."
Kristaps Porzingis will sit out today’s scrimmage after missing a coronavirus test yesterday, Rick Carlisle said.
Encouraging sign for the on-court chemistry of the Jazz's franchise cornerstones: Donovan Mitchell has assisted on three Rudy Gobert buckets in three quarters. Mitchell had three assists to Gobert in only one game this season.
Rockets don’t use a center, but Mike D’Antoni calls 19-year vet Tyson Chandler “invaluable” in the NBA bubble arenas. “He’s quarterbacking the defense over there from the bench.”
Mike D'Antoni says there is no doubt that Eric Gordon will be in the Rockets' starting lineup for the NBA restart.
Boban wraps up his Zoom call by saying, “Thank you very much. I liked the questions. See you soon.” He’s a nice guy who was surely flattered by the @DwainPrice inquiry about whether he should get more playing time.
Trey Burke worked out with the Mavs for the first time in the bubble. He didn’t go through live portion of practice, but he did conditioning work and ran through sets, according to Rick Carlisle.
Rockets guard Austin Rivers has left the NBA bubble due to a family matter, a source confirmed, as first reported by The Athletic.
Russell Westbrook plans to play in the Rockets' scrimmage against the Raptors tonight, per a source. He has practiced twice since clearing the NBA's quarantine protocol.
Seth Curry averaged 17 points while shooting 54.2% from 3-point range in his last 21 games, so it's not exactly shocking to see him lighting it up in the scrimmage against the Lakers.
Mike D'Antoni says Russell Westbrook participated in four 6-minute instrasquad scrimmages in his first practice yesterday. Still to be determined -- by Westbrook and the Rockets' medical staff -- whether he will play in Friday's scrimmage vs. Raptors.
We really need a Nuggets-Rockets series.
Tim Hardaway Jr. mentioned that playing against former Knicks teammate J.R. Smith as one of the things he’s looking forward to in tomorrow’s scrimmage. “I’m happy he’s back in the league.”
Rick Carlisle says PG Trey Burke will arrive in Orlando today and begin his quarantine period.
Nugget from @ESPNStatsInfo: James Harden (34.4 ppg) could go scoreless in the 8-game seeding schedule and still average 30 per game this season. He'll be the first player to score 30 per in three straight seasons since Michael Jordan did so in seven consecutive years (1986-93).
Russell Westbrook is wearing one of the T-shirts his brand made to honor victims of police brutality. “I wanted to be able to, number one, show my respects to the families.” Also says he wanted to give players “another way to use their voice without talking.”
Mike D’Antoni says Luc Mbah a Moute has been cleared and could arrive in Orlando as soon as today.
Mike D’Antoni’s T-shirt is a tribute to John Lewis. “He spent his whole life to peacefully try to get people to vote and change things.”
Russell Westbrook has cleared the NBA’s quarantine protocol and will practice with the Rockets today, per source.
ESPN story on Justise Winslow's Grizzlies' debut being delayed due to a hip injury:
Justise Winslow won’t make his Grizzlies debut in the bubble after all. He suffered a season-ending hip injury.
The Jazz will honor Jerry Sloan with a “1223” patch — the number of wins in the Hall of Fame coach’s 23-season tenure with the team.
Mike D'Antoni said Russell Westbrook will land in Orlando today.
James Harden: "Honestly, I wasn't trying to make a political statement." ESPN story:
James Harden: "It was just something that covered my whole beard. I thought it looked cool. That was it." Harden said he's in process of determining how he will voice his support for the Black Lives Matter while in NBA bubble, including whether he will have a message on jersey.
James Harden said wearing this mask -- associated with "Blue Lives Matter" -- was not meant to make a political statement. He said he wore it because it covers his beard and wasn't aware of the association.
James Harden says he hasn't decided whether he will put a social justice message on the back of his jersey. "But somehow my message is going to get across."
James Harden said his arrival was delayed due to "some family issues."
Mike D'Antoni says he was "really pleased" with how James Harden looked in practice. Harden had no limitations and participated in the full practice, his first since clearing the bubble quarantine.
Michael Kidd-Gilchrist has yet to join the Mavs in the NBA bubble. "We're working to get him here logistically and we hope that it happens soon," Rick Carlisle said.
James Harden has arrived at Disney World.
Rockets G Austin Rivers: “We all know there’s three or four teams that have a legit chance of winning the title. We feel like we’re one of those four teams.”
Rockets G Austin Rivers and C Tyson Chandler both said they wanted to put Trayvon Martin's last name on their jersey. Since that is not an NBA-approved option, they will stick with their own names.
Tyson Chandler, nearing the end of his 19th season, hasn't decided whether he will retire this offseason. He thought he'd retire last summer but then still felt the itch to play. "I'll do myself some justice, not get ahead of myself and wait for that moment to come."
Grizzlies backup PG/new dad Tyus Jones on what parts of his game he worked on during the hiatus: "I focused on changing diapers."
It will be exciting to see Ben Simmons at his natural position. I think he has the potential to be a hyperathletic version of Draymond Green, a premier playmaker and defender.
ESPN newser on Russell Westbrook — who along with James Harden and Luc Mbah a Moute has yet to join the Rockets at Disney World — announcing that he recently tested positive for coronavirus.
Caboclo left his room during the initial quarantine period, a source said. He was unaware that he was not allowed to do so despite the league informing all players and staff of the protocol. “He should’ve known,” the source said. “It was no secret.”
Bruno Caboclo drawing quadruple coverage is further evidence that this is a unique time in NBA history.
Rockets forward Bruno Caboclo inadvertently broke quarantine and must quarantine in his room for another eight days before resuming team activities, sources told @ZachLowe_NBA, @malika_andrews, @TimBontemps and me.
Mavs gonna get every whistle in the bubble.
The Rockets are declining to cite a reason for the late arrivals. “These are things people are dealing with,” Mike D’Antoni said.
PJ Tucker: “I barely have any room left in my room between the 85-inch TV and shoes, but I’m making it work.” He doesn’t know exactly how many shoes he packed, but this is a dude who will bring a dozen pairs on a 4-game trip.
Rockets coach Mike D’Antoni says he expects James Harden and Russell Westbrook to arrive at Disney World within a few days. “I hope it’s sooner than later,” he said.
Dorian Finney-Smith on NBA bubble life: “A lot of teams are complaining, but where I’m from, I think it’s good food and good living.”
J.J. Barea starts his Zoom press conference by asking, “Do you like this look?”
Rockets coach Mike D'Antoni, 69, is on the team flight en route to Orlando, a source told ESPN. He has said recently that his medical screenings didn't raise any red flags and that he planned to coach as usual, other than wearing a mask.
Lindsey cont.: "There’s some things that we all have to look at ourselves when we get critiqued. I’m not sure I’m good at that at 51 years old, but I was quite impressed that Rudy at 28 could reflect and share how he’s felt about a number of things.”
Jazz executive VP Dennis Lindsey after reading this story: “I was very impressed at how open Rudy was, how he owned certain points. There was a real vulnerability and some self-reflection. I’ve just seen some real maturity." 1/2
Mike D’Antoni on the plusses of wearing a mask while coaching: “Referees won’t be able to see my lips moving.”
Mike D’Antoni interrupts a question about how he will coach when social distancing is a priority. “Well, that’s how we guard anyway.”
Mike D’Antoni: “I assume — and maybe I shouldn’t assume anything in this world — that I’m going to Orlando. I haven’t heard from the NBA one way or the other.” He added that all info from his medical screenings is in and there weren’t red flags.
Why there’s tension between Rudy Gobert and Donovan Mitchell — before the positive tests and publicly after — and how the Jazz will move forward with franchise cornerstones who aren’t friends. Gobert: “We can win together. That’s the most important thing.”
Daryl Morey on uncertainty about salary cap projections: “Our main conclusion is it’s probably not going to impact us too much.” He says Rockets are comfortable with “locked-in” roster moving forward and will have midlevel/minimums regardless of cap numbers.
Orlando native Austin Rivers confidently declares that he's scored more points in Disney's Wide World of Sports complex than any other player in the NBA, so he's claiming home-court advantage in the bubble.
Mitchell continued: "I really wish that, going forward, I think that will be the primary focus, us jelling as a team. Obviously, Rudy and I had COVID and whatever happened, happened. But now we’re ready to hoop and focus on the team as a whole."
Donovan Mitchell on his relationship with Rudy Gobert: "Right now, we’re good. We’re going out there ready to hoop. I think the biggest thing that kind of sucked was that it took away from the guys on the team, took away from what the guys on the team were trying to do."
Luka Doncic: “I never hesitated. I always wanted to play. I miss basketball a lot. There was no question about me. I was going to play.”
Ja Morant doesn't mind the speculation that the Grizzlies won't be able to hang on to the West's 8 seed. "We've been motivated by the doubters all season long. ... Going into Orlando, it's just more motivation, fuel to our fire."
Ja Morant, who had knee surgery a year ago, says he feels healthier after hiatus. “I actually feel like I’m leaving the floor easier.”
Ja Morant on putting on 12 pounds during the hiatus: “I feel like there’s always room for improvement. Gaining strength has always been a priority for me, and during this time I’ve been able to do that.”
This is like when I refused to listen to my dad’s advice my freshman year of high school as I was in the process of getting booted from the football and basketball programs and expelled from school.
ESPN story on NBA informing coaches that age alone won't prevent them from being allowed to go to Disney World bubble:
The Grizzlies have the most to lose with the NBA’s play-in scenario, but Memphis coach Taylor Jenkins is “really excited” about the format. (A 9th-place team within four games in standings would have to win two straight games over the 8 seed to claim the playoff spot.)
Rick Carlisle stresses NBA coaches have a responsibility to use restart as platform to speak on racial injustice. “We have got to keep this conversation going. It’s more important than ever. ... There’s no way it’s going to happen overnight, but the conversation must continue.”
NBA coaches association president Rick Carlisle: “We’ve been assured by the league that no one will be red-flagged by the league from going to Orlando based on age alone.” All coaches and staffers will go through a medical screening process.
D’Antoni’s full quote, sprinkled with his usual sense of humor:
What’s the latest that Mike D’Antoni has heard from the league regarding him being allowed to coach from the Rockets bench in Orlando? “Crickets, which is a good thing,” D’Antoni said, reiterating that he fully intends to coach as usual.
Shot 40.3% on 3s in 59 games with Mavs over the last two seasons.
Quin Snyder: "The road from complacency to complicity is a slippery slope. I think as we educate ourselves more and more, that complacency falls off and then it's an opportunity to act."
"To the extent you can rationalize some of those negative comments by saying there were also positive comments, I think that’s a mistake. We all have to be that diligent, because as long as those comments are there, there’s work to be done."
Quin Snyder on the Instagram comments Mitchell alludes to here: "There were a lot of positive comments surrounding Donovan’s post. That said, there were also some comments that were abominable and things that we all should never tolerate." (cont.)
Source: Mavs have interest in signing PG Trey Burke before NBA’s restart. Burke, who was waived by the 76ers in February, averaged 9.7 points and 2.6 assists in 25 games for Dallas last season. Mavs need PG depth with Jalen Brunson out due to shoulder surgery.
Source confirms @TheSteinLine report that Mavs SG Courtney Lee suffered a significant calf injury in a “freak accident.” Lee, a valued veteran presence, averaged 6.6 points on 50% FG in 22.8 minutes per game during March.
Sometimes I think my plate is full balancing being a dad to two daughters with my career. Then I remember my Pops had seven of us to raise on his own after losing his wife, including one royal pain in the ass he had to send to boarding school to get back on the right track.
Jamahl Mosley, the Mavs’ defensive coordinator, excels at building relationships with players. He’s the coach who works with Luka Doncic the most, including putting him through his pregame routine.
Caron Butler: “It’s crazy to me that whenever it’s something with the black and brown community or to drive real change, to move the narrative, it’s always a right-wing thing or a left-wing thing. It’s never about what’s right and what’s wrong.”
Morey: Rockets 'would never stand' for D'Antoni not coaching in Orlando
Props to @clarencehilljr for putting Jerry’s feet to the fire with nuance and a unique perspective. It takes cojones for a beat writer to be critical of powerful sources on a controversial topic.
A little context from Slovenia on Luka Doncic’s conditioning
We have to outnumber the idiots.
Mark Cuban: “The reality is, to be brutally honest, when people talk about white privilege, we get defensive. ... It’s incumbent on us to stop doing that, because that doesn’t move us forward when we do that.”
Dallas police chief Rene Hall:
Mark Cuban: “It’s hard to discuss race when you’re white. To be brutally honest, when people talk about whites privilege, we get defensive. “It’s incumbent on us to stop doing that, because that doesn’t move us forward.”
Panelists include Dallas police chief Renee Hall, Dallas ISD superintendent Michael Hinojosa, Dallas County Judge Clay Jenkins, Mavs CEO Cynt Marshall, Mark Cuban, players, coaches and others.
I’m back at the American Airlines Center for the first time since the NBA season was suspended. The occasion: Courageous Conversation, a discussion about systemic racism and disparities facing the African-American community hosted by the Mavs.
The procedure was performed April 24, per the Spurs, so they’ve known for weeks that they wouldn’t have LaMarcus Aldridge when the season resumed.
An eyewitness account from my little sister:
Mark Cuban, who attended along with the four players:
Mavs players on attending the vigil for George Floyd in Dallas on Sunday (via @scootertomlin):
Quin Snyder: “Ultimately as a white man, what I was hearing was that, We need help.’ It’s not enough to just have support. There has to be a willingness to confront these things when you see them; be willing to take action.”
Some others: Dwight Powell, Jalen Brunson, Justin Jackson and Maxi Kleber along with Mark Cuban
We have to recognize that white supremacists are probably the most serious terroristic threat to our country.
Something for my fellow Texans to consider while making weekend plans ...
This proposal would 1) allow teams to fulfill local TV deals, a major financial issue; 2) give all but two teams a mathematical chance to make the playoffs without potentially excluding teams who had basically punched their tickets. Mark Cuban: “It’s fair. It’s entertaining.”
Mark Cuban’s proposal for the resumption of the NBA season includes all 30 teams and a play-in tournament, he told ESPN. Details:
Jazz coach Quin Snyder on Jerry Sloan:
National Basketball Coaches Association president Rick Carlisle on Jerry Sloan:
Harrison Barnes is a man of extremely high character, as evidenced by his latest generous charitable contribution, as well as sticking with his vow to not shave or cut his hair until Kings hit .500 or season ends.
I was always curious about LeBron’s NFL potential and actually asked Dez Bryant about it during 2013 Cowboys camp. Dez: “I think he’d be a beast in the red zone. I think he could do it.”
Pretty bold for Jerry Reinsdorf to declare that he broke up one of the best dynasties in NBA history because the team would have been too expensive to keep together.
Very fortunate nobody pulled a hammy, like @clarencehilljr once did trying to catch DeMarcus Ware at Valley Ranch.
I appreciate the effort of the middle aged cameramen who tried to run down Dennis Rodman with a head start. That’s hustle!
#TheLastDance appearance by prominent Dallas residents: Rick Carlisle 3, @DavidMooreDMN 2
Any man who believes this is weak and definitely not cool.
After I put on an old pair of Chucks, my 11-year-old told me: “Those shoes are kinda like you.” Me: “What do you mean?” Her: “Old, worn out and not as swaggy as they used to be.”
The Jazz opened their practice facility today in accordance with Utah Department of Health and NBA regulations. Per a team official, a handful of players participated in voluntary, individual workouts at Zions Bank Basketball Campus.
#girldad
Sources: Mike D'Antoni, who turns 69 tomorrow, has no reservations about being on the Rockets' bench if the NBA season resumes. A primary reason: Confidence that NBA commissioner Adam Silver won't allow games to be played if safety would be compromised.
Mark Cuban told @bdameris and @MFollowill on their podcast that the inability to test for coronavirus is the reason the Mavs have no immediate plans to open their practice facility.
The Rockets had planned to open their facility on Friday but reconsidered in collaboration with players and staff as well as the Texas governor’s directive for gyms not to open until May 18.
ESPN story:
Jazz executive VP Dennis Lindsey on Rudy Gobert and Donovan Mitchell: "They're ready to put this behind them, move forward, act professionally. ... We're very pleased with the collective makeup of our group, Donovan and Rudy in particular. We look forward to moving forward."
I gotta know this dude’s security guard credentials.
Rick Carlisle’s second #TheLastDance cameo wasn’t nearly as memorable.
Sportsmanship is overrated.
Jordan shoes were better before he won championships.
Went to a Puerto Rico league game with J.J. Barea last summer. Will never forget the ballboy turning around the broom and pretending like it was a machine gun to shoot down the opponent after the home team hit a clutch bucket.
The Bad Boy Pistons have to be the least popular championship team(s) in pro sports history. The world outside of Detroit wanted to see Air Jordan on the Finals stage.
South Oak Cliff is arguably the best high school hoops program in Texas. It's Dennis Rodman's alma mater, but he didn't play a second of high school basketball. And that's maybe the 1,000,000th strangest thing about his story.
Didn't expect to see a #TheLastDance cameo from Chris Antsey, the Aussie who Nellie infamously declared would be the best running big man in the NBA after the Mavs picked him in the first round.
How does anybody think this is a good idea right now?
This will be a treat for Kobe fans and hoops junkies. Mike Procopio, aka Sweet Chuck, spent years as Kobe's personal scout.
Some of the most detailed, informative coronavirus reporting I've read comes from a Utah Jazz beat writer.
Rick Carlisle’s reaction to his not-so-glamorous #TheLastDance cameo: “There must have been an exhaustive search to find footage of me actually PLAYING in an NBA playoff game.” Footnote: Celtics trailed by 10 when Carlisle subbed in, were 7 in his 7 min.
Sign that I’m past my prime: My back just locked up on me as I was reaching to get a T-shirt out of the dryer. (Also a sign that maybe I shouldn’t use my dryer as a dresser.)
Dirk mentioned to EJ the trip to Germany that Don and Donnie Nelson’s trip took after the draft. It reminds me of this anecdote Dirk told me that ended up on the cutting room floor for the oral history I did on his Hoop Summit experience.
If this is anything like my fantasy football league, the chat room is filled with profane insults.
I'm sure Rick Carlisle is thrilled with his cameo appearance.
Nobody has ever looked as cool playing basketball as Michael Jordan. Still true.
Fair point by Reinsdorf -- weddings are by far the most overrated social events.
Sources: Mavericks vice president of basketball operations Michael Finley interviewed for the Bulls' general manager job. Finley, a Chicago native who was twice an All-Star in his 15-year career, has spent the last seven seasons in the Dallas front office.
Dallas has a pretty good history with German basketball players
Adam Silver says NBA is not ready to set a date when a decision has to be made on resuming the season. "I would just say everything is on the table," including moving back the start of next season.
Adam Silver: “As I sit here today, there’s too much unknown to set a timeline and even too much unknown to say, Here are the variables.’” He does know that number of new infections must decrease and testing must be available on a large scale for NBA to consider return to play.
NBA commissioner Adam Silver: “We are not in a position to make any decisions and it’s unclear when we will be.”
Former Mavericks forward Josh Howard will coach the new men’s basketball program at University of North Texas at Dallas, the school announced. The program plans to play in the NAIA next season. Howard had a 49-49 record at Piedmont International University the last four seasons.
G-League offers elite training/life preparation, six-figure salary, endorsement opportunities and guaranteed college scholarship. Why would any top-10 prospect go the college route now?
They clearly need @therealshammgod to put them through some ballhandling drills.
James Harden’s foundation @_3thehardenway is teaming up with Kroger to provide a weeks’ worth of groceries for a total of 5,000 Houston families over the next eight weeks.
This definitely doesn't boost optimism about the NBA being able to resume its season.
Watching Game of Thrones for the first time. That entitled brat Joffrey is by far the most detestable character -- a leader who only cares about his ego and punishing his enemies. I can only imagine how horrendous he would have been if he grew old.
Russell Westbrook delivers assists to 650 Houston kids who didn’t have computer access.
It was surreal watching this, knowing that no matter how many points he scored, Jamal Crawford's performance was going to be a footnote with it being Dirk's final home game. It's a shame this appears to be the final game of Crawford's terrific NBA career.
PJ Tucker and the sneaker boutique shop he’s opening, The Better Generation, are releasing a clothing line with all proceeds benefiting the Houston Food Bank.
April 1
March 1
Mark Cuban has backed way off after recently expressing optimism that the NBA season could resume as soon as mid-May. "I have no idea," Cuban said on @GetUpESPN. He later added: "I mean, I haven’t had any conversations where anybody discusses an actual date."
I’m willing to bet that Jason Terry is wearing his championship robe while chilling on the couch and watching himself light it up in the 2011 clincher on NBA TV right now.
Took my daughter for a walk at the park today and the sand volleyball courts were packed with teens. Memo to parents: Keep your spoiled brats at home if they refuse to comply with social distancing.
Jazz will continue to practice social distancing and limiting time outside of their homes to essential activities, in accordance with CDC and NBA recommendations. They no longer pose a risk of infection to others, regardless of prior testing status, per Utah Department of Health.
All Utah Jazz players and staff have been cleared by the Utah Department of Health after completing their respective periods of isolation and quarantine following exposure to COVID-19, per a team official.
5 jobs/5 tags: 1. manual labor at apartment complexes 2. telemarketer (got promoted to supervisor!) 3. fantasy sports customer service rep 4. @DentonRC 5. @dallasnews @calvinwatkins @clarencehilljr @mcten @NickFriedell @NotoriousOHM
This reminds me of late last season when Dirk laughed and said, “Porzingis ... shows a little more respect towards me than Luka does.”
There are a select few players who have basketball courts in their home. There are many, many more who live in apartments and have little to no workout equipment at home.
.@Rachel__Nichols asked if this could result in NBA calendar being permanently shifted, such as season starting on Christmas. Adam Silver: "Possibly. Those are things we’re always talking about."
In interview with @Rachel__Nichols, commissioner Adam Silver lays out 3 potential options for NBA resuming: 1. When can we re-start and operate as we’ve known it? 2. Should we consider re-starting without fans? 3. Are there conditions in which a group of players could compete?
I hope Adam Silver is wearing hoop shorts with the suit coat up top. That's the only acceptable way to do TV from home.
You can't spell dumbasses without USA.
.@royceyoung on how easily coronavirus could spread in a basketball game: "How are they gonna sanitize a basketball? Because that’s the one thing everybody is gonna touch -- unless you play for the Rockets."
Anyone heard from @NY_KnicksPR?
Jazz announcement on Rudy Gobert’s $500,000 donation:
Details on Mark Cuban’s plan to pay arena staff for suspended games:
Rockets CEO Tad Brown says the franchise is putting together a plan to "take care of" the game-night arena staffers who will be missing checks, as @Jonathan_Feigen reported. Houston's Tilman Fertitta joins a short list of NBA owners who have made similar pledges.
This is incredibly generous and a commitment of a pretty significant slice of Zion's rookie salary. Pelicans (and Saints) ownership should make a major contribution.
Guard Jalen Brunson underwent surgery to repair the torn labrum in his right shoulder, the Mavs announced. Brunson had planned to attempt to return this season and have the operation over the summer. Not clear if the season suspension altered those plans.
Giannis Antetokounmpo follows Kevin Love's lead with an act of generosity. Would be nice to see this become an NBA trend.
Via @MavsPR: In compliance with a league memo sent to all NBA teams this afternoon, the Mavericks will cease team activities through Monday, March 16. This action is being taken to prioritize the health of players, coaches, staff, fans and media.
Rudy Gobert apologizes for endangering people with “careless” behavior before he knew he had coronavirus. “I hope my story serves as a warning and causes everyone to take this seriously.”
Credit to the Cavs for 1) emphasizing social distancing and having employees work from home, 2) vowing to pay the event staff and hourly workers who would be missing paychecks without games.
Please stay home as much as possible.
I hope other billionaire owners in the NBA follow suit. A lot of people won’t be able to pay bills because of this.
Some Slovenian media members here to report on Luka Doncic are stranded in America.
Mark Cuban says the NBA has told teams that they can continue to practice. He adds that players have been told they should not have visitors from out of town.
Rick Carlisle’s immediate reaction to learning the season was suspended: “My thoughts were we need to win this f—ing game.”
Rick Carlisle says he had no problem playing in a packed arena tonight, even after news that season was suspended. “We had a great turnout tonight for a Wednesday night early start.”
Rick Carlisle says all the Mavs have been told to stay in Dallas. “Games are suspended. Team activities are not.”
Rick Carlisle on getting news during third quarter that season was suspended: “That certainly was good information to have for this game. We played guys a little bit longer.” He’s raving about Boban Marianovic and calls this “one of the best regular-season wins” of his career.
Boban Marjanovic putting up 31 and 17 to lead the Mavs to a win over Nikola Jokic’s Nuggets will go down as a footnote on one of the strangest nights in NBA history.
Fan yells to Mavs coach: “Rick, this is the last game! Motivate em! Let’s go!”
I mean, Mark Cuban even spent a good bit of the timeout debating with a ref.
It’s surreal to be in an NBA arena while a game goes on as usual after the announcement that the season has been suspended.
Luka Doncic’s biggest flaw is letting his frustration get the best of him. He gets T’d up after putting his arms up and swiping the air in protest of a no-call.
Luka Doncic so far tonight: 7-10 FG, 2-4 3s, 0-5 FT
One fan at Mavs-Nuggets is wearing a facemask and latex gloves.
Dolan never fails
There’s a more sparse than normal crowd at the AAC for Nuggets-Mavs, but the 7 pm tip has something to do with that.
Mavs will be missing three starters vs. Nuggets
Kristaps Porzingis will sit out tonight vs. Nuggets as Mavs stick with policy of not playing him in both ends of back-to-back. SG Seth Curry (left ankle sprain) remains out.
Kristaps Porzingis has back-to-back 9-point duds (combined 7-32 FG) in Mavs losses. He had averaged an efficient 27.7 ppg for a five-week stretch before his two off nights.
Mavs PG Luka Doncic is listed as questionable for Tuesday's game in San Antonio due to a right wrist sprain. He has been playing with a sprained left thumb.
Mini-Mav JJ Barea is hosting a charity mini-golf tourney.
Justise Winslow is close to making his Grizzlies debut. He’s done contact work in practice and wrapped up his Friday pregame workout with an impressive windmill dunk.
Luka Doncic: “I got hit in the face and that should be a foul. They should look at it. I think the rule is when you get hit in the face they look at it to see if it’s flagrant or no, right? I got hit in the face three times —two of them was not a foul.”
Pacers 112, Mavs 109 (final). Luka Doncic had a 36-10-8 line but missed two tough 3s on the last possession.
“He can’t f—ing hit me in the mouth!” Luka Doncic shouted at ref Tyler Ford. He’s bleeding from the mouth after taking a shot from Victor Oladipo after passing the ball.
Mavs offense has been a mess again in crunch time. Luka Doncic is yelling about not getting the ball. Let’s see what Rick Carlisle draws up during the timeout.
T.J. Warren, trying to guard Luka Doncic, just had a three-foul possession. And he’s fouled out with 3:14 to go.
This graphic from @MavsPR shows just how much of a groove Kristaps Porzingis is in with all facets of his game.
Rick Carlisle on Kenny Atkinson’s departure from the Nets: “It caught a lot of people by surprise. I found out more about it yesterday, and it looks like it’s going to be a really great situation for him that he’s able to step away. He’ll have great options again next year.”
Kristaps Porzingis (ankle) and Tim Hardaway Jr. (illness) will play against the Pacers. Dorian Finney-Smith (hip) and Seth Curry (ankle) are among the Mavs who are out.
I don’t think this game should shift a bunch of MVP votes to LeBron James. But it’s a reminder that you’d rather have him over Giannis Antetokounmpo if they face each other in the Finals.
Players who have had multiple games this season with at least 25 points, 10 rebounds, 3 assists and 3 blocks, per @bball_ref: Anthony Davis (5), Kristaps Porzingis (4), Giannis Antetokounmpo, James Harden and Pascal Siakam (2 each). Porzingis has done it the last 3 games.
Former Rookie of the Year Luka Doncic and likely future Rookie of the Year Ja Morant swapped jerseys after the Mavs’ win over the Grizzlies.
Maybe we shouldn’t shovel dirt on the Jazz’s hopes of making a playoff run quite yet. Huge road win in Boston with Mike Conley starring.
A blowout might be the only reason Kristaps Porzingis doesn’t get his third straight 30/10/5 night. He has 26 points, 10 rebounds and 3 blocks in 25 minutes. Just checked out with Mavs up 31.
Curry thought he could play the second half but changed his mind after trying to warm up. That’s a significant hit to a Dallas team already missing Tim Hardaway Jr. (illness) and Dorian Finney-Smith (hip). Curry had scored 100 points on 38-53 FG in his last 3 1/2 games.
The Mavs now say that Seth Curry (left ankle) has been ruled out the rest of the half.
Seth Curry (left ankle) is available to return, per Mavs.
Hours after coughing up a $500,000 fine, Mark Cuban is wearing a shirt with various money symbols to the Mavs-Grizzlies game. There are three commas on the left sleeve, as there are in a billionaire’s bank account.
Mavs guard Seth Curry, whose hot streak has continued with a 15-point first half, headed to the locker room with a leg injury.
Kristaps Porzingis grabbed his right foot while on the ground after a landing-area foul by Anthony Tolliver. Porzingis, who has been sizzling for about six weeks, is up but walking gingerly.
That total obviously does not include the $10 million donation to charities Cuban made at the conclusion of the league's investigation to the sexual misconduct scandal in the Mavs' business office.
Mark Cuban has been fined a known total of $3,030,000 by the NBA during his two-decade tenure as the Mavs owner. That includes two fines that were not publicly announced, and there were likely more.
ESPN story on Mark Cuban's $500,000 fine, the NBA's denial of the Mavs protest and the statement from the league office:
Mike D’Antoni: “I think missing shots a lot of times is just a product of not being forceful, not being engaged and not being tough. They smacked us good. We didn’t respond.”
Mike D’Antoni: “They smacked us good, and we didn’t respond.”
Clippers 120, Rockets 105 (final). And it really wasn’t anywhere near that close.
Rockets G Eric Gordon (right knee soreness) has been ruled out the rest of the game. I believe the Rockets’ starters will not return due to being down 26.
The Rockets missed 20 consecutive 3s, but it’s not like this is a Game 7.
Pat Beverley got a flagrant 1 out of it, but I’m guessing he doesn’t mind paying that price to send the message that nothing will ever come easy against the Clippers. “You were such a nice guy when you played for us!” a Rockets fan hollered. Don’t think Russell Westbrook agrees.
The Rockets took three shots on a possession and still got a shot-clock violation.
I thought it’d be tough for Clippers big man Ivica Zubac to stay on the floor against the Rockets. Umm ... he has 14 points and 6 rebounds in 13 minutes while the Clippers are blowing out the Rockets.
Things are not going well for the Rockets when they have fewer made 3s (2) than fouls on PJ Tucker (3).
I think Reggie Jackson took great pleasure in getting a stop against Russell Westbrook. Jackson appeared to have a few things to say to his former OKC teammate after the next whistle.
Luka Doncic joined some pretty good company with his 30-17-10 line last night.
I’m told the hip injury that caused Mavs F Dorian Finney-Smith to exit last night’s win in the first half is likely to be a day-to-day issue. He’s the only Maverick to play every game this season and has emerged as an excellent 3-and-D role player.
Teams can put a bullseye on James Harden in the Rockets’ switch-everything scheme. “Come try it and the s— won’t work,” Harden told ESPN. The stats say he’s right, and it’s an underrated reason small ball works for the Rockets.
X-rays were precautionary. Mavs are still referring to the injury as sprained left thumb.
X-ray was on Luka Doncic’s sprained left thumb. He said he didn’t know the result.
Luka Doncic just headed to the X-day room with the Mavs’ team doctor.
Mavs 127, Pelicans 123 (final in OT). Luka Doncic had seven of his 30 points in OT. Triple-double with 17 rebounds, 10 assists. Kristaps Porzingis: 34 points, 12 rebounds, 5 blocks
Kristaps Porzingis has his fifth 30/10 performance since Jan. 31. He had three in his career before that.
30-15-10 for Luka Doncic and he’s coming up clutch in OT.
Luka Doncic expressed displeasure on his way to the bench entering OT. Mavs didn’t find a way to get the ball in his hands on the last possession.
Lonzo Ball with a 3-point stroke has a chance to be a hell of a point guard.
The Bucks and Lakers are the only teams to hold Zion Williamson under 50% shooting from the floor. He’s 4-of-12 so far against the Mavs. Dallas’ decision to go big with Maxi Kleber in the starting lineup has paid off.
Finney-Smith will not return tonight, per Mavs.
Mavs forward Dorian Finney-Smith (right hip) is questionable to return.
Rick Carlisle on Zion Williamson: “His level of force and efficiency is just unprecedented for a player of that age. Watching him is a breathtaking experience.”
Charles Oakley: “I ain’t never seen a team lose make this much news. Maybe the Dallas Cowboys.”
Shots fired at Mike D'Antoni, who just won West coach of the month after the Rockets scrapped playing with a center entirely. (Also worth noting: Dwight Howard is having success in the second tenure with the Lakers in large part because he finally stopped demanding post touches.)
Kristaps Porzingis was named West player of the week after averaging 26.3 points, 11.8 rebounds and 2.25 blocks as the Mavs went 3-1.
Kristaps Porzingis will sit out against the Bulls due to injury management on the second night of a back-to-back. Mavs have two more back-to-backs remaining.
The Mavs list Luka Doncic (left thumb sprain) as probable for tonight’s game in Chicago.
I mean, look at this. One motion off the rebound and left hand never even touches the ball.
Nikola Jokic just threw one of the best outlet passes I’ve ever seen — an 85-foot dime over a defender for a layup.
Rick Carlisle pretty clearly considers Kristaps Porzingis’ shift to playing center full-time to be permanent.
This is coming off a month in which Kristaps Porzingis averaged an efficient 25.2 points, 10.6 rebounds and 1.8 blocks per game.
Mavs PG Luka Doncic (left thumb sprain) will not play Sunday afternoon against the Timberwolves.
Russell Westbrook put an exclamation point on a month in which he averaged 33.4 points on 54.9% shooting. “Right now, I think I’m moving in the right direction,” he said.
Russell Westbrook is making a pretty convincing final statement for his West player of the month case.
After staying down for several seconds, James Harden grabbed his left wrist before walking off the floor at halftime. He took a spill into the baseline after missing a driving layup in the final second.
The Celtics just had a six-point possession. I’ve only seen that happen in football.
Kane Fitzgerald gave Luka Doncic a T as a 21st birthday present.
Hope he can find somewhere to celebrate after the game tonight in Miami. Mavs will fly to Minnesota tomorrow afternoon.
Mavs star Luka Doncic (left thumb sprain) is listed as questionable for Friday's game in Miami. Doncic, who will be celebrating his 21st birthday, injured the thumb in the first half of Wednesday's win in San Antonio but finished the game and recorded a triple-double.
Sources: The Mavs fear backup PG Jalen Brunson has a torn labrum in his right shoulder. Brunson, a lefty, has been ruled out the remaining two games of this road trip but plans to return at some point and play the remainder of the season. Postseason surgery is a possibility.
Russell Westbrook was Ja Morant's favorite player growing up. "I still feel like he’s highly disrespected," Morant told ESPN. "People take his play for granted." Westbrook: "I'm going to keep busting everybody's ass."
Russell Westbrook flexed about the basket and yelled, "And-one!" That earned his 14th T of the season, two shy of an automatic suspension. Westbrook: "I play with a lot of emotion, but that wasn’t a technical foul."
Grizzlies 47, Westbrook/Harden 46 at the half.
Without their top two power forwards, the Grizzlies are going small to match up with the Rockets. Guard De’Anthony Melton starts for Memphis.
Mavs fans will enjoy the discussion about 36 minutes in. Jared Dudley: "Luka is going to get star players to play with him. He has the LeBron quality, being one of the most unselfish superstars."
Eric Gordon (right knee contusion) is out against the Grizzlies.
The Utah Jazz are in a 4-8 funk and dealing with an identity crisis. Rudy Gobert: “I feel like it's not in our DNA yet to be dogs defensively as a team.”
The Lakers are setting a league record for headband inches on the floor right now. Alex Caruso might as well wear a skull cap.
The Grizzlies’ odds of hanging onto the eighth seed in the West got a lot tougher with news that All-Rookie candidate Brandon Clarke will miss at least two weeks. He would have been filling in as a starter with star PF Jaren Jackson Jr. sidelined by a sprained knee.
Ricky Rubio revenge game
Luka Doncic says the ankle is still bothering him. “That’s why I missed the game in Atlanta. I just try to keep the swelling down.” Has managed to average 27.7 points, 10.3 rebounds and 7.7 assists in the three games he’s played since returning.
Rick Carlisle on Tim Hardaway Jr., who has emerged as a potent third option for the Mavs: “I just love the way he plays. He goes hard. He cares about winning. He’s one of our leaders. He’s had a great year. ... He’s about the right stuff. He’s a culture guy.”
Impressive under any circumstances, but especially considering James Harden arrived at the arena about 70 minutes before tip after flying from LA today.
Luka Doncic is limping pretty badly. He stepped on James Johnson’s foot on his last drive, twisting the right ankle he’s sprained twice this season. But Doncic stayed in the game — and just blocked a shot.
Mavs backup PG Jalen Brunson will not play on the Mavs’ upcoming road trip due to his right shoulder sprain.
James Harden, Russell Westbrook and P.J. Tucker are attending the memorial service for Kobe and Gianna Bryant in Los Angeles. They plan to fly to Houston on a private jet after the service and play against the Knicks tonight.
The Portland Trail Blazers rank 27th in defensive rating.
The NBA’s Last Two Minute Report confirmed that the Mavs have filed a protest and basically delayed comment until commissioner Adam Silver has made his decision.
NBA declined Rockets' protest earlier this season, ruling Houston had sufficient time "during the remainder of the fourth quarter and two subsequent overtime periods and thus the extraordinary remedy of granting a game protest was not warranted." That wouldn't apply in this case.
Source confirms that the Mavs have filed an official protest of their loss to the Hawks last night, as @TheSteinLine reported.
Grizzlies announce that Jaren Jackson Jr. will miss at least two weeks with a sprained left knee.
Russell Westbrook: "We know that we’re the only team that’s in our way, and every night we’ve got to take the challenge of being the best team in the league."
Rockets 120, Jazz 110 (final). James Harden and Russell Westbrook combine for 72 points on 27-49 FG.
James Harden and Russell Westbrook have combined for 61 points on 40 field goal attempts through three quarters. Rockets up 15, on verge of pulling even with Jazz in standings and clinching tiebreaker.
This is Mark Cuban’s most intense ref rant in a while.
Oh yeah ... Rising Stars, too.
The lone Luka Doncic vs. Trae Young meeting we will see this season was in the All-Star Game.
Quin Snyder after Jazz’s loss to Spurs: “We capitulated too easily in a lot of situations.” I gotta look that word up.
Congrats to DA, who deserves all the good things that come his way after all the heartache his beloved Redskins have caused him over the years.
Mike Conley will sit against the Spurs and play Saturday night against the Rockets.
Rick Turner, a friend of my dad, was recently named the Jamaica men's basketball national team coach. His salary: $0. The team's budget: $80,000 per year, if they can raise the money. The goal: Paris 2024.
Veteran forward Jeff Green has agreed to sign with the Rockets, league sources tell ESPN. Green averaged 7.8 points and 2.7 rebounds in 30 games with the Jazz this season.
I get the sense that the Greek Freak didn’t appreciate all the talk from Houston about how James Harden got robbed in last season’s MVP voting.
OK, put the whistles away now.
Did Kyle Lowry just set an All-Star Game record for charges drawn?
I really didn't know Chris Paul could still dunk. His last one in a game was in 2015-16, per @bball_ref. And he threw it down with two hands easy!
Should there be an age limit for the Rising Stars game? Nicolo Melli is 29 — older than Pelicans teammate Derrick Favors, who is in his 10th NBA season.
He’s wrong. The proper technique is to use your knees.
Bam Adebayo: 9 points, 4-10 FG, 11 rebounds, minus-23 Rudy Gobert: 16 points, 7-12 FG, 20 rebounds, plus-25
Luke Walton: "I have all the respect in the world for him. He got what he wanted tonight, wherever he wanted. I wasn’t saying anything to him. I don’t know if he thought I said something to him. ... He’s a great player and he led his team to victory. Give him credit.”
Luka Doncic and Luke Walton did some jawing at each other in the second half. "It happens every game. You know, nothing special," Doncic said. With the opposing coach? "Nothing special. Things happen."
Rick Carlisle just used a challenge up 23 with 1:26 remaining in the Mavs’ last game before the All-Star break. Dude ...
Great veteran leadership by JJ Barea.
Kristaps Porzingis checks out with 27 points, 13 rebounds, 5 assists and 3 blocks in 33 minutes.
Luka Doncic is probably done for the night. He returned in All-Star form with 33 points, 12 rebounds and 8 assists in 31 minutes.
Big win for the Grizzlies entering the break, padding their lead in the race for eighth in the West. Brandon Clarke, Memphis’ other All-Rookie candidate, had 27 points in 23 minutes vs. Blazers.
Kristaps Porzingis and Luka Doncic have combined for 47 points, 22 rebounds and 10 assists with more than 15 minutes to play.
Luka Doncic didn’t look too rusty during a 17-8-5 first half against the Kings. He probably should have gone before the third pick in the 2018 draft.
Holger Geschwindner, Dirk’s longtime mentor, is making his first appearance at the AAC of the season. Believe it or not, he’s wearing a flannel shirt and jeans.
Luka Doncic will play with a brace on his right ankle and a shout-out to Dwight Powell on his shoes.
Jabari Parker will make his Kings debut after the All-Star break. “It just makes more sense to wait,” Luke Walton said. Parker has had only one practice with Sacramento and will get two more coming out of the break.
Michael Kidd-Gilchrist is inactive tonight. “He needs to get some work in before being activated,” Rick Carlisle said.
Harrison Barnes isn’t cutting his hair or shaving until the Kings hit .500 or the season ends. He made the vow in mid-December and looks pretty rugged these days.
James Harden and Russell Westbrook combined for 78 points on 42 field goal attempts in a win over the Celtics, giving us a glimpse of how good the Rockets can be when both stars are rolling. Harden: “It’s pretty scary.”
Per Elias, this is the first time in franchise history that a pair of Rockets scored 35 in a regulation game.
Rockets 116, Celtics 105 (final). James Harden 42-8-7. Russell Westbrook 36-10-5.
It looks like Brown tweaked his calf. Getting it massaged now.
Jaylen Brown is on the baseline getting his lower left leg stretched with the assistance of a Celtics staffer.
James Harden has five fouls with 7:43 remaining and hasn’t been moving well since picking up his third. But he stays in the game.
Never saw the answer to block/charge be both.
Brad Stevens says teams have to careful about the small-ball Rockets’ switching defense baiting them into post-ups. “It’s really hard to post linebackers.”
Nick Nurse adds to his already strong Coach of the Year case.
“I’m ready,” Luka Doncic told reporters after practicing today. He’ll play tomorrow night vs. Kings and in the All-Star Game. (The All-Star Game was never really in question. Sorry, Devin Booker.)
Source: The Mavs released SG Ryan Broekhoff to create a roster spot for Michael Kidd-Gilchrist. Broekhoff shot 40.3% from 3-point range in 59 games over two seasons with the Mavs.
Former Hornets forward Michael Kidd-Gilchrist has agreed to sign with the Mavericks, sources tell @wojespn and me. Dallas has to waive a player to create an open roster spot before making the move official.
Jazz 123, Mavs 119 (final). Utah has recovered from a five-game funk to win three in a row. Dallas falls to .500 at home (14-14).
Jordan Clarkson (25 points, 10-17 FG, 8 assists) fouled out with 3:52 remaining.
Wright is questionable to return, Mavs announce.
Wright was able to limp off on his own, but he went straight to the locker room to be evaluated.
Mavs G Delon Wright is clutching his right ankle after coming down awkwardly after a drive.
Jordan Clarkson has his eighth 20-plus-point performance since making his Jazz debut the day after Christmas. Utah made other adjustments to their bench, but Clarkson breathed life into what was a struggling second unit.
Jazz lead has shrunk from 21 to 5 in first 6:45 of the third quarter. Tim Hardaway Jr. (24 points, 9-13 FG) has kept Mavs in it.
Rick Carlisle just got T’d up right before Mavs PG Jalen Brunson released made 3 in transition. No bucket. Not sure what Carlisle said, but he wasn’t demonstrative. Ref should let the play happen before blowing the whistle.
Rebound battle: Mavs 10, Rudy Gobert 10
Four Utah players are in double figures with 4:06 remaining in the first half. Mavs down 22 at home to one of the teams they’re hoping to catch in the West standings.
Jordan Clarkson didn’t cool off on the flight from Houston to Dallas. He has 44 points in 40 minutes on this two-game Texas trip so far.
Rick Carlisle on Luka Doncic: “The hope is he plays on Wednesday. It’ll depend on how he feels, how he responds to increased basketball activities. But all in all, he’s doing well.”
Jazz point guard Mike Conley will rest against the Mavericks. The official reason is injury recovery, right knee.
Luka Doncic played 5-on-5 at the Mavs' practice facility Monday morning, sources told ESPN. It was his first live action since spraining his right ankle Jan. 30. The Mavs hope Doncic will be cleared to play Wednesday against the Kings.
Can’t believe Alex Caruso was snubbed.
Bojan Bogdanovic had hit one shot all night. The 29-footer he launched at the buzzer had a 12.6% probability of going in, per Second Spectrum. “As soon as he shot it, I knew it was good,” PJ Tucker said. On the crazy shot that made Bogey curse in Croatian:
Bojan Bogdanovic was 1-of-6 from the floor before knocking down the 29-foot buzzer-beater with two Rockets in his face. Rudy Gobert: "He's got big balls, that's all I've got to say."
The complete list of NBA players to hit multiple buzzer-beating game-winners this season: Bojan Bogdanovic
Jazz 114, Rockets 113 (final). What a phenomenal game. Bojan Bogdanovic hit two shots all night. The second was a ridiculous buzzer-beater to win it.
Ja Morant goes for 27, 10 and 10 in Grizzlies’ win over Wizards. Players age 20 or younger to score at least 27 in a triple-double: Luka Doncic (14 times), LeBron James (five), De’Aaron Fox, Ja Morant
Rockets 58, Jazz 54 at the half. This is a fascinating chess match. How many times has James Harden been the screener in a pick-and-roll before doing it multiple times in the first half?
Russell Westbrook scored 17 points on 8-11 FG in the first quarter. He was 4-7 when guarded by Rudy Gobert (3, two midrange bank shots, one drive). All of his buckets with Gobert resting were drives to the rim.
Rudy Gobert is guarding Russell Westbrook, sagging way off him. The Jazz will dare Westbrook to beat them with his jumper.
The Rockets intend to fully guarantee the fourth year of P.J. Tucker's contract, sources confirm. Only $2.57 million of Tucker's $7.97 million salary for 2020-21 was guaranteed. The Athletic first reported the decision to guarantee the entire salary for the 34-year-old.
Rockets guard Eric Gordon (leg contusion) is out against the Jazz.
Carlisle also said on his weekly @1033fmESPN appearance that the Mavs would have no issue with Luka Doncic returning from his right ankle sprain in the All-Star Game if that’s how the timing of his recovery works out.
The NBA's official injury report lists Mavericks star Luka Doncic (right ankle sprain) as out for Monday's game against the Jazz. Coach Rick Carlisle said Friday that the team hopes Doncic will play in one of the two remaining games before the All-Star break.
This is correct. The missed foul call on Joe Ingles actually would have taken a Damian Lillard 3 off the board. My original tweet (now deleted) was an incorrect call.
Mavs C/PF Kristaps Porzingis will not play Saturday night in Charlotte, according to the NBA's injury report. He's out due to injury management on the second night of a back-to-back.
The Blazers security guard was the only guy all night who could stay in front of Damian Lillard. Can't blame Dame for being hot after that blatant missed goaltending.
As much as I appreciate the heartfelt compliment, I'm not in D.C. tonight.
Mavs are now 2-7 in games decided by 3 points or fewer after giving up a game-winning Bradley Beal layup off an inbounds pass with 1.8 seconds left.
The last buyout addition to play at least 100 playoff minutes for a title team: Peja Stojakovic on the 2011 Mavericks.
The Rockets are 5-0 when they start their 6-foot-6-and-under lineup. But they'll probably go bigger soon. Robert Covington is 6-foot-7.
Best plus-minus in Rockets win: Robert Covington at 16. He had 14 points on 5-9 FG, 8 rebounds, 4 assists, 2 steals and 2 blocks in 29 minutes a night after being traded.
The Lakers adjusted to the Rockets as far as lineups go. JaVale McGee and Dwight Howard have combined to play less than 20 minutes. Anthony Davis is at center in crunch time.
Russell Westbrook might be the smallest guy in the shortest lineup in the post-Chuck Taylors NBA era, but he's still gonna rock the baby when he scores in the post.
Kristaps Porzingis (facial injury) is listed as questionable for the Mavericks' game against the Wizards on Friday. Porzingis said he suffered a broken nose in Wednesday's loss to the Grizzlies, but he returned to that game.
Ja Morant on the Andre Iguodala absentee era ending in Memphis: “It’s over with, and we’re looking to play with the players that are on the floor. We’re handling business.”
Dillon Brooks on the deal that is expected to send Andre Iguodala to Miami and Justise Winslow to Memphis: “Now we have a player that we’re getting that actually wants to play with us and thinks we’re good.”
Grizzlies 121, Mavs 107 (final). Ja Morant scored 21 points on 10-12 FG to lead six Memphis players in double figures. Kristaps Porzingis: 32 points, 12 rebounds
That’s a 41-point quarter for the young Grizzlies. They’re up 22 entering the fourth in Dallas. Five Memphis players are in double figures — all age 24 or younger.
And Porzingis just checked back into the game. He apparently just had a bloody nose.
Porzingis just headed to the locker room with Mavs athletic trainer Casey Smith. He has both nostrils stuffed with gauze.
Kristaps Porzingis might have just broken his nose. Bleeding profusely after taking an elbow from Josh Jackson.
Kristaps Porzingis has 88 points on 57.1% shooting in 9 quarters since Luka Doncic got hurt. There were encouraging signs of chemistry developing with that duo before injuries interrupted. But Porzingis is proving himself capable of being a go-to guy when Doncic isn’t on court.
Jae Crowder and Solomon Hill are late scratches for the Grizzlies on trade deadline eve.
The extension is a shocker. A lot of people around the league expected Andre Iguodala to boomerang back to the Warriors next season.
Grizzlies coach Taylor Jenkins grew up in Dallas and his family used to sit up in Section 311 at Mavs games. “Dirk was my guy,” said Jenkins, who at 35 is six years younger than the recently retired Mavs legend.
Rick Carlisle on Ja Morant: “I haven’t seen this kind of athleticism in a point guard since Westbrook when he came into the league. He’s got an exhilarating vibe when he steps on to a basketball court. ... Dynamic is not even the word. He’s beyond that.”
ICYMI: My story on Ja Morant that ran last week
To be clear, the Rockets aren't searching for a starting center. They're playing small-ball and rolling with PJ Tucker at the 5. But they need a big to throw at Nikola Jokic, Anthony Davis, etc. in the playoffs.
Sources: Jordan Bell is also headed to Houston, as first reported by @Jonathan_Feigen. Rockets will continue being aggressive in search for a center, either via trade or in buyout market.
Gerald Green will waive his right to veto being included in this deal, a source said. Green has that right due to the one-year Bird restriction, but he’s out for the year due to a broken foot. He’s expected to be waived and continue his rehab.
Tim Hardaway Jr., dumped by the Knicks as a bad contract in the Kristaps Porzingis deal, has averaged 15.8 points with a 60.2 true shooting % since joining Mavs' starting lineup. Dallas is 22-12 when he starts. One franchise's tax is another's treasure.
Grit 'n Grind flashback in Memphis tonight: Grizzlies 96, Pistons 82. That's a final, not a score after the third quarter.
The Mavs have road wins in Milwaukee, Philadelphia and Indiana in games missed by Luka Doncic. Kristaps Porzingis averaged 28.7 points and 14 rebounds in those victories.
Karl-Anthony Towns hasn't played in a Timberwolves win since Nov. 27.
Memphis' Taylor Jenkins was named Western Conference coach of the month after the Grizzlies' 11-4 January. Jenkins, 35, is the youngest coach of the month since Lawrence Frank in April 2005.
Clint Capela has been hearing his name in trade rumors since his rookie year. He’s well aware that he was a Jimmy Butler “yes” away from being shipped out by the Rockets this summer. Here’s what Capela told me this fall when I asked about dealing with that uncomfortable reality:
Harden over those 6 games: .457 FG%, .323 3% Dame in these 6 games: .548 FG%, .570 3%
Per Elias, Damian Lillard joined James Harden and Kobe Bryant as the only players to score at least 293 points over a six-game span in the last 20 years. Harden had 296 over 6 games last January.
Damian Lillard has three 50-point games in the last two weeks. And 48 and 47 in that span. It’s been a while since we’ve seen this kind of a hot streak.
Trae Young says he rolled his ankle when he fouled Dorian Finney-Smith. He wanted to go back in, but Hawks made the call to pull him. Will get further evaluation tomorrow, but he’s walking on it postgame.
Dirk adopted the rev-it-up celebration on the rare occasions he threw one down in the last few years of his career.
Great note from @LawMurrayTheNU: Vince Carter dunked for the second time this season, both since he turned 43 on Sunday. The only other player in NBA history to dunk at that age or older is Robert Parish.
No surprise to see a sophomore point guard light it up in a Hawks-Mavs game. Jalen Brunson has 19 points and 3 assists at halftime.
The Willie Cauley-Stein era in Dallas truly begins tonight.
The previous starting five featuring Conley ranks sixth among NBA lineups in plus-minus (72 in 266 minutes). Jazz’s starting lineup they’ll use tonight (Joe Ingles instead of Royce O’Neale): 10 in 121 minutes
ESPN story on Jazz’s decision to make Mike Conley a starter again despite the starting lineup without him leading the league in plus-minus:
O’Neale recently told ESPN: “It’s about everybody not caring who’s starting and who’s coming off the bench. ... We’ve got guys who are unselfish, who really don’t care who’s scoring or whatever, who love playing with each other. As long as the team wins, everyone is happy.”
Filed to ESPN — Per league sources, Mike Conley will return to the Jazz’s starting lineup tonight vs. Trail Blazers. He will replace Royce O’Neale, a valuable 3-and-D player who will continue to be a critical part of Utah’s rotation.
Rick Carlisle said earlier this week that Porzingis’ availability for back-to-backs would be made on a case-to-case basis. Porzingis played 36 minutes in last night’s loss to Rockets, when he had a season-high 35 points and 12 rebounds.
The Mavs list Kristaps Porzingis as out vs. the Hawks due to injury management on the second night of a back-to-back. It will be the second time this season that the Mavs have opted to rest Porzingis.
On the Rockets’ historic small-ball strategy and why Mike D’Antoni doesn’t plan to blink while Clint Capela recovers from plantar fasciitis:
The Knicks lost this game by 15. In their defense, they were playing the butt end of a back-to-back-to-back.
Per Elias, the Rockets are the first team to play an entire game without a player listed taller than 6'6" since the Knicks on Jan. 31, 1963 against the Chicago Zephyrs in a neutral-site game in Syracuse.
Rockets 128, Mavs 121 (final). James Harden scored 14 of his 35 points in the fourth quarter to help Houston hold off Mavs rally. Also finished with 16 rebounds, 6 assists, 4 steals. Russell Westbrook: 32-6-9-3.
Kristaps Porzingis, who is nine inches taller than any of the Rockets who have played tonight, has a season-high 35 points.
19 points in 5:07 #math
This feels a lot like the Rockets’ recent loss to the Thunder. Start the fourth quarter with a 16-point lead and let off the gas. Mavs have scored 19 points in 7:07 to pull within three.
Rockets 65, Mavs 60 at half. Kristaps Porzingis has 17 points and 7 rebounds to help Luka-less Mavs hang around. James Harden (19-8-4) leads four Rockets already in double figures.
Jammed his finger, per Mavs PR.
Seth Curry briefly went to the locker room and returned to the bench with a couple of fingers on his left hand taped.
Mavs starters: JJ Barea, Tim Hardaway Jr., Ryan Broekhoff, Dorian Finney-Smith, Kristaps Porzingis
Rick Carlisle on Luka Doncic: “I believe he’s going to be OK by the time the All-Star weekend rolls around. It’s just my feeling that he’ll be able to participate at some level in those events.”
Mike D’Antoni on Clint Capela’s nagging heel contusion: “He shouldn’t come back until he’s pain free.” Capela has been in and out of the lineup for weeks. D’Antoni is noncommittal about whether Capela could sit until All-Star break.
Rockets will go small with Clint Capela out and start PJ Tucker at center with Danuel House Jr. at power forward and three guards (Eric Gordon, Russell Westbrook and James Harden).
This is in line with the timeline it took Luka Doncic to recover from his last ankle sprain. Mavs just have a busier stretch of schedule.
A fine? OK. But if nothing is done to escalate the situation, a suspension is too much.
It's time for the NBA to reconsider the rule about it being an automatic suspension for leaving the bench area during a confrontation. It's silly that we won't see Jaren Jackson Jr. match up against Zion Williamson tonight because Jackson took a few steps away from the bench.
Mavs shooting guard Tim Hardaway Jr. (low back tightness) has been upgraded to probable vs. Rockets.
Rockets center Clint Capela will not play tonight vs. Mavs due to the right heel contusion that has been bothering him for weeks.
Source: MRI confirms a right ankle sprain for Luka Doncic similar to the one he suffered earlier this season. He returned to practice 10 days later after the previous ankle sprain.
Rookie of the Year frontrunner Ja Morant is a ruthless competitor who goes home after games and watches the film with his mom and dad. My story on the Grizzlies' 20-year-old highlight reel and rising star:
After a 19-2 run, the Jazz have lost three straight games — all to teams missing at least one of their top two scorers.
Next: at Mavs on Saturday night. It’s a shame Luka Doncic won’t be healthy.
Luka Doncic is officially listed as out vs. Rockets tomorrow. Tim Hardaway Jr. is questionable due to lower back tightness that caused him to sit most of practice today.
Daryl Morey weighs in on the changes to the All-Star Game.
As @TheSteinLine reported, Luka Doncic will have an MRI on his right ankle tomorrow in Dallas. He is not traveling to Houston. Mavs don’t expect to have Doncic for back-to-back vs. Rockets and Hawks at minimum.
A source describes Luka Doncic's right ankle injury as similar to the one he suffered earlier this season. Doncic missed four games and returned to practice 10 days later after his previous ankle sprain.
A source describes Luka Doncic's right ankle injury as similar to the one he suffered earlier this season. Doncic missed four games and returned to practice 11 days later after his previous ankle sprain.
I've heard team executives refer to this as the "Daryl Deduction."
James Harden has been held under 20 points in four of his last nine games. It hadn't happened since the season opener before this slump.
I'm sure the league office will love this.
The Mavs are the only team in playoff position with a worse record at home (13-12) than on the road (16-6). Home duds include losses to likely lottery teams Knicks, Kings, Hornets and Suns.
Luka Doncic: “That wasn’t us today. We’ve got to forget about this game and move on.”
Deandre Ayton calls it a night with a season-high 31 points (13-15 FG) and 9 rebounds. Devin Booker: 32 points, 6 rebounds, 9 assists. Both young Suns stars had more points than minutes in the road blowout of Mavs.
Down 36 with 8:05 to go, Rick Carlisle pulls the plug on the starters. Quite an embarrassing night for the Mavs.
The Mavs held the Suns to 48 points in the third quarter. Devin Booker had 20, only two fewer than the Mavs.
Deandre Ayton (25 points, 11-12 FG) is dominating the Mavs but has to sit after picking up his fourth foul early in the third quarter. That call looked awfully soft to me.
Dirk Nowitzki is making a rare appearance at a Mavs game, wearing a pair of black and gold Kobe’s.
Ref Tyler Ford seems quite sensitive this evening. Has T’d up Luka Doncic and Rick Carlisle in the first six minutes.
Rick Carlisle is coaching in these shoes tonight. Suns coach Monty Williams is also wearing Kobe’s.
After wearing Kobe’s as a tribute last night, Luka Doncic is back in Jordan’s. He has Kobe’s numbers and #Mamba written on one shoe, Gianna’s number and #Mambacita on the other.
New Maverick Willie Cauley-Stein: “This is a great place to restart my career and try to find a home.” He says the Mavs’ system suits his style, specifically running pick-and-roll with Luka Doncic.
Rick Carlisle rocks a pair of Kobe’s to his pregame press conference. “I like these. I’m going to keep them. I’m going to keep the box and hit my equipment people up for as many pairs as I can.”
Kristaps Porzingis will play tonight, Rick Carlisle said. Resting him on a back-to-back will be decided on a case-to-case basis.
The Mavs coaching staff will wear this pin tonight to honor Kobe and Gianna Bryant.
Porzingis had a 20-month layoff before his Mavs debut while rehabbing from a torn ACL in his left knee. Mavs are at least strongly considering enacting their original load management plan.
The Mavs are listing Kristaps Porzingis as questionable vs. the Suns due to left knee injury recovery. Dallas planned entering the season to sit Porzingis one game of each back-to-back, but that happened only once. Porzingis recently missed 10 games due to right knee soreness.
Austin Rivers on Eric Gordon (50 points, 14-22 FG, 6-11 3s, 16-20 FT): “If he played on a lot of other teams, he has All-Star capability, and he sacrifices a lot for this team. Tonight you saw the full effect of how good he is.”
Austin Rivers on W minus two former MVPs and a starting C: “I’m sure Utah came in here like, This is going to be an easy win.’ That’s just natural for any team, but we have a lot of good players. That’s why we feel we can be the team to win something this year, win it all.”
Eric Gordon on the Rockets: “It’s just about all of us collectively, together, playing for one another. Because we can do this thing. We just have to turn this thing around and win a lot of games.”
Rockets 126, Jazz 117 (final). Eric Gordon puts up his first career 50-point performance to lead Houston to stunning win without James Harden, Russell Westbrook and Clint Capela.
Buddy Hield, who wears No. 24, finished with 42 points on 24 field goal attempts.
Eric Gordon has a career-high 43 points. His recent return to form is a major development for the Rockets. Now, if they can get James Harden right again ...
Most bizarre use of confetti in NBA history? It’s coming down in Utah in the middle of the fourth quarter with the Jazz trailing the Rockets by 16.
This is looking like the Jazz version of the Rockets’ Christmas loss against the Warriors. Team that’s been hot putting up a dud vs. team that’s tormented them in the playoffs and is missing its stars.
Rockets don’t have James Harden, Russell Westbrook or Clint Capela and are wrapping up a back-to-back. Jazz have won 19 of 21. So of course the Rockets lead by 13 on the road at halftime.
James Harden is getting some shots up before layup lines. He’s out tonight but day to day.
Rockets starters: Eric Gordon, Austin Rivers, Ben McLemore, Danuel House Jr., PJ Tucker
Will not play, of course
One of what I’m sure will be many Kobe tributes tonight in Utah:
James Harden will not tonight vs. Jazz, per source.
It’d be surprising if James Harden plays tonight, a Rockets source says.
Rockets are listing James Harden (left thigh contusion) as questionable vs. the Jazz. Russell Westbrook will rest due to the back-to-back. Clint Capela (heel contusion) is doubtful.
As the father of two girls in middle school, I’m deeply saddened by Kobe and his daughter Gianna dying together today but inspired by his commitment to being an awesome dad.
The Mavericks have retired No. 24 in honor of Kobe Bryant.
The respect between Rudy Gobert and Luka Doncic is definitely mutual. Gobert, who played against Doncic in Europe, has been saying since the draft that Luka would be a problem in the NBA.
If there was any doubt, Rudy Gobert earned Rick Carlisle’s All-Star vote Saturday.
Rick Carlisle on Rudy Gobert: "He’s probably going to be Defensive Player of the Year again. He impacts the game massively at the defensive end. He doesn’t just do it around the basket. He does it on the perimeter too on switches."
Jazz 112, Mavs 107 (final). Utah wins for the 19th time in 21 games. Rudy Gobert: 22 points, 17 rebounds, 5 blocks. Luka Doncic: 25 points, 6 rebounds, 7 assists
Kristaps Porzingis dunking on Rudy Gobert got a lot of Twitter buzz, but the two-time DPOY got swatted Luka Doncic, Porzingis and Delon Wright on ISO’s today.
I’m not sure how hyped this game was, but it’s at least living up to my high expectations. Jazz 106, Mavs 104 with 1:02 remaining after a putback by Rudy Gobert (21 points, 16 rebounds, 4 blocks).
Willie Cauley-Stein will meet the Mavs in OKC tomorrow night. He will not have any practice time with the team before Monday’s game vs. Thunder, and Rick Carlisle isn’t sure Cauley-Stein will be active for that game.
James Harden (left thigh contusion) is questionable for the Rockets' game Sunday in Denver.
This is all clear now. Mavs-Warriors trade call is about to happen.
The Mavs have the best offensive rating in NBA history at 116.4 points per 100 possessions. Jazz’s offensive rating while winning 18 of their last 20 games: 119.8. Should be a fun one this afternoon in the city of Utah. (Google it if you don’t get the reference.)
Mavs can’t make the Willie Cauley-Stein trade official until Isaiah Roby passes the Thunder physical. Justin Patton will then be waived by Dallas to clear a roster spot. Roby recently missed two months due to plantar fasciitis but returned to G League games this week.
Russell Westbrook: season-high 45 points in win over Timberwolves. James Harden: season-low 12 points. Those are continuations of recent trends, but I wouldn’t jump to conclusion that Westbrook’s scoring has anything to do with Harden’s slump. Harden looks tired. DNP-rest soon?
The Mavs received $800,000 from the Thunder in the trade that sent Justin Patton to Dallas, per source. They’ll waive Patton, whose salary for next season is not guaranteed to clear the roster spot for Willie Cauley-Stein.
Mavs’ trade for Willie Cauley-Stein means they don’t have room for Joakim Noah. But Noah (working out today at Pepperdine) looks healthy and fit. He’s hoping to help a playoff team.
Check that — Dillon Brooks turned 24 this week. But still ...
Grizzlies go with their 23-and-under lineup to slam the door in Detroit.
I’m told the goal in this deal for the Mavs is to create a roster spot. Patton’s minimum salary the next two seasons is nonguaranteed.
Mavs have made 20 3s in a game six times this season. They did it three times in franchise history before this season.
Mavs shooting coach Peter Patton should re-negotiate his contract at halftime.
Lawler's Law might go into effect before halftime tonight.
Mavs go small in their first game without Dwight Powell. I'd expect Rick Carlisle to look at Maxi Kleber as the starting center at some point. In this case, Kristaps Porzingis should be a matchup problem for Hassan Whiteside.
Luka Doncic will be the youngest All-Star starter since LeBron James in 2005.
The Rockets’ 4-game losing streak is over. Garbage time has officially started. Russell Westbrook: 28-16-8-4. James Harden: 27-5-5. Nikola Jokic (19-12-10) could only do so much with five of the Nuggets’ top seven players sidelined.
Russell Westbrook has been the one Rocket really playing well during Houston’s 1-5 funk. He’s been spectacular (26-15-8-4) against a depleted Denver squad tonight.
10 points, 3-3 FG in the first quarter. Braids clearly caused his slump.
James Harden does not appreciate Nikola Jokic’s fantastic flop to draw a foul. I somehow doubt Harden will get a whole lot of sympathy.
Nuggets forward Michael Porter Jr. is unlikely to play against the Rockets due to back tightness that he experienced during his pregame routine. He's expected to be day to day.
The Mavs would have to create a roster spot to sign a center.
Sources: The Mavs have touched base with Joakim Noah as they search for center depth in the wake of Dwight Powell's season-ending injury. Dallas has concerns about Noah's health and is considering several other options, including G League and overseas players.
The MRI on Dwight Powell’s Achilles confirmed the Mavs’ fear. Unfortunately, the Mavs knew Powell was out for the season as soon as he went down.
Hardaway is shooting 42.3% on catch-and-shoot 3s this season, compared to 32.7% for Doncic.
Luka Doncic had zero regrets about swinging the ball to Tim Hardaway Jr. for a potential game-tying 3 late instead of taking the shot himself: "100% right decision." Rick Carlisle agreed: "The way Tim’s shooting the ball, it’s a great play."
J.J. Barea, who battled back from a torn Achilles suffered last season, has no doubt that Dwight Powell will do the same. "Nobody better or mentally stronger to come back from this than him," Barea told ESPN. "Nobody has ever and will ever work as hard as he is going to do."
Kristaps Porzingis (10 points, 4-17 FG, 9 rebounds): “I feel like if I’d have played just a little bit better, we’d have won this game. So this loss is on me.”
Rick Carlisle cited JJ Barea as proof that a player can come back strong from a torn Achilles. He added that Dwight Powell has similar character and work ethic.
Rick Carlisle calls it a “somber night” due to Dwight Powell’s injury. MRI tomorrow to confirm, but “feared to be severe.”
Clippers 110, Mavs 107 (final). Kawhi Leonard: 35 points, 11 rebounds, 2 assists, 3 steals. Luka Doncic: 36-10-9.
Mavs couldn’t have asked for a better look with a chance to tie the game than the 3 Tim Hardaway Jr. took after a swing pass from Luka Doncic. They’ll get another shot after JaMychal Green misses both free throws. There’s 11.6 seconds left.
Porzingis checks in with 2:23 to go, Mavs down 3 pending Harrell FT
Will be interesting to see whether Rick Carlisle goes back to Kristaps Porzingis (4-17 FG, 1-8 3s). Porzingis, who has played 25 minutes, obviously isn’t in rhythm after missing 10 games. Tie game with 6:22 remaining.
With Pat Beverley (groin) out, Luka Doncic dominated the third quarter, scoring 13 points and dishing out three assists. Clippers started doubling him late, and I’d expect that to continue. Mavs down 4 entering the fourth.
Clippers point guard Pat Beverley (sore right groin) will not return against the Mavericks.
ESPN story on Mavs starting center Dwight Powell’s likely season-ending Achilles injury:
Kristaps Porzingis starts the second half at center with Dwight Powell out. Mavs go small with JJ Barea as the fifth guy.
The obvious fear is that this is a season-ending injury for Dwight Powell, a critical role player and major part of the Mavs’ culture.
Dwight Powell (right Achilles injury) will not return tonight, Mavs announce.
Mavs center Dwight Powell suffered a non-contact lower right leg injury when he attempted to drive. He appeared to be in agony before being helped to the locker room.
It only took four minutes, 55 seconds for the Mavs to get a bucket.
Nothing like a combined 1-of-17 shooting start to thrill the national TV audience.
Rick Carlisle: “Porzingis is scheduled to play. He’s looking forward to playing.” He says Porzingis will play in shorter stints than normal.
James Harden just finished his postgame shooting session on the Toyota Center court.
Russell Westbrook: “Honestly, I thought we played a pretty good game. We played a good game for the most part. Obviously the last 6 minutes we didn’t play our best basketball, but I thought we had pretty much control of the game. There’s some good we can take out of this game.”
“If we’re going to walk by a window, a piano is gonna fall out.”
Mike D’Antoni: “Right now, we’re in a period where if something goes bad, it goes bad. When it rains, it pours, and it’s pouring.”
Thunder 112, Rockets 107 (final). Houston blows a 17-point lead in the final 15:20 of the Rockets’ fourth straight loss and fifth in six games. OKC scored 41 points in the fourth quarter.
James Harden’s last three possessions: missed 3, charge, turnover that led to Thunder’s go-ahead bucket in transition. Russell Westbrook might have to close this one for the Rockets.
Here comes Chris Paul. Thunder down one with 1:48 to go.
All tied up. This Thunder rally has happened with CP3 cheering and coaching from the bench.
Thunder have sliced Rockets’ lead from 16 to two during the fourth quarter with 4:19 to go. Tense times for a Houston team that has lost four of five.
Russell Westbrook (26-10-10) has a triple-double with almost 11 minutes remaining.
After a 27-point first half, Chris Paul had one point in the third quarter. Houston held OKC to only 14 points in the quarter, and it’s approaching blowout territory now.
James Harden has airballed more 3s than he’s made tonight. He’s 1-of-14 from long range as his midseason slump continues. Still has 24 points (6-10 2s, 9-10 FT).
Clint Capela picks up his fifth foul less than two minutes into the third quarter. Thunder go small as he exits. Ref Kevin Cutler might be the tallest guy on the court right now.
Steven Adams is officially out for the rest of the game.
No sign of Steven Adams as the second half starts. Nerlens Noel (left ankle) was a late scratch, so Mike Muscala is the Thunder’s only available big man.
Pretty good show in the first half by the point guards who got traded for each other. Chris Paul: 27-3-1, 9-12 FG Russell Westbrook: 16-7-7, 8-10 FG
Chris Paul (27 points, 9-11 FG) has kept the Thunder in the game despite OKC having only three starters available. He has more than half of the Thunder’s points.
Steven Adams is questionable to return with a left ankle sprain, according to the Thunder. He has been in the locker room since shooting the free throws after a flagrant foul by Clint Capela early in the game.
After a collision with Clint Capela, Steven Adams hobbled to the locker room. Capela was called for a flagrant 1. The Thunder called timeout to allow Adams to return to shoot the free throws. He would have been automatically ruled out the rest of the game if he didn't take the...
Jazz lock up a critical role player. Royce O’Neale gets the toughest defensive assignment every night and is knocking down 44.3% of his 3s.
After four losses in the last five games, the Rockets have slipped to sixth in the West at their season’s midway point.
Loud MVP chants for LeBron James in James Harden’s arena.
PJ Tucker is back on the Rockets’ bench and looks like he’s ready to return.
It looks like PJ Tucker might have suffered another stinger in his right shoulder. He had one a week ago. Went straight to the locker room.
Anthony Davis is out again tonight for the Lakers, per Frank Vogel.
Mike D’Antoni on Dwight Howard playing well in his second stint with the Lakers: “Dwight is a very talented basketball player. If he’s happy and wanting to do it, there’s no reason he can’t be successful.”
Luka Doncic on Carmelo Anthony (22 points, 8-16 FG vs. Mavs): “He’s still a walking bucket out there. He’s still got the game, and it’s beautiful to watch.”
Luka Doncic puts a couple of daggers in the wounded Blazers with a driving layup and deep 3. He’s got 35 (career-best 8-12 3s), 8 rebounds, 7 assists.
CJ McCollum will not return vs. Mavs due to a left ankle sprain, according to the Trail Blazers. He injured it when he landed on Maxi Kleber's foot after driving to the basket.
CJ McCollum appeared to roll his left ankle. Headed back to locker room with Trail Blazers’ athletic trainers.
Rick Carlisle on @1033fmESPN: “No setback, per se, no. He just happened to be a bit sore before the Sacramento game, so we pulled the plug. My understanding was he had a good day today, so he’s out tonight and we’ll kind of see where he is in the next few days.”
The Mavericks downgraded Kristaps Porzingis from questionable to out. This will be the 10th straight game Porzingis misses due to right knee soreness.
Jeez, the refs couldn't even get the date right.
The bizarre officiating shouldn't overshadow Brandon Ingram's spectacular performance. Had an efficient 49 points and 6 assists. He roasted a really good defender in Royce O'Neale and went right at two-time DPOY Rudy Gobert on multiple occasions. He sure looks like a max player.
This is going to be one of the most entertaining last two minute reports ever. The call to foul out Rudy Gobert -- which survived a challenge -- might have been even worse than the gift whistle the Jazz got to get to OT.
Alvin Gentry's postgame press conference will be epic if the Pelicans don't pull this out in OT.
Mavericks are listing Kristaps Porzingis as questionable for Friday’s game vs. Trail Blazers. Safe to assume nothing will be certain regarding his return until after he finishes his pregame warmup.
Mike D’Antoni after Rockets’ third loss in four games: “The focus is more on looking at the back of the jersey instead of the front. We just need to get over it, and we will. Every ship gets rocked sometimes. We’re getting rocked right now.”
Carmelo Anthony insisted that he had no extra emotions about facing the Rockets for the first time since his awkward 10-game stint in Houston.
Mike D’Antoni says Rockets’ “ship is getting rocked.” He’s made some excuses but then quickly admits they’re excuses.
Twenty minutes later, we are still waiting for Mike D’Antoni’s press conference to begin. Highly unusual, but these are rocky times for the Rockets, who have lost 3 of 4.
Trail Blazers 117, Rockets 107 (final). James Harden scores a season-low 13 points on 3-12 FG. Carmelo Anthony: 18 points, 7-10 FG, 12 rebounds.
Melo had a little extra hop in his skip and a big smile on his face after hitting a 3 right in front of the Rockets bench. He has 18 points (7-10 FG) and 12 rebounds to help the Blazers lead by 11.
Russell Westbrook has a triple-double.
Russell Westbrook (31-10-9) is pretty much the only reason the Rockets are in this game. Trail the Blazers by 6 midway through the fourth quarter.
Double T’s after extending chirping between Damian Lillard and Russell Westbrook. They have a little history.
Mike D’Antoni basically said before the game that the Rockets were pretty blah at the midway point of the season. Their performance through three quarters won’t change his mind. Blazers up 13.
It took less than 20 minutes this time.
Who had the worst plus-minus in this game by a whole lot?
Melo revenge game in process: 11 points, 4-4 FG in 12 minutes vs. Rockets.
Mavs are “playing it safe,” a source said, downplaying any significant concern about Kristaps Porzingis’ sore right knee.
Kristaps Porzingis is a late scratch again. The Mavs had declared him available and planned on him playing. This will be the ninth straight game he misses.
Kristaps Porzingis’ return tonight gives me a reason to plug my recent story about how he’s accepted and adapted to the Mavs reprogramming him to be Luka Doncic’s co-star.
I don’t get the outrage. Screen assists are tracked by the official NBA stats site.
That’s a lot lower profile and less pressure than if Zion made his debut one game earlier against Ja Morant’s Grizzlies in an MLK Day matinee on TNT.
Kristaps Porzingis is still listed as questionable on this afternoon’s injury report, but the plan is for him to play tonight in Sacramento, per sources. He has missed the last eight games due to right knee soreness.
“I’m having a lot of fun,” Ja Morant said after perhaps his most spectacular performance so far. So are Memphis fans and everyone involved with the surging Grizzlies.
I dressed up to go on Verno’s show today.
Austin Rivers on Ja Morant: "He has superstar ability. He's special. ... Memphis got one, man. They got a good one. He’s got a team that’s playing well. They beat us, they’re in the playoffs right now. It’s unbelievable. He’s the biggest reason."
Ja Morant gave a little glimpse into the kind of teammate he is when asked about this play. He pointed out that Solomon Hill running the floor created the opportunity to hit Jaren Jackson Jr. for the dunk. "Credit to Solo for that play and great finish by Jaren," Morant said.
Mike D’Antoni on Ja Morant: “It’s hard to stay in front of him. He is fast and athletic. He’s going to be a great player. He already is.”
Grizzlies 121, Rockets 110 (final). Ja Morant: 26-5-8 on 10-11 FG. James Harden: 41-6-6 on 13-37 FG.
Grizzlies are 11-0 when Dillon Brooks scores at least 20 this season. He has 21. Memphis leads Houston by 8 with 5:30 remaining.
All five Jazz starters have plus-minus totals in the positive triple digits during Utah’s 10-game win streak, led by Rudy Gobert’s 137 and Joe Ingles’ 136.
James Harden has 26 points at halftime, but Ja Morant has been the best player on floor. Rook has 13 points (5-5 FG) and 5 assists — with at least three ridiculous highlight dimes. Grizzlies up 6.
Ja Morant has become a must watch. He’s a highlight waiting to happen and pulls off the spectacular within the flow of the game. I’m having a lot of fun watching from courtside tonight despite @ChrisVernonShow sitting next to me and acting like a kid in a candy store.
With Russell Westbrook testing, Austin Rivers will start for the Rockets. “Someone is gonna have to chase Ja Morant around, and I’m gonna let Austin do it,” Mike D’Antoni said. Eric Gordon will come off the bench.
Kristaps Porzingis remains listed as questionable on the official NBA injury report for tonight’s game at Golden State. I’m told it’s more likely that Porzingis, who has missed last seven games due to right knee soreness, returns tomorrow night at Sacramento.
Honored to be the opening act for @aa000G9 on @ChrisVernonShow today.
Mavs list Kristaps Porzingis, who practiced today, as questionable for Tuesday vs. Warriors. He’s been dealing with illness in addition to right knee soreness that has sidelined him last seven games.
Rudy Gobert leads the NBA in the following clutch categories: plus-minus (66), field goal percentage (84.2%, minimum 10 attempts), rebounds (35) and blocked shots (9).
The only NBA teams with more wins than the Grizzlies since Ja Morant returned from his back injury are the Bucks and Jazz.
Jonas Valanciunas — only 27 years old (so will still be in prime when Grizzlies’ kids get really good) — goes for 31 and 19 in 28 minutes vs. Warriors.
Boban would prefer the dunk contest: “I’m the only guy who can dunk without jumping. We’d get some 10s.”
Should Boban be in the 3-point contest? “Yes,” Luka Doncic said. “Ahead of me.”
Mavs bench celebrated Boban hitting a garbage-time 3 like it was a game-winning buzzer-beater. It put the finishing touches on a 109-91 win over Philly to salvage a split on the 6-game homestand.
Luka Doncic calls it a night with a 19-8-12 line. He didn’t shoot the ball well (4-15 FG) but dominated the second half as a facilitator.
Dwight Powell (18 points, 12 rebounds) is thoroughly enjoying playing the 76ers without Joel Embiid.
Boban is back on the bench and available to return.
Boban Marjanovic is headed to the locker room to get his right knee evaluated. He had 9 points in 7 minutes.
Boban revenge game.
Dallas did the bullying in the third quarter. Mavs outscored 76ers 32-16 and outrebounded them 18-9.
Sixers 50, Mavs 41 at the half. That’s the Mavs’ lowest-scoring half of the season.
Ben Simmons picking up his third foul — two fighting over screens — is a huge break for the Mavs. He’s dominating this game.
It’s fairly miraculous that the Mavs are only down two after the first quarter, considering the 76ers’ 31-15 edge in field goals attempted. Philly is beating up the Mavs physically and denting the rim with bricked shots.
Ben Simmons’ defense on Luka Doncic in the first 5 minutes was spectacularly smothering.
Luka Doncic: “I’ve got to get better — a lot.”
The uncensored quote from Mavs PR’s transcription:
Rick Carlisle, when asked whether there are drastic changes he'd like to see with NBA officiating: "I'm not going to get into that stuff here. You should see my credit card bill from Christmas. I’m not going to spend more money on that."
Luka Doncic on how he handles frustration: “I know I can get better. There’s a lot of things. I’m 20 years old. I’ve got a lot of things that I can do better.”
Rick Carlisle gave an interesting, insightful answer to a question about how Luka Doncic handles frustration. It included Carlisle mentioning that he “didn’t know whether to s— or wind my wrist watch” when he was 20 years old. The man has a way with words.
Luka Doncic is done for the night. Finishes with 25 points, 10 rebounds, seven assists, six turnovers and one ripped jersey. Mavs will fall to 2-4 during Kristaps Porzingis’ absence due to right knee soreness. Mavs vs. 76ers tomorrow night.
LeBron James is reminding us that, as great as Luka Doncic is, this is still LeBron’s league.
Well, he made it longer than I thought. Tossed with 9:49 remaining.
Five turnovers and five missed free throws for Luka Doncic so far. His body language is screaming frustration.
I’ve got a feeling that Rick Carlisle will end up watching some of this game in his office. He already has one T and is going after the refs hard. David Guthrie just gave him an extended side-eye.
The current eighth seed in the West: the Memphis Grizzlies, who are much more competitive than expected right now and have a chance to be really good in a few years.
James Harden: "That was dope. Obviously we got smacked, but it was a dope environment. Oklahoma City, as usual, showed mad love to Russell and everything he’s done for those 11 years he was here. Obviously, an unbelievable fan base, and it was just a beautiful thing to see."
The guy the Thunder got in the Russell Westbrook trade just got a standing ovation.
Best matchup so far tonight: @KDTrey5 vs. @KendrickPerkins
Thunder up 12 at the half. Russell Westbrook (18 points, 7-11 FG) is the only reason the Rockets are remotely within striking distance.
James Harden: 1-10 FG. I guess we’re seeing why this guy couldn’t even crack the Thunder’s starting lineup.
Chris Paul, waiting to check in, to the ref as Russell Westbrook goes to the line: “Justin! C’mon, man, you ain’t gotta welcome him back, too!”
Rockets guard Eric Gordon, who recently returned from knee surgery, will warm up but probably not play tonight vs. Thunder.
Russell Westbrook runs to the opposite tunnel for the first time after hitting his usual out-of-bounds shot to wrap up his pregame warmup.
Russell Westbrook’s Thunder-colored Jordans:
Forgive my photography skills, but Russell Westbrook’s shirt reads “ZERO REGRETS” for his OKC return.
With Kristaps Porzingis out, Mavs might miss Anthony Davis and Joel Embiid during the upcoming home back-to-back.
ESPN story on Kristaps Porzingis’ treatment for his right knee soreness:
Filed to ESPN: Kristaps Porzingis recently had a PRP injection in the sore right knee that has sidelined him since New Year’s Day. Mavs commonly use that kind of injection to treat injuries. Illness has delayed his recovery. He’ll miss his 6th straight game vs. Lakers.
Rick Carlisle recently declared that the “post-up just isn’t a good play anymore.” Well, Nikola Jokic 1-on-1 vs. a much smaller defender is certainly an exception.
Mavs' overall offensive rating: 115.3 points per 100 possessions (1st in NBA) Clutch (last 5 minutes, score within 5): 91.0 (28th) Super clutch (last 3 minutes, score within 3): 77.2 (28th)
Luka Doncic left without speaking to the media after going scoreless in the fourth quarter of the Mavs’ loss to the Nuggets. It’s the second time this season a frustrated Doncic has done this. He takes losses hard and on several occasions has publicly blamed himself.
Nuggets 107, Mavs 106 (final). Nikola Jokic: 33-6-7 and the game-winning bucket. Mavs’ offense went kaput in the clutch again.
The post-up is absolutely a good play when Nikola Jokic gets a switch against a small forward.
Luka Doncic went to pull off his warmup pants when he was checking in. Then he realized he wasn’t wearing them and pulled down his game shorts instead. Awkward.
Nikola Jokic went off for 21 points in the third quarter, but the Nuggets didn’t make up any ground. Mavs up three. Jokic (28-5-7) and Luka Doncic (27-7-8) are putting on a show.
Nikola Jokic is in bully mode with 14 of his 21 points in the third quarter. Wonder if Rick Carlisle calls on Boban to bang with his buddy Jokic at some point.
Felt like the Nuggets did a pretty good job defending Luka Doncic in the first half. And he has 15 points and 7 assists.
James Harden has now scored 82 points in four quarters of action against the Hawks this season.
Up next: CP3 will try to ruin Russ’ OKC return Thursday night.
The Rockets could also end up filling the open roster spot with a player from the buyout market, per source.
Rockets are waiving forward Gary Clark, source confirms, adding that Houston could bring him back on a team-friendly deal similar to the one recently signed by guard Chris Clemons. The rest of Clark's salary would have been guaranteed today.
Mavs list Kristaps Porzingis as out for Wednesday's gams against the Nuggets. It would be the fifth straight game Porzingis misses due to right knee soreness.
Highest-scoring triple-doubles this season: 44 -- James Harden 42 -- Luka Doncic 41 -- Luka Doncic 39 -- Luka Doncic 39 -- LeBron James 38 -- Luka Doncic 38 -- Luka Doncic 35 -- Luka Doncic 33 -- Luka Doncic
Asked Kristaps Porzingis if he’d play Wednesday against the Nuggets after missing the last four games due to right knee soreness. “Maybe, I hope so,” he said.
Mavs 118, Bulls 110 (final). Luka Doncic goes for 38-11-10.
Luka Doncic has his 11th triple-double of the season. He’s scored at least 30 in nine of them.
Bulls center Wendell Carter Jr. will not return due to a right ankle sprain. X-rays were negative.
Tim Hardaway Jr. doesn’t look too rusty after missing three games with a sore hamstring. Has 14 points on 5-5 FG in 9 minutes.
The Rockets are committed to holding Russell Westbrook out of one end of back-to-backs. But there was no way he was sitting out in OKC for obvious reasons.
Tim Hardaway Jr. (hamstring) has been upgraded to questionable for Monday against the Bulls after missing the Mavs' previous three games. Kristaps Porzingis (right knee soreness) remains out but is optimistic he will return this week.
No Kawhi Leonard today, but it's still pretty alarming that the Clippers gave up 45 to the Knicks in the first quarter a day after the Grizzlies scored 140.
The good news for Rockets: There has been a noticeable change in Russell Westbrook's shot selection recently. Almost half of his FGAs over last month have been in restricted area. He's averaging 27.8 ppg on 54.0 true shooting % in that span, when Rockets are 10-2 when he plays.
The Mavs have the most efficient offense in NBA history with 115.3 points per 100 possessions. But they rank 28th this season in clutch offensive rating (92.3).
Luka Doncic: "It’s true, I’m not going to lie. But you know, it’s just basketball. It’s a physical game. If the refs see it, they’re going to call it. If they don’t see it, they’re not going to call it. But I’ve just got to keep going. Just keep going."
Luka Doncic used five words to sum up his feelings about breaking Jason Kidd’s franchise record for triple-doubles in a season: “I don’t care about it.”
Hornets 123, Mavs 120 (final in OT). Luka Doncic: 39-12-10. Devonte’ Graham: 27 points, 13 assists. Terry Rozier: 29-6-8. After three losses in four games, the Mavs have slipped to sixth in the West.
Luka Doncic has his 10th triple-double of the season, breaking the franchise record set by Jason Kidd in 1995-96. But Mavs down three with 41.2 seconds left.
Who didn’t want overtime on a Saturday night?
Mavs in first half: 44 points, 4-22 3s Mavs in third quarter: 40 points, 6-11 3s
After an awful offensive first half, the Mavs get back in the game by scoring 17 points in the first 3:14 of the third quarter. Luka Doncic already has 5 points and 4 assists in the quarter — and a 22-8-7 line in the game.
Hornets 57, Mavs 44 at the half. They need to repaint the rim after the Mavs went 4-of-22 from 3-point range.
Rick Carlisle about the way teams defend Luka Doncic: “They’re beating the s— out of him. He’s handling it well, but teams are taking liberties with him.” He says it’s happening more frequently as the season goes along despite constant communication with refs. “It isn’t right.”
Ben Simmons is an elite power forward who is playing out of position. He should be a hyperathletic, taller version of Draymond Green.
Sixers coach Brett Brown said he likes “the spirit of our group,” but that wasn’t the vibe in the Philadelphia locker room. “Losing four in a row sucks, and it doesn’t feel like we’re getting better,” Joel Embiid said.
Ben Simmons: “We’ve just got to stay locked in. We can’t be too distant from each other. We’ve got to be a team.”
Joel Embiid after the Sixers’ fourth straight loss: “It’s taking a toll on me. All I care about is winning. It sucks. We’ve got to find a way.”
Sixers coach Brett Brown says he thinks “spirit” of the team is good despite four straight losses. “They’re smart enough to know that there’s talent in that room. ... Good days will add up. I think the character will prevail.”
Rockets 118, Sixers 108 (final). James Harden: 44-11-11. Clint Capela: 30-14-3. Philly has lost four straight and seven of 10.
James Harden has his first triple-double of the season and 43rd of his career.
Embiid checks in with 3:17 remaining, Sixers down 7 (8 after Capela’s free throw).
Sixers have pulled within 7, but Joel Embiid isn’t checking back in during timeout with 4:26 remaining.
Forget managing James Harden’s minutes. Mike D’Antoni goes to him with 11:21 remaining after Sixers pull within striking distance.
James Harden has to lead the league in 70-plus-foot dimes every year. Just hit Russell Westbrook in stride with a ridiculous pass for a highlight dunk.
Rockets scored 20 points in the first quarter and 40 in the second. James Harden (23 points, 7-13 FG, 4 assists) is in MVP form.
I’m told it’s likely that Kristaps Porzingis misses one more game due to his sore right knee, but he’s expected to return next week.
Big crowd around Maxi Kleber’s locker after he scores a season 18 points on 6-of-7 shooting. “You guys know I’m not Luka, right?” Kleber asks the media.
Mavs 123, Nets 111 (final). Luka Doncic finishes with a 31-13-7 line and scored 15 of his points in the fourth quarter to put the game away.
Tim Hardaway Jr. is doing some light shooting, a good sign that his absence could be short term as far as hamstrings go.
James Harden has now won four of the last six West player of the month awards.
“Just being cautious,” source replied when I asked if Kristaps Porzingis’ right knee soreness is a significant concern.
Luka Doncic is listed as probable due to a right thigh contusion. The left wrist sprain and back contusion he suffered Sunday in LA are not listed on the official injury report.
Kristaps Porzingis (right knee soreness) has been downgraded to out for the Mavs' home game against the Nets. It is the second consecutive game Porzingis will miss after being a late scratch before Tuesday's loss in Oklahoma City.
The reprogramming of “The Unicorn” — How Kristaps Porzingis has struggled and succeeded to adapt his game with the Mavs to fit as Luka Doncic’s sidekick.
Mavs power forward Kristaps Porzingis (right knee soreness) is listed as questionable for Thursday's game against the Nets. Shooting guard Tim Hardaway Jr. (hamstring) will miss his second consecutive game.
Mavs reserve Ryan Broekhoff suffered a fracture of the proximal head of his left fibula, the team announced. There is no timetable for his return.
Isaiah Hartenstein has earned the Rockets’ backup center role by averaging 14.7 points and 11.3 rebounds over the last three games. “For right now, for sure,” Mike D’Antoni said.
James Harden calls it a night with Rockets up 22 with three minutes to go. He finished with 35 on 10-17 FG. Denver doubled a bunch in first half and Rockets picked it apart with ball movement. Didn’t double much in second — Harden scored 20 on 10 FGAs.
Nothing fires up an NBA crowd like a free sandwich.
James Harden came up limping after driving for a layup. He reached for his left ankle. Eric Gordon went to sub in for him, but Harden overruled that.
This is not the knee that Porzingis the ACL in two years ago.
Rockets 69, Nuggets 52 at the half. James Harden has 15 points on a strange shooting line (4-7 FG, 3-4 3s, 4-8 FT). Russell Westbrook has 18 points and 4 assists.
Paul Millsap (knee) is in the Nuggets' starting lineup, but Gary Harris (shin) will sit out against the Rockets.
Nuggets coach Mike Malone on double-teaming James Harden: “I know it’s probably frustrating for him, but he should take it as a sign of huge respect, because people are scheming to take the ball out of the best scorer in recent memory’s hands.”
James Harden (toe) and Clint Capela (heel) will play against the Nuggets, Rockets coach Mike D'Antoni said.
Mavs star Luka Doncic (left wrist sprain, back contusion) has been upgraded to probable for the New Year's Eve game in Oklahoma City. Tim Hardaway Jr. (hamstring) has been downgraded to out.
Mavs list Luka Doncic (left wrist sprain, back contusion) and Tim Hardaway Jr. (left hamstring strain) as questionable for Tuesday's game in Oklahoma City.
James Harden (sprained toe) and Clint Capela (heel contusion) are listed as questionable for the Rockets' Tuesday home game against the Nuggets. Harden missed his first game of the season in Sunday's loss to the Pelicans. Capela sat out the last two games.
I think 2 minutes was the over-under for when Barea would draw an offensive foul. Hope you took the under.
With Tim Hardaway Jr. out due to a hamstring injury, JJ Barea starts the second half for the Mavs. Barea hasn't played much this season, but he's proven he can provide a spark on nights the Mavs' No. 1-ranked offense is sputtering.
Mavs fans — and folks who just enjoy watching fun hoops — can breathe a big sigh of relief.
This could be a significant blow to the Mavs. Tim Hardaway Jr. has averaged 16.9 ppg on .467/.438/.861 shooting splits since moving into the starting lineup
James Harden’s availability vs. Pelicans will be determined based on how his toe feels during his pregame shooting/warmup routine, per source.
James Harden is listed as questionable for Rockets' game in New Orleans tonight due to a right toe sprain. Russell Westbrook (rest) and Clint Capela (heel contusion) are out.
Beating the Clippers in LA is probably the Jazz's most impressive win of the season. Utah has won 7 of 8. They beat up on bad teams for most of that stretch but got a statement-type win tonight.
Rockets 108, Nets 98 (final). James Harden: 44-10-6. Russell Westbrook: 23-9-7.
The 22-point lead the Rockets jumped out to in the first quarter is toast. Nets are up after opening the fourth with a 11-1 run.
That was the fifth time this season James Harden scored at least 20 points in a quarter. He did it six times in 2018-19.
James Harden 23, Nets 18 as he checks out for his first rest. Russell Westbrook has 14 now. None of the other Rockets have scored, but I don’t believe they’re too worried about balance at the moment.
Just like Mike D’Antoni always dreamed, Russell Westbrook is torching the Nets on midrange jumpers. He has 12 points in seven minutes.
Is there a height requirement?
Nets coach Kenny Atkinson on Kyrie Irving: “I know he’s desperate to get back. He’s doing everything he can do. Like I’ve said all along, shoulders are tricky.”
The Rockets downgraded center Clint Capela from doubtful to out against the Nets due to the heel contusion that's been bothering him.
This story, as much as all the numbers he put up and games he helped win with the Grizzlies, sums up why Memphis loves Z-Bo so much. He's a dude that grew up rough, never forgot his roots and loves giving back to folks like him.
Heck of a career for Z-Bo, a bully with a big heart.
The Mavs' offensive rating has dipped from 116.9 to 115.3 since Luka Doncic sprained his ankle. It's still the most efficient offense in NBA history and a full point better than the No. 2 offense this season. So perhaps more post-ups might not be necessary to fix it.
Rick Carlisle sent a post-midnight text to several reporters to note a piece of NBA history.
Luka Doncic: “I’m not going to lie, I was pretty tired going to the end of the game. It’s different. It’s difficult when you’re out four or five games. You’ve got to catch up. It’s going to get better.”
A postgame X-ray on Kristaps Porzingis’ left foot was negative. It’s been sore, but he doesn’t think it will cause him to miss time.
This was part of a pretty strong anti-post-up, pro-KP rant from Carlisle.
Rick Carlisle: “A post-up is not a good play anymore. It’s just not a good play. It’s not a good play for a 7-foot-3 guy. It’s a low-value situation.” So, no, he doesn’t agree with TNT broadcasters that Kristaps Porzingis needs to post-up more. Mavs love how KP spaces floor.
Mavs 102, Spurs 98 (final). Luka Doncic has kind of a ho-hum 24-10-8 night in his return from a sprained right ankle.
Pop asks ref after Dejounte Murray was called for fouling Luka Doncic: “What do you want him to do, disappear?”
Luka Doncic showed some signs of rust in his 10-minute stint to start the game — 0-3 on 3s, 3 turnovers without an assist. But his ankle looks fine, as evidenced by his two-hand slam dunk off a sweet no-look feed from Seth Curry. Doncic has 10 points on 4-8 FG.
Rick Carlisle says Luka Doncic won’t have any minutes restriction in his return. “We’ll just see how it goes,” he said, noting that longer timeouts in national TV game eases concern about fatigue.
Sources: G Chris Clemons signed a 3-year deal with Rockets with the second season nonguaranteed and a team option on the final season. Remainder of this season is guaranteed prorated minimum. He was on two-way deal and out of days of service. Has averaged 4.8 points in 20 games.
Sources: The Mavs are planning for Luka Doncic to make his return from a sprained right ankle tonight against the Spurs. He has missed last four games and is officially listed as questionable.
Mavericks are officially listing Luka Doncic as questionable for Thursday’s home game vs. Spurs. He has missed the last four games due to a right ankle sprain.
ESPN story on Luka Doncic’s progress in recovery from sprained ankle and potential return Thursday vs. Spurs:
Luka Doncic was a full participant in practice. Status for Thursday vs. Spurs is TBD, “but things are looking better and better,” Rick Carlisle said.
Well, I think Adam Silver can count out the Mavs’ vote.
Maybe the biggest impact here is that the Russ-led lineups when Harden rests have gone from disastrous to good. Those lineups had a minus-10.9 net rating before Russ’ recent roll; they’ve been plus-6.7 in his last 8 games.
Derrick Jones Jr. got Rudy Gobert here. Potential dunk of year over 2-time DPOY ... But Gobert just had a monster dunk on Meyers Leonard and stuffed a Bam Adebayo dunk try on consecutive possessions.
Jazz get some much-needed scoring for the second unit.
“It’s a Christmas miracle!” the Scotiabank Arena PA guy hollered after the Raptors rallied from 30 down to beat the Mavs. NBA teams that trailed by 20 entering the fourth were 3-1,667 (.002) over the last decade.
Toronto also broke a franchise record by scoring 47 points in the fourth quarter.
The Raptors just pulled off the biggest comeback in franchise history by rallying from 30 down to beat the Mavs. It’s the first regular-season 30-point comeback in the NBA in a decade, per @ESPNStatsInfo.
Raptors have outscored Mavs 38-11 so far in the fourth quarter. Kyle Lowry (15) has more points than the Mavs in the quarter.
The Mavs’ lead has shriveled from 30 to two points with 5:36 remaining. Kyle Lowry has taken over this game.
After missing their first 11 shots of the game, the Mavs have dominated a depleted Toronto team. Up 23 entering the fourth quarter. Dwight Powell (15 points, 9 rebounds) is having a heck of a game in his hometown with 50 friends/family members in the crowd.
The Mavs have more turnovers (7) than buckets (5) but only trail the Raptors by 3 after the first quarter. This game won’t win any beauty pageants.
Darrell Armstrong with the help defense:
Luka Doncic is moving pretty well during an extended pregame workout. He’ll be at least a limited participant in Tuesday’s practice. His status for Thursday’s home game vs. Spurs might not be determined until game day, but there is some optimism that he’ll return then.
Luka Doncic pregame:
There’s a large Slovenian contingent here in Toronto today. They got to the arena early to watch Luka Doncic’s workout.
Rick Carlisle on Luka Doncic’s pending return: “The group of games after Christmas is definitely in play, but nothing has been determined yet.”
Is this worse than booing Santa?
Story with @NickDePaula on Luka Doncic's soon-to-be-official deal with Jordan Brand ... Per sources, Luka won't have a signature shoe right away but could earn that elevated status.
How deep do the Mavs roll? They outscore opponents by 7.4 points per 100 possessions when Luka Doncic isn’t on the floor. Only teams with better overall net ratings: Bucks (12.2), Mavs (8.5) and Lakers (8.2).
Mavs are now 11-2 on the road, tied with the Bucks for the NBA’s best road record. Dallas’ road success includes wins in Denver, Houston, LA (Lakers), Milwaukee and now Philadelphia.
The Sixers were 14-0 at home a few days ago. Now getting booed by their own fans. Barring a miraculous comeback, Luka-less Mavs are going to manage to win on the road at Milwaukee and Philly this week.
Kristaps Porzingis has a career-high 16 rebounds with 11 minutes to go. He’s improved drastically as a rebounder with the Mavs.
Philly fans are warming up for Cowboys-Eagles on Sunday with a light “Dallas sucks!” chant.
Scattered boos for the 76ers from the home crowd. (Philly folks got mad at me the last time I was in this building because I joked about Santa booing. So I won’t. Merry Christmas, Philly!)
Tim Hardaway Jr. in the last two games: 19 points, 5-27 FG Hardaway in first 11 minutes vs. Sixers: 19 points, 7-8 FG
Mavs don’t wait long to go to the zone. Gotta feeling that the Sixers will see a lot of zone again tonight.
Rick Carlisle expects guards Seth Curry (lower back tightness) and Delon Wright (sprained finger), both listed as questionable, to play tonight vs. 76ers.
The Luka-less Mavs will face a heavily depleted Raptors team on Sunday.
Mavs reserve guards Seth Curry (lower back tightness) and Delon Wright (sprained finger) are questionable for Friday's road game against the 76ers. Curry has been hot, averaging 20.5 points on 60.8% shooting in the last four games.
Rick Carlisle has had success over the years junking games up by playing zone. His Mavs face Sixers tomorrow night.
One of the better questions I’ve ever heard asked of Rick Carlisle
Celtics 109, Mavs 103 (final). Kemba Walker vs. Mavs this season: 61 points on 35 field goal attempts. No wonder they wanted to max him out.
I’m a bit surprised that on a night when the Mavs struggled so much offensively that Rick Carlisle didn’t go to JJ Barea. Carlisle opted to go with Delon Wright over Jalen Brunson in crunch time.
Mavs are shooting 36.5% from the floor and 28.6% from 3. Having Luka Doncic would obviously help, but it doesn’t feel like Mavs are struggling to generate decent looks.
Jayson Tatum and Jaylen Brown look a lot like the young stars who led the Celtics to the East finals a couple of seasons ago.
For the first time in his career, Kristaps Porzingis has three straight 20-10 games.
Celtics coach Brad Stevens said Gordon Hayward has been dealing with lingering foot soreness since before his hand injury. Hayward had a cortisone shot and it didn’t respond well. Will get another MRI tomorrow.
Luka Doncic will join Mavs on Philly/Toronto trip but is “highly unlikely” to play in either game, per Rick Carlisle. “He’s doing well,” Carlisle said. “He continues to progress. He’s doing some very light shooting, no significant on-court work yet, but he’s progressing well.”
Doncic also did a little slow-speed pick-and-roll simulation before wrapping up his light workout.
“Let him rehab in the G League,” Mark Cuban says after a Luka Doncic miss.
Doncic is doing stand-still shooting and shooting off one dribble, not close to full speed.
Mark Cuban to Luka Doncic: “C’mon, let’s play 1-on-1. I’ll kick your ass.”
Kevin Scott was the baseline ref for this blown call and James Harden's dunk that didn't count in San Antonio. It's been a rough December for him.
Mike Conley’s return after two weeks out is cut short when his hamstring acts up again.
RIP, Hayden Fry. As a young Denton Record-Chronicle reporter, I had the pleasure of sitting down with him and talking about his fun Mean Green run. The legendary coach couldn't have been any cooler.
Mavs backup PG Jalen Brunson has averaged 15.5 points and 9.5 assists and been plus-19 in the last two games, when he’s had a much larger role due to Luka Doncic’s injury. Mavs got two steals in last year’s draft — trading up for Doncic at No. 3 and taking Brunson at No. 33.
Kristaps Porzingis was 4-of-8 from 3-point range vs. Bucks. The buckets were from 27, 28, 30 and 29 feet.
DeMar DeRozan was a minus-23 in the second half and was pulled with 4:46 remaining and the Spurs up four points. "It's always tough to take," he said. "You want to be out there to compete. It definitely sucks when you're not out there."
The Mavs have road wins over the Rockets, Lakers and now Bucks in the last month. Houston and LA were by double digits. This one — snapping Milwaukee’s 18-game win streak with Luka Doncic watching from home — might be the most impressive.
Rockets survive with a 109-107 win over Spurs. Bright side for San Antonio: At least the Spurs’ 4-game OT streak is over.
The Spurs’ lead, which was as large as 25 points, is gone.
Russell Westbrook has 25 points at the half. His Rockets teammates also have 28. The Spurs have 72.
The Rockets, who blew a 22-point lead in the protested game in San Antonio earlier this month, have spotted the Spurs a 22-point lead. James Harden: 2 points, 1-11 FG
Dejounte Murray and James Harden get into it. Harden bumped him after a Murray steal and breakaways layup. Murray responded with a two-hand shove and some talking. Double T’s and we move on.
Kristaps Porzingis was asked the other night if he needed to go back to his “Knicks style of play” with Luka Doncic out — basically carry the offense. I think Rick Carlisle will love Porzingis’ response. Summary: Gonna stay within the system and not hunt shots. Full answer:
Mentioned this in the power rankings, and it really is mind boggling: James Harden had 109 points in a two-game trip and it wasn’t even his highest-scoring two-game stretch of the last few weeks.
Rick Carlisle in text message to reporters: "Luka Doncic will not travel to Milwaukee due to a right ankle sprain. He will stay in Dallas with Casey Smith and receive treatment. There will be no further updates until Wednesday night."
Luka Doncic might be able to return within a couple of weeks after suffering a moderate right ankle sprain last night, sources told ESPN. Doncic likely misses upcoming stretch vs. East power (Bucks, Celtics, 76ers and Raptors this week), but Mavs feel they dodged a bullet.
Mavs teammates told ESPN that Luka Doncic was working out on the underwater treadmill under the supervision of the team’s athletic trainers at halftime. That’s an encouraging sign that his right ankle sprain isn’t severe.
Luka Doncic has left the arena and will not talk to the media tonight. Rick Carlisle said Doncic was able to put weight on his right leg.
Rick Carlisle on Luka Doncic’s right ankle sprain: “We hope it’s not serious. X-rays were negative. That’s about all that we have for you now.” He says he doesn’t expect Doncic to play Monday against the Bucks.
Heat 122, Mavs 118 (final in OT). Mavs fought back from 24 down without Luka Doncic but couldn’t finish.
Rick Carlisle is irate that Jalen Brunson didn’t get a whistle on that drive. Don’t think the Last Two Minutes Report will be kind to Scott Foster’s crew.
Heat big man Bam Adebayo has his second triple-double in three games. Putback dunk of his own miss gives Heat the lead with 1:15 left in OT.
Mavs successfully challenge a charge on Tim Hardaway Jr., but the bucket wasn’t counted on continuation. Rick Carlisle didn’t seem pleased with Scott Foster’s explanation.
Mavs’ first lead of the night comes with 4:29 remaining in the fourth quarter. Fought back from 24 down.
JJ Barea baiting a rookie guard into an offensive foul is a given. He’s gotten Kendrick Nunn twice in the fourth quarter.
JJ Barea, one of the Mavs’ 2011 Finals heroes, is doing his best to lead another comeback against the Heat. He has 10 points and 4 dimes in 10 minutes off the bench with Luka Doncic sidelined.
The Luka-less Mavs have managed to slice the Heat’s 24-point lead to single digits. Miami is on a back-to-back after a tough loss to Lakers last night.
Only confirmed details are that X-rays were negative and it’s a sprained right ankle for Luka Doncic. It’s concerning that he grabbed the high ankle area while down.
This streak will end because of Luka Doncic’s ankle sprain.
Timing of Luka Doncic’s sprained ankle is especially tough for Mavs. This is the opener of a five-game stretch against East powers: Heat, Bucks, Celtics, Sixers and Raptors.
Luka Doncic’s ankle injury is a sprain. Not sure about severity yet.
X-rays in his ankle were negative, but Luka Doncic has been ruled out the rest of the game, per Mavs.
From @MavsPR: Luka Doncic (right ankle injury) is questionable to return.
Luka Doncic hopped/hobbled to the locker room for further evaluation.
Luka Doncic limps off the floor. Arena is silent as he gets checked out. Grabbing his right ankle.
Flaw in Luka Doncic’s game: His header lobs are horrible.
Another Jordan night for Luka Doncic
Delon Wright is active for the Mavs after missing two games due to a strained adductor.
Jaren Jackson Jr. has made a non-Ja Morant Grizzlies game a #LeaguePassAlert. He's got 33 late in the third and the Bucks' long winning streak is in jeopardy. Grizzlies up 10.
James Harden in the last two games: 109 points, 39-65 FG, 20-33 3s, 11-11 FT.
James Harden has attempted only seven free throws in his last six quarters and still scored 80 points (33-50 FG, 15-25 3s).
Mavs have won 11 of the 13 entering their Beasts of the East tour that starts Saturday with games every other day: vs. Miami at Milwaukee vs. Boston at Philly at Toronto
There have now been three 40-plus-point triple-doubles by players 20 or younger in NBA history. Luka Doncic has two. LeBron James had the other.
Kristaps Porzingis puts Andre Drummond on his highlight reel.
This is Luka Doncic's first triple-double since Nov. 20. It's crazy that qualifies as a long drought for the kid. He now has 8 this season, matching his rookie total.
Luka Doncic has a 34-12-8 line when he checks out with a few minutes left in the third quarter. Mavs' big lead might deny him a triple-double. He's put on quite a show in Mexico City.
Ja Morant just one of the nastiest clutch dunks I've ever seen on Aron Baynes.
James Harden has had 11 50-point games in the 2019 calendar year. To put that in perspective, LeBron James has had 12 in his career.
If there's such a thing as a desperately needed win in December, the Jazz just got one in Minnesota. Timberwolves are in danger of a tailspin with six straight losses.
James Harden: 55 points, 20-34 FG, 10-18 3s, 5-5 FT. Rick Barry is the only player in NBA history to score more points while attempting 5 or fewer free throws, per @bball_ref.
Actually, only three free throws so far.
Ho-hum, another 50-point game for James Harden. Only four free throws so far.
Some Cavs staffers recently told me they thought Kevin Porter Jr., the last pick of the first round, could be the steal of the draft. The raw teen has a season-high 21 points and counting vs. Rockets.
Cavaliers went on a 24-0 run against the Rockets. I didn't think the Cavs were capable of scoring 24 straight against anyone.
Bam Adebayo has some Draymond-like qualities as an off-the-dribble attacker. Put him on early MIP lists.
Welcome back, Ja Morant. Grizzlies PG's Rookie of the Year campaign continues in his return from a back injury.
Westbrook finished with season-high 34 points on 13-17 FG and had 8 assists. He punished Kings by attacking space when they forced the ball out of Harden's hands, something Rockets need consistently.
Kings' crazy shot-making spoiled Russell Westbrook's spectacular clutch performance. He had 9 points on 4-4 FG in the final 3:14. Hit cold-blooded 3 and attacked basket three times, last one putting Rockets up with a second remaining. Also had a dime to Danuel House for open 3.
Nemanja Bjelica's buzzer-beater seals the Kings' sweep of a Dallas/Houston back-to-back. Pulled it off without De'Aaron Fox and Marvin Bagley III.
Harrison Barnes and Buddy Hield have hit ridiculous 3s to tie it up in Houston with 5.4 seconds remaining. No matter result, Kings have impressed in back-to-back with win in Dallas and going to wire with Rockets.
One of the four officials working the NBA replay center tonight: James Capers, who was the crew chief for James Harden's dunk that didn't count in San Antonio.
Nuggets-Nets Last Two Minute Report has a rare double incorrect no-call on final play. Nikola Jokic set an illegal screen on Spencer Dinwiddie, who then fouled Jamal Murray, who continued to dribble up the court and missed the potential tying 3.
Another incorrect no-call: J.J. Barea fouling Harrison Barnes on a drive with 1:35 remaining.
NBA's Last Two Minute Report says refs missed two no-calls on Luka Doncic drives: the Cory Joseph elbow hit on the potential game-tying shot with seconds remaining and a foul on Richaun Holmes on a Doncic bucket with 1:58 left.
And just imagine wiping out 23 points by Lonnie Walker. That’s 20.9% of his career total.
Crux of NBA ruling: Adam Silver “determined that the Rockets had sufficient time to overcome the error during the remainder of the fourth quarter and two subsequent overtime periods and thus the extraordinary remedy of granting a game protest was not warranted.”
Luka Doncic’s reaction to surpassing Michael Jordan for longest 20-5-5 streak since ABA/NBA merger: “I think it’s a little bit too much stats. You can’t compare nobody to Michael Jordan.”
Sorry, but Chris Paul knows the rules. Better than anybody.
I was surprised and impressed with Luka Doncic’s self-awareness and maturity in his postgame media session. His frequent bitching and showing up refs has been getting out of control. Wise for him to publicly own it instead of harping on clear blown call. More flies with honey ...
Net rating with Blazers: plus-2.0 points per 100 possessions Net rating with Rockets: minus-9.9 points per 100 possessions
Mavs' Luka Doncic: I need to tone it down with officials
Luka Doncic acknowledges that he’s often too animated with officials. “Sometimes I’ve got to calm down and just go to the next play,” he said.
Rick Carlisle had not seen the replay before his press conference. After watching it in his office, he poked his head in the locker room and summoned a couple of reporters to make sure he got this on the record.
After watching the replay, Rick Carlisle says it’s “clear” Luka Doncic got fouled on the critical drive with seconds remaining.
This was the no-call on Luka Doncic’s last drive. Doncic was griping all night and got T’d up in the first quarter. Refs did him no favors with the game on the line.
Kings 110, Mavs 106 (final). Luka Doncic: 27 points, 7 rebounds, 8 assists and countless words with the refs. Nemanja Bjelica: 30-7-4.
Luka Doncic’s floater after a spin move goes off front rim. He pleads for a call but refs ain’t hearing it.
#LeaguePassAlert Kings lead — once as large as 24 points — is down to two with 33.8 seconds left in Dallas.
Luka Doncic has his 19th straight 20-5-5 performance, passing Michael Jordan for the longest streak since ABA-NBA merger. Oscar Robertson has only longer such streaks in NBA history.
Kings 66, Mavs 46 at the half. Mavs look nothing like the team that has won 10 of 11. Buddy Hield, Nemanja Bjelica and Richaun Holmes have combined for 46 points on 20-24 FG.
“I didn’t say nothing!” Luka Doncic says when he gets T’d up. But he’d been asking for a T all quarter, showing up the refs after several no-calls.
Luka Doncic is back in Jordans tonight.
Kings PF/C Marvin Bagley III, listed as questionable, will not make his return tonight against the Mavs.
Mavs G Delon Wright is considered day-to-day with a strained adductor. “We feel like we dodged a bullet as far as it not being a serious thing,” Rick Carlisle said. This tends to be a week-to-week injury on the low end.
Ben McLemore has back-to-back 25-plus-point games for the first time in his career. He's been a huge bargain as a minimum-salary reclamation project for the Rockets.
Russell Westbrook just hit his first corner 3 of the season. He’s now 1-of-19 from the corners for the Rockets. Like most players, he’s shot better from the corners than above-the-break 3s over the course of his career.
Typical Knicks
J.J. Redick was asked if he thought the Pelicans competed in a 46-point loss to the Mavs. “No. Did you?”
Mavs hold on to beat Pelicans by 46.
Luka Doncic is probably done for the night with a 26-69 line in 26 minutes. He asked to stay in a little longer. Rick Carlisle denied his request. Mavs up 34 and face the Kings tomorrow night.
Clarification from @MavsPR: 18 ties the longest 20-5-5 streak since ABA/NBA merger. Oscar Robertson had four longer streaks, topped by 29 games.
Luka Doncic has at least 20 points, 5 rebounds and 5 assists for the 18th straight game. That ties Michael Jordan for the longest such streak in NBA history.
Boban Marjanovic just put in some work: 11 points, 7 rebounds and a block in 8 minutes.
Downgraded to out
Mavs guard Delon Wright is questionable to return due to a right adductor injury.
Luka Doncic has now played four quarters against the Pelicans this week. His stats: 44 points, 19 rebounds, 10 assists
Luka Doncic’s kicks are as funky as the Mavs’ jerseys today.
As Chris Paul says, "That's who they pay to see."
Celtics-Nuggets and Bucks-Clippers games tonight add ammo to argument that the East has at least caught up to the West.
Former No. 4 overall pick Josh Jackson during G League Memphis Hustle’s 10-0 start: 22.9 ppg, 50 FG%, 46.5 3%, 8.6 rpg, 3.8 apg, 1.7 spg, 1.7 bpg. He’s on an indefinite assignment from the Grizzlies.
Jerry Jones, owner/general manager/interim head coach has a nice ring to it.
ESPN story on Rockets’ protest:
Sidenote: This scenario would, at least temporarily, take a 50-point game away from James Harden. He would have 36 points (including the dunk) with 7:50 remaining. (Lonnie Walker would have 23 of his career-high 28 points wiped out.)
Sources: Rockets’ hope is that final 7:50 will be replayed with Houston up by 15 points. Rockets have no expectation that NBA would award them a win based on Houston actually outscoring Spurs in regulation, which was a possibility raised by a Rockets source in wake of the loss.
As @Jonathan_Feigen reported, the Rockets are officially filing a protest of Tuesday's loss to the Spurs, sources said. It's to ensure that the league office, which is conducting an investigation, will make a ruling. Deadline to file protest is 48 hours after the game.
Last night was the third game this season that Luka Doncic had a double-digit negative plus-minus. The Mavs are 2-1 in those games, a testament to the strength of their bench. Jalen Brunson (16 points, 7-8 FG, 21) was the headliner in last night’s win over Wolves.
Rick Carlisle says X-rays were negative on Dwight Powell’s left arm. It’s a contusion. Carlisle raved about Powell’s “tremendous” performance in win over Timberwolves.
22-7-6 for Luka
Mavs 121, Timberwolves 114 (final). Luka Doncic has a 21-7-6 line that qualifies as an off night for the kid. Dwight Powell had great game (24 points, 9-9 FG), but his left arm injury is concern.
Mavs backup PG Jalen Brunson has 14 of his season-high 16 points in the fourth quarter. He’s showing some of the clutch chops Villanova fans remember.
Powell is questionable to return, per Mavs. Just calling it a “left arm injury” for now.
Dwight Powell heads to the locker room. He was grabbing his left wrist/forearm and looked like he was in excruciating pain. He’s been spectacular tonight (24 points, 9-9 FG).
Mavs all-bench lineup outscores Wolves 17-9 in first 5:24 of fourth to give Dallas 4-point lead. Rick Carlisle sticks with that five out of the timeout.
Luka Doncic has been yapping at ref David Guthrie all night. Guthrie finally heard enough and T’d him up. Doncic has attempted only three free throws tonight and clearly feels like he earned several more.
Sources: Rockets likely to file protest over missed call on James Harden's dunk. Houston had been optimistic NBA office would take action without protest but hesitant to risk letting 48-hour deadline pass.
Luka Doncic is limping and grabbing at his right ankle after he twisted it and fell while going toward a handoff. Stays in the game.
Some space age Nikes for Luka Doncic tonight, with a NASA logo on one heel
Rick Carlisle said he’ll monitor Kristaps Porzingis’ minutes closely on his first back-to-back tonight, but there’s no strict limit. “He barely broke a sweat last night,” Carlisle said, referring to Porzingis playing only 18 minutes in win over Pelicans.
This is only second back-to-back for Mavs, but they planned for Porzingis to sit a game of back-to-backs early this season due to caution with him coming off torn ACL/20-month rehab. He’s healthy and had light workload last night, so it made sense for him to play tonight.
Kristaps Porzingis is not listed on the afternoon injury report, so all signs are that he will play tonight vs. Timberwolves. It will be the first time he’s played both ends of a back-to-back with the Mavs. Porzingis played only 18 minutes in last night’s blowout of Pelicans.
Also, if there was a 12th Man of the Year award, Texas A&amp;M would sue for trademark infringement. #Aggiejoke
If there was a 12th Man of the Year vote, JJ Barea would be the clear favorite. He has 43 points (64.1 eFG%) and 12 assists in 55 minutes this season. He’s leader of Mavs’ locker room despite only playing in 4 games, 3 of which he provided key spark in wins.
Precedent for refs reviewing when there’s confusion if ball went in hoop: Manu Ginobili’s accidental 3 vs. Knicks.
Worth noting: Basket interference was not called on the play. It was simply ruled a missed basket.
... protest might not be necessary but will prepare to file one if the league office does not take action.
A Rockets source is optimistic that the NBA office will take action regarding James Harden's dunk that didn't count, either awarding the win to Houston or ordering that the final 7:50 be replayed because the Rockets outscored the Spurs in regulation. The Rockets believe a...
Referee James Capers admits they missed the call on James Harden’s dunk, but the Rockets couldn’t challenge because they allowed 30-second window to pass while “protesting the call, trying to get clarification of it.”
Russell Westbrook sums up the night for the Rockets: “S— happens. Plain and simple.”
Mike D’Antoni, asked what refs’ explanation was for James Harden’s dunk that didn’t count:
It hasn’t been pretty, but James Harden has 50.
Rockets got a great look at the buzzer, but James Harden missed a runner off the glass. He has 44 points in 44 minutes — 10-33 FG, 4-19 3s, 20-20 FT. On to the second OT.
Jakob Poeltl definitely didn’t do what Pop wanted him to do on the Spurs’ last play of OT. Pop was well onto the floor pointing and stomping and then hollered at Poeltl during the timeout.
Well, this James Harden dunk that didn’t count ended up being pretty important.
Rockets’ minutes entering OT: PJ Tucker 42, James Harden 38, Russell Westbrook 38, Clint Capela 35. Good thing Houston’s starters got to take the fourth quarter off in Saturday night’s rout of Hawks.
Spurs fans who have been begging for Lonnie Walker to get more minutes got their wish. He’s delivered 24 points on 9-14 FG while defending James Harden as well as humanly possible. Spurs are plus-27 in Walker’s 25 minutes.
Spurs have stormed back from 22 down to tie it up against the Rockets. Houston has 0.8 seconds to get a shot after Jakob Poeltl volleyball spiked James Harden’s floater into the stands.
Rockets technically can’t challenge. No bucket. Harden ain’t happy.
Shaqtin alert: After the ballboy with the broom scampered out of the way, James Harden’s breakaway dunk didn’t go down. Or maybe it did. Rockets are challenging, saying the ball bounced off Harden’s shoulder and went back up through the rim. Pretty funny regardless of result.
Only James Harden can shoot poorly and still put up a very efficient 22 points in a half — 3-10 FG, 1-6 3s, 15-15 FT.
.@mikefinger asks Pop if he’s tempted to just play his best defensive lineup, offense be damned. Pop: “What’s my best defensive lineup?” Finger: “I’m not a coach, so I don’t know.” Pop: “I am a coach, and I don’t know.”
Bummer for Grizzlies: Both of Memphis’ prized rookies are out on a week-to-week basis. Clarke has played at an All-Rookie level.
Luka Doncic has been named Western Conference player of the month for the first time in his career. Giannis Antetokounmpo won the East honor.
If you’ve ever wanted to see Mark Cuban shirtless, here’s your chance. He’s the first NBA owner to go on Kevin Hart’s “Cold as Balls.”
Kirk mentions that Luka Doncic’s game is evidence that “the future of the league is bending toward Hardenism.” Doncic has acknowledged studying Harden, especially his stepback and how he draws fouls. But Rick Carlisle pushed back on the Luka-Harden comp when I asked him about it.
The best thing you can say about the state of the Jazz right now is it was a lot worse at this point the last two years and then they went on long runs. But Utah looks nothing like the sleeper contender many of us thought they'd be.
This road trip keeps getting worse for the Jazz.
I’ll take a mulligan on my belief that Melo’s days were done as a player who could help an NBA team win. (Never mind that every NBA GM agreed for a full year.)
Dallas' offensive rating when Luka Doncic plays with Dwight Powell: 124.5 Doncic without Powell: 108.7 In other words, the Mavs' franchise player plays his best when he's paired with Powell. That makes Powell pretty valuable to the Mavs.
The highest PER for a full season: Wilt Chamberlain's 31.82 in 1962-63 PER leaders this season: Giannis Antetokounmpo, 33.23 Luka Doncic, 32.56 James Harden, 32.19
Rockets GM on the Mavs ...
Since a 1-3 stretch that somehow included two losses to the Knicks, the Mavs have won seven of eight. That stretch includes road routs of the Rockets and Lakers.
Luka Doncic's third quarter: 16 points, 4 rebounds, 5 assists, plus-18
Best comp for this James Harden performance is Kobe's 62 in three quarters vs. Mavs. He shot 18-31 FG and 22-25 FT.
James Harden's 60 points came on 16-24 FG. Assuming he sits the whole fourth quarter, he will have the fewest field goal attempts ever in a 60-point performance. Previous: Karl Malone getting 61 on 21-26 FG, per @bball_ref.
This is James Harden's 20th career 50-point game. LeBron James (12) is the only other active player with at least half that many.
James Harden has 50 ... with 5:44 remaining in the third quarter.
The Rockets, with two starters home sick, put up 81 points in the first half against the Hawks. James Harden has 31 points on 10-14 FG. Atlanta has some defensive issues.
The Grizzlies announced that rookie point guard Ja Morant is "week-to-week" after he aggravated back spasms in Friday's loss to the Jazz. Morant, who first experienced back spasms after a hard fall in Monday's loss to the Pacers, did not travel with the team to Minnesota.
His next game: career-high-tying 42 points, 9 rebounds, 11 assists in a road win over Suns
We recorded this pod yesterday morning. The Clippers have some dudes who woulda been badass bouncers.
JJ Barea (DNP-CD in all but 3 games) has 35 points  6 assists in 44 minutes. Will he play more? Rick Carlisle: “We’ll have to see. It’ll depend on the situation. But he certainly put everybody on notice that he’s ready, which shouldn’t be a surprise to anybody that knows him.”
After blowing out the Mavs, Clippers improved to 4-0 with Paul George and Kawhi Leonard in the lineup. “Offensively, we’re still figuring it out,” PG said. On the other end? “We’re becoming one of the best defensive teams in the league.”
One superstar won’t cut it at the top of the West. Kristaps Porzingis knows he needs to join Luka Doncic at a consistently elite level for Mavs to be contenders, now or in future. KP: “I’m trying to get there. We’re trying to figure out how to get there.”
Luka Doncic left the arena without talking to the media. Clearly a frustrating night for the Mavs’ 20-year-old face of the franchise.
Kristaps Porzingis: “They came into the game like, We want to beat their ass.’ They has a little more attitude than we did. Got punched in the mouth a little bit. On to the next one.”
Luka Doncic is done for a night. Being the focal point for the Clippers’ defense ain’t fun. Finishes with 22-8-6 but 4-14 FG, 0-8 3s and 7 turnovers in a lopsided loss that snaps Mavs’ 5-game winning streak.
Mavs need a spark. JJ Barea checks in.
Clippers 62, Mavs 46 at half. 3-point shooting — Clippers: 10-22, Mavs: 6-22, including a Kristaps Porzingis bucket from the halfcourt logo. Luka Doncic: 15 points, 6 rebounds, 6 assists, 5 turnovers, 2-9 FG, 0-5 3s, 11-11 FT.
Pat Beverley picks up his third foul with 5:02 remaining in the first half. Rodney McGruder has guarded Luka Doncic when Beverley was on the bench. Doncic is about to head to the line for his eighth and ninth free throws of the night.
These shoes only lasted a quarter. Doncic, who often changes shoes when he’s frustrated midgame, is wearing Nikes now. Question for @ESPNStatsInfo: Is three shoe brands in one night an NBA record?
Clippers 34, Mavs 27 after a quarter. Paul George: 17 points, 5-9 FG and all over the place defensively.
Luka Doncic checks out after getting called for a charge. If I can read lips, he yelled some Spanish curse words at the refs en route to the bench. (My Spanish vocabulary is limited, but I know a lot of those.) He had 8-4-4 in the first quarter but only 1-of-6 from the floor.
Pat Beverley, the primary defender so far on Luka Doncic, picks up his second foul. No Paul George or Kawhi Leonard on the court to guard Doncic now, either.
As soon as Kawhi Leonard checks out, Mavs sub for Dorian Finney-Smith. Expect Finney-Smith to mirror Leonard’s minutes all game.
“Protect our guys! Protect our guys!” Rick Carlisle yells at a ref after Luka Doncic hits the floor hard. Mavs wanted a flagrant. Doncic griped to a ref about a couple of no-calls during the timeout.
The great @DanaLarsonFSN informs me those are the Sour Patch Kids Curry 7s.
Luka changed into some neon green Under Armours for the first half. He had a 42-point triple-double vs. the Spurs the only other time he wore Under Armours in a game. (I’ll never get hired for my photography skills.)
Luka Doncic is wearing Puma tonight. Mavs player development coach God Shammgod has a Puma deal, but Dallas’ MVP candidate is a sneaker free agent.
Don Knobler, the Mavs fan who was banned for the rest of last season after cursing at Pat Beverley, is in the building for tonight’s Clippers-Mavs game.
Doc Rivers on Luka Doncic: “He’s not young. ... He plays too well to be whatever age they say he is.”
.@DwainPrice busted out his dead Mutant Ninja Turtles to steal the spotlight from the Mavs’ new uniforms.
Luka Doncic was named West player of the week. Averaged 37 points, 8.5 rebounds and 11.8 assists while leading Mavs to 4-0 record.
Tim Hardaway Jr. made this an easy decision. Mavs’ starting lineup with Hardaway in it is plus-46 in 51 minutes.
The Mavs’ offensive rating is 117.4 points per 100 possessions, per @nbastats. That’s 2.4 points better than last season’s Warriors, who had the best offensive rating in the NBA stats database. Mavs are scoring 118.7 points per 100 possessions with Luka Doncic on the court.
The Mavs look like they might be a contender way earlier than anticipated, but Dallas’ young stars want no part of that discussion. Luka Doncic: “For me, the goal is making the playoffs still. It’s a long season. It’s only been one month.”
Mavs are tied with the Bucks for the best net rating in the NBA, outscoring opponents by 8.9 points per 100 possessions. Dallas' net rating during the 5-game win streak is 23.3. Kristaps Porzingis is 33.4 during that span, best of Mavs rotation players.
LeBron James was the only player in NBA history to have multiple 40-point, 10-assist performance before turning 21. Luka Doncic then did it twice in a four-game span.
Luka Doncic took a playful jab at a legend when asked about the Mavs’ improved defense this season: “Last year, we had Dirk on defense, so it was tough.” He smiled when he said it. (But a lot of truth is told in jest. Sorry, @swish41.)
Luka Doncic checks out with 41 points, one shy of the career high he set earlier this week. Also has 10 assists and 6 rebounds. Kristaps Porzingis: 23-13-3-2-1. Tim Hardaway Jr.: 31-4-5. Mavs are a force to be reckoned with.
Rockets fans are heading to the exits at Toyota Center. Mavs fans are having a blast here.
The only active players who have had streaks of at least four games with 30 points and 10 assists are all on the Toyota Center court. Luka Doncic just joined Russell Westbrook and James Harden in that club. Only other guy to do it since 1983-84: Michael Jordan.
Clint Capela has 20 rebounds for the sixth time in seven games. He had 19 in the other game.
The duel between Luka Doncic and James Harden has lived up to the hype through three quarters. Doncic: 28-5-8. Harden: 29-6-9. Mavs up 10.
Luka Doncic changed shoes at halftime, as he often does, but stuck with Jordan brand.
It’s been five halves since Tim Hardaway Jr. got a chance to start with these Mavs. He’s scored 55 points on 18-25 FG with 10 assists in 59 minutes.
Mavs 78, Rockets 61 at halftime. That might have been Kristaps Porzingis’ best half of the season: 15 points, 9 rebounds, 2 assists, 2 steals, 1 block, 24
Kristaps Porzingis’ tip-in caps a 45-point first quarter for the Mavs, who are up 16 in Houston. Mavs beat up on bad teams in last two games. They’re beating up on a really good team right now. KP: 10-7-2-2-1. Luka Doncic: 11-1-4.
Kristaps Porzingis continues to dominate doing dirty work, as he did during Mavs’ 4-0 homestand. Has 4 rebounds, 1 block, 1 steal and wrecked a couple of other Rockets’ offensive possessions in first 5 minutes.
Luka Doncic is wearing Jordans again.
Wondering why NBA would schedule Mavs-Rockets for Sunday afternoon tip that partially conflicts with a Cowboys game? It’s a prime-time game in Europe and the Middle East. Those Sunday showcases get audiences in 2M range, per NBA, and I’d bet Luka Doncic will draw more Euro eyes.
Coming off a 4-0 homestand that ended with a couple of 40-point wins, the Mavs are tied with the Bucks for best net rating (plus-8.7) in the NBA. Dallas has the best offensive rating (116.9) by 2.6 points. Next two games will be big tests for Mavs: at Rockets, vs. Clippers
Seth Curry/Kristaps Porzingis/Luka Doncic trio: plus-1.5 net rating in 174 minutes Tim Hardaway Jr./Porzingis/Doncic: plus-33.4 in 94 minutes
Tim Hardaway Jr. will likely stay in Mavs’ starting lineup after filling in for a sick Seth Curry last 2 games. Rick Carlisle: “I mean, the guy is making a really strong case.” Hardaway’s stats in 2 blowout wins: 36 points, 12-15 FG, 8 assists, 1 turnover, plus-44 in 40 minutes.
Rick Carlisle after a 4-block night for Kristaps Porzingis: “What KP is doing defensively, will somebody please write a story on that?” Entering tonight, opponents were shooting only 44.9% in the restricted area when Porzingis was nearby, per @nbastats.
Mavs 143, Cavs 101 (final). Per @ESPNStatsInfo, the Mavs became the fourth team in NBA history with consecutive 40-plus-point wins. The others: Knicks in 1993-94, Kings in 1992-93 and Suns in 1988-89.
Correction: Kristaps Porzingis was 6-of-6 in the third quarter. Notable: Luka Doncic assisted on five of those buckets.
Luka Doncic: 30-7-14 in a little less than three quarters. Mavs up 40, so he’s done for the game. No triple-double, so does this qualify as an off night for the kid?
After a 1-of-8 first half, Kristaps Porzingis had 15 points on 7-of-7 shooting in the third quarter. Rick Carlisle called a play for Porzingis on the first possession to help him find his rhythm.
Luka Doncic’s streak of double-digit scoring first quarters ends at 7, the longest since Carmelo Anthony had 8 straight in March/April 2013, per @EliasSports. Doncic has 9 points, 4 rebounds and 4 assists. His last three first quarters combined: 48-13-13.
Dirk Nowitzki, seated by Mark Cuban near the Mavs’ bench, got a standing ovation when shown on the AAC big screens during the timeout. It’s the first game he’s been to as a retiree.
These Jordans will get at least a half of game action. @NickDePaula
That’s a humble brag if I’ve ever seen one.
Luka Doncic is wearing Jordans again during pregame warmups. Saw a pair of Steph Curry’s signature Under Armours in the sneaker free agent’s locker.
Mavs guard Seth Curry (illness) will miss his second consecutive game.
Full seasons in NBA history with a usage rate &gt; than 35 and true shooting % &gt; 60: James Harden 2017-18, 2018-19 Players putting up those advanced stats this season: Harden, Giannis Antetokounmpo and Luka Doncic
Luka Doncic is making historic stat lines seem “pretty normal,” as Rick Carlisle said. JJ Barea: “It’s not hard for him to do this right now. He’s not forcing crazy s---. It’s just coming. That’s why I think he can keep this up. He’s making it look easy.”
Jayson Tatum did Paul George like James Harden did Wesley Johnson. In crunch time.
But his Mavs teammates will go on and on about the kid. JJ Barea on Luka Doncic (29.9 ppg, 10.7 rpg, 9.4 apg): "It’s not hard for him to do this right now. He’s not forcing crazy s---. It’s just coming. That’s why I think he can keep this up. He’s making it look easy."
Doncic doesn't enjoy doing media -- not a criticism, just a fact -- and especially doesn't like pumping up himself. His best quotes have been when he takes blame for losses, which has happened twice this season when he put up big numbers.
Luka Doncic, asked about his historic recent production: "I’m glad we’re winning games. That’s all. We’ve got three in a row, and we’ve just got to keep going like that."
The Rockets’ winning streak and James Harden’s run of 35-plus-point performances will end at 8 games. Harden will finish with 27 in Denver as the Nuggets held him to only 16 shots from the floor.
Barea says he has a sore right elbow, so he was only going to play tonight if it was an emergency.
Rick Carlisle on Luka Doncic’s consistently ridiculous production: “This isn’t a newsflash now. This is pretty normal.”
Make no mistake, Barea wants to play, but not as a mascot in garbage time. He’s played in one game this season: an 11-point, 3-assist performance in 16 minutes to help beat the Magic.
“We want JJ!” Mavs fans chant. Rick Carlisle looked at the beloved vet and asked if he wanted to play the last few minutes. Barea said, “F— no.” Then he got up and faked the fans out by jogging a few steps toward the scorer’s table and pivoting back to the bench.
There had been seven previous 25-minutes-or-under triple-doubles in NBA history. Highest-scoring of those: Julius Randle with 21 points.
Per @bball_ref, nobody had ever recorded a 35-point triple-double in 25 or fewer minutes before Luka Doncic tonight.
Kristaps Porzingis has four straight double-doubles for the first time in his career. And the Mavs starters call it a night. Luka Doncic: 35-10-11 in 25 minutes.
Luka Doncic seals his 7th triple-double of the season with well over four minutes to go in the third quarter. Question now is if he can go back-to-back 40 triple-doubles. He has 35 points. Mavs up 45.
Warriors 38, Luka Doncic 33 at the half. It’s the second-highest scoring half in Mavs history behind Dirk Nowitzki’s 34 on Nov. 3, 2009 against Utah.
Since I’m tweeting about shoes tonight, gotta give some love to these @DwainPrice specials.
Luka Doncic has 22 points, 5 rebounds and 5 assists. The second quarter begins after the commercial break.
Now we know how dominant Luka Doncic would be in the G League.
A lot of chuckles on the Mavs bench after Luka Doncic threw down his second dunk of the season and strutted a little. He has 11 points in less than 4 minutes. Stat stolen from @coopmavs: Doncic has scored in double digits in 7 straight first quarters.
Not in a spot to provide photographic evidence ... but Luka is wearing some Lakers-colored Kobes, at least to start the game.
Sneaker free agent Luka Doncic, fresh off a 42-point triple-doubles wearing Under Armour, is warming up in a pair of Jordans.
Warriors power forward Draymond Green will not play against the Mavericks because of right heel soreness. It isn't a serious injury, as Green is going through his normal pregame shooting routine.
How exactly does the NCAA think he’s gonna come up with $11,500 to donate?
Mavs vs. Warriors will be completely Curry-free.
"Special players need to be trusted," Rick Carlisle said of Luka Doncic, who he mentions in the same breath as Larry Bird, Magic Johnson and Jason Kidd. How a coach with a rep as a control freak is embracing the creativity of the Mavs' 20-year-old star:
Russell Westbrook is missing only one team on his triple-double list: the Oklahoma City Thunder.
Well, Melo was minus-63 in 10 games for the Rockets, by far the worst on the team. And minus-58 in a 6-game playoff series for the Thunder, again by far the worst on the team. There's a reason a dude who can still drop 20 on any night was unemployed so long.
Nobody doubted whether Carmelo Anthony could still score. His 7 points in 12 minutes isn't a surprise. But neither is his team-worst minus-11.
Luka Doncic is the only NBA player currently ranked in the top 10 in scoring (fourth, 29.5 ppg), rebounding (10th, 10.7) and assists (second, 9.3). The season is only a month old, but with the Mavs at 8-5, the 20-year-old is unquestionably on the short list of MVP candidates.
Russell Westbrook: “I think that a lot of people like to normalize greatness when you see it over and over again, but it’s not normal, because there’s nobody else that can do it. If it was normal, everybody would do it."
James Harden became the first player in NBA history to average at least 35 points with a true shooting % higher than 60 last season, when he averaged 36.1 ppg on 61.6 TS%. His numbers this season: 39.2 ppg, 61.8 TS%
Luka Doncic joined LeBron James as the only players in NBA history to score 40 in triple-doubles as 20-year-olds. Magic Johnson, Isiah Thomas and Oscar Robertson are the only players to put up such lines at age 21. The kid is consistently in historically elite company.
Luka Doncic is averaging 42 points, 11 rebounds and 12 assists when he wears Under Armours.
Not a bad line from Luka Doncic after three quarters: 34-9-11
James Harden calls it a night with 36 points, so his scoring average will dip slightly. Rockets will extend winning streak to 8.
Clint Capela picked up where he left off before missing a couple of games with a concussion. He’s grabbed 20 rebounds in four straight games played.
James Harden scores 23 in the first half. If he finishes with 47, he’ll be averaging 40 for the season.
This is the Cowboys' worst personnel decision since at least the Roy Williams trade. Broaddus will be a tremendous asset for the next outlet that hires him.
I’m told the Rockets have no immediate plans for the open roster spot.
Sources confirms that Rockets are waiving Ryan Anderson, who was on a partially guaranteed deal. He played 14 minutes in two games this season.
James Harden is averaging 43.0 points during the Rockets' 7-game win streak. That stat probably doesn't surprise you. This one might: The Rockets are allowing only 95.9 points/100 possessions with Harden on the floor during this run.
Maxi Kleber was the Mavs’ primary defender on Raptors star Pascal Siakam, who was held to 15 points on 6-24 FG. “That’s why I was just in the cold tub for 10 minutes,” Kleber said.
Rick Carlisle on the reason that Luka Doncic got a career-high 18 free throws: “He’s a beast on offense.”
A sign of a superstar is being able to dominate a game despite shooting poorly. Luka Doncic in Mavs’ win over Raptors: 26 points, 5-14 FG, 15-19 FT, 15 rebounds, 7 assists, 2 steals, plus-14.
Only other active players to put up 40 shots in a game: Russell Westbrook (twice) and Devin Booker (per @bball_ref)
Harden calls it a night with a cool 49 points on 16-41 FG. Rockets were plus-16 in his 39 minutes and win in Minnesota despite missing 4 of top 6 rotation players. It’s the most FGAs in a game by any player since Kobe’s 60-point, 50-shot farewell.
Project for @bobbykaralla, who is nerdy enough to pull it off: What are Luka Doncic’s stats in third quarters after he changes shoes at halftime?
Harden’s first half: 30 points, 9-23 FG, 4-11 3s, 8-10 FG. He is rising to the chucking challenge. Rockets up 2.
James Harden after the first quarter: 18 points, 7-17 FG. The Rockets don’t have Russell Westbrook (rest) or Eric Gordon (knee), so Harden has to launch a lot of shots even by his standards.
D’Angelo Russell out at least two weeks
19-year vet Tyson Chandler is plus-73 in 61 minutes during the Rockets' 6-game win streak. His usage rate during that span: 4.8.
Harden during Houston’s active 6-game winning streak: 42.0 ppg on 65.2 true shooting %
Despite shooting really poorly in four of the first five games, James Harden is averaging 38.7 points with a true shooting % (61.9) that matches the best of his Houston tenure. He really has a legit chance to join Wilt Chamberlain in the 40 ppg-for-a-season club.
Rudy Gobert: “Maybe after three of those fouls on the last possession that aren’t called, you can get a free win or something. Or free Chic-fil-a.”
You can tell Ja Morant is the kind of dude who loves the spotlight. He’s putting on a show so far in Grizzlies’ one ESPN game this season. Has 12 points in 13 minutes, including a ridiculous scoop off the glass after a 1001mph, behind-the-back Euro step and a sweet lob finish.
Mike Conley gets a lot of Grit n Grind love when he’s introduced as an opponent in Memphis for the first time.
Rockets can still give him a tribute video Monday.
Grizzlies believed refs disrespected Mike Conley because he was so nice. Jazz teammates are jokingly plotting to get him T’d up. There’s a long line of offers to pay the fine for his first T. But Conley is proud of his technically perfect record.
The last time a second-year Mavs player put up a triple-double in Madison Square Garden, Dennis Smith Jr. was traded to the Knicks the next day. But I have a hunch the Mavs will hold on to Luka.
The Knicks are 2-0 against the Mavericks and 1-9 against the rest of the NBA. That's despite Luka Doncic averaging 35.5 points in a pair of triple-doubles in Dallas' losses to New York.
A Kristaps Porzingis post-up in the clutch is bizarre at best. That's part of his game that is at least a summer away.
Road trip starts in San Antonio on Saturday night. Next stop: Houston on Monday. Could Melo's return come against the Rockets?
Translation: What a crappy roster they gave me.
Patrick Beverley's sixth foul with 1:57 remaining and Clippers trailing Rockets by two points was deemed an incorrect call. Last 2 Minute Report says Beverley was "in his legally obtained position when he absorbs the incidental contact that is initiated by Harden."
Clint Capela had been playing extremely well before taking the shot to his head that will likely sideline him for both games of this weekend’s back-to-back. He averaged 13.6 points, 17.8 rebounds and 2.8 blocks during the Rockets’ active 5-game winning streak.
Source: Rockets center Clint Capela is expected to miss Friday's home game against the Pacers. Capela was evaluated for a concussion after a collision when he drew a charge late in Houston's win over the Clippers on Wednesday.
James Harden’s 47 points gave Russell Westbrook an excuse to jab his enemy Pat Beverley. But Westbrook’s claim — “He don’t guard nobody, man” — isn’t supported by last night’s matchup numbers. And Harden and Mike D’Antoni definitely don’t agree with it.
Per @ESPNStatsInfo, James Harden was 0-of-6 with four turnovers when defended by Patrick Beverley tonight. Harden was spectacular overall (47 points, 12-26 FG), but the facts don't support Russell Westbrook's opinion that Beverley is an overrated defender.
I asked Pat Beverley about these comments and he had no interest in responding. “Don’t start that, don’t start that. I don’t care about that.”
Austin Rivers still in troll mode: “Doc’s gotta keep his cool.”
Russell Westbrook: “Pat Bev trick y’all, man, like he playing defense. He don’t guard nobody, man. He just running around, doing nothing.” Made sure to note that James Harden scored 47 tonight.
Clint Capela is being examined for a concussion. He will not speak to the media tonight.
James Harden: 47 points, 6 rebounds, 7 assists, 3 steals. Scored 17 in the fourth and sealed the win by stripping Kawhi Leonard and throwing a lob to Tyson Chandler, who threw it down backwards because he’s a fun guy.
Austin Rivers egging the crowd on as Doc gets ejected is a touching family moment.
Russell Westbrook waves goodbye when Pat Beverley picks up his sixth foul.
All seven of James Harden’s points in the fourth quarter came with Pat Beverley on the bench. Related: Pat Bev just checked back in.
Capela went straight to the locker room after getting up.
Clint Capela (12 points, 20 rebounds) is still down after JaMychal Green’s shoulder crashed into the side of his head.
After drawing that foul, James Harden walked over to the Clippers bench and had something to say to feisty former teammate Pat Beverley. The chat continued on the court during the timeout. Harden was smiling. Pat Bev was not.
Clint Capela already has a double-double after only 11 minutes of playing time. He’s been playing really well for the last week or so after a sluggish start.
Russell Westbrook picks up his fourth foul when he’s called for pushing off with 9 seconds left in the first quarter. Not ideal with Eric Gordon and Danuel House Jr. both out.
This might be one of those nights for James Harden. He has 13 points in 9 minutes and hasn’t even been to the free throw line yet.
Midway through the first quarter, Russell Westbrook is on triple-double pace (4 points, 2 assists and 3 fouls).
Doc Rivers says he expects Paul George to make his Clippers debut tomorrow in New Orleans. Will Kawhi Leonard play on the second night of a back-to-back? “I don’t know yet,” Rivers said. “That was a good question. Nice try.”
Left unsaid: Man, too bad that management is such a mess.
Three players rank among the NBA’s top six in scoring and assists: James Harden, Luka Doncic and Trae Young
Sheeeesh
Kristaps Porzingis’ up-and-down start with Mavs hit a low in Boston. “It’s not going to happen overnight. We’re 6-4 with me playing below the level that I’m used to. Once I find my game and be effective out there, we can be doing much more damage.”
Luka Doncic on Kristaps Porzingis: “This happens to great players. They have bad nights. I think the next game he’s going to have at least 30 points.” Mavs’ next game: vs. Knicks at Madison Square Garden.
Porzingis on getting benched
Kristaps Porzingis I’m getting benched for crunch time in Boston: “Of course I want to be out there, but can’t blame him. I wasn’t having a great game. I’m all in for whatever is best for the team.”
Rick Carlisle on Kristaps Porzingis’ rough night: “We just need to flush it and move on.”
Celtics 116, Mavs 106 (final). Luka Doncic (34-6-9) had another big night. Kristaps Porzingis (4 points, 1-11 FG) did not and sat the last 9 minutes after picking up his fifth foul.
Kristaps Porzingis is really struggling tonight. He’s 1-of-9 from the floor and struggling to defend against a small Celtics lineup. Mavs have been outscored by 21 in his 14 minutes.
Mavs manage to go into halftime tied 54-54 in Boston despite missing 16 of their first 18 shots from the floor. Luka Doncic got cooking as a playmaker late in the half.
Luka Doncic has reached the level of stardom where he attracts this kind of crowd on the road.
Story behind this playful slap: Luka Doncic often gives assistant coach Jamahl Mosley a shot to the ribs coming out of timeouts. This was retaliation, caught on camera.
Must have been a heck of a party to celebrate the win over Kristaps Porzingis
Nikola Jokic: early frontrunner for prestigious Cojones Player of Month award.
Luka Doncic puts up a 24-14-8 line in the Mavs' win over Grizzlies. He sat the whole fourth quarter instead of stat padding and hunting his fifth triple-double of the season.
Mavs have faced the NBA's bottom three teams in offensive efficiency this week. Using three different starting lineups, the Mavs allowed those teams to score an average of 32.7 points in the first quarter.
Load management for the Grizzlies’ prized rookie, who sat out summer league after knee surgery.
Kristaps Porzingis will not play Saturday night in Memphis, the second game of the Mavs' first back-to-back. The official reason: injury recovery, left knee. The Mavs have been clear that they would take a cautious approach with Porzingis as he returned from a 20-month lay-off.
Bojan Bogdanovic’s $73 million deal looks like a bargain so far for the Jazz. He’s averaging 21.8 ppg and is a bucket away from 50/40/90 after going for 33 and the game-winner to beat the Bucks tonight.
Mavs have used 6 starting lineups in 8 games. Rick Carlisle: "I’m open to getting something consistent, but ... the way we’re structured, we’re probably going to need to be fluid and flexible. And the guys have handled it well. It’s not easy, I get it."
Luka Doncic wasn’t happy with his career-high 38 points and a triple-double. He blamed himself for loss because he took a stepback from halfcourt logo when Mavs had a chance to tie late. “I made a bad decision. That wasn’t the shot I was looking for. I let my team down again.”
Rick Carlisle and Kristaps Porzingis declined to comment on whether he'd play Saturday night in Memphis. But Porzingis likely sits second night of Mavs' first back-to-back. Team has been clear they'd err on side of caution with him coming off 20-month layoff.
Kristaps Porzingis snapped out of a personal mini-funk with 28 points on 11-22 FG in Mavs' loss to Knicks. KP: "Tonight I took a step forward. It sucks that we didn’t get the win. Whoever the opponent is, I just want to help this team win games. That’s the main thing for me."
Kristaps Porzingis fouls out with 28 points and 9 rebounds. He had to commit his sixth foul after allowing Julius Randle to grab a clutch offensive rebound off of a missed free throw.
Luka Doncic has a career-high 38 points and his fourth triple-double of the season. But it doesn’t look like it will be enough to beat the Knicks.
All the power forwards the Knicks signed this summer have scored in double digits vs. Kristaps Porzingis’ Mavs.
Luka Doncic and Kristaps Porzingis have combined for 57 points in three quarters .... but the Mavs trail the 1-win Knicks by 4. Luka has a 32-12-9 line, an assist shy of his fourth triple-double of the season.
The Knicks are shooting better from the 3-point line than the free throw line. But they’re 11-19 from 3.
Kristaps Porzingis’ 18 points match his highest-scoring half of the season. He’s 7-of-12 from the floor against his former team.
Challenge was successful. Clean block.
Kristaps Porzingis is in a good offensive grove with 16 points in 13 minutes but just picked up his third foul, pending Rick Carlisle’s challenge. Worth using challenge to try to keep KP on the floor and in the flow.
The Mavs allowed the Knicks, No. 29 in the league in offensive efficiency, to score 36 points in the first quarter.
Luka Doncic scored or assisted on the Mavs’ first 25 points. Has 11 points and 5 assists in 9 minutes.
Rick Carlisle refers to Gordon Hayward’s struggles last year and success now as an example of the process that Kristaps Porzingis is going through. “I’m not saying it’s going to take that long for KP, but what I am saying is we’ve all got to manage expectations for this.”
He'd be the first guy I'm asking about in trade talks with the Blazers. A 20-year-old certified bucket getter.
I doubted as much as anyone, but there's no denying that Dwight Howard has accepted his role with the Lakers and been a major contributor in their early success.
Basically, the Clippers are fined because Doc Rivers keeps contradicting the league office's justification for letting them sit Kawhi Leonard.
James Harden: “We’re getting there game by game. We don’t really practice a lot. We’re a vet team, so he leaves it to us to go out there in a game and compete at a high level and kind of work our way into conditioning that way. Individually, we’ve got to make sure we’re on that.”
A sore right shoulder has been a factor in Clint Capela's slow start. He hurt it playing for Swiss national team and has been working to strengthen it. "Getting there slowly," he said, adding that it's really bothered him trying to dunk with one hand and reaching for rebounds.
After getting DNP-CDs in the first 6 games, JJ Barea had 11 points and 3 assists in 16 minutes off the Mavs' bench tonight in W over Magic. Heck of a return for a 5-foot-10 35-year-old coming back from a ruptured Achilles.
“Nothing happened,” Russell Westbrook said. He did nod when asked if he bumped knees, but no concern.
Mike D’Antoni keeps mentioning that the Rockets “aren’t quite in shape.”
Russell Westbrook came up limping after a drive and hobbled to the bench. He took a seat instead of heading to the locker room to be evaluated.
James Harden scored 20 points in the second quarter. Warriors’ rook probably bit off more than he can chew.
Rockets don’t seem to have solved their defensive issues. The Warriors’ G League team scored 29 points on 50% shooting in the first quarter. Houston up one.
Steve Kerr mentioned that second-round rookie F Eric Paschall, fresh off a 34-point, 13-rebound performance in a win over Blazers, has potential to develop into a PJ Tucker type defender. Pretty high praise.
Rockets G Eric Gordon (left hamstring soreness) is listed as questionable for Wednesday's game vs. Warriors. Gordon has struggled mightily this season, averaging 10.3 points on 27.8% shooting.
I lost my fantasy football game by one f—ing point because of Amari Cooper’s touchdown.
Not hard to see the similarities in their games.
Unlike the Cowboys, the black cat got into the end zone.
Players generating 50 points per game for their team so far this season (points scored  points created by assists): James Harden (35.3  18.8  54.1) LeBron James (25.5  27.3  52.8) Luka Doncic (26.7  24.2  50.9) Kyrie Irving (30.5  20.2  50.7)
#LeaguePassAlert
This is a continuation of the Rockets' cautious preseason approach with Westbrook, who underwent spring knee surgery and wasn't clear for live 5-on-5 work until just before training camp began.
Source: Russell Westbrook will sit out the Rockets' game in Memphis due to rest. That was the original plan, but coach Mike D'Antoni left the door open to reconsidering after Westbrook played only 26 minutes in Sunday's blowout loss in Miami.
Jazz offensive efficiency with Donovan Mitchell: 107.3 points per 100 possessions, which would rank tied for 12th in NBA. Jazz offensive efficiency when he sits: 82.0, which would rank last by a whole lot.
Per @bball_ref, there have now been 14 times that a player 20 or younger put up a 25-plus-point triple-double. Luka Doncic has half of them, including both games this weekend. (Others: LeBron James 5, Shareef Abdur-Rahim, De'Aaron Fox)
Luka Doncic has his third triple-double of the season. There is 3:44 remaining in the third quarter.
Playing in Cleveland is special for Luka Doncic because it's the American city with the largest Slovenian population, and a lot of those folks show up to watch him. Had 35-11-6 there last year. Already at 13-4-4 after a quarter tonight.
The Rockets had five buckets in the first quarter. So did Jimmy Butler, and he also had five assists. Heat up 32.
Heat 24, Rockets 4 when the first subs come in, so I don’t think switching up the starting lineup had the desired effect for Mike D’Antoni.
I always check net rating rankings before voting on ESPN’s NBA power rankings. The No. 2 team as of now: Monty Williams’ Phoenix Suns.
Jazz backup center Ed Davis has a fractured left fibula and will miss at least four weeks, the team announced.
League office acknowledges the obvious: Dwight Howard held Seth Curry to free up Danny Green for his OT-forcing 3.
Doncic gets stitches; Mavs unhappy with refs - via @ESPN App
Kristaps Porzingis scored only two points on 1-of-6 shooting in the second half and overtime in the loss to the Lakers. Rick Carlisle: “I’ve got to do a better job of getting him shots.” Porzingis’ take:
Luka Doncic was quite flattered by LeBron James telling him he’s a “bad motherf—er” after their triple-double duel.
Luka Doncic got three stitches to close the laceration in his head.
Seth Curry mentioned that Mavs blew two chances to foul on last possession of 4Q. “Even so, I knew what play was coming. ... I’m still there to take away that pass, and then Dwight Howard grabbed me and it was a no-call right in front of the official. It’s just unfortunate.”
Luka Doncic is about to get stitches.
Luka Doncic’s head is still bleeding.
Why not foul up 3 on the last possession of regular? The Mavs were supposed to but didnt execute the plan. “The fact that we weren’t able to do that, that’s on me,” Rick Carlisle said.
Since LeBron’s dagger 3, Luka Doncic has spent a lot of time venting to the refs. He pointed to his chin and back of the head, telling Mark Lindsay he took elbows to both with no calls. He just showed Sean Wright a scratch from his last drive.
Danny Green drills the OT-forcing 3 right in front of Mark Cuban, who he left hanging in free agency this summer. Ouch.
Mavs chief athletic trainer Casey Smith is spending every second of the timeouts trying to deal with the cut in Luka Doncic’s head. Doncic dishes out a clutch dime in between visits.
The Mavs’ best defense against that runaway freight train of a LeBron fast break was Rick Carlisle impolitely requesting a T for hanging on the rim.
Luka Doncic has a career-high 13 assists. Several, like that lob to Maxi Kleber over traffic, have been absolutely spectacular.
Alex Caruso just threw down the nastiest dunk ever by a balding white man.
Luka Doncic had 10 points and 6 assists during the Mavs’ 27 point third quarter. You could make a nice highlight reel for him from those 12 minutes.
Make that 10 for Luka. That LeBron guy (23-5-10) is playing pretty well tonight, too.
Luka Doncic has a triple-double with a couple of minutes left in the third quarter. He loves the national stage.
Look for that stepback 3 over LeBron on Luka’s Instagram later.
Boban is making his Mavs debut. Had been DNP-CD so far.
Mavs’ depth won them the game in Denver this week. Need it now with Luka Doncic and Kristaps Porzingis both in early foul trouble.
Luka Doncic showed the ref that he was bleeding — so he shoulda got a foul call — and then was annoyed when they called an “infection control” break.
You know Dwight Howard really is buying into being a role player because he’s playing offensive line pregame.
LeBron was completely unfazed by infamous Dallas reporter Scoops Callahan, transitioning from 1920s gibberish to 2019 cliches within one sentence.
I bet Nike would be on board with this.
Related: Mike Conley and Rudy Gobert are feeling out the rhythm of their pick-and-roll. Conley got a bunch of his buckets off Gobert screens last night and also connected with the big fella on a couple of lobs.
“It’s a lonely place where I was the last week or so,” Mike Conley told ESPN after he busted out of his funk with 29 points. That’s why he so enjoyed the love showered on him by Jazz fans, saying the emotion “was just built up and just burst out.”
Jimmy Butler scrolling Instagram ...
If the NBA really wants to punish Joel Embiid and Karl-Anthony Towns, forget a suspension. Gotta ground them from their phones.
I think this heavyweight is enjoying watching a couple of others duke it out.
Mike Conley in his first four games with the Jazz: 31 points, 9-45 FG Conley tonight: 29 points, 11-17 FG
Houston and Washington split tonight’s home-and-home series.
Mike Conley has 15 points, two assists, one standing ovation and one chant in the first 7:08 of the third quarter.
Mike Conley’s game has finally arrived in Utah. He’s usually even keeled as they come, but he’s fired up, hollering back at the crowd, after hitting a 3 and a driving layup. Has 16 on 7-10 FG tonight. Was 9-45 FG in first four games.
Buried beneath James Harden’s 59, Bradley Beal’s 46, Russell Westbrook’s triple-double ... Isaiah Thomas (17 points, 10 assists off the Wiz bench) looked the best I’ve seen him in a long time. Potential for a cool comeback story.
League Pass recovered for the final seconds. What a wild win for the Rockets.
I was thinking Rockets-Wizards was the most entertaining game that nobody was watching due to the World Series. Then League Pass dealt me low blow in the final minute.
Doc Rivers on new Jazz PG Mike Conley's struggles: "Now everything is new for him. He’s playing, as I say, home-road games for a while. Eventually, Utah will be home for him, and he’ll be back to being Mike Conley. Tell him to take his time. At least one more night."
Just outside the American Airlines Center, which Dirk often sarcastically told Mark Cuban is the house that he built.
The Clippers are officially listing Kawhi Leonard as out vs. Jazz due to "load management, knee," satisfying the NBA's new requirement to list a specific body part. However, Doc Rivers said Leonard "has never felt better."
Doc Rivers says there is no set plan on how they will handle back-to-backs with Kawhi Leonard. “Case by case,” Rivers said.
Kawhi Leonard will sit out tonight in Utah and play tomorrow in San Antonio, Doc Rivers said.
The Jazz might be the best collection of never-been-All-Star talent in NBA history. Can they win a West loaded with superstar duos?
7-26 FG for Doncic and Porzingis. Math has never been my strength, and that’s still ugly.
Nuggets were on back-to-back, but it's awfully encouraging for the Mavs to pull out a win in Denver on off night for Luka Doncic and Kristaps Porzingis. Dallas stars combined for 22 points on 7-29 FG. Tim Hardaway Jr. (14 points, 5-9 FG) was one of 7 other Mavs in double figures.
Another Jackie Mac masterpiece: From no stars to All-Stars: KD, Kyrie and the chance to start anew
Russell Westbrook has “no friends when I hoop,” but he was all smiles when he visited the Thunder locker room after beating his old team.
Chris Paul mentioned that he talks to former Rockets teammates PJ Tucker and Gary Clark almost every day. “Hope I don’t get them in trouble.” Why would they get in trouble? "I don’t know, just saying. You just never know. Never know. Tricky league. "
James Harden on getting tangled up with Chris Paul after this play: "He’s just trying to start something. Laughs. Nothing happened. I didn’t even know Chris was right there."
Russell Westbrook: 21 points, 12 rebounds, 9 assists, game-best plus-19 in Rockets’ 116-112 win over the Thunder. After a slow start, Russ was a dominant force for the final three quarters. James Harden: 40 points, 21-22 FT.
PJ Tucker: 4-of-6 on 3s. Rest of the Rockets: 5-of-36.
Russell Westbrook is two assists shy of a triple-double. He’s generated four good looks for teammates early in the fourth, but the didn’t knock down the shots.
Third quarter scoring: Rockets 39, Thunder 18. James Harden had 12 points and 2 assists in the quarter. Russell Westbrook: 6 points, 3 rebounds, 4 assists and 1 tech for talking trash.
Ref Natalie Sago heard enough from Chris Paul and T’d him up. He’d been barking at her since Paul got tangled up with James Harden while Harden was celebrating an oop he threw Russell Westbrook.
Thunder 62, Rockets 52 at the half despite only 2 points and 2 assists from Chris Paul. Houston is 4-of-25 on 3s. Russell Westbrook is close to a triple-double pace (8-5-4).
After one quarter, Russ only needs 10 points, 8 rebounds and 9 assists for a triple-double. Thunder up 13 over the Rockets.
The typically late-arriving crowd at the Toyota Center offered polite applause for Chris Paul during the Thunder’s pregame intros.
The Rockets announced that Gerald Green is expected to miss "approximately six months" after undergoing surgery to repair the broken bone in his left foot. A source told ESPN it's "highly doubtful" that Green could return this season even if the Rockets make a deep playoff run.
Sign that the chemistry is starting to click between Luka Doncic and Kristaps Porzingis: Doncic dished 5 assists to Porzingis vs. Portland. Doncic had only one dime to his new co-star through the Mavs' first two games.
Luka Doncic: “I lost that game. Bad shot selection. ... They were in the bonus. I should have drove it.”
Zach Collins said the shoulder “popped back in so cleanly” that it’s a good sign. He is out vs. Spurs today and status beyond that depends on MRI results.
Blazers 121, Mavs 119 (final). Stars on both teams put on a show. Damian Lillard/CJ McCollum: 63 points, 9 rebounds, 9 assists. Luka Doncic/Kristaps Porzingis: 61 points, 21 rebounds, 14 assists.
Terry Stotts’ challenge to get Damian Lillard’s foul call overturned was successful. Jump ball instead of Dorian Finney-Smith going to line for potential go-ahead free throws.
Damian Lillard had two points in the first half. He has 28 after that driving layup to give the Blazers the lead with 26.8 seconds remaining.
Zach Collins is out the rest of the game, per Blazers. No word yet on severity of his left shoulder injury.
Trail Blazers PF/C Zach Collins heads to the locker room holding his left shoulder.
#LeaguePassAlert for the Ja Morant show in Memphis. The rookie scored 17 in the fourth quarter, including a tough lefty finish in traffic to tie it up with seconds remaining, then blocked Kyrie Irving’s shot to send it to OT.
Luka Doncic/Kristaps Porzingis in the first half: 32 points, 12 rebounds, 9 assists. Might not be long before they’re in the conversation about the league’s elite duos.
Kristaps Porzingis playing center is a big problem for Hassan Whiteside. Porzingis has 13 points in 10 minutes after knocking down 3s on back-to-back possessions, the second from well behind the arc.
Don Knobler, the Mavs fan banned last season for cursing at Clippers guard Patrick Beverley, is in a courtside seat at the American Airlines Center tonight.
James Harden laughed about this postgame and said it didn’t hurt: “I’ve got my beard, so that protected me.”
Austin Rivers on the Pelicans: “That team is going to be in contention for the playoffs, I can promise you that. Especially when they get Zion back.”
James Harden is 4-of-31 from 3-point range through two games. Mike D’Antoni: “He’s just lost his rhythm a little bit. ... Nothing to worry about. There’s no way it’s going to last his way. He’s fine.”
Russell Westbrook: 28 points, 10 rebounds and 13 assists in the Rockets’ 126-123 win. Had 10 points in fourth quarter — 8 in lead-seizing run to start the quarter while James Harden rested and two clutch free throws with seconds remaining.
That’s the 139th triple-double of Russell Westbrook’s career, breaking a tie with Magic Johnson for the second most all-time. Oscar Robertson had 181.
Russell Westbrook is in takeover mode: 8 points, an assist and a steal in first 2:33 of fourth quarter.
Brandon Ingram has his fifth career 30-point game with a quarter left to play. Strange but true: Lakers were 0-4 when he got 30. Pelicans lead the Rockets by 3.
The beard softens the impact.
Heck of a half by the former Lakers lotto picks on the Pelicans. Lonzo Ball: 13 points, 6 assists, 3-5 3s. Brandon Ingram: 18 points, 6 rebounds, 7-9 FG. Tied at 61 in Houston.
James Harden finally got a 3 to fall on his seventh attempt of the night. He’s 2-of-15 from long range so far this season. My hunch is he’ll keep letting em fly.
With Jrue Holiday out, Josh Hart will start for the Pelicans and open as the primary defender on James Harden, coach Alvin Gentry says.
The background and DJ have returned, but the Rockets’ red carpet was even more short-lived than the Melo era.
After six quarters with the Jazz, Mike Conley’s shooting percentage (.048) would be a legal breathalyzer test.
The Knicks did also get off two significant salaries in that deal to clear cap space for a plethora of power forwards.
Most triple-doubles before turning 21: Luka Doncic 9 Magic Johnson 7 LeBron James 5
Luka Doncic has eight assists early in the third quarter. I think half of them made me go, “Ooooh!”
Kristaps Porzingis looked pretty comfortable while scoring 17 points in the first half. There is exactly one man in the world that tall with such a versatile skill set.
In an apparent tribute to Dirk’s defensive legacy, the Mavs allowed the Pelicans to score 41 points in the first quarter.
Mike D’Antoni on the Rockets’ pace with Russell Westbrook: “Six seconds or less, baby. We’re working on it.” Houston had 27 fast break points in the opener, matching their most in any game last season.
One game into the season, Wes Matthews looks like a massive vet minimum bargain for his hometown Bucks. Scored 14 points on 6-12 FG — including a clutch 3 — and spent a lot of the night as the head of the snake in the team defense on James Harden.
On a related note, Russ on media day: "There’s going to be adversity. There’s going to be times where I’m upset, James is upset, but I’m able to kind of able to sit there and let him know what he’s able to do about himself and vice versa."
An animated on-court discussion between Russell Westbrook and James Harden is far from evidence of any friction between two stars who have been friends for two decades and decided this summer to reunite on the Rockets. Russ when asked about that exchange:
James Harden: “This one’s on me. I wasn’t aggressive enough.”
Brook Lopez has all 11 of his points in the fourth quarter. He’s punishing the Rockets for playing small.
Giannis Antetokounmpo fouls out with 30 points, 13 rebounds, 11 assists ... and 5:18 to play.
James Harden in the second half so far: 0 points, 0-6 FG. Rockets down 6, 5:31 to go.
The runnin’ Rockets have 24 fast break points with 7:42 to go after that nasty Russell Westbrook dunk off a James Harden dime. The most they had in any game last season: 27. That’s the Russ effect.
Giannis has a 30-13-10 line going. And the Bucks have the lead.
James Harden has four fouls and 10 free throws made late in the first half. The whistle giveth and taketh away.
T-shirts in Toyota Center stands read: FIGHT FOR FREEDOM on the front and CHINA, STOP BULLYING on the back.
James Harden in the first quarter: 8 points, 0-2 FG, 8-8 FT
Man, Tyson Chandler looks bouncy for a 19-year vet. He says, half-kidding, that he has some juice left because he barely played the last four years.
Rockets and Bucks both successfully challenge calls in the first 10 minutes of the game. Rough start for ref crew.
Mike D’Antoni tried to challenge the offensive foul call that negated a James Harden 3. No can do. Already used his one challenge to get Giannis a charge.
Russell Westbrook’s first official field goal attempt as a Rocket: a 3 that he banked in, of course.
The Greek Freak didn’t exactly come ready for the red carpet.
James Harden’s red carpet journey:
James Harden wasn’t joking when he said the Rockets — maybe the most fashion-conscious team in NBA history — would have a red carpet complete with music (live DJ!!!) at home games.
Does this mean the Astros’ statement ripping the integrity of the Sports Illustrated reporter was misleading and completely inappropriate?
Remember when one of the big questions about Luka pre-draft was whether he’d be able to create his own shot?
How will Russ-Harden dynamic work? Mike D’Antoni: “We're not going to make it too complicated. They're MVPs. They'll put up MVP numbers. I don't have to interject how smart I am. That'll just screw it up. They're really f---ing good."
Bradley Beal praises Luka Doncic: 'He was kicking our butts'
KP: "I'm still getting there. I'm not where I want to be, but I'm getting there, and I have to be content with the game I had and the game we had. We won the game in the end. That's most important. For the first game, for myself being out that long, I think I did pretty OK."
Luka: "That’s what basketball is about. You don’t have no friends on the court. I respect him for doing that. Everybody’s saying he’s only a fancy player. No, he showed he’s great on defense, too."
Luka Doncic's 34 points, one shy of his career high, is the highest-scoring season opener by a player under 21 years old in NBA history. (@ESPNStatsInfo)
Luka Doncic on Kristaps Porzingis: “He played amazing for that much time out. I know he’s going to be even better and better after this.”
It got chippy between them, but Bradley Beal has no beef with Luka Doncic. “It’s just goops,” Beal said. “He’s got a bright future. He’s very mature for his age. He’s been a pro since he was 10 probably. He knows what he’s doing.”
Rick Carlisle wearing one of Fred McLeod’s ties sent by the Cavs announcer’s widow Beth.
Kristaps Porzingis’ debut in Dallas: 23 points (7-16 FG), 4 rebounds, 2 assists, 1 steal, 1 block
Extended edginess resulted in double T’s on Bradley Beal and Luka Doncic. Then ref Jonathan Sterling gave Beal another T and tossed him.
Luka Doncic has an easy 32 points (12-18 FG) in 28 minutes. He’s hit half of his 8 3-point attempts, and the work he did to slim down this summer is paying off with him a half-step quicker off the dribble.
Luka Doncic puts up an efficient 20 points (7-11 FG) in the first half. Poor Davis Bertans ended up on an island against him way too often.
Tim Hardaway Jr. just returned to the Mavs’ bench after getting his right ankle checked out. He’s available to return.
Kristaps Porzingis went scoreless during his first stint with the Mavs, missing four shots. He found his rhythm after a short rest, scoring 9 points in final 2:45 of the quarter (despite getting called for a couple of walks when he tried to drive).
Lakers gotta get Danny Green some help.
Well, you see why the Mavs were willing to wait so long for Danny Green to make his decision in free agency.
Norm Powell is no Dame Lillard.
You can't foul out a dude with a fresh max contract on that call!
Chinese state TV does not air NBA's opening night slate - via @ESPN App
Playing 1-on-1 with my fifth grader daughter (rule: I can only shoot lefty outside paint) ... Her: “I’m up six.” Me: “I can do the math.” Her: “Really? Because you can’t even help with my math homework.” Hurts because it’s true.
